Sent1
render one language in another language
nations unified by shared interests, history or institutions
convert into absorbable substances, (as if) with heat or chemical process
devote or adapt exclusively to an skill, study, or work
elevated wooden porch of a house
either half of an archery bow
a removable device that is an accessory to larger object
restrict or confine
orient, be positioned
Bring back to life, return from the dead
anything illusory, not concrete or real
a name or trait that identifies a product or type of thing
the processing or operation of something
line, cover
determine a standard; estimate a capacity or measurement
an interpretation, an account or reading of an event or situation
festive social event, celebration
Make fine adjustments to for optimal operation; adjust to a certain scale.
a short lyric or poem intended to be sung
effectively wield or manipulate a concrete entity
employ or become employed in a position
group of people defined by a specific profession
storage cabinet furniture
Signal (approval or interest) by winking; briefly shut one eye.
capital stock in a corporation
prove or corroborate
(the content of) a communication.
a partial denture
move to a lower position, terminate something
flow, as of liquids
seal, insulate or protect
scar physically; create a mark on someone or something
Surround completely; close in, as if with a covering or border.
the act or event of ending a process, state, situation
the price of a good or service
depict or portray in art, words, or model
travel in or be shaped like a zigzag
Annoy, harass, or mock, perhaps playfully.
(Cause to) smell bad.
social ranking or position
ponder, consider, observe carefully
persuade or achieve acceptance
physical matter left behind after a removal process
any tall, vertical shape
physically inflate
heavy radioactive metallic element, atomic number 92
Complain about something or say mean things to someone.
care about, be bothered by, be concerned by
the tallied points of a game, at a given time
edit so as to block the truth; prevent distribution
a casual, brief meeting with someone
an electrical connection between conductor and earth
an agent's act of terminating an activity or event
notable or famous persons (real or fictional)
a person who manipulate or controls a device or machine
find, determine the place of
to engage in plotting or activities of an illegal or deceitful nature
be equivalent, have the same effect as something
(cause to) survive
the money
a sudden emotional vocalization
go back, restore, revive
settlement of people distant from their homeland
(The discovery or exhibition of) factual evidence that establishes the truth of something.
enter a realm, become involved with
a project or undertaking
a standardized system of measurements for heaviness
a concern or affair
have a strong sexual attraction to
a surrogate expression, utterance for a taboo word
facility for secure storage of things, often money
emit or cause to emit noise
make physical contact with, possibly with the effect of physically manipulating.
find out or be informed of a new information, understand or realize
head of a country
Touch with the lips.
a natural physical force of drawing towards something
a change which is a decrease
an evaluation, an estimation of worth, a grade
having responsibility for managing or supervising
fail or suffer failure
an abundance of something
An authoritative text or the corresponding citation.
An instance of visual perception.
fluctuate, move back and forth
the alleviation of distress
A ceremony marking admission into a religious community.
a social gesture of deferential greeting
move to a new location, state, or situation
Change one for another
a full stop, as a punctuation mark
something that is craved
to grow rapidly
Speak in a high-pitched tone of voice, as either an animal or human might.
domesticated animals kept for use or profit
a discipline, a branch of knowledge
a person who is aggressively pursued, chased
personnel casualty
escape or avoid a situation or responsibility
a relative loss in price, value
a measurable or quantitative decrease
Change the key, pitch, tone, or volume of, likely for aesthetic reasons.
a written message of nonacceptance
(cause to) stop speaking or bring about silence
injure, scratch the surface
A plant structure near the top of the plant.
a written list of particular things being offered
a notational mark used in writing, diacritic
the state of believing in, or having confidence in, something or someone
an attempt or effort to achieve a goal
increase in amount, extent, or intensity
clean, wash thoroughly
compress out of shape or into small pieces
point or direct object, weapon, or blow at something or someone
employ or utilize, put into service
Spin, wind, braid, or twist together, perhaps as when performing lacework.
a decorative container, often for holding flowers
preserve, keep in safety, use frugally
an open motorboat used for transport
a process of development, increase or advancement
Make sure of.
supply or furnish with something needed or wanted
a sharp bladed instrument for shaving off hair
learn, assimilate a body of knowledge
support; hold up; nurture or provide for
keep away, prevent from happening, or not do something
Something that provides advice.
The act of copying the actions of someone else.
a physical entity
lessen in force, impact, or effect
a judgement or opinion about something
flog or whip
act, form, or progress according to a plan or ideal
Germinate, as in a plant.
social sphere, scope of activity or interest
a static vertical layout, e.g. text or numbers
recognize, be familar or well-versed with
a portrayal of someone or something, through words or behavior
a device to control the rate of some activity, e.g., chemical or mechanical
Form an aesthetic or conceptual whole.
human legs, informal usage
goal or objective
protect from heat, cold, or other detrimental conditions
an allotment or percentage of something
something that attains victory
line up or make parallel; bring into proper adjustment
a home furnishing that is a fabric cover
meshed frame over windows and doors
a measure of the likelihood or probability of an event
Anyone who judges or finds fault with something.
the rescue or release of someone, something
observe, perceive
limit, keep under control, deter, forbid
stick out, jut out, protrude
to act as the host of
put an end to, make invalid a process that's already begun
enjoy, be fond of or approve
per centum
an approximate attribute or quality of something
The act of having and controlling property.
a physical protuberance, large or small
estimate or calculate the numerical value of something
a portion or percentage of a whole
lightest most abundant element, atomic number 1
a unit cost of something
move back and forth
a cyclical span of time defined by a calendar system
face an event and survive; endure
(medicine) the capacity of an organism to defend against disease.
a statement, an idea expressed in language
perform a duty
soldier who is a member of a special forces group
become master of, overcome, dominate
area of damaged, cut tissue on a living body
revolve
twice the quantity or amount of something
Give an incentive for action, provoke or stir up, urge on, or cause to act.
Funeral direction
to ignite or catch on fire
a large approximate quantity of some attribute or thing
Medicines
a method for solving a problem
reach an objective, attain a benchmark or goal
take something or someone away from somewhere
a stiffener in a garment
a constructed underground passageway
discern, identify, or know because of a previous experience
move or change one's own position or quality
incorporate or enclose one thing in another
guide, draw through
rescue, redeem, deliver from harm or danger
beat (as if) with a whip or rod
the medical procedure of manually turning the uterus
create an edge or border
restart or continue an activity after an interruption or pause
capture, ensnare, discover in the act
initiation, founding, introduction of something
a creased or bent form
train, tutor or polish social behavior, taste, judgement
a mental activity of construing or interpreting
emphasize; draw attention to; underline
possibility for the future
require or need something that is missing
an indication or manifestation of something, often physical
a sudden, brief burst of light
come or bring back to life, health, existence or use
A mental state of sadness.
position or location change
(cause to) move through a space, circuit or system, usu. returning to the starting point
bring in to consonance
submit, send to
state of being unified
(Cause to) become different or aquire a different character, possibly during development.
an objective or goal
seize and take captive; take or gain possession of something
give, dedicate, pledge
decide a specific time for an event
value a thing or course of action more highly than another
give something for a cause
furnish with a guideline
a social entreaty, as courtship or pleading
fail in strength or health and cease to funtion
reply verbally or in written form to a question, comment, letter, or speech
a slight cut in a physical surface
cause something to be the case
a state of confinement in a small space
state or explain the meaning
cause animals to move
be against, resist
a quantity of money added to a bank account
cause to come into existence; create
Performance, routine
people assembled together in a rhythmic movement
a computer server
forbid, prohibit
computer text files
a speech act of acknowledging gratitude for something
a state of pretending to be someone, something else
Become widespread as an idea or feeling.
connect with; reach a target or goal
income collected as tax by a government
be the deciding factor in a state of affairs or an outcome
end
a region allocated to hold something
acknowledge a contribution or cause
arrangement
system of arrangement
close within bounds; deprive of freedom
to collect, acquire or gather
deliver a formal talk or reprimand at length
a pair of mated people, e.g., married
rot; become unfit for consumption
lock with one another
take vows, join or allow to join a religious order
activity of selling
give out, allow to have
secondary public school, grades 9-12
Benjamin Rush, physician and American Revolutionary leader.
luggage compartment of a car
have a monopoly of; control fully
reduce to a simpler molecular compound
cause to be interested
To remain emotionally or intellectually attached without necessary physical contact.
The act of transporting goods commerically at rates cheaper than express rates.
(An occurance of) the preservation or management of natural resources.
remove the pod, husk or shell
abstain from eating or from certain foods
feel hot or painful, as if burning
(cause to) return after being refused
a loss of function
administrator, one who controls resources
a stovetop, cooking appliance
rinse one's mouth with mouthwash, gargle
a quantity that is an approximate calculation
turn on an axis; spin
marriage offer
Try to gain favor by flattering or showing submission or fear.
the public submission of a legal record
Shrivel, wither, or mature imperfectly, as of a flower.
have faith in, bet on
burst into flames (telic)
The cognitive processes and capacity to remember.
mechanism that controls the water level in a section of canal
an onerous worry or concern
someone or something that is the agent of fulfilling desired expectations
a sharp side of an object
the forceful hit of a ball
Fine powdery material; the remains of something destroyed or broken up.
throw with force
Treat a substance with some agent; add an agent to.
pass through the esophagus
move freely (usually within a bounded space)
secrete or form water
the state of being in contact
a variant of a musical theme which employs notes of reduced duration from the original theme
time to come
the legal state of owing money
a style and size of typeset
demand, ask for, or take as one's due
Cause to be distrusted or rejected; damage the reputation of.
Give equal rights to, as of the right to vote.
(cause to) lengthen or expand in time or some abstract realm
a knapsack, bundle on the back
a person who delivers information or goods
having an intuitive understanding or appreciation of something
adherence to moral principles
have sex with
partake or provide a banquet
idolize/show devotion to
make a ticking sound
run or flow slowly
Write a computer programme.
a state of social order in conformance with existing law
An electronic storage device.
a reference line used to align lettering
the quality of dedication, fixity of purpose
Look furtively at something.
cast off, get rid of something
recover posession or get back again
a coefficient assigned to elements in a frequency distribution in order to indicate the relative importance of each element
(cause to) move around
become due
Provide medical care for.
do over, make new
coat, cover, or treat the surface of
BASEBALL: strike out a batter
Regain or make up for, as of a financial loss.
duplicate, match
indistinct vocal articulations
the act of shoving something away
move or drive forcefully as if by a punch.
an intense surprise, often unpleasant
Make less emotionally hostile; win over mentally or emotionally.
informal usage for a domestic cat, often young
The act of sorting one thing from others.
the act of physically affixing or connecting things
the people who dwell in a camp
An unforseen development.
bring into general popular/common use
make impure; make radioactive
a long, thin implement, usually made of wood
Formally reject or disavow a formerly held belief; retract a statement.
(Cause to) to turn to the left side.
Entail as a necessary accompaniment or result
Physically attach to something.
assign to a particular task
culminating event
act of constructing
the primary information-processing component of a computer, of a microprocessor chip
consider again, usually with a view to changing
cancel, reverse, annul
define; determine essential qualities of
The pursuit and killing or capture of animals.
manipulate the registers of a musical instrument
move in an irregular course
the legal granting or bestowment of rights
jolt of electrical current to the body
Become pregnant.
the bestowing of a franchise, enfranchisment
act of distributing
The state of being more than satisfied or satiated.
conscious subjective emotion or desire
The act of proposing someone as a candidate for something.
to hunt snipe
hunt for hawks
a continuous horizontal layer of brick
a brief attempt at some endeavor
propagation of waves back from a surface
examine minutely; search diligently
enjoy, be fond of or approve
a person under the guardianship or custody of another
Strike or hit sharply, perhaps as in sport.
Fly in or on a glider plane
one fourth of a year
make an abstract thing tight or more restrictive
provide (a person or group) with power or authority
Run at a moderately swift pace, as for exercise.
Envelop completely; form a cover over.
mold for casting, setting concrete
cause friction; wear away or erode
A feeling for something that is desired intensely.
put or store in a bottle
Be a sign or indication of; have as a meaning.
the act of choosing, picking one among many
act of becoming distant, moving away from
take in marriage; perform a marriage ceremony
Skip, leap, or move up and down or sideways as a manner of motion.
a military fortification, stronghold
the fashionable elite of a given community
characteristic call of an animal
make or become more acute or intense
A journey for some purpose.
Fake or falsify; control in a fraudulent manner.
fruit cooked down with sugar, jam
the act of leading or guiding others
coating used as a repellant to moisture
a person who cleans chimneys
Shine intensely; emit a steady, even light from a source.
behave in a certain way; have a specific effect or outcome
communicate with a hiss
a male bee whose function is to fertilize the queen
a sporting match, boxing
cause to reproduce (plants or animals)
The feeling of annoyance at being hindered or thwarted.
move along on wheels
[provide with a new or different resting place
activity of extracting ore or other matter from the ground
to interrupt, enter uninvited
A person or thing equal to another in value or significane.
a cause or source of harm
make (more) comprehensible
the state of being retained
a problem, something wrong
stretch out or over completely
continue to live, exist, or prosper
a caress with the lips
Provide with rails, as by laying.
the close approach of one object to another
make a hole with a pointed tool
Fix (something old) with a new part; improve.
the act of damaging something, causing breakage
the ground level of a multi-storied building
A quantity of something
a large room
leave out, omit, prevent from entering
Sniff at inquiringly.
provide lodging for
Change the purpose or functioning of a system.
provide with tools or items for a specific purpose
gain points in a game; add up (numbers)
travel in front of, be first, precede
Remove by rubbing
the hard upper part of the human nose
make shine
recover, return to former state
remove the pod, husk or shell
speed up the process of
(cause to) swing and miss the third pitch, striking out
Literally and quantifiably raise in social rank or status.
alter by chemical means, to make images.
highly infectious viral disease
make a certain size or sort according to size
Remove tree stumps from an area.
pass the tongue over, take up with the tongue
a computer-generated visual image
do better in a competition; win
aerodynamic force that opposed gravity
Start abruptly, ignite
a local announcement made within a public broadcast
making real or concrete
Sound sharply or shrilly, as if stabbing.
the act of officially gaining entrance to somewhere
spend time in prison
hold, contain within
act of verbally informing
forcefully request
the quality of dissimilarity
throw quickly, flick
move to and fro around a particular point or points, remain near
Put up with something or someone unpleasant; show deference towards someone or some authority.
the breakup or termination of a social relationship
destruction of a ship
The human act of making something new.
ride (a bicycle or motorcycle)
The principal activity that one does to earn money.
maintain or preserve a particular condition, state, or activity
a spoken or written reply to a question
committee with supervisory powers
a section of a composition, textual or musical
a gear for changing the motion of a machine to the opposite direction
take a digestion-aiding walk after a meal
forked form or shape
insert or close with a plug
incite some act of insubordination
formally announce the termination of an agreement
beat or pound rapidly
Make a line or marks on a surface; copy by following the lines of
recite as a chant, intone
the ability of computers to exchange digital information between them and make use of it
act of applying force
the process of becoming less or smaller
Be in command of; exercise authority or control over.
be a factor or play a role in something
an expanse of land
move an implement through with a circular motion, mix
deprive of courage, hope, or optimism
the armed forces
Furnish with metal spurs.
Remove water from a substance.
Provide with rails, as by laying.
make or be a summary
be affected with smut or mildew
Talk or behave amorously; have sex with.
Excuse some minor social infraction; accept an excuse for something.
indicate, be signs or symptoms of
a verbal or written request for access to something.
have a logical result
Travel on foot.
the act of suction
A band of leather or rope made to identify animals.
Put a harness on.
Provide or equip specifically with furniture.
To move (the head or body) quickly downwards or away (from something).
reason or establish by deduction
Make pregnant; fertilize and cause to grow.
find the solution to or understand the meaning of
Move about in a confused or purposeless manner.
put up with something unpleasant
A means or agency by which something is communicated.
take apart into constituent pieces
A short theatrical program that is part of a longer program.
decree, issue an order
the termination, ending of a meeting
An indicator that orients one generally.
Increase the acoustic volume of.
open to members of all races and ethnic groups
reduce to small pieces by pounding or abrading
hit a fly (baseball)
FISHING-exhaust by allowing to pull on the line
be or come into conflict
Produce a phonemic click.
angle with a hook and line and draw through water
the front face of a building
make something more diverse or varied
issue bonds on something
women's sleeveless undergarment
Move oneself very fast.
Oppose or approach, as in hostility or competition
make more complex or intricate
cause to be/show to be invalid
create a new entity by putting components or members together
the activity of providing supplies
make or become brighter or lighter
actors in a play
take someone's soul into heaven
Discipline in personal or social activities.
a person eating a meal, often in a restaurant
A sudden (emotional) outburst.
make or become harder
the introductory portion of a story
work material with a tool
make or become less strict or severe
support by placing on or against something solid
Part, cease, or break association with (something).
have the financial means to obtain, buy, or do something
A list of candidates nominated by a political party to run for election.
say, state, or perform again
allow the passage of air
unite; merge with something already in existence
use resources or materials
make or become harder
(Cause to) be firmly attached or closed.
make or become wider or more extensive
Unrestricted freedom to use something.
laying claim, the act of taking possession of, or power over, something.
give structure to
mark with scars
(Baseball) Tag the base runner to get him out.
Be reflected as heat, light, or shock waves;.
a competitor most likely to win
make or become longer
be on base at the end of an inning
Either of the two categories (male or female) into which most organisms are divided, or key properties that distinguish the categories.
(science) The atomic weight of an element that has the same combining capacity as a given weight of another element.
provide with a toggle
(cause to) move back and forth or side to side
measure the depth of a body of water
make a loud noise, as an animal
The act of coming to rest after a voyage.
join or bring together (two) objects, ideas, or people
Make reference to something.
Behave violently, as if in a state of great anger; break or tear violently.
Form a spiral or move in a spiral course.
a feeling of aversion, distaste, antipathy
Release (gas or energy) as a result of a chemical reaction or physical decomposition (perhaps in a metaphorical sense)
overcome with amazement; flabbergast
behave in a condescending manner
take into one's family or group
(Contract bridge) the highest bid becomes the contract setting in the number of tricks that the bidder must make.
go on a campaign or off to war
react, or respond to a call, command, or stimulus
(Literally) sound with resonance.
an injury to the skin caused by radiation, heat or chemicals
make a causal or logical connection; group together
Apply conditioner to make smooth and shiny.
exercise or have power of memory
A feeling or state of extreme anger.
Wrinkled, crumpled, or creased.
Admit to testing/proof
an accounting period of 12 months
praise the qualities in order to sell or promote
relative darkness of a color
Strike heavily, especially with a fist or implement.
Make receptive or willing toward an action or belief.
open again, open anew
A conceptual formulation; a way of conceiving something.
heat metal prior to working it
feel the strong need to eat
be in direct physical contact with
Give suck to; receive suck.
covering for a bed
grip, penetrate or tear off with or as if with the teeth or jaws
play a stringed instrument with a bow
Doubt or an impression that something might not be the case.
A successful throw or try for a point after a touchdown.
Express audibly; utter sounds (not necessarily words); indicate.
hold back in uncertainty or unwillingness
a serving of a beverage
Give an incentive or reason for action.
the day before today
take or capture by force or authority
(Medicine) Apply a plaster cast to.
interfere with someone else's activity
Assign a new time for an event
Value measured by what must be given or done to obtain something.
touch or hold with the hands
scrape or rub to relieve itching
give a detailed account of
Any activity that acquires a person's attention.
cause to become awake or alert
provide a feast or banquet
The act of hindering someone's plans or efforts.
Fool or hoax (someone).
raising the stakes or bet of a game by a factor of 2
The (period of) control of a country by military forces of a foreign power.
(computer science) the occurence of an incorrect result produced by a computer.
give pleasure, satifaction, or happiness; be pleasing to
the soft padding under a saddle
elecate or idealize in allusion to Christ's transfiguration
inability of the heart to pump blood to sustain life functions
cause to vibrate in a different pattern
warn or call to a sense of preparedness
Adapt oneself to new or different conditions.
move faster, or cause to move faster
Supply food ready to eat, as for parties and banquets.
express protest or dissent, raise an objection
clear mucus from one's throat
pass into a state or condition
add embellishments (to medieval manuscripts)
make or become thick
move or execute very quickly or hastily
hurt, feel physical pain
tell or spread rumors; say
throw with force or recklessness; cast away
return to in thought or speech
Try to cure by special care or treatment, of an illness or injury; treat carefully.
a sweeping cut with a sharp instrument
Any address at which one dwells more than temporarily.
BOTANY -- the usually underground organ of a plant that lacks buds or leaves or nodes, which absorbs water and mineral salts; usually it anchors the plant to the ground.
Reproduce or make an exact copy of; make, do, or perform again.
pass (a thread) through or into,on or as if on a string
Engrave by means of dots.
have a strong desire to do something
be relevant or pertinent
indicate contempt by breathing noisily and forcefully through the news
become aware of through the senses
cause to be alert or energetic
Remove by erasing or crossing out, as if by drawing a line through.
cook slowly for a long time in liquid
the temperature at which a liquid boils, bubbles
Make a map of; show or establish the features or details of; explore or survey for the purposes of making a map.
The social force that binds one to the courses of action demanded by that force.
Avoid or try to avoid fulfilling, answering, or performing.
Lead someone in the wrong direction (physically); give wrong spatial directions.
maintain, assert, or claim
Improve by restoring to a previous or better condition.
make accessible to some action, influence, or condition
Approach a limit as the number of terms increases without limit; specifically a mathematical term.
The stiching that forms the rim of a shoe or boot.
put under the control of the federal government
Manual stimulation fo the genital area for sexual pleasure.
equip with a fuse
end of the American Revolution
(mathematics) The smallest whole number or a numeral representing this number.
stimulating or demanding factors of a situation
A physical portion of all or part of a natural object that is collected and preserved as an example of its class or total.
Amplify an electron current by causing part of the power on the output circuit to act upon the input circuit.
A human utters words loudly and forcefully.
oppose with equal weight or force
(Cause to) strike the air in flight.
Preserve in a tin or jar.
a chain of atoms in a molecule forming a closed loop
make the surface level or smooth
Impress or affect deeply (emotionally).
Supply with a constant flow of some liquid, for the purpose of cooling, cleansing, or disinfecting.
apply a thin coating of paint/metal
disregard, fail to attend to
make a short, sharp sound
connect or fasten into a chain by linking
beat thoroughly in a competition or fight
Look through a book or some other written material (for information).
state of being active
(theology) the act of deliving from sin or saving from evil.
declare or make unfit or unsuitable
Cook on a hot surface using fat; cook in oil.
Improve by pruning or polishing
An area that is central within some larger region.
start suddenly, as if from fright
Be larger in number, quantity, power, status, or importance, without personally having sovereign power.
Give oneself entirely to a specific person, activity, or cause.
the finger next to the thumb, forefinger
put up with something or someone (unpleasant)
role or function of the head of a government department
consider again, usually with a view to changing
drive at an excessive or illegal velocity
an air force military unit, smaller than a squadron
the act of giving someone a job, hiring someone
the act of annoying someone or something
Droop, sink, or settle from or as if from pressure or loss of tautness; become less intense.
Cite as an authority; resort to (as in an argument).
Allocate or dedicate; set aside or apart for a specific purpose or use.
make out of components (in an improvising manner)
rehearse, learn by repetition
Intend something to move toward a certain goal
register formally as a participant
write as if with print, not in cursive
shoot down birds
appoint to clerical posts
(Chemistry) Undergo sequestration by forming a stable compound with an ion.
Furnish with an opening to allow air to circulate or gase to escape.
Stand with arms or forelegs raised, as of menacing.
accounting period of 12 months
Convert the genetic information in a strand of DNA into a strand of RNA.
give a thrashing to, beat
Immerse or be immersed in a boiling liquid, for purposes of cooking or processing.
Supply with water for crops, as with channels, ditches, or streams.
The period of time during which a leasing contract is in effect.
Protect or strengthen with sandbags.
travel; make a tour of a place
the political head of city government
pass the tongue over, take up with the tongue
A city on the River Thames in Bershire, southern England
a chart or map showing the dimensions, movements or progress of something
Take away a vital or essential part of something.
An imperfection; the quality of being inadequate or falling short.
Pat or squeeze, especially under the chin.
make up something fictional or untrue
the act of swallowing liquid
have unlawful sex with a prostitute
Reverse the winding or twisting of; separate the tangles of.
Reimburse or compensate (someone), as for a loss or sacrifice.
sharpen a razor with a strap
the longer telegraphic signal of Morse Code
The part of the body between the neck and upper arm, or any of its subparts.
Rain, hail, or snow hard and be very windy, often with thunder and lightning; blow hard.
fill with high spirits
The release of pressure built up during a stop consonant.
(cause to) fall in drops
The status of being champion.
Draw advantages from; take advantage.
The problem likely will mean corrective changes before the shuttle fleet starts flying again.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC inched down 1 point, or 0.11 percent, to 1,650.
"It's a huge black eye," said publisher Arthur Ochs Sulzberger Jr., whose family has controlled the paper since 1896.
SEC Chairman William Donaldson said there is a "building confidence out there that the cop is on the beat."
Vivendi shares closed 1.9 percent at 15.80 euros in Paris after falling 3.6 percent on Monday.
Myanmar's pro-democracy leader Aung San Suu Kyi will return home late Friday but will remain in detention after recovering from surgery at a Yangon hospital, her personal physician said.
Darren Dopp, a Spitzer spokesman, declined to comment late Thursday.
Bremer said one initiative is to launch a US$70 million nationwide program in the next two weeks to clean up neighborhoods and build community projects.
In afternoon trading in Europe, France's CAC-40 advanced and Britain's FTSE 100 each gained 0.7 percent, while Germany's DAX index rose 0.6 percent.
He later learned that the incident was caused by the Concorde's sonic boom.
Sens. John Kerry and Bob Graham declined invitations to speak.
Page said it's also possible that genes on the Y chromosome may influence gender-specific differences in disease susceptibility.
One of the most well studied facets of temperament is how people respond to novelty.
But butterflies exposed to an earlier light cycle, from 1am to 1pm, orientated themselves towards the south-east.
RT Jones analyst Juli Niemann said Grant was "the one we were all pulling for.
A key question was whether France, which infuriated Washington by leading the charge against U.N. authorization for the war, would vote "Yes" or abstain.
Mel Gibson's passion-stirring Biblical epic "The Passion of Christ" will open in the United States on Feb. 25 - Ash Wednesday on the Roman Catholic calendar.
Dunlap won both the swimsuit competition and the talent portion of the competition, singing "If I Could."
Governor Gray Davis estimated yesterday that the fires could cost nearly $2 billion.
The American Express Corp. has pledged at least $3 million of more than $5 million needed.
South Asia follows, with 1.1 millions youths infected — 62 percent of them female.
An hour later, an Israeli helicopter fired missiles at a car in Gaza City, killing two Hamas officials and at least five other people.
Executive recruiters say that finding a seasoned chief merchandising officer will perhaps be the trickiest of all hires because there is such a dearth of good ones.
AAA spokesman Jerry Cheske said prices may have affected some plans, but cheap hotel deals mitigated the effect.
The decades-long conflict has killed more than 10,000 people in the resource-rich province, most of them civilians.
Claudette, the first hurricane of the Atlantic storm season, hit the mid-Texas coast July 15 with 85-mph wind.
She countersued for $125 million, saying Gruner & Jahr broke its contract with her by cutting her out of key editorial decisions.
The Standard Edition is $15,000 per processor or $300 per named user.
Results from No. 2 U.S. soft drink maker PepsiCo Inc. (nyse: PEP - news - people) were likely to be in the spotlight.
Microsoft acquired Virtual PC when it bought the assets of Connectix earlier this year.
Taylor's aides warn an abrupt departure could trigger more chaos, a view shared by many in Liberia and, in private, even by mediators.
But Odette is the first to form over the Caribbean Sea in December, the Center said.
Leon Williams' body was found inside his third-floor apartment at 196 Bay St., in Tompkinsville.
It's the first such drill since the September 11 terrorist attacks on New York and Washington.
The AFL-CIO is waiting until October to decide if it will endorse a candidate.
Ursel Reisen confirmed it operated the coach, but gave no details other than to say the passengers were of mixed ages.
A total of 17 cases have been confirmed in the southern city of Basra, the Organization said.
He was also expected to visit Yemen and Bahrain during his tour of the region.
General Myers told reporters that "at first blush, it doesn't look like any rules were broken".
Proving that the Millville son's sacrifice would not go unsung, Mayor James Quinn ordered all city flags flown at half-mast for the next 30 days.
Tom Kasmer, a 14-year-old from Belmont, N.C., got a word that sounded like "zistee" during yesterday's competition.
Tom Kraynak, manager of operations and resources for the Canton, Ohio-based East Central Area Reliability Council, said that scenario is one among many that investigators are considering.
They found molecules that can only be produced when ozone breaks down cholesterol.
It was developed with consultation from more than 300 leaders in academia, industry, government and the public.
It can store more than a gigabyte of information equivalent to around 12 hours of music in one cubic centimetre.
Earlier this month, RIM had said it expected to report second-quarter earnings of between 7 cents and 11 cents a share.
The budget analysis comes as negotiations between the City Council and the Bloomberg administration heat up.
Also at increased risk are those whose immune systems suppressed by medications or by diseases such as cancer, diabetes and AIDS.
Local police authorities are treating the explosion as a criminal matter and nothing has been ruled out.
"For me, the Lewinsky imbroglio seemed like just another vicious scandal manufactured by political opponents," according to extracts released yesterday.
In 2001 and 2002, wire transfers from 4 of the company's 40 accounts totaled more than $3.2 billion, prosecutors said.
Stony Brook University launched the study in 1996, after earlier studies indicated a possible connection between electromagnetic fields and cancer.
Earlier, they had defied a police order and cried "Allahu Akbar" (God is Greatest) as Bashir walked to his seat in the tightly guarded courtroom.
Metropolitan Ambulance spokesman James Howe said five people were taken to hospital and three were treated at the scene after yesterday's incident.
Chiron already has nearly 20 percent acceptances from PowderJect's shareholders.
But it is clear that the Joint Intelligence Committee was not involved.
About 22% of twentysomethings are obese, which is roughly 30 pounds over a healthy weight.
Coupling, an American version of a hit British comedy, will get the valuable Thursday 9:30 p.m. time slot.
Shares of Coke closed New York Stock Exchange trading Thursday at $44.01.
Her body was found several weeks later in the Green River.
"I feel that people that are sending these messages are infringing on my rights and everyone else's rights to use their computers," said McKechnie.
"Fighting continued until midnight," western rebel commander Ousmane Coulibaly told Reuters by satellite phone on Sunday.
The reading for both August and July is the best seen since the survey began in August 1997.
"Generally unwanted - and often pornographic or with fraudulent intent - spam is a nuisance and a distraction," Gates writes, warming us up for the punchline.
US Special Forces troops are training Colombian soldiers at military bases in the region to protect the pipeline, which transports crude from Colombia's second-biggest oil field.
The retailer said it came to the decision after hearing the opinions of customers and associates.
Lord Falconer hailed the changes as "a new beginning as far as the courts, Crown Prosecution Service and police are concerned".
We need a certifiable pay as you go budget by mid-July or schools wont open in September, Strayhorn said.
Shares of Hartford rose $2.88 to $46.50 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.
The DVD-CCA then appealed to the state Supreme Court.
"We believe we are fully prepared to roll out the [touch-screen] machines for the 2004 presidential primary," said Gilles W. Burger, State Board of Elections chairman.
Country-music station KKCS has suspended two disc jockeys for playing songs by the Dixie Chicks in violation of a ban imposed after one group member criticized President George Bush.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> jumped 26 points, or 1.78 percent, to 1,516.
Business Week's online edition reported on Friday that WorldCom and the SEC could announce a settlement as early as Monday.
Sovereign's shares lost 74 cents, or 4.5%, to $15.68.
Aspen Technology's shares dropped 74 cents, or 23 percent, to close at $2.48 on the Nasdaq.
The new law requires libraries and schools to use filters or lose federal financing.
In addition, it offered the United States and Israel a way to work around Mr. Arafat.
And yes, Marilyn Monroe is definitely part of the story, titled "Arthur Miller, Elia Kazan and the Blacklist: None Without Sin."
Gilroy police and FBI agents described Gehring as cooperative, but said Saturday that he had revealed nothing about what had happened to the children.
Scribner's body was found floating in the city's Portage Bay, where he lived with his wife in a houseboat.
After protesters rushed the stage and twice cut power to the microphone, Hedges drew the speech to an early close.
A passer-by found Ben hiding along a dirt road in Spanish Fork Canyon about 7 p.m., with his hands still taped together but his feet free.
Analysts expected earnings of 27 cents a share on revenue of $17.7 billion, Thomson First Call says.
Doctors say one or both boys may die, and that some brain damage is possible if they survive.
Another was in serious condition at Northwest Medical Center in Springdale.
"I started crying and yelling at him, 'What do you mean, what are you saying, why did you lie to me?'"
Sean Harrigan, president of the California Public Employees' Retirement System, also suggested paring down the NYSE's 27-member board, changing its composition and making it more accountable.
Also missing is Al Larsen, 31, of Fort Worth, Texas, who was in another vehicle swept off the turnpike.
British-based GlaxoSmithKline Plc said earlier this year it would cut off supplies to Canadian drugstores that ship to the United States.
The festival kicked off yesterday one day after the Competition Commission delivered its final verdict to the Government on the proposed £4.1 billion merger.
The Swedish central bank was also meeting on Wednesday and widely expected to announce a cut on Thursday.
It was the third time in four years that wildfires forced the park to close.
GM, the world's largest automaker, has 115,000 active UAW workers and another 340,000 retirees and spouses.
His 1996 Chevrolet Tahoe was found abandoned in a Virginia Beach, Va., parking lot June 25.
She said he persisted and she eventually allowed him to fix her bike while she sat in the front seat of his car.
Heatley was sixth in the league in goals last season with 41 and ninth in points with 89.
Daniels said he doesn't know what Bush will have to say about him at tonight's $2,000-per-person presidential fund-raiser.
A three-judge panel of the 11th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled late Friday that the small size, limited use and secular purpose make the image legitimate.
"Tony's not feeling well," Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said.
Electronic Data Systems Corp. Thursday said the Securities and Exchange Commission has asked the company for documents related to its large contract with the U.S. Navy.
The company claims it's the largest single Apple VAR Xserve sale to date.
Only 29 families of frogs are known and most were identified and described in the mid-1800s and the last in 1926.
Officials at Brandeis said this was an "extremely heartrending" time for the campus.
North American markets finished mixed in directionless trading Monday as earnings season begins to slow and economic indicators move into the spotlight.
As well as the dolphin scheme, the chaos has allowed foreign companies to engage in damaging logging and fishing operations without proper monitoring or export controls.
The value will total about $124 million, including convertible securities, according to Corel.
The Standard & Poor's 500 stock index ended the quarter up 120 points, a gain of 14 percent, the best performance for that broad market benchmark since 1998.
The next court session will be when the three-judge tribunal announces its verdict in mid-February.
He started in the 1983 Super Bowl, which Miami lost 27-17 to Washington.
The consensus among Wall Street analysts was for a loss of 28 cents a share.
"I know of no pressure," said Mr. Feith, the under secretary of defense for policy.
Nterprise Linux Services is expected to be available before then end of this year.
Excluding one-time items, the company enjoyed a profit of 6 cents a share.
"But I do question the motives of a deskbound president who assumes the garb of a warrior for the purposes of a speech."
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX fell 3 points, or 0.30 percent, to 995.
Instead, tickets for the Jersey jam went on sale last night through Ticketmaster.
Earlier on Monday, Grant Thornton SpA repeated previous statements that it was "a victim of fraudulent action".
Peter Lyman and Hal Varian of Berkeley's School of Information Management and Systems say that information production has increased by 30 percent each year between 1999 and 2002.
"My judgment is 95 percent of that information should be declassified, become uncensored, so the American people would know."
The researchers found only empty cavities and scar tissue where the tumors had been.
Washington, however, said more was needed to prevent complaints being filed in the first place.
After 26 hours of surgery and a year of anticipation, the boys were separated Sunday at Children's Medical Center of Dallas.
Pines said he would convene the relevant party bodies within 10 days to discuss whether new elections would be held or whether a temporary leader would be appointed.
"She was crying and scared,' said Isa Yasin, the owner of the store.
The euro soared to US$1.1914 in Asian trading, before slipping back slightly to US$1.1895 as trading opened in Europe.
Abbas told the summit he would end the "armed intefadeh," renounced "terrorism against the Israelis wherever they might be" and alluded to the disarming of militants.
The civilian unemployment rate improved marginally last month -- slipping to 6.1 percent -- even as companies slashed payrolls by 93,000.
Moffitt said the results need to be replicated in another study before testing of individuals for presence of the long or short versions of the gene will be pursued.
"Frank Quattrone is innocent," Keker said in a statement.
Cmdr. Rod Gibbons, an academy spokesman, said, "The academy is shocked and saddened.
The compensation committee will prohibit securities industry directors from sitting on it.
Shares of LendingTree rose $6.21, or 42 percent, to $20.90 after hitting $21.36 earlier.
Last week, his lawyers asked Warner to grant clemency under conditions that would have lead to a new sentencing hearing.
Q: Can I buy coverage for prescription drugs right away?
"I think it should have been released years ago," said Brian Rohrbough, whose son, Daniel, was killed at Columbine.
CIA Director George Tenet said the two men were "defined by dedication and courage."
Shares of Mandalay closed down eight cents to $29.42, before the earnings were announced.
But software license revenues, a measure financial analysts watch closely, decreased 21 percent to $107.6 million.
Dotson, 21, was arrested and charged on July 21 after reportedly telling authorities he shot Dennehy after Dennehy tried to shoot him.
Prosecutors contended that Mr. Durst had plotted the murder to assume Mr. Black's identity.
That objection was cited by PeopleSoft's board in rejecting Oracle's offer.
Several black Democratic leaders were attempting to arrange a meeting with DNC chairman Terry McAuliffe to discuss the layoffs.
"These are dark days for our industry," Giovanni Bisignani, director general of the Geneva-based organization, said in a statement.
The seven other nations in the initiative are Britain, Germany, Italy, the Netherlands, Poland, Portugal and Spain.
The dollar was at 116.92 yen against the yen , flat on the session, and at 1.2891 against the Swiss franc , also flat.
Germans account for more than 40 percent of foreign visitors coming to Italy.
Also in Mosul, rebel gunmen on Friday assassinated a Sunni Muslim tribal leader who backed the coalition.
The average American makes four trips a day, 45 percent for shopping or errands.
Mr. Bush had sought to store his papers in his father's presidential library, where they would have stayed secret for a half-century.
In 1999, the building's owners, the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, issued guidelines to upgrade the fireproofing to a thickness of 1{ inches.
It's also a strategic win for Overture, given that Knight Ridder had the option of signing on Google's services.
In the weeks leading up to the execution, several Florida officials received anonymous threatening letters.
This integrates with Rational PurifyPlus and allows developers to work in supported versions of Java, Visual C# and Visual Basic .NET.
Freeman's civil hearing may be, on the surface, about a driver's license.
Protesters had been calling for an end to the country's hard-line establishment and for supreme leader Khamenei's death.
Hoy confirmed the woman's age Tuesday and said she has left on vacation with her family.
BOSTON The Catholic archdiocese in Boston has offered $55 million to settle more than 500 clergy sex abuse lawsuits, according to a document obtained by The Associated Press.
The 3{ hours of recordings include conversations between police, firefighters and other emergency workers, as well as media inquiries.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR jumped 20/32, taking its yield to 4.14 percent from 4.18 percent.
But he is the only candidate who has won national labor endorsements so far, picking up his 11th union on Tuesday when the United Steelworkers of America endorsed him.
Oracle shares fell 27 cents, or 2 percent, to $13.09.
North American futures pointed to a sub-par start to trading on Tuesday, with investors ready to get their first taste of quarterly earnings.
Another million barrels, bought by Spanish refiner Cepsa SA, was to be loaded onto a Spanish tanker, the Sandra Tapias.
Singapore is already the United States' 12th-largest trading partner, with two-way trade totaling more than $34 billion.
The dollar was last at $1.1149 to the euro, close to its strongest level since April 30.
The market's broader gauges also posted big gains, having climbed higher for four consecutive weeks.
Jim Furyk celebrated his first Father's Day as a father by winning his first major golf championship.
They passed through the Lemelson Medical, Educational and Research Foundation Limited Partnership in 2001 to Syndia.
The SIA says the DRAM market is expected to grow 2.9 percent to $15.7 billion in 2003 and 43 percent to $22.5 billion in 2004.
Morrill's wife, Ellie, sobbed and hugged Bondeson's sister-in-law during the service.
After 9/11, Connolly said, agents spent thousands of hours investigating al-Bayoumi.
Calvin Hollins Jr.'s attorney, Thomas Royce, has repeatedly said his client had no link with the company that owned and operated E2.
The single currency rose as far as 135.13 yen , matching a record high hit shortly after the euro's launch in January 1999.
A New Castle County woman has become the first Delaware patient to contract the West Nile virus this year, the state's Department of Health reported.
Mr. Grassley and Mr. Baucus rejected any disparity in drug benefits.
He also reaffirmed his wish to resolve the North Korean nuclear crisis peacefully.
In the year-ago quarter, the steelmaker recorded a profit of $16.2 million, or 15 cents per share, on sales of $1.14 billion.
PG&E Corp. shares were up 39 cents or 2.6 percent at $15.59 on the New York Stock Exchange on Tuesday.
The Nasdaq had a weekly gain of 17.27, or 1.2 percent, closing at 1,520.15 on Friday.
"This decision is clearly incorrect," FTC Chairman Timothy Muris said in a written statement.
A rebel who was captured said more than 2,000 insurgents were involved in the attack.
"It was brazen intimidation to keep people on the reservation," said a Republican who attended but did not want to be named.
No charges were announced, but the statement said legal proceedings were expected Monday.
The dead woman was also wearing a ring and a Cartier watch.
The tech-heavy Nasdaq Stock Markets composite index added 14.17 points or 0.94 per cent to 1,517.05.
Paul Themba Nyathi, an MDC spokesman, said the Avenues Clinic was being targeted because it was treating opposition supporters.
Kyi, a U.N. envoy says, as Japan adds to growing international pressure by saying it will halt its hefty economic aid unless Suu Kyi is freed.
He claims it may seem unrealistic only because little effort has been devoted to the concept.
But the FBI never kept tabs on al-Bayoumi - even though it had received information that he was a Saudi agent, the document says.
"It's going to happen," said Jim Santangelo, president of the Teamsters Joint Council 42 in El Monte.
Wal-Mart, Kohl's Corp., Family Dollar Stores Inc., and Big Lots Inc. were among the merchants posting May sales that fell below Wall Street's modest expectations.
He was released on $3-million bail and immediately returned to Las Vegas, where he had been filming a video.
Gartner analysts said that businesses are not yet feeling confident enough to upgrade corporate PCs.
Mr Eddington warned yesterday that the future of the airline was "in the hands of the negotiators".
As of Tuesday, almost 250 health-care workers were in quarantine.
"Both of these kids are in wonderful physical condition right now," he said during a press briefing at the hospital.
Brian Brabazon said his son would get upset but then turn around and befriend his taunters.
The tech-heavy Nasdaq Stock Markets composite index added 1.16 points to 1,504.04.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index dipped 0.08 of a point to 1,646.
YES filed suit yesterday in the Supreme Court of New York County in Manhattan.
He told the jury Stubbs is a "cold, calculating killer."
Likewise, the 30-year bond <US30YT=RR> slid 1-11/32 for a yield of 4.38 percent, up from 4.30 percent.
A seventh victim, a woman, died Tuesday night in the burn unit at childrens Hospital Medical Center of Akron.
The men were immediately flown to nearby Botswana on a chartered Air Malawi flight, Malawi intelligence officials said on condition of anonymity.
He will be paid $395,000 per year, up from Atkinson's current salary of $361,400.
On the cell's surface, the foreign components are recognised by other cells that then realise it is infected and kill it.
In exchange, North Korea would be required to end its nuclear weapons program.
"We condemn and denounce the Governing Council, which is headed by the United States," Moqtada al-Sadr said.
Sendmail said the system can even be set up to permit business-only usage.
His daughter, Nina Axelrod, told The Associated Press that he died in his sleep, apparently of heart failure.
That exploit works on unpatched Windows 2000 machines with Service Pack 3 and 4.
Further out the curve, the benchmark 10-year note US10YT=RR shed 25/32 in price, taking its yield to 3.26 percent from 3.17 percent.
Tech stocks were hurt by a sour forecast from Sun Microsystems, which was viewed as a bad omen for the upcoming quarterly earnings season.
Trading in Loral was halted yesterday; the shares closed on Monday at $3.01.
Shares of Coke were up 6 cents at $44.42 in afternoon trading Wednesday on the New York Stock Exchange.
Ernst & Young has denied any wrongdoing and plans to fight the allegations.
Neither military action nor large-scale bribery can solve the North Korean problem, Wolfowitz said.
The driver, Eugene Rogers, helped to remove children from the bus, Wood said.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> was up 9.69 points, or 0.98 percent, at 994.53.
Knox County Health Department is following national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Protocol to contain infection.
Shares of Guidant plummeted in trading both on and off the New York Stock Exchange before a news halt was imposed after midday.
"Three Weeks in October" goes on sale Monday, nearly a year after the Washington, D.C.-area sniper shootings started.
Deaths in rollover crashes accounted for 82 percent of the number of traffic deaths in 2002, the agency says.
Based on a separate survey of households, the unemployment rate fell in August to 6.1 percent from 6.2 percent.
The pound also made progress against the dollar, reached fresh three-year highs at $1.6789.
Schools Chancellor Joel Klein said the push for higher standards and accountability "is showing results."
The rate of skin cancer has tripled since the 1950s in Norway and Sweden, according to the study.
One witness told Anatolian he saw the plane on fire while it was still in the air.
The judge also refused to postpone the trial date of Sept. 29.
While opposition parties have welcomed the cabinet's decision on anti-retroviral treatment, some said Health Minister Manto Tshabalala-Msimang was not fit to preside over a rollout plan.
The Recording Industry Association of America says it plans to sue the song traders next month.
Chief merchandising officers oversee the buying and development of merchandise, deciding the merchandising direction of the company, or basically what it should stand for.
The Rev. Christopher J. Coyne, spokesman for the archdiocese, wouldn't comment Friday.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> eased 7.57 points, or 0.76 percent, at 990.94.
Several relatives of Australian victims of the attack were in court to witness the proceedings, but few Balinese attended the trial.
On July 10, a team of 32 Singaporean police officers was sent to Baghdad.
The euro <EUR=> was up 0.67 percent against the dollar at $1.1784 after rising to a three-month high earlier in the session above $1.18.
Previously, it had reported a profit of $12 million, or 0 cents a share, for that period.
Earlier Thursday, PeopleSoft formally rejected the unsolicited bid from Oracle.
A coalition of campaign groups, including the militant national students body, is backing the protests, which the NLC called in defiance of a court order banning them.
The company is highlighting the addition of .NET and J2EE support to its Enterprise Application Environment (EAE) with the new mainframe.
He proposed a system under which it would take fewer and fewer votes to overcome a filibuster.
Since being drafted into service in 1971, it has racked up a record 45 accidents, with 393 deaths.
Ryan Harvey, an outfielder from Dunedin High School in Florida, was selected with the sixth pick by the Chicago Cubs.
Glover spoke at a news conference that included about 20 relatives of the victims.
Four other men who were also charged in June have already pleaded guilty.
Both papers are being published today in the New England Journal of Medicine.
The federal and local governments remained largely shut down in the aftermath of Hurricane Isabel, as were schools, and much of the region's transportation network was slowed.
Hormone replacement therapy that combines estrogen and progestin doubles a woman's risk of breast cancer, a British study of more than a million women has found.
He gave a surprisingly impassioned speech to the United Steelworkers of America, who announced their endorsement yesterday.
Some 50 million phone numbers are registered on the list, which was to take effect Oct. 1.
"And about eight to 10 seconds down, I hit.
But Adora Obi Nweze, the NAACP state president, said the state only tried to prove its conclusion of suicide, rather than consider the possibility of murder.
The WHO experts didn't say how many cases in Hebei were in rural areas.
Activists say they fear the gathering is an attempt by corporate farming to push bio-engineered crops on starving countries.
Their contract will expire at 12:01 a.m. Wednesday instead of 12:01 a.m. Sunday, said Rian Wathen, organizing director for United Food and Commercial Workers Local 700.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC rose 39.39 points, or 2.2 percent, to 1,826.33, after losing more than 2 percent on Tuesday.
Some 14,000 customers were without power in the area, Oklahoma Gas and Electric said.
Now, Blanca's American husband, 63-year-old Roger Lawrence Strunk, faces a murder indictment issued in February by the Philippine government, which says he's the leading suspect.
Barbini's comments came Tuesday, the second day of the Ministerial Conference and Expo on Agricultural Science and Technology.
Yesterday, shares closed up 29 cents, or 0.54 percent, at $54.32.
Prince is replacing Sanford "Sandy" Weill, who will remain Citigroup's chairman.
The operating revenues were $1.45 billion, an increase over last year's result of $1.38 billion.
Spot gold was quoted at $367.90/368.60 an ounce at 1000 GMT, having marched up to $369.50 -- a level not seen since February 10.
In Canada, the booming dollar will be in focus again as it tries to stay above the 75 cent (U.S.) mark.
But the justices ruled that the police supervisor who repeatedly questioned Martinez did not violate his Fifth Amendment rights in doing so.
Lawtey is not the first faith-based program in Florida's prison system.
"I do not wish to be present during this witness," he told Stanislaus County Superior Court Judge Al Girolami.
The blue-chip Dow Jones industrial average eased 44 points, or 0.47 percent, to 9,543, after scoring five consecutive up sessions.
The center's president, Joseph Torsella, was struck on the head but was able to walk to an ambulance.
The report ranked 45 large companies based on employment, marketing, procurement, community reinvestment and charitable donations.
"I don't know if the person I'm talking to now may end up being someone else at another time that may not follow the rules," Parrish said.
Ruffner, 45, doesn't yet have an attorney in the murder charge, authorities said.
They are being held on immigration violations as the incident is investigated.
Passed in 1999 but never put into effect, the law would have made it illegal for bar and restaurant patrons to light up.
The transaction will grant Handspring stockholders 0.09 of a share of Palm--and no shares of PalmSource--for each share of Handspring common stock.
The report shows that drugs sold in Canadian pharmacies are manufactured in facilities approved by Health Canada - the FDA's counterpart in Canada.
The first trial of a suspect in last year's Bali nightclub bombings that killed more than 200 people opened in Indonesia today, Sky News reported.
French retirees will increase from one fifth to a third of the population by 2040.
Iraqi police opened fire in downtown Baghdad today after demonstrators stormed a police station demanding they be given jobs they claimed to have paid bribes for.
The Dow Jones industrial average <.DJI> added 28 points, or 0.27 percent, at 10,557, hitting its highest level in 21 months.
During the same quarter last year, EDS declared a profit of $354 million, or 72 cents per share.
Microsoft fell 5 percent before the open to $27.45 from Thursday's close of $28.91.
"This is extraordinarily fast," said Matt Geller, an analyst at CIBC World Markets.
The giant rock was first observed on August 24 by Lincoln Near-Earth Asteroid Research Program, based in Socorro, New Mexico.
Both rebels and government forces have been accused of pillaging villages in Liberia's countryside despite the peace agreement.
Microsoft has been awarded a patent for a feature in instant messaging that alerts a user when the person they are communicating with is inputting a message.
Who will succeed Mr. O'Neill at Hyundai is not clear.
"We need to change old habits and seriously rethink business-as-usual."
The arrests revealed new details about the four-month investigation at Selenski's Mount Olivet Road home.
We intend to appeal vigorously and still expect to be vindicated ultimately.
"These despicable acts were committed by killers whose only faith is hate," Bush said, adding that the United States will find the killers.
Under Kansas law, it is illegal for children under the age of 16 to have sexual relations.
The transaction will expand Callebaut's sales revenues from its consumer products business to 45 percent from 23 percent.
Indonesia's army has often been accused of human rights abuses during GAM's battle for independence, charges it has generally denied while accusing the separatists of committing rights violations.
Iraq's economy was ravaged during years of U.N. sanctions over ex-president Saddam Hussein's 1990 occupation of Kuwait and by the U.S.-led war to oust him which ended in April.
One had also pointed to the word refugee in an English/Turkish dictionary.
The bulk of the funds, some $65 billion, will go for military operations in Iraq and Afghanistan.
Under the U.S. Constitution, the other chamber of Congress, the House of Representatives, does not vote on foreign alliances.
Dolores Mahoy, 68, of Colorado Springs, Colo., is someone who might be helped by the legislation pending in Congress.
The Securities and Exchange Commission has also initiated an informal probe of Coke.
Advancing issues outnumbered decliners about 8 to 5 on the New York Stock Exchange.
There are a total of 659 women enrolled at the academy, the report said.
It is a national concern that will touch virtually every American," Abraham said.
A beauty contest to be held in Italy next week may be the first for pixel-perfect pin-ups.
In the United States, 20.7 percent of all women smoke.
Analysts' consensus estimate from Thomson First Call was for a loss of $2.08 a share, excluding one-time items.
Lee Janzen, who was tied atop the leaderboard with five holes left, finished with a 68 and tied for sixth.
Tenet has been under scrutiny since November, when former Chief Executive Jeffrey Barbakow said the company used aggressive pricing to trigger higher payments for the sickest Medicare patients.
Boeing's board is also expected to decide at its December meeting whether to offer the airplane for sale to airlines.
Bush said resistance forces hostile to the U.S. presence "feel like ... the conditions are such that they can attack us there.
It has a margin of error of plus or minus 4 percentage points.
Defense lawyers had said a change of venue was needed because massive pretrial publicity had tainted the jury pool against their client.
Founded in 1996, the LendingTree exchange consists of more than 200 banks, lenders, and brokers.
Most taxpayers will get surprise tax cuts of between $4 and $11 a week from July 1.
Shares of MONY were gaining $2.57, or 9%, to $31.90 in after-hours trading on Instinet.
Gyorgy Heizler, head of the local disaster unit, said the coach was carrying 38 passengers.
Tuition at four-year private colleges averaged $19,710 this year, up 6 percent from 2002.
The statewide unemployment rate fell to 6.4 percent, down from a revised 6.7 percent in August.
Diana was at her lowest ebb when she wrote the letter to Paul Burrell claiming there was a plot to kill her.
Security lights have also been installed and police have swept the grounds for booby traps.
But U.S. troops will not shrink from mounting raids and attacking their foes when their locations can be pinpointed.
Moore had no immediate comment Tuesday.
A judge ordered the child placed in state custody Aug. 8.
Gillespie sent a letter to CBS President Leslie Moonves asking for a historical review or a disclaimer.
But White House spokesman Ari Fleischer said yesterday: "The steps the Iranians claim to have taken in terms of capturing al-Qa'ida are insufficient."
Dotson was arrested Monday in his native Maryland and charged with murder.
The bank also said its offer was subject to the agreement of Drax's senior banks, senior bond holders and hedging banks by 30 September 2003.
The results were released at Tuesday's meeting in Seattle of the American Thoracic Society and will be published in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine.
His dissent was joined by Chief Justice William H. Rehnquist and Justice Clarence Thomas.
United already has paid the city $34 million in penalties for not meeting the first round of employment targets.
Shelley's office reported Friday that 575,926 signatures have been reported to him.
Bush wanted "to see an aircraft landing the same way that the pilots saw an aircraft landing," White House press secretary Ari Fleischer said yesterday.
Standing with reporters and photographers about 150 yards from the prison gates was Brent Newbury, president of the Rockland County Patrolmen's Benevolent Association.
"They were brutally beaten, and it's really a wonder that Porchia is the only deceased in this case."
"The gloves are off," said UNIFI official Rob O'Neill.
Pratt &Whitney had said that 75 per cent of the engine equipment would be outsourced to Europe, with final assembly in Germany.
Staff writers Selwyn Crawford and Colleen McCain Nelson and Brian Anderson of DallasNews.com contributed to this report.
The Commerce Commission would have been a significant hurdle for such a deal.
Prosecutors filed a motion informing Lee they intend to seek the death penalty.
"They've been in the stores for over six weeks," says Carney.
"Let's show we won't let them off," said Marc Blondel, leader of the Force Ouvriere union.
Contrary to what PeopleSoft management would have you believe, Oracle intends to fully support PeopleSoft customers and products for many years to come."
American Masters: Arthur Miller, Elia Kazan and the Blacklist: None Without Sin (Wed.
That package included increases to both the city's sales and income taxes.
The world's largest software company said it recognized the difficulty the multiple patches posed for companies, and set out to make it easier for them to apply the updates.
But price declines have remained below 30 percent, year over year, for the last two quarters, said IDC analyst John McArthur.
Putin hailed Saudi Arabia as ``one of the most important Muslim nations.
The songs are on offer for 99 cents each, or $9.99 for an album.
"Certainly what we know suggests that we should take what they're saying very seriously," he added.
Under Mexican law, bounty hunting is considered a form of kidnapping.
Gillette shares rose $1.45, or 4.5 percent, to $33.95 in afternoon New York Stock Exchange trading.
Shares of San Diego-based Jack In The Box closed at $21.49, up 78 cents, or 3.8 percent, on the New York Stock Exchange.
The Dow Jones industrials climbed more than 140 points to above the 9,000 mark, the first time since December.
The announcements were made at the International Broadcasting Convention (IBC) in Amsterdam.
Appellate courts across the country have issued differing rulings on the issue, allowing public displays of the Ten Commandments in some cases and banning them in others.
The government has chosen three companies to develop plans to protect commercial aircraft from shoulder-fired missile attacks, homeland security officials announced Tuesday.
Tamil parties blame the Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam (LTTE) for these killings.
Two of the Britons, Sandy Mitchell from Glasgow and Glasgow-born William Sampson, face the death penalty.
He urged patience from Americans eager for the service, which is intended to block about 80 percent of telemarketing calls.
He was arrested Tuesday night at a northwest Atlanta tire shop after a national manhunt.
Jordan Green, the prelate's private lawyer, said he had no comment.
Mr Hadley, who has a new partner and child, said: "I am absolutely delighted.
The losses occurred overnight in Willow Canyon, one of three areas in the Santa Catalina Mountains threatened by the 2-week-old fire that already had blackened 70,000 acres.
"We do not want to stand by and let a credit card lynching take place," declared Rep. Major Owens (D-Brooklyn).
The effort is the Bush administration's latest effort to expand the role of religious organizations in government services.
However, commercial use of the 2.6.0 kernel is still months off for most customers.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX advanced 2 points, or 0.24 percent, to 977.
Two officials initially said about 300 workers had been arrested at 61 stores in 21 states.
"This deal makes sense for both companies," Halla said in a prepared statement.
Fifty-seven senators, including 24 Republicans, have signed the letter.
The shares represent more than half the 115.9 million shares Turner held at the end of April, according to Bloomberg data.
Five more human cases of West Nile virus, were reported by the Mesa County Health Department on Wednesday.
Mr. Manuel and his group entered the United States by walking across the bridge linking Matamoros and Brownsville.
Under NASD regulations, Mr. Young can file a response and request a hearing before an NASD panel.
Its keywords are supported by Chinese language Web portals.
The president began his speech by acknowledging the terrorist attacks in Saudi Arabia that killed at least 29 people, including seven Americans.
Sirius carries National Public Radio, although it doesn't include popular shows such as "All Things Considered" and "Morning Edition."
"I´m very proud of the citizens of this state," Gov. John Baldacci said after votes from Tuesday´s referendum were counted.
Among three major candidates, Schwarzenegger is wining the battle for independents and crossover voters.
He will replace Ron Dittemore, who announced his resignation April 23.
Selenski had previously spent seven years in prison on a bank robbery conviction.
Maddox, 87, cracked two ribs when he fell about 10 days ago at an assisted living home where he was recovering from intestinal surgery, Virginia Carnes said.
Graham, a presidential candidate, was criticized by several Republicans as ''politicizing'' the report.
In 2002, Linksys overtook Cisco Systems as the leading wireless equipment vendor, accounting for 14.1 percent of revenue.
Schools that fail to meet state goals for three years in a row must offer tutoring in addition to transfers.
Tampering with medicine has been so lucrative that many of those arrested lived in million-dollar homes.
The consensus estimate of analysts polled by Thomson First Call called for a profit of $1.70 per share.
Initial autopsy reports show they died of dehydration, hyperthermia and suffocation.
Mr Howard said he also had faith in the system under which Hicks could be tried.
Mahmud controlled access to Saddam for everyone but immediate family members, Pentagon officials said.
Smugglers in a van chased down a pickup and SUV carrying other smugglers and illegal immigrants, said Pinal County Sheriff Roger Vanderpool.
The trial, featuring 125 witnesses, could continue until the start of 2004.
The computers were reportedly located in the U.S., Canada and South Korea.
The vulnerability affects Windows NT 4.0, NT 4.0 Terminal Services Edition, XP and 2000, as well as Windows Server 2003.
The additional contribution brings total U.S. food aid to North Korea this year to 100,000 tonnes.
The European Union banned the import of genetically modified food in 1998; the United States is now demanding that the EU end its ban.
He projected Vanderpool will be available within the next five years.
Annika Sorenstam gets her first opportunity to test that objective this week at the McDonald's LPGA Championship.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX gained 3 points, or 0.39 percent, at 924.
According to the 2000 Census, Long Beach's Hispanic or Latino population was listed at 35.8 percent.
Authorities appealed to the public Friday to come forward and provide what could be the key to solving the sniper-style shootings that have killed three people outside area convenience stores.
Actor Noah Wyle, who has played Dr. John Carter since the shows inception in 1994, extended his contract with the show through the 2004-2005 season.
Cisco has signed similar deals with AT&T Corp. T.N , SBC Communications Inc. SBC.N and Sprint Corp. FON.N .
The WHO says the latest case does not fit its profile of SARS and is not a public health concern.
Harris and Klebold killed 12 students and a teacher before taking their own lives on April 20, 1999.
"We condemn the Governing Council headed by the United States," Muqtada al Sadr said in a sermon at a mosque.
Second comes HP (27 percent with $2.9 billion, up just 0.4 percent).
In a statement distributed Friday, 28 Chechen non-governmental organizations said they would boycott the vote.
The state's population was 6,080,485 in 2000, according to the U.S. census.
July 18: Hurlbert files a single count of felony sexual assault against Bryant.
St. Paul Chairman and Chief Executive Jay S. Fishman, 51, will be CEO of the combined company.
U.S. forces recently apprehended some 40 suspected foreign militants near the Syrian border and are now interrogating them.
Instead, Weida decided that Meester's case on charges of rape, sodomy, indecent assault and providing alcohol to minors should proceed to a court-martial.
That compares with a profit of $1 million, or breakeven, on $1.39 billion in revenue during the same period last year.
They made a similar discovery in Houston on another aircraft, Dallas-based Southwest said in a statement.
Rosenthal declined comment on the Garrett situation Tuesday but said in a statement: "We had a big contract negotiation.
With the power back on, state workers headed back to their jobs Friday morning.
Bolivia's army fought to stop columns of protesters from streaming into the food-starved capital on Wednesday as a popular uprising against the president spread.
The Nasdaq fell about 1.3% for the month, snapping a seven-month winning streak.
The report was found Oct. 23, tucked inside an old three-ring binder not related to the investigation.
U.S. troops killed nearly two dozen suspected Taliban militants after coming under fire in southern Afghanistan in the latest in a series of such attacks.
The A920 comes with a printer, scanner, and copier for $89.
On Saturday, the International Committee of the Red Cross said it was temporarily closing its offices in Baghdad and Basra.
The Ireland Palestine Solidarity Campaign, of which Mr O Muireagáin was a member, welcomed his release.
Glover said the killer used a "peculiar slipknot" on the ligature he used to strangle some of the victims.
She said Jane Doe's lawyers asked Verizon to withhold her name because she was planning on challenging the subpoena.
It got up on his personal radar screen this past week, I've given him my pitch and he was quite supportive," he said.
In September, a 27-year-old Singapore researcher contracted SARS while working in a laboratory.
A number below 50 suggests contraction in the manufacturing sector, while a number above that indicates expansion.
A lawsuit has been filed in an attempt to block the removal of the Ten Commandments monument from the building.
Britz earned $3.77 million in salary, bonus and other compensation, and Kinney earned $3.76 million.
That truck was spotted in the Campbells Creek area, fitting that description, Morris said.
But in the first 30 seconds after Young entered the ring, the family knew it was an uneven match, Meyers said.
Chairman Michael Powell and FCC colleagues at the Wednesday hearing.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 0.3 per cent at 9,886.75, while the Nasdaq Composite index was 0.4 per cent higher at 1,986.97.
Tehran has made clear it will only sign the Additional Protocol introducing such inspections if a ban on the import of civilian Western nuclear technology is lifted.
Congress twice before passed similar restrictions only to see President Bill Clinton veto them.
But I would rather be talking about high standards than low standards."
Under the program, U.S. officials work with foreign port authorities to identify, target and search high-risk cargo.
Niels told an interviewer in 1999 he thought the Old Man would outlive him by many years.
One, Capt. Doug McDonald, remained hospitalized in critical condition on Thursday.
On Wednesday, the total of National Guard and Reserve members called to active duty worldwide stood at 154,603.
During a period of nearly a decade, Telemarketing Associates raised more than $7 million.
The bodies of former Invercargill man Warren Campbell, 32, and climbing companion Jonathan Smith, 47, were recovered from below Mt D'Archiac late yesterday morning.
Mr. Geoghan had been living in a protective custody unit since being transferred to the prison on April 3.
The 2000 Democratic platform supported "the full inclusion of gay and lesbian families in the life of the nation."
Its shares fell 71 cents, or 3.5 percent, in after-hours trading to $19.55.
Singapore reported no suspected SARS cases Wednesday, but officials quarantined 70 people who had contact with the Taiwanese patient.
A former candidate for governor of New York, he styled himself an advocate of better corporate governance.
Hundreds of reporters and photographers swamped the courthouse grounds before the hearing, which was carried live on national cable networks.
AMD's chip sales jumped 7 percent year-on-year to $402 million.
Downstream at Mount Vernon, the Skagit River was expected to crest at 36 feet -- 8 feet above flood stage -- tonight, Burke said.
FBI agents arrested a former partner of Big Four accounting firm Ernst & Young ERNY.UL on criminal charges of obstructing federal investigations, U.S. officials said on Thursday.
Shelia Chaney Wilson seemed agitated when she came to help prepare for Turner Monumental A.M.E. Church's upcoming 104th anniversary celebration, worshippers said.
He was the Ace of Diamonds in a pack of cards depicting Iraqi fugitives that has been issued to U.S. troops.
Miodrag Zivkovic, of the Liberal Alliance of Montenegro, won 31 percent of the vote, while the independent Dragan Hajdukovic got 4 percent.
So far, Georgia has been returned all but $70,000 of the money it wired.
Yeager said the suspect in the Target attack showed tendencies of being a prior offender.
The island nation reported 65 new cases on May 22, a one day record, and 55 new cases on May 23, making Taiwan's epidemic the fastest-growing in the world.
Cubs outfielder Sammy Sosa was suspended for eight games by major league baseball Friday for using a corked bat.
Half of the women were given a daily dose of the drug and half took a placebo.
On Monday, the Dow declined 5.25, or 0.1 percent, at 8,983.80, having shed 2.3 percent last week.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR dipped 14/32 for a yield of 4.26 percent from 4.23 percent.
The injured were taken to hospitals in Jefferson City and Columbia, a college town about 30 miles to the north.
When police removed the four from the home, they weighed 136 pounds combined.
The dollar was at 117.85 yen against the Japanese currency, up 0.1 percent.
While the Ibrahims had one separation operation, Goodrich and Dr. David Staffenberg plan about three for the Aguirres, with several weeks between each.
The company has expanded into providing other services for buyers, including payment services.
The blasts killed two people and injured more than 150 others.
In 2001, President Bush named Kathy Gregg to the Student Loan Marketing Association board of directors.
The Boston Archdiocese has faced waves of scandal that have not only angered victims' advocates but parishioners and some priests.
A federal magistrate in Fort Lauderdale ordered him held without bail.
The department's position threatens to alienate social conservatives, who have provided strong political support for Mr. Ashcroft and President Bush.
South Africa has the world's highest caseload with 4.7 million people infected with HIV or AIDS.
In that position, Elias will report to Joe Tucci, president and CEO of EMC.
The new Army Commander is the Masaka Armoured Brigade commanding officer, Brigadier Aronda Nyakairima who is now promoted to major general.
"If that ain't a Democrat, I must be at the wrong meeting," he said.
Mailblocks was founded five years after WebTV was acquired by Microsoft for $425 million.
"It's a major victory for Maine, and it's a major victory for other states.
In addition to O'Connor, Rehnquist's majority opinion was joined by Justices David Souter, Ruth Bader Ginsburg, and Stephen Breyer.
The Metropolitan Transportation Authority was given two weeks to restore the $1.50 fare and the old commuter railroad rates, York declared.
The Embraer jets are scheduled to be delivered by September 2006.
"Today, we are trying to convey this problem to Russian President Vladimir Putin and US President George W Bush."
The state wants to kill the wolves in approximately a 1,700-square-mile area near the village of McGrath.
Peterson told police he fished alone in San Francisco Bay on Christmas Eve, returning to an empty house.
The Fed's Empire State survey far exceeded expectations by jumping to 26.8 in June, a record high, from 10.6 in May.
"I can say I am being forced into exile by the world superpower," he said.
Det Chief Insp Norman McKinlay said there was "evidence a body or bodies have been in this area".
Investigators have meticulously looked into virtually every aspect of Campbell's personal and financial affairs, Campbell has acknowledged.
Board Chancellor Robert Bennett declined to comment on personnel matters Tuesday, as did Mills.
General Jeffrey said he would donate his military pension to charity for the period he was in office at Yarralumla.
Tampa Bay manager Lou Piniella, bench coach John McLaren and right fielder Aubrey Huff were ejected for arguing after Huff was called out on strikes to end the ninth.
The venture owns five oil refineries and more than 2,100 filling stations in Russia and Ukraine.
Other changes in the plan refine his original vision, Libeskind said.
Revenue rose to $616.5 million from $610.6 million a year earlier.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> was up 8.79 points, or 0.96 percent, at 929.06.
Rep. Peter Deutsch, D-Fla., criticized the FDA's efforts in Florida.
Neither Iowa State athletic director Bruce Van De Velde nor Morgan could be reached for comment.
There are now 37 active probable cases in the GTA, compared with 70 cases on June 6.
The male eagle was found by a zookeeper early Thursday, suffering from severe puncture wounds in his abdomen.
Agnew said Pinellas began baiting when rabies cases "went from zero to 30" in 1995.
Marc Garber, Whitley's attorney, had a different view.
BioReliance's stock closed down 2 cents yesterday at $47.98 per share.
Just five months ago, Dean committed to accepting taxpayer money and vowed to attack any Democrat who didnt.
SARS has killed 296 people on China's mainland and infected more than 5,200.
The redesigned Finder also features search, coloured labels for customized organization of documents and projects and dynamic browsing of the network for Mac, Windows and UNIX file servers.
The lawyer representing Torch Concepts, Rich Marsden did not respond to repeated phone calls.
He was voluntarily castrated in 2001, an operation he contends removed his ability to become sexually aroused.
The S&P/TSX composite rose 87.74 points on the week, while the TSX Venture Exchange composite gained 44.49 points.
In turn SuSE will license Java 2 Standard Edition while also formalising an existing agreement to distribute Sun's Java Virtual Machine for running Java applications.
Artists are worried the plan would harm those who need help most - performers who have a difficult time lining up shows.
Long lines formed outside gas stations and people rushed to get money from cash machines Sunday as Israelis prepared to weather a strike that threatened to paralyze the country.
The tech-heavy Nasdaq composite index fell 3.99, or 0.2 percent, to 1,682.72, following a two-day win of 55.93.
Martin, 58, will be freed today after serving two thirds of his five-year sentence for the manslaughter of 16-year-old Fred Barras.
We don't know if any will be SARS," said Dr. James Young, Ontario's commissioner of public safety.
Sales for the quarter beat expectations, rising 37 percent year-on-year to 1.76 billion euros.
The company said it would issue revised guidance for the full fiscal year next month when it releases its Q2 results.
IDEC shareholders would own 50.5 percent of the stock of the combined company, and Biogen shareholders the remaining 49.5 percent.
Nonetheless, the open-source guru insisted, "This attack was wrong, and it was dangerous to our goals."
"We haven't decided whether to use an unbroken or dotted white line, but this is an experiment worth introducing," said David Richardson, the ICC's cricket manager.
Shinseki retires Wednesday after a 38-year career that included combat in Vietnam and head of U.S. peacekeeping efforts in Bosnia.
The department also sent water and soil samples to the state health laboratory.
"But that does not clear them of the obligation to do everything possible to protect civilians, and that is not what we're seeing."
Ross Garber, Rowland's lawyer, said Tuesday he would attend the meeting and would ask to speak on the issue.
At his request, he will be reassigned within the district.
Frank Quattrone, the former Credit Suisse First Boston technology investment-banking guru, reportedly pleaded not guilty Tuesday to charges of obstruction of justice and witness tampering.
A federal appeals court ruled Tuesday that the government was free to withhold the names of more than 700 people detained in the aftermath of Sept. 11, 2001.
Previously he had seen the grinning mechanic from east Java only on television.
Two years later, the insurance coverage would begin.
NASA satellite images show that Arctic ice has been shrinking at the rate of nearly 10 percent a decade.
The blue-chip Dow Jones industrial average .DJI fell 86.56 points, or 0.94 percent, to 9,109.99, after giving up more than 1 percent earlier.
"Biotech products, if anything, may be safer than conventional products because of all the testing," Fraley said, adding that 18 countries have adopted biotechnology.
The Dow Jones industrial average ended the day down 10.89 at 9,837.94, after advancing 111.04 Wednesday.
The time was about 4 a.m. on March 18, just hours before the first pinpoint missiles rained down on the capital.
A nationally board certified teacher with a master's degree, Kelley makes a salary of $65,000 in his 30th year.
In Vienna, the IAEA said ElBaradei would accept the invitation, although no date had yet been set.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> was up 7.42 points, or 0.45 percent, at 1,653.44.
The epidemic began in November in the mainland's Guangdong province, but the People's Republic of China refused to report truthfully about its spread for four months.
Druce will face murder charges, Conte said.
That compared with $35.18 million, or 24 cents per share, in the year-ago period.
EU ministers were invited to the conference but canceled because the union is closing talks on agricultural reform, said Gerry Kiely, a EU agriculture representative in Washington.
Nick Markakis, a left-hander from Young Harris Junior College in Georgia, went to the Orioles with the seventh pick.
We remain hopeful that the city will agree to work with us and engage in good-faith discussions on this issue."
Some women are also concerned that so many women are turning to cosmetic surgery in a quest for bodily perfection.
The notification was first reported Friday by MSNBC.
"Now, the other guy, he's ashamed of his party," Street said to crowd laughter.
Perry has since called two special legislative sessions to try force the redistricting plan through.
There is, however, no photo of Peter Hollingworth in the June issue examined by the Herald yesterday.
In his new position, Dynes will earn $395,000, a significant increase over Atkinson's salary of $361,400.
"We continue to work with the Saudis on this, but they did not, as of the time of this tragic event, provide the additional security we requested."
The agency will "consider as timely any tax returns or payments due" Aug. 15 if they are submitted by Aug. 22.
A statement released by DEI said Green would begin driving the car on an interim basis beginning next week in the Winston Open at Lowe's Motor Speedway.
Costa's semifinal opponent is Spaniard Juan Carlos Ferrero, whom he beat in last year's final.
Doctors have speculated that the body's own estrogen protects against cell damage and improves blood flow.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> added 8.27 points, or 0.51 percent, to 1,633.53.
Democrats currently hold a 17-15 advantage in the state's congressional delegation.
No Americans were reported among the casualties, according to Capt. Michael Calvert, a spokesman for the regiment.
We think they have the right to choose.
"We have found the smoking gun," investigating board member Scott Hubbard said.
Chaudhry was released 56 days later and the Fiji military installed an all-indigenous government led by Qarase, who won democratic elections in September 2001.
But in the end, all the worm did was visit a pornography site, said Vincent Weafer, a security director with Symantec Security Response in California.
"This child was literally neglected to death," Armstrong County District Attorney Scott Andreassi said.
Microsoft said Friday that it is halting development of future Macintosh versions of its Internet Explorer browser, citing competition from Apple Computer's Safari browser.
Chapman was not immediately arrested and is expected to appear for arraignment July 3.
President Bush raised a record-breaking $49.5 million for his re-election campaign over the last three months, with contributions from 262,000 Americans, the president's campaign chairman said Tuesday.
Authorities in Ohio, Indiana and Michigan have searched for the bodies.
He said European governments "have blocked all new bio-crops because of unfounded, unscientific fears.
One question was whether France, which infuriated Washington by leading the charge against U.N. authorization for the war, would vote "Yes" or abstain.
Luzerne County District Attorney David Lupas told a news conference Monday that authorities were ``continuing to make significant progress'' in the case.
The U.S. Conference Board said its latest measure of business confidence hit 60 after falling to 53 in its first quarter survey.
Justices said that the Constitution allows the government to administer drugs only "in limited circumstances."
Its legal representatives began meeting with plaintiffs' attorneys last week to discuss a settlement.
Seniors would then have to pay 50 percent of their drug costs up to $3,450.
The veteran Malyasian diplomat met Suu Kyi Wednesday at the lakeside home in Yangon where she is under house arrest.
The flamboyant entrepreneur flagged the plan after a meeting in London with Australian Tourism Minister Joe Hockey.
Government bonds sold off sharply after Greenspan told Congress on Tuesday that the U.S. economy "could very well be embarking on a period of extended growth".
New legit download service launches with PC users in mind.
For Kathy Nicolo (Jennifer Connelly), the house means stability and family.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR rose 22/32 for a yield of 4.31 percent, versus 4.35 percent at Wednesday's close.
The Institute for Supply Management's index of nonmanufacturing activity rose unexpectedly in April, reports said.
Last week, his lawyers asked Gov. Mark R. Warner to grant clemency, but the governor declined to intervene.
WHO spokeswoman Maria Cheng agreed, saying: "It looks very much like an isolated event."
Police said her two small children were alone in the apartment for up to two days.
The priest, the Rev. John F. Johnston, 64, of 35th Avenue in Jackson Heights, was charged with aggravated harassment and criminal possession of a weapon.
Gov. Linda Lingle and members of her staff were at the Navy base and watched the launch.
The settlement includes $4.1 million in attorneys' fees and expenses.
Three no votes would kill it for now.
Some 660 prisoners from 42 countries, including Canada, are held, many captured during the war against in Afghanistan the al-Qaida network.
To reach John A. Dvorak, who covers Kansas, call (816) 234-7743 or send e-mail to jdvorak@kctar.com.
Prosecutor Jim Hardin called the decision a victory for Kathleen Peterson's family.
At first blush, then, the distinction drawn by the creators of the do-not-call registry would seem to draw the line in precisely the right place.
And now it's anything he wants to say," Alesha Badgley, Stone County Nursing and Rehabilitation Center social director, said this week.
The national denomination of the Episcopal Church, with 2.3 million members, is the U.S. branch of the 77 million-member Anglican Communion.
"I feel confident saying that HP is no longer an integration story," Fiorina said.
British police arrested 21 people early Tuesday in connection with the suspected ritual murder of an African boy whose torso was found in the Thames River.
The best the investigators can do is nitpick about the process and substance of isolated business decisions ... and question his competence as a manager."
By late afternoon, the Dow Jones industrial average was up 12.81, or 0.1 percent, at 9,331.77, having gained 201 points Monday to its highest level since July 2002.
Ukrainian President Leonid Kuchma today cut short a visit to Latin America as a bitter border wrangle between Ukraine and Russia deteriorates further.
The Justice Department filed suit Thursday against the state of Mississippi for failing to end what federal officials call "disturbing" abuse of juveniles and "unconscionable" conditions at two state-run facilities.
The Chelsea defender Marcel Desailly has been the latest to speak out.
Chechen officials working for the Moscow-backed government are a frequent target for rebels and tension is running high ahead of next Sunday's presidential election in war-torn Chechnya.
Eric Gagne pitched a perfect ninth for his 23rd save in as many opportunities.
Shares closed on NASDAQ just below their 52-week high, at $32.17, up $1.54.
She was the only woman in her unit and a member of Teamsters Local 995.
Janice Kelly said her husband had received assurances from senior MoD officials that his name would not be made public.
If convicted, they face up to five years in prison and a $250,000 fine on each of the 11 counts.
Special police detained Khodorkovsky early on Saturday in the Siberian city of Novosibirsk, where his plane had made a refuelling stop.
Sony Ericsson also said it would shut down its GSM/UMTS R&D center in Munich, Germany, to increase profitability.
But the country is scrambling to prevent it spreading to the vast countryside where most of its 1.3 billion people live.
Kansas Department of Health and Environment records show there were 88 abortions performed on girls age 14 and younger last year.
U.S. corporate bond yield spreads tightened in spotty trading on Friday as Wall Street labored to get back on its feet after the largest power outage ever in North America.
Evacuation went smoothly, although passengers weren't told what was going on, Hunt said.
"The discovery that the MAP bug is present in the vast majority of Crohn's sufferers means it is almost certainly causing the intestinal inflammation," it said in a statement.
Between 1993 and 2002, 142 allegations of sexual assault were reported.
Smith said simply "Oh, my God," in the seconds afterward, according to Weinshall.
The life expectancy for boys born in 2001 was 74.4 years, up two years since 1990.
Cooley said he expects Muhammad will similarly be called as a witness at a pretrial hearing for Malvo.
"He really left us with a smile on his face and no last words," daughter Linda Hope said.
For the full 12-month period, high-speed cable modem connections increased by 49 percent.
He also could be barred permanently from the securities industry.
"They were an inspirational couple, selfless and courageous," said the Oscar-winning film director.
We believe the report is fully consistent with what the courts have ruled ... that the department's actions are fully within the law.
A second victim, Michael Walker, 23, was struck in the torso, the bullet perforating his lung.
About 25 governments have signed in the last four months, about half of those in the last three weeks.
In an interview, Healey, who is a criminologist, acknowledged that much of the sentiment among legislators here and across the country was wariness toward capital punishment.
Franklin County Judge-Executive Teresa Barton said a firefighter was struck by lightning and was taken to the Frankfort Regional Medical Center.
Police spokesman Brig. Gen. Edward Aritonang confirmed Saturday that another two had been arrested, one in Jakarta and another in Magelang, Central Java.
Federal Judge William Barbour said Tuesday he imposed the maximum sentence because Avants showed no remorse in the brutal slaying.
Indeed, Mr. Weill, a self-described workaholic, said he planned to remain very involved in the company.
About 120 potential jurors were being asked to complete a lengthy questionnaire.
Five alternate jurors were also chosen, with a final one set to be selected Friday morning from the panel.
Gregory Parseghian, a former investment banker, was appointed chief executive.
The California Farm Bureau did not immediately return calls seeking comment.
The report cites the marriage of the alleged operational commander of the Bali bombings, Mukhlas, to Farida, a "highly cosmopolitan and well-educated young woman".
The Cradle of Liberty Council isn't the first one to buck the national group's stance.
But the prime minister told the BBC he wasn't bothered by polls and that he would continue to do what he believed to be right.
Gen. Sattler heads a Combined Joint Task Force based on ship in the Gulf of Aden and the Indian Ocean.
"It''s absurd," Funny Cide's trainer Barclay Tagg said.
The panel ordered the Commerce Department to issue revised figures for the duties within 60 days.
Wall Street analysts had expected 22 cents a share, according to Thomson First Call.
The legal ruling follows three days of intense speculation Hewlett-Packard Co. may be bidding for the company.
Last year, Cuban officials said none of nearly two dozen nominated Cuban musicians received U.S. visas on time to attend the Grammys in Los Angeles.
The findings were published in the July 1 issue of the Annals of Internal Medicine.
The measures could be taken up by the full Senate as early as Friday.
Enron spokesman Eric Thode declined to comment on the mediation order.
Labor Department analysts think the payroll statistics from the survey of businesses provide a more accurate picture of the economy because the survey figures are based on a larger sample.
The parents want her kept alive; her husband says she never wanted to be kept alive artificially.
Earlier, he told France Inter-Radio, "I think we can now qualify what is happening as a genuine epidemic."
Terri Schiavo, 39, is expected to die sometime in the next two weeks in the Tampa-area hospice where she has spent the past several years.
The company will launch 800 hot spots, or "Wi-Fi Zones," later this summer, and plans to have more than 2,100 by the end of the year.
Prior to joining Kodak, Palumbo worked for Procter & Gamble Corp., where he managed products such as Folgers and Pantene shampoo.
Mr McDevitt has been granted control of three crucial aspects of policing in the Solomons.
Gold's rise pulled other precious metals higher, shunting silver to $4.81/83 an ounce from $4.77/79 last quoted in New York.
Officials with North Carolina Speedway at Rockingham could not be reached.
They said the child was taken to Nassau County Medical Center for observation.
Tisha Kresler, a spokeswoman for Global Crossing, declined to comment.
Shares of LendingTree soared $5.99, or 40.1 percent, to $20.68 in afternoon trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
The unions also staged a five-day strike in March that forced all but one of Yale's dining halls to close.
Gov. Rick Perry has said that while he opposes gambling expansion, he would be reluctant to veto continuation of the Lottery Commission.
In midafternoon trading, the Nasdaq composite index was up 8.34, or 0.5 percent, to 1,790.47.
In Kentucky, Democratic Attorney General Ben Chandler faces U.S. Rep. Ernie Fletcher.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 98.32, or about 1.1 percent, to 9011.53.
Enron's 401(k) plan covered about 20,000 workers, retirees and beneficiaries.
The US Senate judiciary committee overcame a significant hurdle yesterday in the battle to create a trust fund to pay victims of asbestos exposure.
But she didn't say whether she'll certify the two-year $117.4 billion budget for 2004-05.
It would be difficult to overestimate the potential dangers of the Remote Procedure Call (RPC) vulnerability.
Although obesity can increase the risk of health problems, skeptics argue, so do smoking and high cholesterol.
Michelle Wie chips Sunday during her 1-up victory over Virada Nirapathpongporn in the 27th U.S. Women's Amateur Public Links Championship.
Sony said the PSP would also feature a 4.5-inch LCD screen, Memory Stick expansion slots.
At one of the three sampling sites at Huntington Beach, the bacteria reading came back at 160 on June 16 and at 120 on June 23.
The American conservatives are clearly in the minority within the Episcopal Church.
Where long-lines used to catch 10 fish per 100 hooks in past decades, they are now lucky to catch one, the study found.
The New York senator's new book, "Living History," appears a certain bestseller.
Carnival Corp. stock was trading at $31.29 during midday trading Wednesday, down 72 cents or 2.25 percent.
But Senate criticism of the House plan Tuesday came on several fronts.
As a result, Murphy sought to substitute Strier's sister, Ethel Celnik, as the trustee.
It will cost about $20,000 per eight-week course of treatment, comparable to other injected cancer therapies, a spokeswoman said.
The rule bars groups from airing ads that promote, support, attack or oppose a candidate at any time.
Cisco pared spending to compensate for sluggish sales.
Kansas City drafted outfielder Chris Lubanski, from Kennedy-Kenrick High School in Pennsylvania, with the fifth pick.
Sterling was down 0.8 percent against the dollar at $1.5875 GBP= .
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI rose 41.61 points, or 0.44 percent, to 9,415.82.
"Right from the beginning, we didn't want to see anyone take a cut in pay.
"There were a number of bureaucratic and administrative missed signals -- there's not one person who's responsible here," Gehman said.
DeVries did make one stop in town Wednesday - registering as a sex offender at the Soledad Police Department.
At 5 p.m. EDT, Grace's center was near latitude 25.6 north, longitude 93.7 west or about 280 miles east-southeast of Corpus Christi.
On Saturday, a 149mph serve against Agassi equalled Rusedski's world record.
Teams of inspectors walked into a restricted area at one park without being stopped; others took pictures of sensitive areas without being challenged.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX climbed 10 points, or 1.10 percent, to 943.
October heating oil futures settled .85 cent lower at 69.89 cents a gallon.
Mr Levine confirmed that Ms Cohen Alon had tried to sell the story during the World Cup.
Mr. Bankhead said the crime scenes indicated that the killer was "very methodical."
"This moves us a lot closer to saying that the foam can do this kind of damage," said Hubbard, a member of the Columbia Accident Investigation Board.
"We had nothing to do with @Stake's internal personnel decision," Microsoft spokesman Sean Sundwell said.
Egyptologists cast doubt Tuesday on an expedition's claim that it may have found the mummy of Queen Nefertiti, one of the best-known ancient Egyptians.
The identical rovers will act as robotic geologists, searching for evidence of past water.
Treasurys long-range plan is to provide retail buyers of all Treasury securities the ability to manage their holdings online in a single account.
"Canada is a small country, and it needs companies like this, deals like this."
He was listed last night in critical but stable condition at Kings County Hospital Center, police said.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR grew 1-3/32 for a yield of 4.30 percent, down from 4.35 percent late Wednesday.
Representatives for Puretunes could not immediately be reached for comment Wednesday.
IAC's stock closed yesterday down $2.81, or 7.6 percent, at $34.19.
Byrd, speaking from the Senate floor, said he questioned "the motives of a deskbound president who assumes the garb of a warrior for purposes of a speech."
The Ministry of Defence is facing a 20m compensation claim from hundreds of Kenyan women who claim they were raped by British soldiers.
Police official S.K. Tonapi told Reuters at least 40 people had been killed and more than 100 wounded.
Shares of USA Interactive rose $2.28, or 7 percent, to $34.96 on Friday in Nasdaq Stock Market composite trading and have gained 53 percent this year.
Similar bills passed the House twice but died in the Senate.
The show's closure affected third-quarter earnings per share by a penny.
I've still got a fighting chance, though," Hewitt said after battling to overcome Davydenko 6-3 4-6 6-3 7-6 (7-5) on centre court.
"Jeremy's a good guy," Barber said, adding: "Jeremy is living the dream life of the New York athlete.
The woman was hospitalized June 15, Kansas health officials said.
Blue chips edged lower by midday on Wednesday as a wave of profit warnings drained some of the optimism that has driven a rally over the past three months.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> tacked on 5.91 points, or 0.29 percent, to 2,053.27.
But Mitsubishi Tokyo Financial (JP:8306: news, chart, profile) declined 3,000 yen, or 0.65 percent, to 456,000 yen.
Two Kuwaitis and six Palestinians with Jordanian passports were among the suspects, the official said.
Her birthday, 21 April, was declared a public holiday and she attended a reception and a ball.
Sorkin, who faces charges of conspiracy to obstruct justice and lying to a grand jury, was to have been tried separately.
The man, who entered the post office in Lakeside shortly before 3 p.m., gave up to deputies about 6:30 p.m.
"Fewer than 10" FBI offices have conducted investigations involving visits to mosques, the Justice Department said.
Outside the court, Sriyanto, who faces up to 25 years' jail, denied he had done anything wrong.
University of Michigan President Mary Sue Coleman said in a statement on the university's Web site, "Our fundamental values haven't changed.
Two astronomers surveying the region around Jupiter have detected 20 new moons, bringing the giant planet's total to 60.
Comcast Class A shares were up 8 cents at $30.50 in morning trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
Thomas was joined in full by Rehnquist, and in parts by O'Connor and Scalia.
"What they have done is a thinly veiled attempt to do an end run around the Constitution," she said.
When you crossed the line, you violated the constitutional right," said Charles Weisselberg, a UC Berkeley law professor.
Preliminary reports were that the men were not seen together at the airport, sources said.
Toronto yesterday had 64 probable cases of SARS and nine suspect cases.
The Nasdaq composite index rose 13.70, or 0.8 per cent, to 1700.34.
Toll, Australia's second-largest transport company, last week offered NZ75 a share for Tranz Rail.
About 1,557 genes on chromosome 6 are thought to be functional.
MessageLabs, which runs outsourced e-mail servers for 700,000 customers around the world, said it had filtered out 27,000 infected e-mails in 115 countries as of Thursday morning.
In the second quarter, Anadarko now expects volume of 46 million BOE, down from 48 million BOE.
U.S. troops encountered no resistance during the five-hour sweep near Tikrit, Saddam Hussein's hometown and the center of a region of Baath Party supporters.
The woman felt threatened and went to the magistrate's office, police said.
Miodrag Zivkovic, of the Liberal Alliance of Montenegro, won 31 percent of the vote while the independent Dragan Hajdukovic got four percent.
Carlson on Tuesday said he would not recuse himself from the case.
Oracle shares were also higher, trading up 12 cents at $13.60.
In the year-ago period, Pearson posted a 26 million pre-tax profit.
With all precincts reporting, Fletcher — a three-term congressman from Lexington — had an overwhelming 57 percent of the vote.
Through Thursday, Oracle said 34.75 million PeopleSoft shares had been tendered.
In Hong Kong, 24 patients were quarantined Wednesday after seven public hospital workers developed flu-like symptoms.
On the upside, Coca-Cola Co. (nyse: KO - news - people) reported higher profit for the quarter early on Thursday, helped by European demand.
Yucaipa owned Dominick's before selling the chain to Safeway in 1998 for $2.5 billion.
The unemployment rate rose a tenth of a percentage point to 6.1%, the highest level since July 1994.
As part of his deal, Mr. Delainey has agreed to cooperate in the continuing investigation.
Graves reported from Albuquerque, Villafranca from Austin and Ratcliffe from Laredo.
A 25 percent increase would raise undergraduate tuition to about $5,247 annually, including miscellaneous, campus-based fees.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
A Europe for All
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
The People Versus Putin
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
The questions are many.
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
The Political Stock Market
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
The Political Stock Market
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
Other ways are needed.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
A Europe for All
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
Some results are remarkable.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
Some results are remarkable.
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
A Europe for All
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
Other ways are needed.
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
Other ways are needed.
The Political Stock Market
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
Other ways are needed.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
The Political Stock Market
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
The Political Stock Market
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
Some results are remarkable.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
The People Versus Putin
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
The questions are many.
But they were necessary.
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
Western Europeans, who have been spared this legacy, should heed our warnings.
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
The People Versus Putin
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
The People Versus Putin
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
But they were necessary.
The Political Stock Market
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
The questions are many.
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
The questions are many.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
The questions are many.
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
Some results are remarkable.
A Europe for All
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians may or may not want to consider.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
Some results are remarkable.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 leading journalists to murder in the past six years.
A Europe for All
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed against a deposed tyrant.
But they were necessary.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
Some results are remarkable.
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
A Europe for All
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as self-indulgent.
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
The People Versus Putin
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
But, like the Union itself, it will be built and it will be done.
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
The questions are many.
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
It then appointed a task force to formulate the necessary changes in tax and spending policies.
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
The People Versus Putin
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
But America's interest in Iraqi oil was not driven either by economics or energy policy.
The answer lies in the support that Indonesian pro-democracy activists can generate domestically and internationally.
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
But if Europe's performance continues to decline, would this perception survive?
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
Other ways are needed.
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
They are ignorant, poor, and sick.
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
Other ways are needed.
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
Only a month ago, Mubarak dismissed demands for constitutional reform as "futile."
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
Other ways are needed.
Jobs, in particular, will help young people to create new lives through serious work.
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
Each time, radical improvements in technology made the threat evaporate.
But they were necessary.
A Europe for All
But they were necessary.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
Each side had quite different theories and explanations of what was going on.
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
The book's success is itself a sign of a kind of "malaise."
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad is a destabilizing influence; Bernanke is not.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
But they were necessary.
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
This has left the Conservative opposition without an effective response.
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
But the returns that make US stock markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
Yet a process of de-institutionalization of religious experience is also taking place within Islam.
Putin, too, also seems to suspect his regime's impotence.
None of this absolves rich countries of their responsibility to help.
Today's great Pax Europa and today's pan-European prosperity depend on this.
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
Moreover, the main oil exporters are unwilling to subordinate their investment policies to market requirements.
This gross error is leading Russia to political ruin.
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
The president has fewer powers than it seems, overshadowed particularly by Supreme Guide Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
The questions are many.
A prominent Chinese businessman who divides his time between Hong-Kong and London was even more specific.
Foremost among these is that economic development is largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
The People Versus Putin
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be written.
Some results are remarkable.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
The old version of the European response--what psychologists might call "dollar envy"--will only become more acute.
Pro-market economists don't object to corporations that blatantly use snob appeal to promote their products.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure; Bernanke is not.
More than that, the divisions are reproduced at the local level.
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
The Political Stock Market
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
Indeed, intolerance goes right to the top of the Turkish government.
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
Being a Muslim and being an Islamist are not the same thing.
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
Iraq's future depends directly on the fate of Iraqi oil production.
In other areas, sharia law is being introduced by force.
What we are witnessing today is a shift from a Muslim identity to an Islamist identity.
Those who know little about modern factory farming may wonder why such legislation would be necessary.
Indeed, the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled a recent book Democracy Against Itself.
This tendency extends deeper than headscarves.
This is a clear if implicit repudiation of Mubarak, the sole ruler for 24 years.
But they were necessary.
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
The bottom line is that when interest rates rise, asset values will fall.
A defeat on Alstom would have profound consequences in Europe--and not only for competition policy.
Tocqueville believed that there are no effective long-term constraints on this tendency.
Will it give us the right to divorce the husbands who abandon us?
But US stock prices fell only 5.2% between May 9 and May 24.
He did, but the initiative did not get very far.
A man with a hard hat is dancing.
A plane is taking off.
A young child is riding a horse.
A man is feeding a mouse to a snake.
A man is playing a large flute.
A man is spreading shreded cheese on a pizza.
Three men are playing chess.
A woman is playing the guitar.
A woman is playing the flute.
A man is playing the cello.
A woman is cutting an onion.
Some men are fighting.
A man is smoking.
The man is playing the piano.
A man is playing on a guitar and singing.
A man is erasing a chalk board.
A person is throwing a cat on to the ceiling.
The man hit the other man with a stick.
A woman picks up and holds a baby kangaroo.
A man is playing a flute.
A person is folding a piece of paper.
A man is running on the road.
A dog is trying to get bacon off his back.
A woman is carrying a boy.
A girl is styling her hair.
The polar bear is sliding on the snow.
A woman is writing.
Three men are playing guitars.
A cat is rubbing against baby's face.
The man is riding a horse.
A man pours oil into a pot.
A man is playing a guitar.
A panda is sliding down a slide.
A group of men play soccer on the beach.
A woman is eating something.
A woman peels a potato.
A woman peels a potato.
People are playing cricket.
The boy fell off his bike.
A man is playing a guitar.
The woman is playing the flute.
The cougar is chasing the bear.
A rabbit is running from an eagle.
The man cut down a tree with an axe.
The woman is frying a breaded pork chop.
One woman is measuring another woman's ankle.
A girl is flying a kite.
A man is riding a mechanical bull.
The man is playing the guitar.
The man is playing the guitar.
A woman is dancing and singing with other women.
A man is finding something.
A man is slicing a bun.
A man is pouring oil into a pan.
A lion is playing with people.
A dog rides a skateboard.
Someone is carving a statue.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A woman peels shrimp.
A woman is frying fish.
The girl sang into a microphone.
A woman is playing an electric guitar.
A baby tiger is playing with a ball.
A man is cutting up a cucumber.
A person is slicing a tomato.
A person cuts an onion.
A man is playing a harp.
A man is climbing a rope.
A man is playing the piano.
A woman is playing the flute.
A man is cutting up a potato.
A kid is playing guitar.
A boy is playing guitar.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is cutting onions.
A little boy is playing a keyboard.
A man is riding an electric bicycle.
A man is playing a guitar.
A dog licks a baby.
Kittens are eating food.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A man is playing the guitar.
A man is playing the drums.
A woman is slicing a pepper.
A man is playing the drums.
A woman rides a horse.
A man is eating a banana by a tree.
A cat is playing a key board.
A man is speaking.
A man chops down a tree with an axe.
A kid plays with a toy phone.
A woman is cooking eggs.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
An animal is chewing on something.
A squirrel is spinning around in circles.
A man is cutting an onion.
A man and a woman are kissing.
A man is getting into a car.
A man is cycling.
A man is dancing.
A man is playing the guitar and singing.
A person is cutting mushrooms.
A man is slicing open a fish.
A tiger cub is making a sound.
A person is slicing onions.
A man is playing the piano.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A pankda is eating bamboo.
A person is peeling an onion.
A monkey pushes another monkey.
A squirrel runs around in circles.
A man is tying his shoe.
A boy is singing and playing the piano.
A dog is eating water melon.
A woman is chopping broccoli.
A man is peeling a potato.
A woman is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a flute.
A woman is slicing tomato.
A man is slicing a tomato.
A man swims underwater.
A man and woman are talking.
A man is playing a guitar.
A baby panda goes down a slide.
A small dog is chasing a yoga ball.
The men are playing cricket.
A man rides off on a motorcycle.
A man is playing a guitar.
The man talked on the telephone.
A man is singing and playing a guitar.
A man is fishing.
A man is levitating.
A man attacks a woman.
Two boys are driving.
A man is driving a car.
A man is playing soccer.
A man is riding on a horse.
A man is riding a bicycle.
A man is slicing potatoes.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is cutting tofu.
A girl is riding a horse.
A woman is slicing a leek.
The man cut a paper plate.
The woman is styling her hair.
The man is playing the guitar.
A man is playing the piano.
A man is lifting weights in a garage.
A woman is slicing up some meat.
A man is playing on his keyboard.
Two zebras play in an open field.
The lady chopped up the green onions.
Someone is sitring noodles in water.
An animal is biting a persons finger.
Lionel Richie is dancing on the ceiling.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is cutting a potato.
A woman is playing flute.
A boy is checking a calender.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is using a sewing machine.
A woman is flipping pancakes.
A man is slicing an onion.
A man is dancing.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A man is running on the road.
A woman is reading.
A woman is slicing garlics.
A man is riding on a horse.
A man is riding a bike.
A man is crying.
A woman is dancing.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is speaking.
A man is spinning.
A little boy is singing and playing a guitar.
A monkey is swinging from limb to limb.
The people got off the train.
The lady cracked an egg into a bowl.
A dog is jumping on a trampoline.
A boy is playing an instrument.
A band is performing on a stage.
A woman plays the guitar.
A woman is picking a can.
A man is climbing a rope.
A man is lifting a car.
Elephants are walking down a trail.
A man and woman are driving down the street in a jeep.
The shirtless man sat in a chair.
A turtle is swimming in water.
Two women are wrestling.
The puppy played with a blue tennis ball.
A kangroo is eating something.
A cat is playing a piano.
The man cut some carpet with a knife.
A woman is riding a motorized scooter down a road.
someone is slicing a vegetable.
A woman is dancing.
A man is playing a guitar.
A dog licks up a baby's drool.
A man is rowing a boat.
A young woman is putting stickers all over her face.
A man cuts up potatos.
A man sitting on the floor plays a guitar.
A woman is chopping up garlic.
A puppy plays with a plastic container.
An animal run in circles.
A man is walking slowly across a rope bridge.
A man is playing the guitar.
A man plays the flute.
A man plays the violin.
A man plays the piano.
A man is eating food.
A woman cracks two eggs into a glass bowl.
A man is playing a basketball.
A man is cutting a fish.
Two men are packing suitcases into the trunk of a car.
A toddler walks down a hallway.
A man pours oil on some tomatos.
A man is slicing something.
A plane is landing.
A woman is wrapping tofu.
A man is paddling a canoe.
A man and woman are walking together through the woods.
A cat is eating some corn.
The woman picked up the kangaroo.
Fish are swimming.
Two women mix something in a food processor.
A panda is climbing.
A person is surfing a large wave.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a flute in a band.
The man spread butter on the loaf of bread.
A person is boiling noodles.
A man is eating a food.
A group of people dance on a hill.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is dancing outside.
A woman is feeding a man.
A man is putting a pan into an oven.
A man is kicking pots of water.
A woman is sitting at a desk.
Medics transport a patient on a stretcher.
A man is cutting a pipe with scissors.
A woman is playing a flute on stage.
A woman is dancing in the rain.
Two baby pandas are playing.
Kids are dancing on stage.
A baby is laughing.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is taking a bath.
A man is folding paper.
Three women are dancing.
A man plays a guitar.
The cats are playing with each other.
A person is writing.
A woman is slicing a meat.
A woman is taking a picture.
A man mixes vegetables in a pot.
A man is running.
The woman is rolling dough.
A woman is adding spices on a meat.
A woman is adding oil on fishes.
A young boy is holding a guitar.
A cheetah is running.
The man is eating pizza.
An orangutan is riding a bus.
A man and a woman talk in a diner.
A woman is talking on a cell phone.
A man is playing a guitar.
A girl is singing and playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
The man is riding a horse.
A man is playing a guitar.
A girl is communicating with sign language.
A woman is doing weight exercises.
A man is getting inside a car.
A big green ball knocks a potato over.
A man is drilling a hole in a board.
A cat is playing keyboards.
Two dogs swim in a pool.
A man is fitting silencer on a pistol.
The man used a chopper to chop the onion.
A woman slices tofu.
A herd of deer are crossing the street.
The person is riding the horse.
Someone is feeding a animal.
Someone is slicing tortila's.
Someone is mixing ingrediants.
A rooster pecks at a dead mouse.
A woman holds a kangaroo.
A man is playing with frogs
Two men are talking.
Two little girls are talking on the phone.
A man is cutting apple by his hand.
A man spreads butter on a big piece of bread.
A man is running across a high wire.
Someone is stirring chili in a kettle.
The woman is cracking eggs into a bowl.
A man is mowing a lawn.
A man is opening a door.
A man is opening a door.
A man is slicing a tomato.
A man is slicing a potato into pieces.
The woman is cutting cooked octopus.
A man is cutting paper with a sword.
A man is punching through boards.
A woman puts flour on a piece of meat.
A man is dancing.
Someone is playing a piano.
Two foxes are eating from a plate on a brick patio.
A boy is playing a key-board.
A person plays a keyboard.
A boy studies a calendar.
A man is shooting a gun.
Someone is slicing an onion.
A man is talking on a phone.
A man is swimming.
The ballerina is dancing.
A man is playing the guitar.
A woman is slicing a pumpkin.
A woman is dancing.
A woman is dancing.
A woman is cracking eggs into a bowl.
A car is moving through a road.
A woman is slicing some tomatoes.
Someone is greasing a pan.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is drinking vodka.
A woman is water skiing.
A man is playing an electronic keyboard.
A woman is cutting meat into pieces.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is rinsing a steak.
A man is playing the piano.
A man is selling items.
A man is jumping into water.
A woman is picking a can.
A man is jumping a wall.
Runners race around a track.
A man is kicking a soccer ball.
A woman is frying something.
A cat is licking a sucker.
A woman is dancing by a fire.
A man puts three pieces of meat into a pan.
A man is playing a guitar.
The man is slicing a fish open.
A woman is cutting an onion.
Butter is melting in a pan.
Some men are sawing.
Three boys are dancing.
A woman is playing a game with a man.
The man is driving a white car.
A young man is playing the piano.
A car is driven down the road.
A woman is mixing ingrediants.
A man drove his car.
A car backs out of a space.
Someone is shredding cabbage leaves with a knife.
A man puts some cheese on a pizza.
The boy is playing the piano.
The man is kissing and hugging the woman.
The man played his guitar.
A slow lori walks around.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is walking on a rope.
A little boy is vacuuming the floor.
A girl is playing a flute.
People step off a train.
A woman is sewing on a machine.
A dog is looking into swimming pool.
A man is buttering a piece of bread.
A woman is applying eye liner to her eyelid using an eye pencil.
A man is cutting tomatoes into pieces.
A train is moving.
Three teenage girls danced in the room.
A lion is walking.
A man shooting a car.
A man is making a bed.
A black horse is running around.
Someone is slicing an onion.
A woman is deveining shrimp.
A man is riding a horse.
A man plays a keyboard.
A man walks down a path.
A man is slicing a potato.
A dog is barking at a ball.
A woman is playing in the ocean.
A kid runs away from a fish swinging around on a fishing pole.
A man is walking along a path through wilderness.
An elderly man is speaking at a podium.
A person is playing an electronic keyboard.
A man riding a horse in slow motion.
A person is cutting some burrata cheese.
The man is shooting an automatic rifle.
A rabbit is playing with a toy rabbit.
A plane rides on a road.
A man is crushing garlic with the back of a knife.
A woman is filing her fingernails with an emery board.
A man is riding a skateboard.
A woman is taking a shower.
A man is dancing.
A man is holding a leaf.
A woman is peeling shrimp.
A man is rowing a boat.
A man is swinging from a rope attached to the ceiling.
A woman is riding a horse on a beach.
A man holds a small animal in one hand.
A person is folding a square paper piece.
A person is frying meat in a pan.
A man shoots a man.
A man plays the guitar.
A man is sitting and smoking.
A chimpanzee is hurting a woman.
The woman is peeling shrimp.
A guy is playing hackysack
A man is playing a guitar.
One man is breaking cement on another man's chest.
Two zebras are playing.
A woman is slicing butter.
Some men are playing guitars.
The elephants sprayed water on themselves.
A man is talking with other women on the beach.
A dog sat at the counter of a store.
Someone drills a hole in a strip of wood with a power drill.
The woman is dicing onions.
A man is standing in front of the window and looking outside.
A skunk is looking here and there.
A woman is slicing some vegetables.
A badger is burrowing a hole.
A woman is water skiing on a lake.
A girl is playing a violin.
A helicopter is landing on a helipad.
A woman is cutting up a chicken.
A woman is cutting a cucumber.
A woman rides an elephant in front of an adoring crowd.
A puppy is sliding backwards along the floor.
A chef is preparing some food.
A woman splits garlic cloves.
A dog is looking into swimming pool.
A woman mixes a beauty treatment in a glass.
A man is drawing a picture.
The man talked to a girl over the internet camera.
A man is playing the guitar and singing.
A turtle walks over the ground.
The lady cracked an egg for the mixer.
A woman is picking tomatoes.
A man is looking at a computer monitor.
The boy is riding a tricycle.
Two men compete in a tire rolling race.
A woman opens a window.
A person is cutting a meat.
A man is playing a violin.
Five kittens are eating out of five dishes.
People are dancing outside.
A woman is slicing some tuna.
The man is using a camera to hammer a nail.
The baby crawled through the doorway.
A man is playing keyboard.
A man playing the guitar.
A man is smelling two pizzas.
A woman is filing her nails.
A monkey pulls the tail of a dog.
A dog lies on his back on a wooden floor.
A man is playing a flute.
A woman is frying something in the pan.
A boy is crawling into a dog house.
A man puts seasoning in a bowl of water.
An elderly woman is pouring oil into a frying pan.
A baby rhino is walking around his pen with his mother.
A woman is chopping an onion.
The woman picked up the kangaroo.
A dog biting on a can.
A woman is deboning a fish.
A man is mowing grass.
A cat is watching a TV.
The boy is stuck in the door of the doghouse.
People flip into a swimming pool.
A woman is swimming underwater.
The man used a sword to slice a plastic bottle.
A woman swims underwater.
A man is playing a guitar.
A machine is sharpening a pencil.
An airplane is flying in the air.
A bear is running from two dogs.
A woman is resting in a floating raft.
A man is cleaning a fish on a kitchen counter.
A man is dieing in an operating room.
A man is holding a leaf.
A person is riding a horse.
A woman is slicing octopus.
A man is breaking water jugs.
A man is playing a guitar.
A girl is eating a cupcake.
The little girl played on the grass with a dog and a ball.
A person is chopping coriander leaves.
People ride and paddle a raft.
A man is pressing microwave buttons.
A girl is riding a horse.
The lady cut up a potatoe.
A monkey is playing drums.
The missile exploded.
A dog is playing in the snow.
A woman is dancing with other women.
A boy is pushing a van.
Batman and Robin fly a helicopter over water.
A boy is making some dance steps.
A woman is opening a soda and drinking it.
A man is assembling speaker parts.
A woman pours oil into a skillet from a plastic bottle while she is talking.
The dog walked along the edge of the pool.
Butter is being put into a bowl.
A man is opening a box and taking out paper.
Raccoons are eating.
Someone fell off a horse.
A woman is cutting some herbs.
A woman peels an apple.
A man is taking some math classes.
Animals are playing in water.
A man is riding a horse and jumping over obstacles.
A person is doing pencil tricks with his hand.
The person lit the cameras on fire.
The man is slicing the tape from the box.
The lady put the skewered shimp in the hot water.
A woman is dancing.
A man is fishing in the river.
A man is riding a bike.
A man is doing push-ups.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is riding on a horse.
The boy is playing the piano.
A person is drawing on a large touchscreen.
The cook is kneading the flour.
The little boy is singing and playing the guitar.
A woman is powdering her face.
The men played follow the leader on the grass.
A woman is cracking eggs.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A woman is firing a rifle.
A woman peels garlic with her hands.
The polar bears fought over the kill.
A woman is riding a horse along a perimeter.
A woman is putting her baby in a waste bin.
A woman puts a garland over a man's shoulders.
An old woman is shaking hand with a man.
A man is doing trick with play cards.
The woman is waterskiing.
Trees are bending in storm.
The cat is licking a bottle.
A man and woman is riding in a car.
A man is moving a tree limb.
A cat is pouncing on a trampoline.
A man plays a piano.
A person pours oil on a skillet.
A person is slicing an onion.
The animal is eating.
A man and woman are eating at a table.
The woman is walking her dog.
A woman is riding on a horse.
A man is screwing wood to a wall.
A girl is playing a flute.
A group of people sing.
The cat is drinking milk.
A person is peeling a potato with a potato peeler.
A small baby is playing a guitar.
A girl is making eyelid.
A woman is chopping onion.
Two men are fighting.
A man and a woman walk through the woods.
A child is playing a computer game.
Two women are dancing and singing in front of a crowd.
Men are jumping into water from a bridge.
The military officer barked at the recruits.
The man is putting chicken into the container.
A man is tying on a stenographers machine.
A woman is adding pasta to a pot of water.
A woman is lying on a blanket on a rock and reading a book.
Two puppies are playing with each other.
A man is running on a field.
A man is hugging someone.
Someone is pouring ingrediants into a pot.
A man is seasoning some carrots.
A couple are walking.
Two men pushed carts through the woods.
A person is playing a guitar.
A person is adding food in a pan.
A group of penguins is walking.
A man is playing a guitar.
A dog is jumping on a trampoline.
A man is shaking a container over a kitchen sink.
A man is playing a football.
A man is walking with a horse.
Paper is being cut with scissors.
The lady peeled the potatoe.
A person peels shrimp.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man making a bed in a hotel.
A woman is slicing some tofu.
A woman is peeling some fish.
The dog pulled the dogs tail and then his leg.
A woman beats two eggs in a bowl.
People are playing baseball.
A person is boiling soup.
A man is jumping rope outside.
A person is slicing some onions.
A woman holds a kangaroo.
Someone typed on a keyboard.
Soccer players are kicking a soccer ball into the goal.
A woman is cooking something.
A woman is swimming in the beach.
A man is carrying another man.
The woman is putting paste into a dish.
A man is holding up and talking about a gray You Tube T-shirt.
Three young men run, jump, and kick off of a Coke machine.
Someone pours olive oil into a bowl of tomato wedges.
A man is playing the guitar.
Someone is boiling okra in a pot.
A person is peeling a potato.
A cat is jumping into a box.
A young Asian girl is applying eyeliner.
The woman is seasoning the oil.
A cat is sliding upside down under a couch.
A woman dances while a man plays the keyboard.
A chef is cleaning up a bowl of soup.
An explosion is booming in the desert.
A woman slices a lemon.
An overweight man is skipping rope.
A cat is walking around a house.
The lady cracked two raw eggs.
A man sharpens a pencil using a knife.
Plastic toys are floating in water.
A woman is dancing.
The turtle followed the fish.
The woman is pencilling on eye shadow.
A man is tying his shoe.
A ballet dancer is performing on stage.
A woman is slicing meat with a knife.
A dog is running on the ground.
A woman is talking to her pet bunny as she fondles it.
A monkey is playing drums.
A man is petting a tied up dog.
A woman is walking on an open ground with a pet dog as some other dogs follow them.
A woman is mincing some garlic.
A man shoots a basket.
The elephants are bathing.
Two teams are playing soccer.
A rat like creature is smelling around.
A man is riding a white horse on an enclosed ground.
Two Sumo ringers are fighting each other.
An oriental lady is cutting a carrot into thin pieces.
A man lays on the ground and aims a rifle.
The man cut up an onion.
A couple are running towards the ocean.
A group of people are dancing.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman mixes up vegetables.
A woman pours a mixture into a bowl and mixes it.
A woman is chopping a hard egg.
Two robots share a kiss.
A cat is trying to touch a dog.
A woman puts cosmetics on her eyelid.
The rhino grazed on the grass.
The man drove his little red car around the traffic.
A man is cutting bread.
A woman and man are riding in a car.
A man is cutting pieces of butter into a mixing bowl.
A cat rapidly swats a kid in the head.
A cat is playing in a box.
A man is putting garlic on some bread slices.
The couple danced in the church.
The panda bear lay on the logs.
A man is patting an alligator on the mouth.
A person checks some rice pudding.
A girl is dancing in a cage.
Five men jump into a swimming pool.
A woman is stirring two eggs in a glass bowl.
The man is playing the drums.
A cat is on a robot.
A man is slicing a pepper.
A woman is speaking in sign language.
A boy is crawling into a dog house.
The girl flew her kite while she ran up a hill.
A woman is placing food in a pot of hot water.
A small monkey walks through water.
A man is riding a bike.
A young man is singing and playing the piano.
A boy takes off his sunglasses.
A girl is playing a piano.
The lady stirred up raw eggs in the bowl.
A cheetah is running behind its prey.
The lady sliced a tomatoe.
Someone is holding a hedgehog.
A woman peels a potato.
A cat is playing on the floor.
A boy is playing violin on stage.
A cow is eating grass.
A cat is drinking some water.
A person is putting salt and pepper on a piece of pork.
The man sat in his chair and stared.
A woman is dicing a potato.
The man stirred the sauce for the chicken.
A baby is crawling happily.
A person is frying a meat in the pan.
A man is looking out of a window.
A man seated is playing the guitar.
A dog is barking at a toy.
A woman is slicing an onion with a knife.
A man jumping rope
A woman is peeling an orange.
A rider is running and jumping her horse.
A boy is playing a key-board.
A man is cycling.
Two men are fighting.
A man is playing a wooden flute while several other men play bongo drums.
Someone is beating an egg.
A person is petting a monkey.
A man is cutting a potato.
A woman is slicing ginger.
Two cartoon rabbits are kissing.
The hedgehog chewed on the towel.
A man is buttering a piece of bread.
A man is dragging a dead deer.
A cat is licking himself.
A woman cuts up some vegetables.
A man is preparing a snake for cooking.
A woman is spreading mustard on a bread roll.
A small guinea pig is gnawing and eating a piece of carrot on the floor.
Four boys are standing in front of the burning car.
The lady cut the tail and body of a shrimp.
A man is smoking.
Someone touched the kitten chewing on a string.
A woman is adding sauce to some food.
Meat is being put into a skillet.
A baby elephant is eating a small tree.
A man plays an acoustic guitar.
Three children are eating their food.
A submarine is going through water.
A man is running on a street.
A person is slicing an onion.
A badger is digging in the dirt.
A woman is slicing big pepper.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
There must be a balance as a whole.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Tunisia
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Thank you, Commissioner.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Thank you, Commissioner.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Thank you, Commissioner.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Thank you, Commissioner.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Tunisia
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Tunisia
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Tunisia
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Tunisia
There must be a balance as a whole.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Tunisia
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Thank you, Commissioner.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Thank you, Commissioner.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Tunisia
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Tunisia
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Thank you, Commissioner.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Thank you, Commissioner.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Tunisia
Tunisia
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Tunisia
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
Tunisia
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
There must be a balance as a whole.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Tunisia
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Thank you, Commissioner.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
There must be a balance as a whole.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
There must be a balance as a whole.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Tunisia
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Tunisia
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
Thank you, Commissioner.
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Tunisia
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in four words: citizens' power over bureaucracy.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Tunisia
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
Thank you, Commissioner.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
It increases the power of the big countries at the expense of the small countries.
I am one of those Members who attends sittings quite faithfully.
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
There must be a balance as a whole.
Unanimous decisions, and hence an inherent incapacity to act, remain largely the norm in the Council.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Mr President, I rise in defence of the workers in the industry.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Selective aid, such as market support and a grass subsidy, are essential.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Consumers will lose out, employees will lose out, Europe will lose competitive strength and growth.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The leaders have now been given a new chance and let us hope they seize it.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Van Orden Report (A5-0241/2000)
That provision could open the door wide to arbitrariness.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
The standards are scarcely comparable, let alone transferable.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
As I already explained during second reading, there is a crisis underlying this directive amendment.
The European Union has got to do something and do it quickly.
Unfortunately, others separate on the basis of accumulated hatred.
Then perhaps we could have avoided a catastrophe.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
It is our job to continue to support Latvia with the integration of the Russian population.
The vote will take place today at 5.30 p.m.
Neither was there a qualified majority within this House to revert to Article 272.
Let me remind you that our allies include fervent supporters of this tax.
We often pontificate here about being the representatives of the citizens of Europe.
But other sources close to the sale said Vivendi was keeping the door open to further bids and hoped to see bidders interested in individual assets team up.
Micron has declared its first quarterly profit for three years.
The fines are part of failed Republican efforts to force or entice the Democrats to return.
The American Anglican Council, which represents Episcopalian conservatives, said it will seek authorization to create a separate group.
The tech-loaded Nasdaq composite rose 20.96 points to 1595.91, ending at its highest level for 12 months.
Amgen shares gained 93 cents, or 1.45 percent, to $65.05 in afternoon trading on Nasdaq.
U.S. prosecutors have arrested more than 130 individuals and have seized more than $17 million in a continuing crackdown on Internet fraud and abuse.
Chavez said investigators feel confident they've got "at least one of the fires resolved in that regard."
Authorities said the scientist properly quarantined himself at home after he developed SARS symptoms Dec. 10.
The support will come as a free software upgrade called WebVPN for current customers that have support contracts.
The man accused of using fake grenades to commandeer a Cuban plane that landed in Key West in April was sentenced Friday to 20 years in prison.
Jim Williams, director of the US-VISIT project, said that by the middle of November, many arriving passengers in Atlanta will be fingerprinted and photographed.
The hearing occurred a day after the Pentagon for the first time singled out an officer, Dallager, for not addressing the scandal.
The Episcopal Church ''is alienating itself from the Anglican Communion,'' said the Very Rev. Peter Karanja, provost of the All Saints Cathedral, in Nairobi.
Counties with population declines will be Vermillion, Posey and Madison.
Swartz, indicted in February, had argued that New Hampshire was the wrong place to charge him.
The last time the survey was conducted, in 1995, those numbers matched.
Higher courts have ruled that the tablets broke the constitutional separation of church and state.
They were at Raffles Hospital over the weekend for further evaluation.
When the bomb exploded at the Casa de España, customers were eating dinner and playing bingo.
Plofsky said the commission won't investigate because the three-year statute of limitations has expired.
In two weeks, he'll probably send out Peace Rules in the Preakness.
If convicted of the spying charges, he could face the death penalty.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index was up 7.60 points, or 0.46 percent, at 1,653.62.
Hilsenrath and Klarman each were indicted on three counts of securities fraud.
Entrenched interests are positioning themselves to control the network's chokepoints and they are lobbying the FCC to aid and abet them.
But church members and observers say they expect that the decision could be problematic for many Episcopalians.
Squyres is principal investigator for the Athena payload - a collection of science instruments carted by each rover.
The military said it had killed 12 rebels and captured nine in the campaign so far, for the loss of six soldiers wounded.
The new sensor -- dubbed CANARY for ''cellular analysis and notification of antigen risks and yields'' -- hijacks this natural process with two important changes.
Express Scripts ESRX.O shares fell 3.6 percent to close at $66.89 on the Nasdaq.
One, Fort Carson-based Sgt. Ernest Bucklew, 33, had been on his way home to attend his mother's funeral in Pennsylvania.
Police launched an international hunt for Shevaun Pennington after she ran away with 31-year-old Toby Studabaker Saturday.
Lawyers and others familiar with the federal investigation say it remains focused on Campbell, though prosecutors declined to discuss the probe.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI was off 58.69 points, or 0.64 percent, at 9,137.86.
Peace Rules defeated Funny Cide in the Louisiana Derby.
Waksal has pleaded guilty to securities fraud and is to be sentenced next week.
He allowed two runs in seven innings and struck out six.
Still, he said, "I'm absolutely confident we're going to have a bill."
Boeing said the final agreement is expected to be signed during the next few weeks.
Shares in EDS closed on Thursday at $18.51, a gain of 6 cents.
Nationally, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recorded 4,156 cases of West Nile, including 284 deaths.
A divided Supreme Court ruled Monday that Congress can force the nation's public libraries to equip computers with anti-pornography filters.
The weakness exists in the way that VBA looks at the properties of documents passed to it when the document is opened by a host application.
Of 24 million phoned-in votes, 50.28 percent were for Studdard, putting him 130,000 votes ahead of Aiken.
Consumers still would have to get a descrambling security card from their cable operator to plug into the set.
However, we have decided to opt for the European consortium's engine as the best overall solution and due to the substantial price efforts made".
The Food and Drug Administration rejected ImClone's 2001 application to sell Erbitux, citing shoddy research.
Critics say the law violates civil liberties, something House Judiciary Committee Chairman James Sensenbrenner, R-Wis., says he is sensitive to.
The Dodgers won their sixth consecutive game their longest win streak since 2001 as they edged Colorado, 3-2, Wednesday in front of a crowd of 25,332 at Dodger Stadium.
So far, they have searched Pennsylvania, Ohio, Michigan, Illinois and Indiana, authorities in those state said.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR firmed 31/32, taking its yield to 4.16 percent -- another record low -- from 4.22 percent.
On Thursday, a Washington Post article argued that a 50 basis point cut from the Fed was more likely, contrary to the Wall Street Journal's line.
Mr. Heatley, who suffered a broken jaw and torn knee ligaments, faces several charges.
Lay had argued that handing over the documents would be a violation of his Fifth Amendment rights against self-incrimination.
Strayhorn said it was the first time in Texas history a comptroller had not certified the appropriations act.
Excluding the charges, analysts, on average, expected a loss of 11 cents a share.
Security experts are warning that a new mass-mailing worm is spreading widely across the Internet, sometimes posing as e-mail from the Microsoft founder.
Mr Sahel said police had identified the bodies of seven of the 14-strong cell believed to have carried out the five almost simultaneous attacks on Saturday.
Only New Jersey now bans holders of learners permits or intermediate licenses from using cell phones, pagers or other wireless devices while driving.
The University of Michigan released today a new admissions policy after the U.S. Supreme Court struck down in June the way it previously admitted undergraduates.
The audiotape aired last week by the Arab Al-Jazeera television network appears to be an effort to incite attacks.
Former company chief financial officer Franklyn M. Bergonzi pleaded guilty to one count of conspiracy on June 5 and agreed to cooperate with prosecutors.
The company didn't detail the costs of the replacement and repairs.
Dean told reporters traveling on his 10-city "Sleepless Summer" tour that he considered campaigning in Texas a challenge.
"I felt that if I disagreed with Rosie too much I would lose my job," she said.
The device plays Internet radio streams and comes with a 30-day trial of RealNetworks' Rhapsody music service.
The dollar fell as low as $1.1624 per euro from $1.1486 on Friday, and traded at $1.1594 at 10:15 a.m. in London.
The American decision provoked an angry reaction from the European Commission, which described the move as "legally unwarranted, economically unfounded and politically unhelpful".
Ms. Cripps-Prawak left last Friday, two days after the department introduced a plan to distribute medical marijuana through doctors' offices.
During 2001 and 2002, Morgenthau said, wire transfers from just four of Beacon Hill's 40 accounts totaled more than $3.2 billion.
Last year, he made an unsuccessful bid for the Democratic nomination for governor.
The nation's largest retailer has told its 100 top suppliers they have to start using electronic tags on all pallets of goods by Jan. 25, 2005.
He was taken to a hospital for precautionary X-rays on his neck.
During the hearing, Morales expressed "sincere regrets and remorse" for his actions.
The bill says that a woman who undergoes such an abortion couldn't be prosecuted.
U.S. District Judge Edmund Sargus ruled that the Akron-based company should have determined that changes at one of its plants would increase overall pollution emissions.
Site Finder has been visited 65 million times since its introduction, Galvin said.
There are 103 Democrats in the Assembly and 47 Republicans.
Mr Pollard said: "This is a terrible personal tragedy and a shocking blow for James's family.
"I came basically to Washington to establish relationships and to make sure that we are getting more federal money to California," Schwarzenegger said after meeting with congressional Republicans.
The latest snapshot of the labor markets was slightly better than economists were expecting; they were forecasting claims to fall no lower than 410,000 for last week.
"They were tossed around like feathers," Gordon said.
Chante Jawan Mallard, 27, went on trial Monday, charged with first-degree murder.
"IT is the only vehicle on which established economies will be able to compete," Barrett said.
Linda Saunders pleaded guilty in federal court to six charges, including extortion, money laundering and conspiracy.
Vivendi shares closed 3.8 percent up in Paris at 15.78 euros.
Microsoft has identified the freely distributed Linux software as one of the biggest threats to its sales.
Antonio Monteiro de Castro, 58, currently director of the group’s Latin America & Caribbean operations, will become chief operating officer from the same date.
"Spin and manipulative public relations and propaganda are not the answer," it said.
Another shooting linked to the spree occurred Nov. 11 at Hamilton Central Elementary in Obetz, about two miles from the freeway.
On Tuesday, the central bank left interest rates steady, as expected, but also declared that overall risks were weighted toward weakness and warned of deflation risks.
The new system costs between $1.1 million and $22 million, depending on configuration.
Fighting erupted after four North Korean journalists confronted a dozen South Korean activists protesting human rights abuses in the North outside the main media centre.
Dusty had battled kidney cancer for more than a year.
According to SunnComm's Peter Jacobs, "MediaMax performs exactly as 'advertised' to the companies who purchased it.
Kadyrov was not injured, but four of his bodyguards were among those killed.
The router will be available in the first quarter of 2004 and will cost around $200, the company said.
The commission estimates California lost $1.34 billion -- the most of any state -- to tax shelters in 2001.
The officials did not say whether U.S. forces crossed into Syrian territory and were vague about how the Syrian border guards became involved.
VeriSign introduced its Site Finder service on Sept. 15.
On Monday, as first reported by CNET News.com, the RIAA withdrew a DMCA notice to Penn State University's astronomy and astrophysics department.
Druce is still being held at the prison and is now in isolation, she said.
The first health-care worker in the country to die of SARS was a Filipina-Canadian who contracted the disease at North York General Hospital, the site of the second outbreak.
Their leader, Abu Bakr al-Azdi, turned himself in in June; his deputy was killed in a recent shootout with Saudi forces.
After Freitas' opening statement, King County Superior Court Judge Charles Mertel recessed trial until after the Thanksgiving weekend.
Google's investors include prominent VC firms Kleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers and Sequoia Capital, the paper noted.
July 1st is the sixth anniversary of Hong Kong's return to Chinese rule.
Palm Wednesday announced plans to acquire Handspring, a company started by Jeff Hawkins, regarded by many as the father of the Palm handheld.
"I'm not going to be sponsoring it because it is not our proposal but I'm not going to be negative about it".
The government recently shelved peace talks with the MILF, being brokered by Malaysia, after a string of attacks, including three bombings, on Mindanao.
The company posted a profit of $54.3 million, or 22 cents per share, in the year-ago period.
Joining Boston on Monday were the Massachusetts communities of Watertown, Saugus and Framingham.
He was tracked to Atlanta where he was arrested on Tuesday night.
ISRAELI soldiers knocked down empty mobile homes and water towers in 10 tiny West Bank settlement outposts overnight as part of a US-backed Mideast peace plan.
The union had not yet revealed which chain would be targeted.
Get it all out," says Howard Davidowitz, chairman of Davidowitz & Associates, a national retail consulting firm based in New York City.
The updated products include Pylon Pro, Pylon Conduit, Pylon Anywhere, and Pylon Application Server.
Dixon was otherwise the class of the field at Pikes Peak International Raceway.
Turkish authorities have said all the suicide bombers were Turks.
In April, it had forecast operating earnings in the range of 60 to 80 cents a share.
From Florida to Alaska, thousands of revelers vowed to push for more legal rights, including same-sex marriages.
By Sunday night, the fires had blackened 277,000 acres, hundreds of miles apart.
Others with such a status are Egypt, Israel, and Australia.
The findings appear in Wednesday's Journal of the American Medical Association (news - web sites).
Additionally, the h2210’s cradle has room to charge a second battery.
U.S. forces struck dozens of targets on Monday, killing six guerrillas and arresting 21 others, the military said.
One of the 14 Kurds pointed at the word "refugee" in an English/Turkish dictionary.
"Close co-operation between law-enforcement agencies and intelligence services lie at the heart of the ongoing fight against terrorism," Mr Howard said.
In 2006, the group says the market will rebound 29.6 percent to $21.3 billion in sales.
Captain Robert Ramsey of the US 1st Armoured Division said a truck had exploded outside the building about 11am, and that one of the compound's outer walls had collapsed.
They came despite what BA called a "difficult quarter", which it said included unofficial industrial action at Heathrow.
This northern autumn US trainers will work with soldiers from four North African countries on patrolling and gathering intelligence.
The Bush administration blames Hussein loyalists and foreign Muslim militants who have entered Iraq to fight U.S. troops for the wave of bombings and guerrilla attacks.
It later emerged that he had broken his right thigh and bones in his right wrist and elbow.
The author is one of several defense experts expected to testify.
"The figures are becoming catastrophic," said Dr. Patrick Pelloux, the president of the association of emergency room physicians.
"Whatever has happened to you by way of punishment is certainly more than enough," Covello told the 49-year-old, whose family, friends and supporters filled half the courtroom.
The mother also alleged in the lawsuit that she was sexually assaulted by one of the guards.
The two-year note US2YT=RR fell 5/32 in price, taking its yield to 1.23 percent from 1.16 percent late on Monday.
As part of a restructuring Peregrine sold its Remedy help desk software unit last year to BMC Software Inc.
Yes, from today Flash memory purchased from AMD or Fujitsu will be branded Spansion.
The world's two largest automakers said their U.S. sales declined more than predicted last month as a late summer sales frenzy caused more of an industry backlash than expected.
A tropical storm rapidly developed in the Gulf of Mexico Sunday and was expected to hit somewhere along the Texas or Louisiana coasts by Monday night.
The pressure may well rise on Thursday, with national coverage of the final round planned by ESPN, the cable sports network.
Pataki praised Abraham's decision, and LIPA Chairman Richard Kessel said the cable should be kept in operation permanently.
Part of the accord was the implementation of a special health council that would monitor health spending and progress in reforming the health system.
Dynes came to UC San Diego in 1991 after 22 years as a physicist with AT&T Bell Labs.
Shares in BA were down 1.5 percent at 168 pence by 1420 GMT, off a low of 164p, in a slightly stronger overall London market.
The Senate agreed Tuesday to lift a 10-year-old ban on the research and development of low-yield nuclear weapons.
Meningitis is an infection of the spinal cord fluid and the tissue around the brain.
The companies, Chiron and Aventis Pasteur, together made about 80 million doses of the injected vaccine, which ordinarily would have been enough to meet U.S. demand.
Mayor Joe T. Parker said late Thursday that the three workers were two men and a woman who were inside the building when the first blast occurred.
London-based NCRI official Ali Safavi told Reuters: "We condemn this raid, which is in our view illegal and morally and politically unjustifiable."
Investigators uncovered a 4-inch bone fragment from beneath the concrete slab Thursday, but it turned out to be an animal bone, authorities said.
Joining Stern and McEntee on stage was International Union of Painters and Allied Trades President James Williams.
It exploded in his hands, but the former Italian prime minister was unhurt.
Some 95 million Americans -- half of all households -- invest in mutual funds.
Halabi's military attorney, Air Force Maj. James Key, denied the charges, which could carry a death penalty.
Waksal, in a letter to the court, said: "I tore my family apart.
Since early May, the city has received 1,400 reports of dead blue jays and crows, Jayroe said.
But Forest, the Freedom Organisation for the Right to Enjoy Smoking Tobacco, said: ''Mention the word prohibition and everyone knows what happened there.
The House has passed prescription-drug legislation in the last two sessions, but the Senate has failed to do so.
Once converted, BayStar will own an aggregate of approximately 2.95 million shares of SCO common stock or 17.5 percent of the company's outstanding shares.
The elderly and those with weakened immune systems are also urged to protect against mosquito bites.
OPEC producers at a meeting on Wednesday are set to pressure independent oil exporters to contribute to the cartel's next supply cut to allow for the return of Iraqi oil.
The Winston-Salem, North Carolina company opened six stores during the quarter, bringing the total to 282.
Ms Lafferty's lawyer, Thomas Ezzell, told a Kentucky newspaper: "My understanding of this is that there is a lower percentage of successful impregnations with frozen.
The Federal Trade Commission (FTC) asked Congress today for additional authority to fight unwanted Internet spam, which now accounts for up to half of all e-mail traffic.
A federal grand jury indicted them on Tuesday; the document was sealed until yesterday to allow authorities to make arrests.
People who have opposed these actions throughout are now trying to find fresh reasons to say this wasn't the right thing to do."
Klarman was arrested by FBI agents in the Hamptons, an exclusive summer resort enclave east of New York City.
The bishop told police he thought he had hit a dog or a cat or that someone had thrown a rock at his vehicle.
The report also claims that there will be up to 9.3 million visitors to hot spots this year, up again from the meagre 2.5 million in 2002.
Richard Miller remained hospitalized after undergoing a liver transplant, but his wife has recovered.
Sequent representatives could not immediately be reached for comment on the SCO announcement.
The proportion of people covered by employers dropped from 62.3 percent in 2001 to 61.3 percent last year.
WORLD No. 2 Lleyton Hewitt has accused the Association of Tennis Professionals of malice, including an alleged attempt last year to dupe him into refusing a drug test.
MSN Messenger 6 will be available for download starting at 6 p.m. GMT on Wednesday from http://messenger.msn.com/download/v6preview.asp.
Families stuck on the highway remained in their cars, and used their cell phones to call home.
In connection with the incident, I have acknowledged that I behaved inappropriately."
A promotional poster, complete with countdown dial, reminds readers of the upcoming release of "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix."
A spokesman said: "Since November, we have co-operated fully with the police.
Women who eat potatoes and other tuberous vegetables during pregnancy may be at risk of triggering type 1 diabetes in their children, Melbourne researchers believe.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX inched up 3 points, or 0.32 percent, to 970.
People who once thought their blood pressure was fine actually may be well on their way to hypertension under new U.S. guidelines published on Wednesday.
"Further testing is still under way, but at this stage, given the early detection, the outlook in such instances would be positive," the specialist said yesterday.
Amazon also reported that the New York Attorney General's office had settled civil fraud charges with one of the spoofers it identified.
The leading actress nod went to energetic newcomer Marissa Jaret Winokur as Edna's daughter Tracy.
In morning trading, the Dow Jones industrial average was up 40.12, or 0.5 percent, at 8,571.69, having fallen 51 points Monday.
For the entire season, the average five-day forecast track error was 259 miles, Franklin said.
Rich media doubled its share, increasing from 3% in Q2 2002 to 6% in Q2 2003.
"It appears from our initial report that this was a textbook landing considering the circumstances," Burke said.
Allegiant shares rose $4, or $17.2 percent, to $27.43 in Thursday morning trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
By state law, 911 calls are not public information and were not released.
The ADRs fell 10 cents to $28.95 at 10:06 a.m. in New York Stock Exchange composite trading today.
It will take time to oust die-hard remnants of Saddam Hussein's deposed regime in Iraq, Defense Secretary Donald H. Rumsfeld said Tuesday.
Orange shares jumped as much as 15 percent.
Bremer said one initiative is to launch a $70 million nationwide program in the next two weeks to clean up neighborhoods and build community projects.
A search for three missing teenagers uncovered at least two bodies buried beneath freshly poured concrete in the basement of a house, authorities said Wednesday.
Sayliyah was the command base for the Iraq war, but Central Command sent hundreds who ran the war back home to Tampa, Florida.
Beleaguered telecommunications gear maker Lucent Technologies is being investigated by two federal agencies for possible violations of U.S. bribery laws in its operations in Saudi Arabia.
SCO says the pricing terms for a license will not be announced for weeks.
The Nasdaq composite index added 30.46 points, or 2 percent, to 1,520.15.
The British Foreign Office said Monday that coalition authorities in Iraq were pleased that the men were freed.
Wal-Mart estimates more than 100 million Americans visit their stores every week.
Sources within the racing industry have told the Daily Bulletin that Fontana will get a second NASCAR race on Labor Day weekend starting next season.
Added Mr. Prodi: "Maybe, but the old age helps us to understand our strengths and our weakness."
"I am proud that I stood against Richard Nixon, not with him," Kerry said.
He claimed Red Hat and the Free Software Foundation with trying to undermine U.S. copyright and patent law.
Shares of Corixa were gaining 71 cents, or 10%, to $7.91 on the Nasdaq.
Police then called a bomb squad, but the device exploded, killing Wells, before bomb technicians arrived.
Spokesmen for the FBI, CIA, Canadian Security Intelligence Service and Royal Canadian Mounted Police declined to comment on El Shukrijumah's stay in Canada.
"This has been a persistent problem that has not been solved," investigation board member Steven Wallace said.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI ended up 56.79 points, or 0.67 percent, at 8,588.36 -- its highest level since January 17.
"Americans don't cut and run, we have to see this misadventure through," she said.
At 12 months there was still a difference in function, although it was not a significant one.
"There is no doubt about the chemical programme, biological programme, indeed nuclear programme, indeed all that was documented by the UN," he said.
"It just seems like all the issues that we support, he doesn't," said Gabriela Lemus of LULAC.
"City-grown pollution, and ozone in particular, is tougher on country trees," says Cornell University ecologist Jillian Gregg.
Ridge said no real explosives or harmful devices will be used in the exercise.
Dennehy, who transferred to Baylor last year after getting kicked off the University of New Mexico Lobos for temper tantrums, had begun to read the Bible daily.
This is America, my friends, and it should not happen here," he said to loud applause.
Bashir felt he was being tried by opinion not on the facts, Mahendradatta told Reuters.
Schofield got Toepfer to admit on cross-examination that she ignored many of O'Donnell's suggestions and projects.
The Standard & Poor's 500 Index slipped 4.77, or 0.5 percent, to 929.62.
On May 1, he crawled through a narrow, winding canyon, rappelled down a 60-foot cliff and walked some six miles down the canyon.
Amnesty International has said that over the past 20 years it has collected information about 17,000 disappearances in Iraq but the actual figure may be much higher.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 0.7 per cent to 9,547.43 while the S&P 500 was 0.8 per cent weaker at 1,025.79.
Texas Instruments climbed $1.37 to $19.25 yesterday and Novellus Systems Inc. advanced $1.76 to $36.31.
She asked to be excused from last week's Cabinet session to prepare for a meeting with the presidents of Rwanda and Uganda.
"We hope all parties will continue to make efforts and continue the process of dialogue," the Chinese Foreign Ministry said in a statement.
School officials said Van-Vliet reported the accident using the bus’ radio.
In a mixture of ancient pagan and modern Christian rites, the villagers have staged a series of ceremonies hoping to erase the misfortunes they believe have kept them poor.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI edged up 13.33 points, or 0.15 percent, to 9,196.55.
Monkeypox is usually found only in central and western Africa.
Board Chancellor Robert Bennett declined to comment on personnel matters Tuesday.
In that case, the court held that Cincinnati had violated the First Amendment in banning only the advertising pamphlets in the interest of aesthetics.
The film is the second of a trilogy, which will wrap up in November with The Matrix Revolutions.
In addition, the Justice Department said that the FBI has conducted ''fewer than 10'' investigations involving visits to mosques.
The launch coincides with the JavaOne developers' conference in San Francisco this week.
A Royal Duty is based on his experiences with Diana, Princess of Wales and letters allegedly to and from her.
The army said the raid, which comes just days after Israeli troops shot and killed Abdullah Kawasme, the Hamas leader in the city, targeted militants in Hamas.
Its former chief Mickey Robinson was fired for cause when he left in September, the company said.
SARS went on to claim the lives of 44 people in the Toronto area, including two nurses and a doctor.
Apple Computer's new online music service sold more than 1 million songs during its first week of operation, the company said Monday.
He had been arrested twice before for trespassing and barred from the complex - home to his mother and two children.
Oracle Corp's Chairman and CEO Larry Ellison didn't rule out sweetening the company's unsolicited offer to acquire rival PeopleSoft Inc.
Box cutters were used as a weapon by the Sept. 11, 2001, hijackers and have since been banned as carry-on items.
The Portuguese weather service said Europe's heatwave was caused by a mass of hot, dry air moving from the southeast.
"Spending taxpayer dollars to create terrorism betting parlors is as wasteful as it is repugnant," they announced at a press conference yesterday.
Still, the "somewhat ambiguous ruling" might be a setback for Static Control depending on how it developed its competing product, Merrill Lynch analyst Steven Milunovich said.
Police believe Wilson shot Reynolds, then her mother once in the head before fatally turning the gun on herself.
On July 22, Moore announced he would appeal the case directly to the U.S. Supreme Court.
The monkeys could track their progress by watching a schematic representation of the arm and its motions on a video screen.
That triggered a 47-hour police standoff that inconvenienced thousands of commuters, as traffic backed up in Downtown Washington and northern Virginia.
The Standard & Poor's 500 index advanced 6.48, or 0.7 per cent, to 990.51.
Agriculture ministers from more than one hundred nations are expected to attend the three-day Ministerial Conference and Expo on Agricultural Science and Technology sponsored by the U.S. Department of Agriculture.
According to security sources, London Metropolitan Police Commissioner John Stevens placed his force on its highest state of alert last week following the warning.
Complicating the situation is the presence of battle-hardened Liberians who have been fighting on both sides.
This year the Audubon Society once again hosts its annual Christmas Bird Count.
Before it was removed, the site listed in broken English the rules for hackers who might participate.
Southwest said its traffic was up 4.6 percent in the quarter, and it ended the quarter with $2.2 billion in cash.
Doctors have speculated that the body’s own estrogen protects against cell damage and improves blood flow.
They also found shortness was associated with a family history of hearing loss.
Cisco executives said they were encouraged by $1.3 billion in cash flow and the increase in net income, but hoped for a rebound.
In an E-mail statement to the Knoxville News Sentinel, Shumaker said, ''I am not giving any consideration to resignation.
A poll showed that the FBI bugging of the mayor had given a boost to his reelection effort against GOP opponent Sam Katz.
Bulger's brother is now on the agency's ''10 Most Wanted'' list, sought in connection with 21 murders.
The injured passenger at John Peter Smith Hospital died later Friday morning, Jones said.
Doctors had planned to deliver him two weeks early, on or around November 14.
Sobig.F spreads when unsuspecting computer users open file attachments in emails that contain such familiar headings as "Thank You!," "Re: Details" or "Re: That Movie."
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC rose 17.26 points, or 1.06 percent, to 1,640.06, based on the latest data.
Founders of the group are Matsushita Electric, Sony, Hitachi, NEC, Royal Philips Electronics, Samsung, Sharp and Toshiba.
Is it in the food supply?" says David Ropeik, director of risk communication at the Harvard Center for Risk Analysis.
During a screaming match in 1999, Carolyn told John she was still sleeping with Bergin.
On the other hand, if this will help further establish Steve's innocence, we welcome it."
Florida's Supreme Court has twice refused to hear the case.
Fletcher said he expects to have the support of lawmakers from agricultural states, many of whom are on the committee.
Four versions of Windows operating systems are targeted: Windows NT, Windows 2000, Windows XP and Windows Server 2003.
Seven 20- and 21-year-old cadets were ticketed by police for drinking alcohol in an off-campus hotel room early Saturday with two young women, aged 16 and 18.
Shares of McDonald's Corp. and Wendy's International Inc. continued a modest run-up on the New York Stock Exchange Monday.
Such a step could put the issue before the UN Security Council.
He planned to stay all day until the river crested, which was forecast for late last night.
The camp hosts summer religious retreats for children and other events year-round, according to its Web site.
Dealers said the single currency's downward momentum against the dollar could pick up speed if it broke below $1.15.
Gemstar's shares gathered up 2.6 percent, adding 14 cents to $5.49 at the close.
"The European Union is basically absent," said Tito Barbini, regional minister for agriculture in Tuscany, Italy.
Along with chipmaker Intel, the companies include Sony Corp., Microsoft Corp., Hewlett-Packard Co., IBM Corp., Gateway Inc. and Nokia Corp.
Kroger Co., which owns Ralphs, and Albertsons Inc. bargain jointly with Safeway and locked out their union workers the next day.
According to the Census Bureau, the Hispanic population increased by 9.8 percent from the April 2000 census figures.
Its shares jumped to $54.50 in pre-open trading from $50.90 at Wednesday's close.
He playfully chided the Senate's "little bitty tax relief plan."
Looking to buy the latest Harry Potter?
MediaQ's customers include major handheld makers Mitsubishi, Siemens, Palm, Sharp, Philips, Dell and Sony.
Aventis, based in Strasbourg, France, is one of a handful of companies that still make the flu vaccine.
The Dow Jones industrial average <.DJI> was off 58.69 points, or 0.64 percent, at 9,137.86.
"It was a little bit embarrassing the way we played in the first two games," Thomas said.
From Broadway comedies like "The Seven Year Itch" (1952), "Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter?"
His lawyer, Pamela MacKey, said Bryant expects to be completely exonerated.
It was the best advance since Oct. 1, when the index gained 22.25.
Mr. Mask said Mr. Cullen would be taken from the Somerset County Jail by Thursday and moved to the Ann Klein Forensic Hospital just outside Trenton for psychiatric care.
Scientists believed Stardust trapped thousands of particles of dust.
Nine seconds later, it broke the sound barrier and continued its steep powered ascent.
The report by the independent expert committee aims to dissipate any suspicion about the Hong Kong government's handling of the SARS crisis.
The plane was estimated to be within 100 pounds of its maximum takeoff weight.
Both devices implement the v1.2 standard's eSCO facility to provide the basis for new cordless telephony applications.
Michael Bloomberg, NYC Mayor: "I'm gonna try march with a number of different groups.
The attack seemed similar to others staged near foreign compounds in Riyadh on May 12.
The drop in core wholesale prices in April reflected falling prices for cars, trucks, men's and boy's clothes and cigarettes.
Gainer said the two staff aides are "very sorry this all happened," and the security personnel had performed "well within standards."
"We put a lot of effort and energy into improving our patching process, probably later than we should have and now we're just gaining incredible speed.
International rescue workers are scouring flattened debris for survivors in Iran's shattered ancient Silk Road city of Bam after a violent earthquake killed more than 20,000 people.
Griffith, a Mount Airy native, now lives on the North Carolina coast in Manteo.
He also said the academy will get its own internal report next week detailing the seriousness of the remaining problem.
The boy also sprayed the room full of retardant from fire extinguishers, which made it hard to see, the chief said.
The Conference Board reported its U.S. Consumer Confidence Index slipped to 83.5 in June from 83.6 in May.
"I notice a mood change in their priorities," one politician said.
"But HRT should not be used to prevent heart disease or any other chronic condition."
Heather, 35, who lost a leg in a road accident, is thought to have steel plates fitted in her hips, which would make natural childbirth impossible.
The network is also dropping its Friday night "Dateline" edition.
The meat, poultry, butter, cheese and nuts were impounded a year ago at a LaGrou Cold Storage warehouse in Chicago.
The BlueCore3-Multimedia includes a 16-bit stereo audio CODEC with dual ADC and DAC for stereo audio.
Vice President Dick Cheney and Mississippi Republican gubernatorial candidate Haley Barbour acknowledge the cheering crowd.
The 51-year-old nurse worked at North York General Hospital, the epicentre of the latest outbreak.
Rusch has also allowed five or more earned runs in each of his last three starts.
Mr. Turner transferred about 10 million shares to a charitable trust before they were sold.
He also recruited others to participate in the scheme by convincing them to receive fraudulently obtained merchandise he had ordered for himself.
Gartner's report said global WLAN equipment shipments reached 19.5 million last year, a 120 percent increase over 2001's 8.9 million units.
The New York Mets then selected outfielder Lastings Milledge from Lakewood Ranch High School in Florida.
Now, with the agency's last three shuttles grounded in the wake of the Columbia disaster, that wait could be even longer.
Bremer, 61, is a onetime assistant to former Secretaries of State William P. Rogers and Henry Kissinger and was ambassador-at-large for counterterrorism from 1986 to 1989.
Roy Moore, the suspended chief justice of the Alabama Supreme Court, stood accused but unrepentant Wednesday in the same courtroom he recently presided over.
The blue-chip Dow Jones industrial average .DJI climbed 164 points, or 1.91 percent, to 8,765.38, brushing its highest levels since mid-January.
An arrest warrant claimed Bryant assaulted the woman June 30 at a hotel.
Florida Sen. Bob Graham was not identifiable by 61 percent of those polled.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX rose 3.47 points, or 0.36 percent, to 977.59.
As a result, 24 players broke par in the first round.
Those conversations had not taken place as of Tuesday night, according to an Oracle spokeswoman.
FRIENDS of Robert De Niro yesterday rallied around him after he was diagnosed with prostate cancer.
Albertsons and Kroger's Ralphs chain locked out their workers in response.
Taiwan has attempted to gain observer status to the United Nations-affiliated WHO for seven years, but again was rebuffed March 19 at its annual conference in Geneva.
The technology-packed Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> dropped 37.78 points, or 1.94 percent, to 1,912.36.
Shares of SCO closed at $10.93, down 28 cents, in Monday trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
A Washington County man may have the countys first human case of West Nile virus, the health department said Friday.
National Breast Cancer Centre chief executive Professor Christine Ewan said it was too early to quantify the risk to women.
Brendsel and chief financial officer Vaughn Clarke resigned June 9.
On health care, the NDP says there will be no privatization and no health-care premiums.
But JT was careful to clarify that it was "not certain about the outcome of the discussion at this moment".
The House voted 425 to 2 to clear the bill, the first of 13 that Congress must pass each year to fund the federal government.
Knight agreed to a two-year, $2.38 million contract that included a $300,000 signing bonus.
Against the Japanese currency, the euro was at 135.92/6.04 yen against the late New York level of 136.03/14.
The procedure is generally performed in the second or third trimester.
The new companies will begin trading on Nasdaq today under the ticker symbols PLMO and PSRC.
Kids, adults, booksellers and postal workers all are preparing for "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix."
Besides Hampton and Newport News, the grant funds water testing in Yorktown, King George County, Norfolk and Virginia Beach.
Shares of Halliburton fell 71 cents, or 3 percent, to close at $21.59 yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange.
He said the attackers left behind leaflets urging staff at the Ishtar Sheraton to stop working at the hotel and demanding U.S. forces leave Iraq.
With diplomacy heating up in the nearly 10-month-old nuclear crisis, Chinese Foreign Minister Li Zhaoxing is slated to visit South Korea from August 13 to 15.
Tail wagging, Abbey trotted on stage with Conway before a crowd of more than 10,000 attendees at PeopleSoft's annual customer conference at the Anaheim Convention Center.
Bond bulls would like the Fed to recognize that risks are biased toward economic weakness.
"There is the real potential for a secondary collapse," Gov. James McGreevey said.
At midnight on Wednesday, 68 percent of voters said "no" to the tax, with 97 percent of the votes counted.
The government did not identify the taikonauts — a term coined from ‘‘taikong,’’ the Chinese word for space — who would travel on the second mission.
No. 2 HP saw its Unix server sales dropped 3.6 percent to $1.36 billion.
Graham is expected to be nominated and elected to a second one-year term today and will deliver the presidential address.
"These changes may affect a large number of existing Web pages," the statement continued.
"People are obviously inconvenienced," said Dr. Jim Young, Ontario's commissioner of public safety.
The others were given copies of "Dr. Atkins' New Diet Revolution" and told to follow it.
Barbini said the union may reach a compromise with the United States but it wants a system for labeling such foods, something the industry successfully fought here.
The blaze then spread to several surrounding structures on the property and destroyed them.
The rapper's lawyer, Mark Gann, didn't return calls for comment.
Sources say agents confiscated "several" documents he was carrying.
Also weighing on the market was news that General Motors GM.N planned to issue $10 billion in debt, in part to plug a hole in its pension plan.
The helicopter burst into flames upon impact, according to the Mohave County Sheriff's Office.
"I am advised that certain allegations of criminal conduct have been interposed against my counsel," said Silver.
I think we made the right case and did the right thing."
Russin did not comment; his lawyer did not attend the hearing and did not return phone messages.
Licensing revenue slid 21 percent, however, to $107.6 million.
Hispanics, the fastest growing ethnic group in the US, have overtaken blacks to become the largest minority in the US, according to newly released government figures.
The Bishop of Armidale, Peter Brain, was forthright.
When fully operational, the facility is expected to employ up to 1,000 people.
Kollar-Kotelly has scheduled another antitrust settlement compliance hearing for January.
The American Stock Exchange biotech index .BTK surged 5 percent.
"Tomorrow at the Mission Inn, I have the opportunity to congratulate the governor-elect of the great state of California.
"I really liked him and I still do," Cohen Alon told the Herald yesterday.
For the full 12-month period ending June 30, 2003, advanced services lines for ADSL increased by 37 percent and cable modem connections increased by 75 percent.
The new research will be published soon in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.
"I expect Japan to keep conducting intervention, but the volume is likely to fall sharply," said Junya Tanase, forex strategist at JP Morgan Chase.
The Sunshine Group LTD represented the developers, The Related Companies and Apollo Real Estate Advisors LP, on the deal.
State Education Commissioner Kent King said Wednesday that the scores on the Missouri Assessment Program tests disappointed him.
Agents found more than 1,000 credit cards and credit card duplicating machines during a search of Ragin's address.
Lowe's, with about half as many stores, reported a 33 percent increase in third-quarter profit behind a 12 percent jump in same-store sales.
Caldera acquired the Unix server software of the original SCO and changed its name to the SCO Group.
Two convicted killers and another inmate escaped from a state prison on a busy street Wednesday by cutting through a fence, a Corrections Department official said.
"It is about a third of what I owe in the world," he told reporters.
Officers threw him to the ground and handcuffed him, and Reyna dropped a knee into his back, according to testimony.
The best-performing stock was Altria Group Inc., which rose more than 27 percent to close at $42.31 a share.
Officials are trying to retrieve the bodies from the water," police officer J.D. Tambe told Reuters, adding 26 of the dead were women.
According to market research from The NPD Group, the number of people downloading music dropped from 14.5 million in April to 10.4 million in June.
"This is an easy case in my view and wholly without merit, both factually and legally."
The tech-laced Nasdaq Composite Index gained 2.90 points, or 0.18 percent, to 1,606.87.
The weather service reported maximum sustained winds of nearly 105 miles an hour with stronger gusts.
The WiFi potties were to be unveiled this summer, at music festivals in Britain.
The benchmark 10-year Treasury note yield <US10YT=RR> dipped below 4.20 percent on Tuesday.
MEN who drink tea, particularly green tea, can greatly reduce their risk of prostate cancer, a landmark WA study has found.
So was Edie Falco, the critically praised co-star of "Frankie and Johnny."
John Hickenlooper had 65 percent of the vote to 35 percent for City Auditor Don Mares.
Forecasters said warnings might go up for Cuba later Thursday.
Shiites make up 20 percent of the country's population.
The CWA, which represents more than 2,300 Comcast employees, called that excessive when a typical union employee makes about $27,000 a year.
The consumer group generated $4.47 billion of profit and $20 billion of revenue from January to June, 53% of Citigroup's profit and revenue.
GALLOWAY TOWNSHIP, N.J. Annika Sorenstam drew the crowds, Michelle Wie got the publicity but Angela Stanford took her first LPGA victory.
"Saddam is gone, but we want the (U.S.) occupation to end," said Hit resident Abu Qasim.
Young has 28 days to file a response and ask the NASD for a hearing.
British Airways' New York-to-London runs will end in October.
The new policy gives greatest weight to grades, test scores and a student's high school curriculum.
The new version, W32/Sobig.C-mm, had already reached a "high level" outbreak status by Monday, according to security analysts.
The only other person who had not been accounted for Sunday was a man from Fort Worth, Texas.
Stocks dipped lower Tuesday as investors opted to cash in profits from Monday's big rally despite a trio of reports suggesting modest improvement in the economy.
From the start, however, the United States' declared goal was not just to topple Saddam but to stabilize Iraq and install a friendly government.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> gave up 11.91 points, or 1.19 percent, at 986.60.
AFTRA members approved the merger by a vote of 75.88% to 24.12%.
The currency briefly weakened slightly on Monday to trade at 55.34/39, not far from its record low of 55.75.
While some other parts of Africa have been used as staging grounds for the terror group, Malawi previously had not been a major focus of investigations into al-Qaida.
On Sunday, a U.S. soldier was killed and another injured in southern Iraq when a munitions dump exploded.
"I'm real excited to be a Cleveland Cavalier," James said.
According to law enforcement officials, the person arrested was a known sophisticated hacker.
Excluding litigation charges, RIM's loss narrowed even further to 1 cent a share.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX gained 19.72 points, or 1.98 percent, to 1,015.69.
It will also help reform the Royal Solomon Islands Police, strengthen the courts and prisons system and protect key institutions such as the Finance Ministry from intimidation.
Mr Alibek said: "Our outcomes are very encouraging.
Selenski descended down the wall and used the mattress to climb over razor wire.
A jury convicted rapper C-Murder, also known as Corey Miller, of second-degree murder Tuesday night in the shooting death of a 16-year-old in a Jefferson Parish nightclub.
Joe Kernan, who had been lieutenant governor for the past seven years, was sworn in as governor after O'Bannon died Saturday.
Wells’ other series include NBC’s ER and Third Watch.
Thirty-three of the 42 men had been arrested by Wednesday evening, said Daniel Bogden, U.S. attorney in Nevada.
Advanced Micro Devices said Fujitsu Siemens Computers is offering a high-end workstation based on AMD's Opteron 200 Series.
Five-time Tour de France winner and cancer survivor Lance Armstrong had a few words of advice for other cancer survivors in Denver on Friday.
She survives him as do their four children -- sons Anthony and Kelly, daughters Linda Hope and Nora Somers -- and four grandchildren.
Police using pepper spray arrested 12 people Monday night at a march and rally by about 400 activists protesting an annual training seminar of the Law Enforcement Intelligence Unit.
Common side effects include nasal congestion, runny nose, sore throat and cough, the FDA said.
The department ordered an 18.2 percent reduction for Allstate Texas Lloyds and a 12 percent reduction for State Farm Lloyds.
Kodak expects earnings of 5 cents to 25 cents a share in the quarter.
Colgate shares closed Monday at $56.30 on the New York Stock Exchange.
Several shots rang out in the darkness, but only one gator had been killed by 11 p.m.
Shares of Corixa fell 12 cents to $6.88 on the Nasdaq stock market.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> was 0.46 points lower, or 0.05 percent, at 997.02.
Announcing the selection, Kmart CEO Julian Day said Grey will help the retailer "find creative ways to communicate the unique strengths of Kmart to the new America consumer."
Republicans had pledged to complete a Medicare drug package by August, then extended the deadline to Oct. 17, and they are still working on it.
Supermarket chains facing a possible grocery clerk strike this week accused union leaders Monday of breaking off contract talks prematurely over the weekend.
He was referring to John S. Reed, the former Citicorp chief executive who became interim chairman and chief executive of the exchange last Sunday .
The index, which measures activity in the service sector, climbed to 50.7 last month from 47.9 in March.
Bush plans to meet with Israeli Prime Minister Ariel Sharon and the new Palestinian prime minister, Mahmoud Abbas, in the Jordanian port of Aqaba on Wednesday.
"Unlike many early-stage Internet firms, Google is believed to be profitable.
"It is safe to assume the Senate is prepared to pass some form of cap," King said.
And when asked if he felt regret or guilt about the attack his answer was an adamant "no".
Another big gainer was Rambus Inc. (nasdaq: RMBS - news - people), which shot 32 percent higher.
Russ Britt is the Los Angeles Bureau Chief for CBS.MarketWatch.com.
"If you pass this bill, Big Brother will be watching you," said Rep. John Mabry, D-Waco.
Douglas Robinson, a senior vice president of finance, will take over as chief financial officer on an interim basis.
INTEL TODAY disclosed details of its next-generation XScale processor for mobile phones and handheld devices here in San Jose.
Several states and the federal government later passed similar or more strict bans.
Still, he noted Miami must decide whether to seek ACC membership for the next school year by June 30 to adhere to Big East guidelines.
He refused to reveal what percentage of flights carried sky marshals, or whether they would be increased.
Revenues for "The Hulk" came in well below those of last month's Marvel Comics adaptation, "X2: X-Men United," which grossed $85.6 million in its opening weekend.
Shares of Littleton, Colorado-based EchoStar rose $1.63, or 5.3 percent, to $32.26 at 10:55 a.m.
The valid signatures of 897,158 registered California voters must be collected and turned in to county election officials by Sept. 2.
The benchmark 10-year note US10YT=RR lost 11/32 in price, taking its yield to 3.21 percent from 3.17 percent late on Monday.
The MDC called the strike to force Mr Mugabe to either resign or negotiate a settlement of the Zimbabwe crisis.
The 6th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals on Wednesday ruled that an Ohio law banning a controversial late-term abortion method passes constitutional muster and the state can enforce it.
The Nasdaq composite index advanced 20.59, or 1.3 percent, to 1,616.50, after gaining 5.7 percent last week.
Revenue rose 3.9 percent, to $1.63 billion from $1.57 billion.
In January 2000, notebooks represented less than 25 percent of sales volume.
Argentine Guillermo Coria and Netherlander Martin Verkerk are in the other half.
The Nasdaq Composite Index rose 19.67, or 1.3 percent, to 1523.71, its highest since June 18.
"What can I say to you?" he told a crowd at a cemetery with a thousand headstones, many of them marking the graves of entire families.
They said they had concluded that the film failed "to present a balanced portrayal" of the Reagans.
"We're going to do everything in our power to get money back to ratepayers as quickly as possible," Kennedy said.
She had only a single condition, that the book not be published until her death.
The findings are published in the November 6 edition of the journal Nature.
Median household income declined 1.1 percent between 2001 and 2002 to $42,409, after accounting for inflation.
U.S. and European leaders pledged on Wednesday to work together to keep Iran from developing nuclear weapons, presenting a united front after months of bitter acrimony over Iraq.
The company said it would cut the wholesale price of most top-line CDs to $9.09 from $12.02.
He left the army for Syria where he received religious training.
The meeting was scheduled to end Wednesday night, with attendees approving resolutions that express the denomination's view on issues but that are not binding on churches.
But the inadequate performance of students in various subgroups tagged the state as deficient under the federal No Child Left Behind act.
This led to the recovery of the 270-kilogram Cancuen altar, announced on Wednesday by the Vanderbilt University in Nashville and the National Geographic Society.
Shares of Allergan fell 14 cents to close at $78.12 on the New York Stock Exchange (news - web sites).
The upcoming second-quarter earnings season will be particularly important in offering investors guidance, they say.
In a not-too-subtle swipe at Dean, he predicted Americans would not elect a Democrat "who sounds an uncertain trumpet in these dangerous times."
That took the benchmark 10-year note US10YT=RR down 9/32, its yield rising to 3.37 percent from 3.34 percent late on Thursday.
The report forecasts there will be 71,079 hot spots worldwide this year, up from just 14,752 in 2002 and 1,214 in 2001.
A new study, conducted in Europe, found the medicine worked just as well as an earlier disputed study, sponsored by ImClone Systems, said it did.
The bank's shares fell 45 cents in trading yesterday to $91.51 per share.
Her lawyer Donald Levine told The Telegraph she had been offered $US250,000 to tell her story exclusively to Australian TV.
Perry has called lawmakers into two special sessions to address congressional redistricting.
In the latest violence, insurgents threw a bomb at a U.S. convoy in northern Baghdad, killing one soldier.
Consumer groups are against the changes, saying they hurt individuality in markets.
AirTran officials and a Boeing official declined to comment yesterday.
The lawsuit names Shelley, a Democrat, and registrars in Los Angeles, Orange and San Diego counties.
Negotiators said Friday they made good progress during their latest round of talks on creating a Central American Free Trade Agreement.
"It's very difficult to do large syndicated loans in Japan," where there is a lack of expertise, says one banker.
The case comes out of Illinois and involves a for-profit company called Telemarketing Associates Inc.
Every Thursday, a grains management committee meets in the Commission's agriculture directorate to decide the outcome of a weekly export tender.
He urged Congress to "send me the final bill as soon as possible so that I can sign it into law."
Mr. Pingeon is director of litigation for Massachusetts Correctional Legal Services, a prisoners' rights group.
Yee is a 1990 graduate of the U.S. Military Academy at West Point, New York.
"PNC regrets its involvement" in the deals, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer James Rohr said in a statement.
CCAG supported Bill Curry, Rowland's opponent in the 2002 gubernatorial election.
They later fell out and have backed a series of rival Congolese militias in recent years.
State health officials said today a young northeast Kansas woman likely has the state's first case of monkeypox among humans or animals.
Another said its members would continue to call the more than 50 million phone numbers on the Federal Trade Commission's list.
Veteran entertainer Bob Hope celebrates his 100th birthday - and many years in showbusiness - on Thursday.
Navistar shares were down 44 cents, or 1.1 percent, at $41.19 on the New York Stock Exchange after falling as low as $39.93.
Colin Powell, the Secretary of State, said contacts with Iran would not stop.
Declining issues outnumbered advancers nearly 2 to 1 on the New York Stock Exchange.
A floating airfield with a flight deck covering 4.5 acres, the ship took about five years to build.
Im very proud of the citizens of this state, said Gov. John Baldacci, a casino foe.
Stout previously worked for General Electric subsidiary GE Capital Service Inc., where he was vice president and chief technology and information officer.
Only Intel Corp.'s 0.3 percent yield was lower.
An injured woman co-worker also was hospitalized and was listed in good condition.
The shooting victim was taken to Kings County Hospital Center, where he later died, the police said.
MGM, NBC and Liberty executives were not immediately available for comment.
The new analysis found that 32 of the 16,608 participants developed ovarian cancer during about 5 years of follow-up.
They reported symptoms of fever, headache, rash and muscle aches.
"We've become like total strangers," Klein quotes him as saying.
Davey graduated Saturday from Northwest College, which is affiliated with the Assemblies of God, with a bachelor of arts degree in religion and philosophy.
Veteran stage and screen actor Hume Cronyn died of cancer Sunday.
Scrimshaw, Supervisor, Best Minister and Ten Most Wanted are expected to complete the Belmont field.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC fell 23.54 points, or 1.42 percent, to 1,630.08.
"It was a final test before delivering the missile to the armed forces.
"Your withdrawal from our country is inevitable, whether it happens today or tomorrow, and tomorrow will come soon."
Deirdre Hisler, Government Canyon's manager, said the state has long had its eye on this piece of property and is eager to complete the deal to obtain it.
According to a news release sent by the Terry Schindler-Schiavo Foundation, Florida Speaker Johnnie Byrd will introduce "Terri's Bill" during the special session Monday.
Also, businesses throughout Utah are volunteering to display Amber alerts on their signs.
Thanks to the euro's rise against the Japanese currency, the dollar was at 117.24 yen, well above the overnight 10-month low of 116 yen.
Former South African Archbishop Desmond Tutu said Sunday he did not see what "all the fuss" was over appointing a gay bishop, but urged homosexual clergy to remain celibate.
Russian stocks fell after the arrest last Saturday of Mikhail Khodorkovsky, chief executive of Yukos Oil, on charges of fraud and tax evasion.
Reuters witnesses said many houses had been flattened and the city squares were packed with crying children and the homeless, huddled in blankets to protect them from the cold.
For the year, it expects sales of $94 million and a profit of 26 cents a share from continuing operations.
In September, Hewlett-Packard signed a development and marketing deal with the company.
Consumers would still have to get a descrambling security card from their cable operator to plug into the set.
On Friday, the Concorde started up around sunrise and seemed to launch itself straight out of the rising sun.
A Stage 1 episode is declared when ozone levels reach 0.20 parts per million.
After Hughes refused to rehire Hernandez, he complained to the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission.
The three grocery chains were relying on store managers and replacement workers to keep their stores open.
Dewhurst's proposal calls for an abrupt end to the controversial "Robin Hood" plan for school finance.
Other countries and private creditors are owed at least $80 billion in addition.
Telemarketers who call numbers on the list after Oct. 1 could face fines of up to $11,000 per call.
While waiting for a bomb squad to arrive, the bomb exploded, killing Wells.
He explained that he found Antetonitrus when he came to Wits in 2001 as a post-doctoral research assistant at England's University of Bristol.
Air Canada, the largest airline in Canada and No. 11 in the world, has been under court protection from creditors since April 1.
The security official's backup couldn't fill in because he was on active military duty, Strutt said.
The jury also found Gonzales guilty of using excessive force by dousing Olvera-Carrera with pepper spray.
The bodies of some of the dead, pulled out from under the train, were laid out beside the tracks while emergency services brought in wooden coffins.
Garner said the self-proclaimed mayor of Baghdad, Mohammed Mohsen al-Zubaidi, was released after two days in coalition custody.
"Enron company executives engaged in widespread and pervasive fraud," prosecutor Samuel Buell told the Associated Press.
"It seems to me ... we're just dealing with bragging rights here, who wins and who loses," said Gammerman, who heard the case without a jury.
Customers that pay the $1,219 entrance fee get SMS 2003 with 10 device client access licenses.
Results of the 2001 Aboriginal Peoples Survey released yesterday by Statistics Canada suggest living standards have improved but still lag for those off reserves.
"The recent turnaround in the stock market and an easing in unemployment claims should keep consumer expectations at current levels and may signal more favorable economic times ahead."
While the day's trading was lackluster, the Standard & Poor's 500 index was preparing to close out its best three-month period since the fourth quarter of 1998.
Researchers found the fossils in a semidesert area of Venezuela, about 250 miles west of Caracas.
ONA explicitly stated that it did not receive intelligence material indicating that Jemaah Islamiyah terrorist network was planning to mount an operation in Bali.
Those reports were denied by the interior minister, Prince Nayef.
Bryant previously said that hike had a greater impact on demand than officials expected.
The American women, who are defending champions, will play in Philadelphia on Sept. 25 and conclude group competition in Columbus on Sept. 28.
Judge Leroy Millette Jr. can reduce the punishment to life in prison without parole when Muhammad is formally sentenced Feb. 12, but Virginia judges rarely take such action.
Mr McDonnell is leading Grant Thornton International's inquiry into the Italian business.
A spokeswoman at Strong Memorial Hospital said Doud was in satisfactory condition Tuesday night.
Ray Brent Marsh, 29, faces multiple counts of burial service fraud, making false statements, abuse of a dead body and theft.
After that, college President Paul Pribbenow told him to wrap up his speech.
For the 12-month period ending June 30, high-speed lines installed in homes and businesses increased by 45 percent.
Ricky Clemons' brief, troubled Missouri basketball career is over.
US military officials say rotor wash from the helicopter might have blown down the banner.
The industry's largest association is urging its members not call the more than 50 million home and cellular numbers on the list.
The settlement taking effect this week was reached less than two months after O'Malley took the helm of the nation's fourth-largest archdiocese.
The U.S. Capitol was evacuated yesterday after authorities detected a possibly hazardous material in the basement of the Senate wing, Capitol Police said.
The former president also gave numerous speeches in 2002 without compensation, said his spokesman Jim Kennedy.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX was down 0.04 points, or 0 percent, at 971.52.
Dubbed Project Mad Hatter, the Linux-based desktop is being promoted by Sun as a more secure and less expensive alternative to Windows.
The workers accuse General Dynamics of "reverse age discrimination" because of a change in retirement benefits in 1997.
The tech-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC eased 5.16 points, or 0.32 percent, at 1,590.75, breaking a six-day string of gains.
A key figure in former state Treasurer Paul Silvester's bribery scheme was accused Wednesday of changing his story about Silvester's alleged corrupt dealings with a Boston investment firm.
"The mission of the CAPPS II system has been and always will be aviation security," said the administration, part of the Homeland Security Department.
Hovan did not speak, but his lawyer, John Speranza, said his client "did not wake up that day" intending to hurt anyone.
"We believe that it is not necessary to have a divisive confirmation fight over a Supreme Court appointment," Daschle wrote.
Yahoo accounts for 159,354 of the BSD sites, with 152,054 from NTT/Verio and 129,378 from Infospace, the survey found.
The Space Infrared Telescope Facility's mission is to search for the beginnings of the universe.
Its maker, MedImmune Inc., based in Gaithersburg, made 4 million to 5 million doses this year.
Kaichen appeared Wednesday in federal court on two bank robbery charges.
In the latest top-level shuffle at CNN, Teya Ryan is leaving her post as general manager of U.S. programming, the network announced.
He is suspected of being a key figure in Jemaah Islamiyah, the al-Qa'eda-linked terror group which has been blamed for the bombings.
About 100 firefighters are in the bosque today, Albuquerque Fire Chief Robert Ortega said.
"The issue has been resolved," Marlins President David Samson said through a club spokesman.
China's Health Ministry said five more people had died of Sars and a further 159 were infected.
The respected medical journal Lancet has called for a complete ban on tobacco in the United Kingdom.
Shares of McDonald's rose $1.83, or 8.3 percent, to close at the day's high of $23.89.
An incremental step reported by researchers at the University of California, San Francisco, is the latest in a decade-long effort.
He said the FDA was hoping Congress and the courts would bring clarity to the situation and some financial relief to consumers.
Ernst & Young admitted no wrongdoing with the settlement.
The driver of the truck escaped and is now being sought by the police, Supoyo said.
The witness, a 27-year-old Kosovan parking attendant with criminal convictions for dishonesty, was paid 10,000 by the News of the World.
"In so many different ways, the artistry of black musicians has conveyed the experience of black Americans throughout our history," Bush said.
The differences between Grassley and Thomas on energy and Medicare have become so pointed that other members say their angry personal relationship is embarrassing the party.
Geraldine Andrews, the pastor's daughter-in-law, said Robinson recently took her daughter out of a mental health facility.
He wounded a security guard and then fled, stabbing two passersby as he ran off along the promenade.
He and his colleagues attributed some of the communication gap to doctors feeling pressed for time.
State police said as many as 30 workers were trapped immediately after the garage collapsed.
Before Thursday's matinee, Baker called a clubhouse meeting, concerned that the controversy had distracted the Cubs.
She was taken by ambulance to Charing Cross Hospital in Hammersmith.
Bush turned out a statement yesterday thanking the commission for its work, and said, "Our journey into space will go on."
OS ANGELES - ''The Hulk'' was a monster at the box office in its debut weekend, taking in a June opening record of $62.6 million.
The governor is going to Jackson, where 13 of the state's 16 fatalities were reported.
Congratulations on being named Time magazine's Person of the Year.
Shortly after the opening bell, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 11.13 to 9,228.48, while the S&P 500 index gained 1.74 to 982.33.
The indictment said he attended important meetings to plan the attacks, recruited fellow bombers and coordinated the operation.
In addition, primary care trusts (PCTs) were given star ratings for the first time this year.
It will also give Microsoft an opportunity to comment on remedies proposed by the Commission.
Texans saddled with skyrocketing homeowners premiums might finally be getting relief.
Six Democrats are vying to succeed Jacques and have qualified for the Feb. 3 primary ballot.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index rose 3.42 points, or 0.34 percent, to 1,007.84.
Crews worked to install a new culvert and prepare the highway so motorists could use the eastbound lanes for travel as storm clouds threatened to dump more rain.
Halliburton on Tuesday reiterated its contention that KBR had "delivered fuel to Iraq at the best value, the best price and the best terms".
Elecia Battle, of Cleveland, told police she dropped her purse as she left the Quick Shop Food Mart last week after buying the ticket.
Customers include Mitsubishi, Siemens, DBTel, Dell, HP, Palm, Philips, Sharp, and Sony.
The Cleveland Cavaliers won the right to draft James by winning the NBA's annual lottery Thursday night.
Among the workers, the researchers found short workers had worse hearing than expected for their age.
Mr Colpin did not specify whether it was this system that was at the centre of the investigation.
Until now, sales of the entertainment-oriented PCs have been limited to the United States, Canada and Korea.
Ballmer has been vocal in the past warning that Linux is a threat to Microsoft.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500-stock index was up 4.83 points or 0.49 per cent to 980.76.
Talabani told him the Governing Council would "need UN assistance and advice in implementing the new decisions which have been taken."
Stanford (46-15) plays South Carolina (44-20) today in a first-round game at Rosenblatt Stadium in Omaha, Neb.
The same survey a month ago had Street leading Katz 42 percent to 34 percent, with 21 percent undecided.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> advanced 11 points, or 1.25 percent, to 931.
"We are expending all available resources toward the investigation," said Assistant U.S. Attorney Todd Greenberg, a counterterrorism prosecutor in Seattle.
But they don’t realize that until it’s too late (of course) because they’re potential victims in a horror movie.
Arthur Benson, attorney for the case's plaintiff schoolchildren, said he will appeal.
The euro has slipped nearly four percent since matching a record peak of around $1.1935 only last week and hitting an all-time high of 140.90 yen in late May.
Pennsylvania, which has the most aggressive treatment program, is treating 548 of 8,030 inmates.
The tech-loaded Nasdaq composite rose 20.96 points to 1595.91 to end at its highest level for 12 months.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC shed 15 points, or 0.98 percent, to 1,492.
With the Expose feature, all open windows shrink to fit on the screen but are still clear enough to identify.
Instead, prosecutors dismissed charges and Rucker left the courtroom a free man.
"This case was both mentally challenging and emotionally exhausting," said the foreman, Jim Wolfcale, a 41-year-old minister.
He arrives later this week on the first state visit by a US President.
The deal, approved by both companies' board of directors, is expected to be completed in the third quarter of Nvidia's fiscal third quarter.
The research firm earlier had forecast an increase of 4.9 percent.
The volatile mix could drag the session beyond the four days allotted by Bush, said Senate President Jim King.
More than 100 police officers were involved in the busts that were the culmination of a two-year operation investigating the cocaine importing and money laundering gang.
Stripping out the extraordinary items, fourth-quarter earnings were 64 cents a share compared to 25 cents a share in the prior year.
But at age 15, she had reached 260 pounds and a difficult decision: It was time to try surgery.
PeopleSoft will commit $863 million in cash and issue 52.6 million new shares, the companies said.
"If we could do that throughout the world, we could end terrorism," he said.
Buoyed by some of the advice imparted by Nicklaus, Howell shot an 8-under 64 for a one-stroke lead over Kenny Perry.
So in his State of the Union address in January, Bush declared that the British government "has learned that Saddam Hussein recently sought significant quantities of uranium from Africa."
Net revenue rose to $3.99 billion from $3.85 billion during the same quarter last year.
If it's a Bill Gates Comdex keynote, it must be time for new Tablet PCs.
According to reports, Knight allegedly punched a parking attendant outside a Los Angeles nightclub.
Among those waiting a turn was Jodie Singer, a sixth-grader from Washington, D.C.
But the cancer society said its study had been misused.
Both are being held in the Armstrong County Jail.
A few miles further east is Tehuacan, where corn may first have been domesticated 4,000 years ago.
The confusion capped a tumultuous week for the list, which is intended to block about 80 percent of telemarketing calls.
The other 24 members are split between representatives of the securities industry and so-called "public" board members.
"Our strong preference is to achieve a financial restructuring out of court, and we remain hopeful we can do so," chief executive Marce Fuller said.
Named in the complaint were former chief executive officers Paul A. Allaire and G. Richard Thoman and former CFO Barry D. Romeril.
The Episcopal Diocese of Central Florida became one of the first in the nation Saturday to officially reject the national denomination's policies on homosexuality.
Chera Larkins, 32, of Manhattan, charged with three sham marriages, is also charged with perjury and filing a false instrument.
It estimated on Thursday it has a 51 percent market share in Europe.
The Senate Banking Committee is scheduled to hold a hearing on Tuesday where Donaldson is scheduled to testify on hedge and mutual funds.
The tech-heavy Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC was off 0.11 percent, or 1.78 points, at 1,594.13.
These men "are entitled to respect for their private lives," Kennedy said.
Mr Morse is charged with assault and Mr Darvish is charged with filing a false report.
The mock explosion, the first event in the drill, occurred in a car in industrial south Seattle.
The third appointment was to a new job, executive vice president and chief staff officer.
The commission dropped charges that Patton improperly appointed Conner to the Kentucky Lottery Board and that he improperly appointed Conner's then-husband, Seth, to the Agriculture Development Board.
McGill also detailed the hole that had been cut in the Caprice's trunk.
Analysts had been expecting a net loss of 54 cents a share, according to Thomson First Call.
The district also sent letters yesterday informing parents of the situation.
Richard Grasso quit as chairman last week after losing the support of his board amid public furor over his $140 million pay package.
The new servers will run either Linux or the x86 version of Solaris, he said.
Sliding down the ice, Moriarty and Carella hit the spongy, rocky floor of the river and immediately felt the pull.
Cadbury Schweppes plc plans to cut 5500 jobs and shut factories after a 4.9 billion ($A11.9 billion) acquisition spree over the past three years inflated costs.
Mr. Sweeney outlined plans for the campaign in a speech last night in Philadelphia at the annual meeting of the American Political Science Association.
It seemed like an isolated incident," said Ariel Dean of Washington D.C., who earned a degree in political science.
The jury awarded TVT about $23 million in compensatory damages and roughly $108 million in punitive damages.
TVT Records sought $360 million in punitive damages and $30 million in compensatory damages, officials said.
The two Democrats on the five-member FCC panel held a news conference to sway opinion against Powell.
Unit volumes also set a record as notebooks accounted for more than 40 percent of sales.
Besides battling its sales slump, Siebel also has been sparring with some investors upset about huge stock option windfalls company managers have pocketed.
That compared with a year-earlier profit of $102 million, or 13 cents a share.
Stanford (51-17) and Rice (57-12) will play for the national championship tonight.
"The economy, nonetheless, has yet to exhibit sustainable growth.
A 32-count indictment "strikes at one of the very top targets in the drug trafficking world," U.S. Attorney Marcos Jimenez said.
A soldier was killed Monday and another wounded when their convoy was ambushed in northern Iraq.
The commission estimated California lost $937 million to corporate tax shelters in 2001.
In other markets, U.S. Treasuries started off on Monday weaker, as stocks rose early.
A cost analysis is under way, said Michael Rebell, CFE's executive director.
I was going to the court believing I could do this, only if I played my best tennis.
Dotson told FBI agents that he shot Dennehy after the player tried to shoot him, according to the arrest warrant affidavit.
Dogs, he said, are second only to humans in the thoroughness of medical understanding and research.
The stock rose $2.11, or about 11 percent, to close on Friday at $21.51 on the New York Stock Exchange.
Eric Gagne earned his 17th save in as many opportunities as he struck out three in the ninth and allowed only an infield single by Greg Norton.
Blair's government included the charge that Saddam sought uranium from Niger in a September 2002 dossier setting out the case for military action.
Not counting energy prices, wholesale prices were down 0.9 percent.
The spacecraft is scheduled to blast off as early as tomorrow or as late as Friday from the Jiuquan launching site in the Gobi Desert.
Hong Kong was flat, Australia , Singapore and South Korea lost 0.2-0.4 percent.
SUVs parked on residential streets in Monrovia were tagged with "ELF" and other slogans, and another was set ablaze in front of a house, Sgt. Tom Wright said.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC was down 25.36 points, or 1.53 percent, at 1,628.26.
At least 11 more cases in Indiana and three in Illinois are suspected.
The pill, which they call the "polypill," would contain aspirin, a cholesterol-lowering drug, three blood pressure-lowering drugs at half the standard dose and folic acid.
"They drive around in their cars, while people are being killed 500 metres away," he said on Sunday.
At Tuesday's arraignment hearing, Marsh pleaded not guilty to 122 counts of burial service fraud and 47 counts of making false statements.
Still, revenues from the extra premiums would not be huge.
The Pentagon had hoped to retain control of the postwar effort, so the decision is a victory for Secretary of State Colin L. Powell.
Aiken's study appears in the Sept. 24 issue of the Journal of the American Medical Association.
Semiconductor giant Intel Corp. said yesterday that its second-quarter profits doubled from a year ago as stronger-than-expected demand for computer microprocessors offset the weakness of its communications chip business.
A Merrill Lynch spokesman said "we are pleased with the judge's decision."
Trans fats are created when hydrogen is added to vegetable oil, solidifying it and increasing the shelf life of certain food products.
Schroeder cancelled his Italian holiday after Stefani refused to apologise for the slurs, which came after Berlusconi compared a German politician to a Nazi concentration camp guard.
Dell's OpenManage software includes Dell Update Packages with SMS to help automate the management of server hardware, applications and operating systems patches with a single tool.
He'll be swept over any minute or just die of the cold, Moriarty thought.
LURD's Ja'neh also called for an interim government and the deployment of a U.S.-led Western peacekeeping force.
KEDO Spokesman, Roland Tricot said: "The executive board decided to refer this question to capitals.
But skeptics are concerned about the ease with which vendors can use these hardware-based security features to set digital rights management policies.
Prof Sally Baldwin, 63, from York, fell into a cavity which opened up when the structure collapsed at Tiburtina station, Italian railway officials said.
It calls for the agency to plan an independent safety and engineering organization.
WorldCom's accounting problems came to light early last year, and the company filed for bankruptcy in July 2002, citing massive accounting irregularities.
Benchmark Treasury 10-year notes gained 17/32, yielding 4.015 percent.
Prosecutors did an about-face in May and asked that the autopsy reports be unsealed after portions of Conner Peterson's autopsy report favorable to the defense were leaked to the media.
Volume was moderate at 827.68 million shares, up from 798.95 million at the same point Tuesday.
Penn Traffic's stock closed at 36 cents per share on Wednesday on Nasdaq, up two cents.
Hotly contested legislation that would change the state's takeover law and help a Michigan-based development company fend off a takeover cleared the state Senate on Thursday.
However, other unions including the powerful CGT remained opposed to the reform and demanded the government begin fresh negotiations with them.
The family owns Cheetahs strip clubs here and in Las Vegas.
The new bill would have Medicare cover 95 percent of drug costs over $5,100.
Several thousand 3rd Infantry troops, including the 3rd Brigade Combat Team based at Fort Benning in Columbus, began returning last week.
The study also found that consumer goods advertisers continued to spend the most dollars online, representing 35% of all Web advertising.
Prairie dogs sold as exotic pets are believed to have been infected in an Illinois pet shop by a Gambian giant rat imported from Africa.
The defense cannot appeal Roush's ruling until after the trial.
Crohn's disease causes inflammation of the intestine and symptoms include diarrhea, pain, weight loss and tiredness.
The committee was appointed by Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld under orders from Congress.
Authorities identified the tipster as Richard Powell, who is imprisoned for killing his landlady in 1982.
Kiernan testified that Seifert had received a gunshot wound to the back.
Former Indiana Rep. Frank McCloskey, 64, died Sunday in Bloomington after a battle with bladder cancer.
Hospitals and the Red Cross appealed to blood donors yesterday.
It is priced at $5,995 for an unlimited number of users tapping into the single processor, or $195 per user with a minimum of five users.
A man is riding a bicycle.
A woman and man are dancing in the rain.
Someone is drawing.
A man and a woman are kissing each other.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A person is peeling shrimp.
A woman is cutting broccoli.
A man is playing a guitar.
Two men are fistfighting in a ring.
A small boy is playing with a dog.
The man is drawing.
A man is cutting a potato.
A small dog laying on the bed.
A person wipes butter on a tray.
Two men are playing football.
The man is playing the guitar.
The man is slicing a potato.
A boy is playing a guitar.
The man is slicing a potato.
A man is peeling a potato.
A woman is stabbing a potato with a fork.
A child is waking up.
A boy is playing a key-board.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A toy train is striking a toy car.
A man is playing the guitar.
A cat opens a drawer and climbs inside.
A woman is frying a food.
A woman plays the flute.
A man is dicing an onion.
A girl is playing a guitar.
A girl is singing on stage.
A woman is riding a horse.
A girl is playing a guitar.
A woman is brushing some shrimp.
A man is dancing on the ceiling.
A woman is playing an electric guitar.
A woman thinly slices an onion with a large knife.
A man is playing a keyboard.
A man plays the guitar.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A woman is handling a frog.
A person is peeling shrimp.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing a flute.
Two women are on a couch.
Someone is slicing a cucumber.
A kitten is playing with a blue rope toy.
A group of people are sweeping water out of a house.
The dog is barking at the toy.
A person folds a tortilla.
A cat is drinking milk.
A person is driving a car.
A turtle is walking.
A cow is eating grass.
A woman is chopping broccoli.
A man is crying.
A woman is putting on sun glasses.
The man is playing the guitar.
A man is cutting an onion.
A man is slicing a potato.
A woman is slicing a potato.
A man plays a guitar.
Women are running.
A woman is tapping her fingers on a table.
Someone is boiling okra in a pot.
A man is smoking.
The man is playing the drums.
A man dives into a pool.
A woman is cutting a leak.
A man is playing a harp.
A man dives into a pool.
A little boy is playing a guitar.
The man is smashing garlic.
A man is cutting up a potato.
A woman is dancing.
Women are talking.
A girl is putting gel in her hair.
A kid is playing guitar.
A group of people are marching in place.
A man and a woman is kissing each other.
The woman is shooting a machine gun.
A man played the piano.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A man is slicing a cucumber.
A girl is eating a cupcake.
A woman is cutting an onion.
The man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing the guitar.
Two little girls talk on the telephone.
A man is chopping a log with an axe.
A woman is climbing a cliff.
A man is slicing an onion.
A polar bear is running towards a group of walruses.
A person is cutting a capsicum into pieces.
A man is talking with a woman.
The man is walking.
Someone is pouring oil into a skillet.
A small kitten is playing a ball.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is cutting some fish.
A girl is playing a violin.
Someone is playing a piano.
A man is playing two pianos.
A man is exercising.
A person is slicing a scallop.
A man and a woman are riding on their bicycles.
A man is pouring rice a roni into a pan.
Two men are fighting in a cow pasture.
A woman is adding oil to a pan.
A girl makes up her bed.
The cat played with a watermelon.
A girl jumps on a car.
A man is breaking wooden boards with his hand.
A girl is playing guitar.
A man is praying.
A man is praying.
A car is parking.
A man is running.
A man is dancing.
A man is running.
A man is singing.
A man is carrying another man over his shoulder.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A woman is cutting a tomato.
Someone is peeling a potato.
A woman is peeling a potato.
Two robots kiss.
Two boys on a couch are playing video games.
The man is hiking in the woods.
A woman is squeezing a lemon.
A man is playing piano.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is riding a bike.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A woman is slicing a carrot.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A girl is styling her hair.
A man walking down the stairs.
A man is riding a horse by a creek.
A woman is playing the guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
Two people are riding a motorcycle.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar and singing.
A man is walking in the rain.
A kangaroo is eating.
A man is fishing.
A woman is swimming.
A Woman is eating.
A boy and a girl is dancing in the rain.
A man is driving a car.
A woman is grating onion.
Two roosters are fighting.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is eating a pizza.
A man is shooting a gun.
A man is picking up a tree.
A woman is cutting an onion.
The woman is slicing herbs.
A boy is playing the piano.
A baby elephant is eating.
A person is peeling a potato.
A person is playing a piano.
A woman is cracking eggs into a bowl.
A person is playing the keyboard.
A boy whacks a man with a sword.
A person is slicing a carrot into pieces.
A man sliced through a bunch of water bottles with a knife.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is writing in a book.
A man is spitting.
A man is playing a musical keyboard.
A woman is slicing a garlic.
A person is making a bed.
The man is buttering the bread.
A woman is hitting a man.
A man is playing keyboard.
A man is playing a violin.
Three men are dancing.
A man is speaking.
A man is dancing.
The woman is smoking.
A man is dancing.
The man erased what the other man had on the board.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A man is riding a motorcycle on the highway.
A woman is slicing up some meat.
A person is combing a cat hair.
A woman cuts up broccoli.
A man is playing a piano.
Someone is slicing a tomato.
A woman is dancing in a cage.
A woman is swimming.
A man is running.
The man is playing the guitar.
A cat stares into the camera.
The baby is laughing and crawling.
A man plays a trumpet.
A woman is shooting a gun.
A man is playing the drums.
A woman is dancing in the rain.
A woman is riding a horse.
A woman is dancing.
A kid is playing an instrument.
Someone slices a bottle with a sword.
A man is peeling a banana.
A woman is cutting an apple.
The man is peeling an apple.
A boy is riding a horse.
The puppy tried to get out of the tub.
The man is playing the guitar.
An animal is walking on the ground.
A band is playing on stage.
A woman is playing a guitar and singing.
A little girl is playing a grand piano on stage.
The man is eating.
a group of people dancing
A man plays a guitar.
A little boy hits a golf ball.
A cat swings on a ceiling fan.
A guy is taking off his sunglasses.
Someone is reading an email.
A woman is playing the flute.
The woman is dicing onions.
A monkey is brushing a bull dog.
A person is slicing onions.
A woman is slicing a onion.
A man is playing the piano.
A woman is washing her hands.
A woman fires a shotgun.
A man is eating a bowl of cereal.
A girl is coming up on a car.
A woman is bathing into bath-tub.
A motorcyclist crashes on his motorcycle.
A man is dangling a mouse near a snake.
A man and a woman are walking in the woods.
A person pours some rice pudding into a bowl.
A man stares out a window.
A woman is firing a rifle.
A man is eating a banana.
The men are performing on stage.
A cartoon woman dives into a pool.
The lady put the baby int a trashcan.
Someone is frying meat.
A man is rapidly chopping some mushrooms using a knife.
A woman is adding ingredients to a bowl.
A skateboarder does tricks on a half-pipe.
A man is speaking on a stage.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing on his keyboard.
A person is cutting a potato.
A man is playing drums.
A man is dancing on the ceiling of a room.
Two men are dancing.
Someone is seasoning eggs.
A woman is peeling an onion.
A person is mixing a pot of rice.
A man is swinging in a rope.
Someone is slicing a onion.
A man is cutting tomatoes.
A woman is boiling shrimp.
A man cuts a potato.
A man is dancing on the road.
The deer jumped over the fence.
A girl dances in the rain.
A woman is writing a letter.
A gorilla is playing the drums.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is riding on a horse.
A lion cub tries to climb a fence.
A man is talking on a cell phone.
A man is playing a guitar.
The boy cut the grass by the curb with scissors.
A woman is dicing some peeled potatoes cut into thick strips.
A man with glasses is talking.
A little girl peddling a scooter.
A woman is cutting some flowers.
A person is walking down a stone path.
Someone is pouring chicken broth into a pot.
A man plays the keyboard with his nose.
A man is playing guitar.
A animal is eating.
A man is lifting weights.
A man is running with a bus.
A man is climbing a rope.
A cat is playing the piano.
A woman is dancing in the rain.
A cat cleans itself.
A man is kicking a soccer ball.
Men are running a race.
A woman opens a window.
A man is cutting tomatoes into pieces.
A man is playing a flute.
A woman is cutting potatoes.
Three men are doing same dance in the street.
A chicken is pecking at a dead mouse.
A woman is chopping an onion.
The woman is thinly slicing a cucumber.
A person is slicing a bread pieces.
A woman is cutting a squash.
A woman is adding oil on fishes.
A woman is grating carrots.
Someone is cleaning a animal.
The man is playing the guitar.
A man is talking on the phone.
A woman is smoking.
A man laying down and shooting a gun
A man is being put into an abulance.
A man is diving into a swimming pool.
A man is firing a shot gun.
The man is shaking hands with other men.
A target is being hit with gun fire.
A man playing the guitar.
A man is peeling potato.
The woman is riding a horse.
An airplane moves along a runway.
A woman is slipping in the water-tub.
A man is mowing a lawn.
A man is dancing.
A woman is exercising.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A man is playing piano.
A woman is doing ballet.
A woman is applying makeup.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A woman is slicing a big pepper.
A woman is stirring rice in a pot.
A boy is playing the violin onstage.
The woman is measuring the other woman.
A man puts some cheese on a pizza.
A woman puts slabs of meat in a pan.
The boy played his trumpet.
A person is riding a horse.
A man is staring at a leaf.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A man is slicing vegetables.
A cat is playing.
A man is riding a bicycle.
A band is performing on a stage.
A person is picking a komodo dragon and putting it in a box.
The woman is slicing fish cake.
A man is eating bread.
A woman is cooking shrimp.
A woman is dancing.
A woman tosses a cat in the air, and the cat hangs off a rod on the ceiling.
A person drops a camera down an escelator.
A big turtle is walking.
A man is doing exercise.
A man is burning a flag.
The man is pushing the van.
A man is eating wood.
A dog is speaking to the camera.
A man is putting two paper towels on a paper plate.
A man and woman are walking.
A man is cutting a rope with a sword.
The man is singing and playing the guitar.
A dog is playing with a toy.
A man is cutting a paper.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is dancing.
Two boys are talking on the phone.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A woman is riding a horse.
A man is playing soccer.
A woman is peeling an orange.
A man is bowling.
Someone is cracking an egg open.
A man is cutting a snake to cook.
The man is playing the keyboards.
A woman is applying eye shadow.
A woman is scraping a carrot.
A woman is playing the flute.
A man is riding on a horse.
A man and woman are Bollywood dancing.
A woman is cutting flowers.
A woman is dancing near a fire.
The man danced in the diner.
A man is playing flute.
American flag is waving.
A lion is walking in an enclosed area.
A tiger is walking around his cage.
A person pours cooking oil into a pot.
A woman is cutting potato.
A woman is slicing a lemon.
A man is making a bed.
A parrot is talking.
A woman is playing the flute.
A person is riding a motorcyle.
A man is singing into a microphone.
A man pours rice into a pot.
The dog is barking at the toy.
A woman is adding an egg and stirring.
A woman covers a piece of meat with flour.
A person is slicing some garlic.
A white cat perched on a small wooden cabinet is looking outside the window.
A woman is exercising.
A man does floor exercises.
A child runs into and out of the ocean waves.
A man is slicing a potatoe.
A man is playing the piano.
A guy is riding a horse.
Someone is playing piano.
The woman is putting makeup on the man.
The woman droppped eggplant into the pan.
A dog is stealing food from a refrigerator.
A man plays a trumpet.
A person uses a blowtorch on two cameras.
A woman is slicing a lemon.
A tiger trys to climb the wall.
A man is preparing a hanging rope.
A woman dances on a stage.
A woman is slicing ginger.
Men are playing soccer.
The girl is riding the horse.
A man is putting a knife in a vice.
A person is frying.
A man is shooting a pistol.
A woman is swinging her arms.
A man is walking outside.
A woman is cooking meat.
A man dries his hands.
A soccer player is kicking the soccer ball into the goal from a long way down the field.
A person is scrubbing a zucchini.
A puppy is trying to come out from the sink.
A girl is playing the piano.
A man is drawing some figures.
The monkey is hanging from the trees.
Some children are jumping on Trampoline.
A person is folding a square paper piece.
A woman with a knife is slicing a pepper.
A panda bear is chewing on a stick.
A man is adding oil to car.
The people are lifting bags.
The boy is playing the piano.
A man is talking on the phone.
A man is slicing a carrot by a machine.
A boy played a keyboard.
A cat is playing with an antenna.
A woman is slicing pumpkin.
A woman is braiding her hair.
A man is cutting a potato.
A woman is feeding a baby.
A man is playing a guitar.
The people threw the dummy over the cliff edge.
A gun is being fired.
A woman is mixing eggs.
A woman is cutting a plastic sheet.
A woman cuts a pineapple.
A woman is adding spices on a meat.
A person is adding oil in the pan.
A cook seasons some dough.
A boy is running on a beach.
A baby monkey scratches itself.
The man is throwing knives at a tree.
A boy is riding a bike on a gate.
The woman is slicing tofu.
A man is riding on a boat.
A woman is folding paper.
Someone is folding a piece of paper.
A man is doing a card trick.
A man is playing the piano.
A man is lifting weights.
A man is mowing grass.
A person is mixing water and flour.
The two dogs were in the pen.
A man is riding on one wheel on a motorcycle.
A man is serving cake.
A cat opens a drawer and climbs inside.
Someone is greating a carrot.
A man is opening a box using a knife.
A man is kicking oots of water.
A man is eating.
A puppy is repeatedly rolling from side to side while on its back.
A young boy sings and plays a guitar.
The woman is peeling lemon.
A man is playing the trumpet.
A man is standing on a roof top playing a violin.
A dog is looking around
A woman is slicing an onion.
The man drilled holes into the wood.
Someone is cutting a circle out of a pink sheet of paper.
A man is playing flute.
A man is placing meat in a bag.
A girl is eating a cupcake.
A rabbit is sniffing and pawing a stuffed rabbit.
A man is buttering bread.
A monkey is karate kicking a person.
A woman is squeezing some cucumber slices.
A man is taking out the insides of a green pepper.
A man takes a piece of pepperoni pizza out of a pizza box and puts it on the lid after he closes the box.
The man added vegetables to the broth in the pot.
The man ran and jumped against the wall.
A man is playing a cello.
The man is talking.
A man tries to feed a mouse to a snake.
The man is seasoning the sausages.
A clown is singing and people are dancing.
A woman is feeding an aardvark.
A man shappens a knife.
A person is rinsing a steak off with water.
A boy rode his bike on top of a metal fence.
A man is throwing knives at a tree.
A man is playing the drums.
A woman is brushing her feet.
A man is playing a ukulele.
Girls are walking on the stage.
A woman is doing weight exercises.
A man is peeling a potato.
A large bird standing on a table picks up a plastic glass containing liquid and places it in a bowl of something.
A woman is in the rain.
A woman is hitting a man.
A woman is riding an elephant.
A man is lifting weights.
A person is riding a jetski in the waves.
A woman is removing skin from some meat.
A woman is wearing headphones.
A kitten is drinking milk from a bowl.
A kitten is eating its food from a plate.
A woman is reading a lifestyle magazine.
A man is pouring chili into a bowl.
A man is stirring ingredients in a bowl.
The bird ate the food in the tree from a bowl.
A group of girls are exiting a taxi.
A man breaks cinder blocks on another man.
A woman is seasoning a piece of meat.
A woman is relaxing in a bath tub.
A woman is adding oil on fishes.
A woman is writing something.
A man is chopping coriander leaf.
A man takes a slice of pizza.
A man is placing meat inside a plastic bag.
A baby eats his food.
A man is slicing a carrot by a machine.
A rabbi is talking.
A man rides a horse.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is slicing a bun.
A man is driving a car.
A dog is pawing at a fly in the carpet before it.
A dog is barking.
A man is playing a guitar and singing on a stage.
A monkey is walking on a bed.
A woman is cooking broccoli.
A man is hitting a boy with flower vase.
A boy is playing a piano.
A man is frying a tortilla.
A woman serving volleyballs over a net.
The person is starting a fire.
A man is slicing cucumber with a knife.
A man is playing an electronic keyboard.
The man is mixing whipping cream.
A man is playing a violin.
A man is stirring juice.
A man severs the toe of an empty leather boot using a sword.
Someone is slicing two uncooked racks of ribs apart.
The person is removing the scales from the fish.
People are walking in the garden.
A young child rides a horse.
A person is cutting garlic into pieces with a knife.
A man is folding a piece of paper.
The man was pushed into the water.
A boy is upset playing video games.
A man makes a call on a cell phone.
A man is speaking on a phone.
A man is kicking pots of water.
A woman is applying cosmetics to her face.
The man lifted barbells.
Two little girls talk on the telephone.
A cat gets stuck on a moving ceiling fan.
The cat is drinking milk.
A woman feeds an animal by hand.
A woman is riding a horse on the beach.
A person is chopping an herb.
Several ferrets climb out of their cage.
A woman is collecting tap water in a mug.
A young woman is playing the flute.
A woman shoots a shotgun.
A person is whisking eggs in a bowl.
A person is adding chili powder to chili with beans.
A woman rapidly fires a handgun.
A person is slicing an onion.
Rocky and Apollo Creed are running down the beach.
A man is singing while playing the guitar.
The dog could not figure out how to get a stick out the doggy door.
A dog is opening a fridge.
A woman is mixing eggs in the bowl.
A boat sails along the water.
A woman is holding a dancing baby up.
A woman is doing a joker make up on a man.
The lady added cheese to the sauce.
A man is giving a lecture on a podium.
The cat shimmied under the bed.
An okapi is eating from a tree.
A woman is chopping garlic.
A man is cutting grass.
A man is cutting grass.
A boy runs away from his fishing line.
Several kids jump up and down on a trampoline.
The man played haki sak in the office.
A man is carrying another man on his back.
The lady made some slices on the shrimp.
A woman is pouring egg into a frying pan.
A woman is frying ground meat.
Meat is dropped into a pan.
A woman is cutting scallions.
A man is slam dunking a ball.
A machine is sharpening a pencil.
A woman is brushing her feet.
A man is cleaning the windows.
Someone is mixing a liquid.
A person is stirring rice.
Three boys in karate costumes are fighting.
A man puts a knife in a vice.
A boy plays violin on stage.
A woman cuts a pink loaf with a knife.
A man is adding pork chops to a pan.
The men are fighting each other.
A man is catching a ball.
A girl is reading a newspaper.
A slow loris bites a persons fingers.
A man is walking along a path through wilderness.
The man played his guitar.
Swimmers are racing in a lake.
Some men are skating on the road.
A man pours liquid into a pan.
A boy is playing piano and singing.
A woman is slicing big pepper.
A person is boiling noodles.
A cat and a ferret are playing.
A monkey is walking through the water.
A woman is putting on makeup.
A person is slicing some onions.
A dog is driving a car.
The man sang on stage into the microphone.
A car backs out of a space.
The animal with the big eyes is eating.
A man is holding a frog.
A baby is crawling happily.
A man is traveling in a boat.
The man rode his motorcycle down the highway.
A tiger club is playing with a ball.
A man reels in a fish.
A man is dicing an onion.
A man performs on a stage.
The women are sitiing down.
A woman is slicing fruit.
A man removes a couple of toaster scrambles from a plastic packet.
The flag was moving in the air.
A woman is dancing by a fire.
A man is meditating.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A boy is cutting paper.
A lady mixed up a meat mixture in bowl.
The man talked on the telephone.
A man is playing the guitar and singing.
the soccer player kicked the ball side to side between his legs.
The baby laughed in his car seat.
An animal is walking.
A girl is applying makeup on her face.
Someone is scratching an animals belly.
A man is lifting heavy weights.
A dog knocks a boy into the water twice.
A woman puts make-up on.
A boy is playing with a toy.
A man dives off of a cliff.
A cat plays in his water.
The bird is taking a bath under the faucet.
A man plays the guitar and sings.
A man is coming out into the water.
A man and woman dance.
A man is sweeping the floor of a house using a long broom.
A group of couples are dancing.
A man is scaling a fish.
A person is adding food in a pan.
The man set up his camera to take sunset pictures at the beach.
A man is smoking.
Women are holding each other and dancing together.
Someone is holding and petting a baby tiger.
The man is playing the guitar.
The man did pushups on a wall.
A woman cuts up a vegetable.
A person is putting shredded cheese in a pot.
The man is trying to feed the snake with a mouse.
A person breaks an egg into a small bowl.
A man is playing keyboards.
A dog is running around a yard.
A child is walking down the street as a jeep pulls up.
A man is erasing a chalk board.
A man is adding oil to a pot.
The girl danced in front of the bonfire.
The man is exercising.
A man is chopping butter into a container.
A girl is dragged downhill by a dog.
The man took off his sunglasses while talking.
The two men did a funny skit with a boxer in front of a crowd of people.
The girl is tiding up her bed.
Someoen is cooking onions.
The man is using a sledghammer to break the concrete block that is on the other man.
The lady put the dried noodles in the hot water to cook.
A tiger is playing with his trainer.
The girls danced on the stage.
A panda bear is laying down.
Two kids are playing in a swimming pool with a green colored crocodile float.
A couple of policewomen are singing karaoke.
A man is putting broccoli into water.
A chimp is kicking a target.
The doctor was helping the patient.
Some is grating onion into water.
A cat is playing with a watermelon on a floor.
A man is doing exercise.
A cat retrieves an object out of a dish of water.
A baby is talking.
The girl is carrying a baby.
A chef is slicing carrot.
A woman boils eggs.
A woman puts ingredients in a whisked egg.
A woman is slicing mango.
A girl is slicing a butter into two pieces.
Several swimmers jump into the water.
A man is playing the guitar.
A man spins on a surf board.
A man is opening a package containing headphones.
A girl is playing a guitar.
A little girl plays the violin on a beach.
A monkey is karate kicking at someone's gloved hand.
A woman is adding some mushrooms and liquid to a pot.
A man is passionately playing a guitar in front of an audience.
A female applies something to he hair with her hands.
A young man is riding a skateboard and jumps onto a sidewalk then off at another curb.
A man is karate kicking at another man wearing protective boxing gloves.
Someone drew on Washington's face on the dollar.
The girl is slicing an onion.
A person dices up an orange pepper.
The man is playing the wooden flute.
A young woman is playing a guitar.
The man is aiming a gun.
The men are playing soccer.
Two men are dancing together.
A woman is running on the beach.
A man is reading an email.
A man is straining pasta.
Panda's play on a swing.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
Thank you very much, Commissioner.
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
Clearly, explanations are necessary for the increased incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
Fifty-seven senators, including 24 Republicans, have signed the letter.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
People with the same business affairs in common are peacefully bound to one another.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
The joint debate is closed.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
This is also the position advocated by the rapporteur, and it is shared by the European People' s Party.
Clearly, explanations are necessary for the increased incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
Whilst employment may be the European Union' s priority policy, fisheries, as another economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
The European Council will also discuss the state of progress of the accession negotiations and hence of the enlargement.
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
Clearly, explanations are necessary for the increased incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
We shall have to speak with just one disagreeable voice in the WTO.
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
It is gratifying that Parliament has succeeded in producing a large majority in favour of more openness.
The aim of the annual review is to identify such potential improvements.
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality through gender mainstreaming and through specific guidelines.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
Knowledge of foreign languages is accepted as a necessary precursor to mobility.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX gained 3 points, or 0.39 percent, at 924.
This is also the position advocated by the rapporteur, and it is shared by the European People' s Party.
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
on the situation in Burma
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
The debate is closed.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
In the last three weeks, progress has been made in three major areas.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
Slovakia has not been condemned to the second division and it is logical that it should like to join together with the Czech Republic.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
It is gratifying that Parliament has succeeded in producing a large majority in favour of more openness.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
The European Council will also discuss the state of progress of the accession negotiations and hence of the enlargement.
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality through gender mainstreaming and through specific guidelines.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to apply the precautionary principle.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
(Applause)
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to apply the precautionary principle.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
on the situation in Burma
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by going to Article 272; the financial perspective has been maintained, even though we have used the flexibility instrument.
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
In the last three weeks, progress has been made in three major areas.
This is no time for the faint-hearted.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
(Applause)
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
It is a matter of the utmost importance and yet has curiously attracted very little public attention.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to apply the precautionary principle.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by going to Article 272; the financial perspective has been maintained, even though we have used the flexibility instrument.
Declarations must be followed by concrete steps to trace, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
It is a matter of the utmost importance and yet has curiously attracted very little public attention.
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
This is also the position advocated by the rapporteur, and it is shared by the European People' s Party.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous sitting
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
(The sitting was suspended at 2.06 p.m. and resumed at 3 p.m.)
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
Question No 6 by (H-0886/00):
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
Knowledge of foreign languages is accepted as a necessary precursor to mobility.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
This is no time for the faint-hearted.
The European Council will also discuss the state of progress of the accession negotiations and hence of the enlargement.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality through gender mainstreaming and through specific guidelines.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
This is no time for the faint-hearted.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous sitting
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
Slovakia has not been condemned to the second division and it is logical that it should like to join together with the Czech Republic.
In the last three weeks, progress has been made in three major areas.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to apply the precautionary principle.
We shall have to speak with just one disagreeable voice in the WTO.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
(Applause)
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
This is also the position advocated by the rapporteur, and it is shared by the European People' s Party.
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
The joint debate is closed.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
Question No 6 by (H-0886/00):
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
At Feira, the Council considered those countries participating in the Stabilisation and Association Process as potential applicants for membership of the European Union.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous sitting
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
(The sitting was suspended at 2.06 p.m. and resumed at 3 p.m.)
Finally, I welcome the idea that we should review the implementation of the programme annually.
At Feira, the Council considered those countries participating in the Stabilisation and Association Process as potential applicants for membership of the European Union.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
Thank you very much, Commissioner.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
The European Council will also discuss the state of progress of the accession negotiations and hence of the enlargement.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
Clearly, explanations are necessary for the increased incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
It must be respected and protected' .
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
Declarations must be followed by concrete steps to trace, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by going to Article 272; the financial perspective has been maintained, even though we have used the flexibility instrument.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality through gender mainstreaming and through specific guidelines.
We shall have to speak with just one disagreeable voice in the WTO.
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
(Applause)
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
Thank you very much, Commissioner.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
We shall have to speak with just one disagreeable voice in the WTO.
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
(Applause)
People with the same business affairs in common are peacefully bound to one another.
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
Whilst employment may be the European Union' s priority policy, fisheries, as another economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
People with the same business affairs in common are peacefully bound to one another.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality through gender mainstreaming and through specific guidelines.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality through gender mainstreaming and through specific guidelines.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
It is a matter of the utmost importance and yet has curiously attracted very little public attention.
Slovakia has not been condemned to the second division and it is logical that it should like to join together with the Czech Republic.
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
We shall have to speak with just one disagreeable voice in the WTO.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
Finally, I welcome the idea that we should review the implementation of the programme annually.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
The aim of the annual review is to identify such potential improvements.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
Those who stand apart from reinforced cooperation are really being given the same freedom as the back seat passengers in a car.
Declarations must be followed by concrete steps to trace, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
The European Council will also discuss the state of progress of the accession negotiations and hence of the enlargement.
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
At Feira, the Council considered those countries participating in the Stabilisation and Association Process as potential applicants for membership of the European Union.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
As a matter of urgency, therefore, the staff complement of the Interdepartmental Group attached to the Commission Secretariat should be strengthened at the earliest possible opportunity in order to ensure that all proposals for acts which are general in scope are accompanied, when considered by the College of Commissioners and on the basis of Article 299(2), by a simplified sheet outlining their potential impact.
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
It is a matter of the utmost importance and yet has curiously attracted very little public attention.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
Whilst employment may be the European Union' s priority policy, fisheries, as another economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
At Feira, the Council considered those countries participating in the Stabilisation and Association Process as potential applicants for membership of the European Union.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
At Feira, the Council considered those countries participating in the Stabilisation and Association Process as potential applicants for membership of the European Union.
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
People with the same business affairs in common are peacefully bound to one another.
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
It is gratifying that Parliament has succeeded in producing a large majority in favour of more openness.
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
Finally, I welcome the idea that we should review the implementation of the programme annually.
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by going to Article 272; the financial perspective has been maintained, even though we have used the flexibility instrument.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
People with the same business affairs in common are peacefully bound to one another.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
Clearly, explanations are necessary for the increased incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
Declarations must be followed by concrete steps to trace, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
(The sitting was suspended at 2.06 p.m. and resumed at 3 p.m.)
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
Knowledge of foreign languages is accepted as a necessary precursor to mobility.
This is no time for the faint-hearted.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
Therefore, I also believe that this reconciliation is sustainable, but that the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the university issue and to many other issues, needs visible signs of its success, and powerful support, else peace throughout the region will be under threat.
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by going to Article 272; the financial perspective has been maintained, even though we have used the flexibility instrument.
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
I know that in France they have had whole herd slaughter and this does not seem to be the best way forward.
Finally, I welcome the idea that we should review the implementation of the programme annually.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
A step in the right direction, for which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time now, is the creation of a provisional unit for judicial cooperation.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
Declarations must be followed by concrete steps to trace, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
It is a matter of the utmost importance and yet has curiously attracted very little public attention.
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
I would urge the French Presidency to do their utmost to overcome this divide, because it is extremely destructive.
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
The aim of the annual review is to identify such potential improvements.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
We welcome the arrangements proposed in this respect by the Preparatory Committee and adopted by the General Assembly regarding procedures for the registration of non-governmental organisations for involvement in the preparatory process and the Special Session in September 2001.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
We shall have to speak with just one disagreeable voice in the WTO.
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than a poor one and it is true that, in this instance, the American proposal was a third-rate proposal, and one which was completely unacceptable to Europe.
Knowledge of foreign languages is accepted as a necessary precursor to mobility.
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
It is gratifying that Parliament has succeeded in producing a large majority in favour of more openness.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
This is also the position advocated by the rapporteur, and it is shared by the European People' s Party.
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
It is gratifying that Parliament has succeeded in producing a large majority in favour of more openness.
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
Mr President, the Commission' s attitude to the right of access to documents may be seen from the internal handbook sent on 11 October to employees of the Commission to tell them how to deal with requests from MEPs for access to documents.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
(Applause)
In the last three weeks, progress has been made in three major areas.
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
This is also the position advocated by the rapporteur, and it is shared by the European People' s Party.
It is gratifying that Parliament has succeeded in producing a large majority in favour of more openness.
Knowledge of foreign languages is accepted as a necessary precursor to mobility.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
This is a vague area, and it is possible that more restrictive provisions may also remain in force, and this is one point in respect of which we have tabled amendments.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
It is unlikely that the planned protection of the universal provision of services by means of a compensatory fund, as a result of which private profits are ploughed back into public services, will last.
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
I call on Prague to respond to this signal, this challenge, this plea for dialogue, to grant our request and to ensure, together with our House, that this legacy of a nationalist era can be consigned to the past.
Mr Gayssot, Greek ships have sunk without warning, when there were no storms in the vicinity.
People with the same business affairs in common are peacefully bound to one another.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
Let us, as a Europe of 15 Member States, organise ourselves in order to be able to welcome those countries who are knocking at the door into the fold under respectable conditions.
The aim of the annual review is to identify such potential improvements.
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
This is no time for the faint-hearted.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
Spain has done a magnificent job in turning round the difficult neighbourly relations which Europe and North Africa and Spain and Morocco have suffered during the course of history.
Secondly, say no to the big bang idea of incorporating candidate countries simultaneously as a large group, since that would militate against the principle that each country should be admitted on its own merits.
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
In Nigeria, Chevron has been accused by the All-Ijaw indigenous people of instigating violence against them and actually paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot protesters at the Warri naval base.
The European Council will also discuss the state of progress of the accession negotiations and hence of the enlargement.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
We have started to exchange ideas on this question, from which it has emerged that all the Member States want to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
Thirdly, acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the individual countries and for the EU as a whole basically depend - and Denmark demonstrated this - on dismantling the social and democratic deficits of European policy.
Slovakia has not been condemned to the second division and it is logical that it should like to join together with the Czech Republic.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
on the situation in Burma
The other viewpoint illustrated by the rapporteur' s initial statement and shared by a number of members is to promote regulations and codes of conduct which are needed in order to establish among insurers ways of organising costs on a mutual basis providing everybody with guaranteed access to high-quality care and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices developing together with risk and client selection.
It is a matter of the utmost importance and yet has curiously attracted very little public attention.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
On the other hand, we would like to be given a chance to prove to Europe that we are able to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia on our own, by recognising the genuine principles of democracy.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
Slovakia has not been condemned to the second division and it is logical that it should like to join together with the Czech Republic.
Question No 6 by (H-0886/00):
Worst of all, I believe, is having to issue a warning that a court judgment in their favour may just be a set of comforting words and make no real difference in their lives.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
Whilst employment may be the European Union' s priority policy, fisheries, as another economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
They will keep the pressure on, and they are strengthening their position with the revenue they are generating from delivering mail above 150 grams.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to say a few words on the joint resolution, which will, of course, be passed.
Question No 6 by (H-0886/00):
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
The Council of Europe, along with the Court of Human Rights, has a wealth of experience of such forms of supervision, and we can build on these.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
If we want to help Indonesia we must act now with money and deeds, not merely words.
Firstly, simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
Unfortunately, the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be precisely the opposite, and so, of course, we cannot vote for it.
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
But I would like to say to Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the EU spends just 1% of GDP and much of that is administered in the Member States.
In the last three weeks, progress has been made in three major areas.
That is a shameful state of affairs when we consider that the EU itself is a champion of modernised business practice.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
It must genuinely be a centre for coordinating the network of national agencies which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence for food safety at the level of the individual regions.
I should also have liked the Court of Auditors' report to have been a little more user-friendly and to have provided a number of clear recommendations, for example one or two per chapter.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
From the first discussions on this dossier, which were held at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission has given a commitment to the Member States to pursue a course of action designed to develop what we might call a European police culture, grounded in the highest standards of duty, respect for the rights and freedoms of our citizens and efficiency in the fight against crime.
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything, which is why competition is not completely unrestricted, nor should it be.
Given this situation, there is an inescapable need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
There has been a budget heading for the funding of mine clearance and prevention programmes for many years now.
Lastly, and most controversially, the committee strongly called for the use of a fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
I find it rather odd that people are already trying to tie the Commission's hands in relation to the proposal for a directive, while at the same calling on it to present a Green Paper on the current situation with regard to optional and supplementary health insurance schemes.
B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnap in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
Finally, I welcome the idea that we should review the implementation of the programme annually.
I wonder if the Commissioner has planned any steps in this respect to demonstrate that we really do consider Kostunica to be the only lawfully elected representative of the Serbian people, and the only partner with whom the European Union is involved as from today.
While withdrawing the resolution, however, I express the conviction that this Parliament would have made its voice heard better if, in anticipation of the Council of Nice, it had devoted a specific and separate resolution to these important and difficult topics of the Intergovernmental Conference, instead of dealing with them in a single resolution that also embraces all the other points on the Council agenda.
It is this kind of future I would also like to see in the other countries within the European Union.
The only instance in which no tax is levied is when the supplier is in a non-EU country and the recipient is in a Member State of the EU.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
On my own behalf and on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries, I would ask you, Madam President, to send Parliament' s condolences to the families of the victims and to the local authorities in both Brittany and in Marín, Galicia, from where the majority of the victims came.
These objectives, the main one and the secondary ones, will be the touchstone by which the concrete proposals submitted by the Commission must be judged.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
There is, of course, one crucial event, namely that a start has been made with category four and with looking at ways how we will deal with it, but it is not yet entirely clear whether we have managed to resolve this, partly because the Council refuses to have sufficient input in the attendant thought processes.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
Mr President, I would like to focus in my speech on Mrs Lalumière' s report, which I think is clearly worded and well put together.
I think that France has set an excellent example by finally deciding to take this step.
The French Presidency thanks you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for this cooperation, for your support and also for the warm reception you have given us.
The very worst situation is when the women concerned also come from distant countries, having taken the work on out of desperation because they have no other way of continuing to provide for themselves.
The debate is closed.
The Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market rightly insists on no upper limit and a minimum of no less than 7%.
(The sitting was suspended at 2.06 p.m. and resumed at 3 p.m.)
There is an urgent need, following the recent attacks on the Greek minority in Himara, to promote democratisation measures and measures to strengthen institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
The UK Labour members of the PES Group welcome the adoption of their contribution to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing every single detail.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
Declarations must be followed by concrete steps to trace, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
Do you think that the Austrian model, i.e. bilateral majority resolutions, will be used in future as a way of passing resolutions which bypass the European institutions and of forming a new institution or a new group in order to circumvent unanimity in the Council?
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to apply the precautionary principle.
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
We have heard that the previous Council Presidency first restructured and then scrapped the Ministry for Equality.
This rule can be applied equally to all recreational but dangerous drugs when no one but the person consuming the drug is likely to be affected.
This is our priority fight in order to ensure that the affirmation of fundamental rights is put into practice in our political decisions.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report on the taxation of electronic commerce.
I should like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear, comprehensive report.
Finally, I welcome the idea that we should review the implementation of the programme annually.
Above all, when a one-man company or a company with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it should not need to provide 120% loan guarantees in the form of land to receive financing; it should also be possible for it to be funded on the basis of a good idea.
Whilst employment may be the European Union' s priority policy, fisheries, as another economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
(Applause)
Thank you very much, Commissioner.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
The lesson for this Parliament this morning must be that we have to conclude that maritime laws throughout the world are in a state of shambles and we have to begin the process of putting them right.
Either we are in a club or we are out of it and it is particularly important that we accept this.
The right of a government arbitrarily to set aside its own constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
After all, it is by no means certain that the proposed definition of equitable price is better than any other, because the various definitions that are currently in use in the Member States are all perfectly satisfactory.
The labelling of beef that was agreed on, which is a minimum form of labelling and only came into force two and a half months ago, does not make it possible for the origin of animals to be adequately traced, and we were very slow to ban specified risk materials.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to apply the precautionary principle.
Question No 6 by (H-0886/00):
As long ago as 1996 the European Parliament came out in favour of a ban on the use of meat-and-bone meal throughout the European Union in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only.
That made them heavily dependent on loans.
Mr President, we took a great deal of care over preparing the Karamanou report in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
The debate is closed.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the eventual Treaty of Nice.
You do not even intend to incorporate it into the Treaty, evidence indeed that this text, this exercise was always destined to be laid aside.
Reiterating the calls made by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, what initiatives does the Presidency of the European Council propose to take with a view to playing a more active role so as to guarantee the full and complete application of the UN peace plan?
All those who are at present engaged in illicit work would obtain work with decent social conditions.
As there is still a lot of uncertainty, we must know what the scientific facts are and what action must be taken.
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united European continent.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
The resolution on Nice, voted today, does not reflect this.
The House had also fought, however, for the reduction of the funds available for innovative measures to be offset by means of resources from the flexibility instrument, a demand which is recorded in a declaration on the financial perspective in the Interinstitutional Agreement.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous sitting
That was changed in the face of criticism, especially from Ireland and France, and a different spin has now been put on it by the British Chancellor of the Exchequer: it is now being portrayed as a user charge for all, including British lorry drivers.
He will stand trial on 8 January on charges of having attended a meeting of the Tunisian opposition in France, which he denies.
If we define a clear, binding framework for the Member States, then there should be a longer evaluation period for the various support systems required to satisfy these requirements.
And I am telling you loud and clear: Kostunica must be given his chance here and I therefore hope that he will give amnesty in the next couple of weeks or months, but meanwhile, I do want the introduction of those two new budget lines, democratisation and reconstruction, to be accompanied by political conditions, both from a political and budgetary perspective.
The aim of the annual review is to identify such potential improvements.
Action is needed quickly, which is why we decided to include this item on the agenda.
One could indeed wish for more and for improvement, but I honestly believe that we have made a good start.
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
- My party has serious reservations about Community law applying to the sale of consumer products, as against applying the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
He saw a red rose.
measure the depth of a body of water
someone who plays a principal role
(cause to) come to rest on a surface
the act of advocating or promoting something
alphanumeric sequence used for identification
a state of being elevated or raised
the act of lifting something
Bind or join (as if) with cement.
(finally) do something or be somewhere
a point, as the op part of a compass arrow
the act of preserving or protecting something
coerce by violence, fill with terror
cause to move, cause to be moved
the uppermost area of region of something
the foremost part of something
behave or move in a certain manner
a reproduction or physical representation of something
a type of subdivision of a larger literary composition
the person who is assigned to a non-elective position
Advance; contribute to the progress or growth of.
a narrow channel or span of a sea or ocean
the act of preserving or protecting something
Cut into, possibly creating something new.
the act of choosing among alternatives
The act of testing something.
the state of being in contact
giving a reference or citation of something
Sell something to or obtain something from by underhanded activity.
the act of determining or discovering the position of an object
a feeling or state of contentment, relief
Physically extend or spread outward from a center or focus or inward towards a center; physically spread from a start point.
place into the ground for growing
an approximated amount of something
stimulate sexually; get sexual gratification through self-stimulation
the act of acknowledging the truth of something
Express audibly; utter sounds (not necessarily words); indicate.
The state of being suspected.
The act of providing approval and support.
Relieve someone from work by taking a turn; take turns working.
a side or surface of something
utter in a certain way
the act of turning, rotating an object
(Cause to) increase in extent or intensity.
the legal state of owing money
make sense of, give meaning to
The act of beginning something new.
printed version of electronic data from a computer
Limit in quantity or quality.
search (as the bottom of a body of water) for something
the act of surrendering or losing something of value
The physical act of following in an effort to overtake or capture.
Expel or eject (saliva, phlegm, sputum, or vomit) from the mouth.
the natural progression or development of something
the act of lifting something
an explanation or alibi for something
recover, return to former state
Act without permission or with too much confidence.
the act of putting a preparation on something.
become the owner or posessor of something
the act of moving, turning something
the act of confining, preventing or blocking something
the act of putting a preparation on something.
the act or means of getting rid of something.
the shape of a wave in a given period of time
a distinctive style of clothing
cause to have an odor
fall or cause to fall
the act of allowing, bestowing something
keep from being seen or perceived by others
a document authorizing another to vote on one's behalf
the act of lifting something
the act of combining, blending, integrating
smell by inhaling through the nose
the conclusion of a communication
(cause to) adopt a different system, value, or viewpoint
(cause to) become less intense or strict
the act of choosing or selecting
narrative or account, intended as factual reporting
Engrave by means of dots.
the act of shoving something away
decide the amount to be paid on an insurance claim
make noise like bad engine
be in direct physical contact with
the quality of being dependable
Arrange a programme for an individual, group, or entity.
express a certain idea when rendering a play or music
the quality of being dependable
a store or supply of something
suggest or prescribe a solution
person who manages money in board games
the act of rubbing a surface
The act of dividing or disconnecting.
the act of validating the authenticity of something
the act of putting a preparation on something.
the act of preserving or protecting something
Oppose or approach, as in hostility or competition
Travel (as if) through water.
administer or bestow, as portions
Form a spiral or move in a spiral course.
Induce into action by using one's charm; provoke to do something.
connected underground tunnels used by rabbits
hold or embrace in a tight grip
the shape of a wave in a given period of time
the foremost part of something
The act of controlling by restraining someone or something.
the act of planning or deliberating
be located at or on top of something
the scent or odor of something
(Cause to) make a dry crackling sound, possibly by mixing.
fill, attach, fix with, or as if with gum
The act of talking about the features of something.
the act of providing help or aid to someone
a natural growth of plants, usually trees
the act of planning or deliberating
the physical expanse of the universe
a boundary area or edge of something
reach a destination or goal
the act of preserving or protecting something
to argue or plead in favor of
support, sustain, bear, or be responsible for
take or capture by force or authority
(cause to) lengthen or stretch out in space
the act of rending, tearing, ripping
Equip with armed and armored motor vehicles (as of an army).
(the content of) a communication.
The act of changing course or twisting oneself.
the act of pressing together firmly
The state or condition of feeling or being rushed.
move to a lower position, terminate something
the act of pulling a load
(cause to) appear suddenly or briefly
The human act of making something new.
make or become more acute or intense
the activity of breaking or splintering something
the extreme endpoint of something
Perform an action with an intent to deceive.
any cause or source of great suffering
the act of moving, turning something
To remain emotionally or intellectually attached without necessary physical contact.
The state of being pleased with life.
the height of the sea's surface
The act of testing something.
cover with a primer base
discover a logical or causal connection; associate
Rewrite in a different script.
the act of reasoning, cogitation
the act of giving a speech
be located at or on top of something
the act of turning, rotating an object
the scent or odor of something
Give an incentive or reason for action.
the context or setting in which something takes place
tolerate; aceept or take on as a responsibility.
move from one location to another
The act of testing something.
Give a performative affectation to (something).
a participant who is a beginner in some activity
Turn the paddle or oar.
the activity of examining or assessing something
the conclusion of a communication
An object impairs the respiration of someone or something.
be a reason, cause, or justification of
retreat or move from a position, relocate
The human act of making something new.
an instance of halting some motion
(cause to) gradually become weak
a deficiency, state of disappointment, non-achievement
The act of giving up a claim, office, or possession.
the uppermost area of region of something
take something or someone away from somewhere
energy in the form of molecular motion
a state of exposure to harm
the act of putting a preparation on something.
The act of testing something.
have a strong desire to do something
take in (mentally or physically)
the act of intentionally omitting something
pronounce with a nasal twang
an upward slope or incline
an allotment or percentage of something
Shrivel, wither, or mature imperfectly, as of a flower.
Identify, establish location or identity
the act of shoving something away
an explanation or alibi for something
incline from a vertical position
Preserve in a tin or jar.
behave or move in a certain manner
The act of testing something.
give a deceptive explanation for; cover up
The principal activity that one does to earn money.
The act of dividing or disconnecting.
the act of planning or deliberating
The act of testing something.
12th month of the calendar year
the activity of examining or assessing something
the act of turning, rotating an object
a company that provides public service commodities
get involved with or mixed up
gradual decrease in the strength of a signal
a fast rate or occurrence of something
the act of lifting something
(cause to) become even or level
Declare invalid; take away the legal force of or render ineffective.
Give an incentive or reason for action.
hit or return before it touches the ground
the act or means of getting rid of something.
the act of accusing someone or something for being at fault
Fix or set a physical object securely or depeply
A storyline; the plan,scheme,or main story of a literary or dramatic work, true or fictional.
the activity of breaking or splintering something
a retail store with merchandise for sale
twist a body part suddenly so as to sprain
resist immunologically foreign tissue or organ
be a factor or play a role in something
the trading price between sellers and buyers in a an open marketplace
request or demand something from someone
the act of confining, preventing or blocking something
Ride on someone's shoulders or back; support on the back or shoulders.
oppose with equal weight or force
the quality of acting with vigor and vitality
the quality of being important, worthy of attention
attachment, restraint or shackle between physical entities
the reduction of the extent of something, e.g, its size, importance or quantity
a visual characterization of something
put in a particular place or abstract location
the action of extending outwards
the consequence or aftermath of something
(Cause to) increase in anxiety.
the activity of examining or assessing something
the act of preserving or protecting something
turn on an axis; spin
PLAY OFF-set into opposition or rivalry
the processing or operation of something
the act of pulling a load
the act of explaining or defending something
come upon, attack or catch someone or something unaware
the act of turning, rotating an object
social or economic downfall of someone or a group
the primary component of a communication
the process of becoming less or smaller
the concluding section of a communication
Reduce to small pieces by pounding or grinding.
the act or capability of seeing
the act of accusing someone or something for being at fault
give a specific interpretation to
The state of being suspected.
The process of cultivating the land, possibly as a way of life.
a military aircraft that drops ordinance
the act of accusing someone or something for being at fault
accept, acclimate or adapt to a context, situation
the temperature at which a liquid boils, bubbles
The human act of making something new.
Beat or hit (as if) with a whip.
the act of lifting something
rein in a horse to lose a race
(cause to) come to rest on a surface
provide or supply with water
Amount that can be contained
contain or have a specific wording or information
a channel of social communication
Cause to be or last longer, extend in duration or space.
a rank or position relative to others
the uppermost area of region of something
the apparent condition or state of something
burn slightly to affect color
a general trait or characteristic of something
position in football played by a team member
The act of arranging elements together.
cause a sharp or stinging pain to
the act of choosing or selecting
incite action, cause an event
come up, as of liquid or gas
(Cause to) become less tense; rest or take one's ease.
adapt to a specified measurement or proportion
anatomical shape of the body of a being, physique
cause romantic action; lure away from proper conduct
make up something fictional or untrue
remove to or from a place or situation
the act of lifting something
a happening or incident of human significance
protect with or as if with a shield
basic monetary unit of Kyrgyzstan
the act of lifting something
(cause to) move gently back and forth
the state of being in contact
The act of testing something.
the act of explaining or defending something
Understand the meaning of something.
take a risk or guess in hope of a favorable outcome
the act of annoying someone or something
change (dramatically) between high and low values
the activity of examining or assessing something
(cause to) be anxious or preoccupied
design for a specific purpose
to combat or oppose someone or something
(Cause to) form a cluster in either abstract or physical space.
a mental grasp or understanding of something
do something considered below one's diginty
(game) a division during which one is allowed to play (perhaps as offense).
the act of cutting off length, snipping off
a sovereign regime and its assemblage
the act of annoying someone or something
the extreme endpoint of something
be or have a quality of being
Improve by pruning or polishing
the act of preserving or protecting something
register formally as a participant
a lever that activates a firing mechanism, especially with a firearm
The act of beginning something new.
the act of annoying someone or something
Cut into, possibly creating something new.
a casual game of throwing a ball back and forth
come up, as of liquid or gas
cause to be immersed in
the act of substituting one thing for another
The act of testing something.
the act of validating the authenticity of something
amount of time that something is postponed
reverse a direction, attitude or course of action, perhaps perceptually.
An established or recognized right, formal or informal.
the act of intentionally omitting something
the occupants who dwell on a level of a building
a method for solving a problem
cause to move with a flick or as if with a flick
an observer of a process or activity
an address used for postal communication
Spur on, urge, or deride by cheers and shouts.
spare in quality or quantity
the act of shoving something away
the apparent condition or state of something
engrave, shape or cut by chipping away at the surface
something considered trite but amusing
the act of lifting something
concrete enactment of an idea or concept
raise or haul up as if with a mechanism
(Cause to) change from a solid to a liquid.
(The act of making) a measurement of something.
a duplicate of something, serving as a backup
(The act of making) a measurement of something.
react, or respond to a call, command, or stimulus
club or association of people with a shared interest
free from obligations, service or confinement
the degree or amount of something
the act of arriving at a certain place
medium of exchange minted by a government
advance or set forward in court
make a written note of something
the act of explaining or defending something
a citizen of ancient Troy
The act of testing something.
the act of turning, rotating an object
The act of moving in a hurried manner.
the act of clipping, cutting
Physically raise from a lower position.
the act of turning, rotating an object
an increase in size as measured per unit of time
advance warning or notification of something
the act of advocating or promoting something
Supply with water for crops, as with channels, ditches, or streams.
smother, surpress or lessen something
cause to be immersed in
The human act of making something new.
The intended meaning of an instance of communication.
be given to, come into the possession of
utter in a certain way
have or be covered with bristles
the act of planning or deliberating
be located at or on top of something
be in or establish communication with
Adapt oneself to new or different conditions.
be located at or on top of something
a collection of something, often a large amount
whip with or as if with a whisk
dysfunction or ailment of the heart
decorate a manuscript with red
the act of devoting time and energy to something
verify something by comparing to a standard
Part, cease, or break association with (something).
put heels on a shoe
the act of preserving or protecting something
make images or sounds less sharp
Expel or eject saliva, sputum, or an object from the mouth.
measure the depth of a body of water
give a detailed account of
a recurrent artistic theme or pattern
the act of choosing or selecting
have a strong desire to do something
The activity of looking thoroughly in order to find something or someone.
person who is a social companion
hold or place in equilibrium
the act of accusing someone or something for being at fault
work as a tinker (fix pots and pans)
the act of allowing, bestowing something
the termination, ending of a meeting
scratch or scrape with claws or nails
a social occasion, often official or formal
infer or believe to be the case
move in such a way as to avoid
The state of being absent.
remove by pinching or snipping
(Cause to) become a powder or as dust.
prepare, arrange; create or organize for a particular purpose
the act of people having sex
to lecture formally to an audience
the act of creating an artistic work
the state of being in contact
collect discarded, refused or damaged material
an enterprise or company that publishes newsprint
the act of providing incentive to someone
the activity of examining or assessing something
Make marks in the surface of.
Make a copy with the intent to deceive.
the act of choosing or selecting
spare in quality or quantity
return to in thought or speech
The act of testing something.
manner of handling, managing someone or something
the act of selecting or picking something
LAY OFF--put an end to a state or activity
move the body backwards and down into a comfortable resting position
Shine intensely; emit a steady, even light from a source.
The act of purchasing back something previously sold.
reach or cause to reach the highest point, best something
a type of military aircraft
the act of putting a preparation on something.
a person who plants or detonates explosives
make fit for a specific purpose
strike with horror, surprise, disgust
have the same value, be or become equivalent to something else
A state of confusion or disorder.
a public enclosure for animals, as dogs
a system by which one currency is exchanged for another, enabling international transactions
the natural progression or development of something
the act of pulling an object
A perceptual distinction based on color or shading.
The act of purchasing back something previously sold.
Cook in cream or using cream.
a negative or undesirable aspect of something
gear or develop something to a particular purpose
identify or pick out someone or something
a state of being encircled
read or conform to the metrical pattern of
a major branch of a tree
the act of lifting something
(Cause to) become a fluid, as when heated.
form schemes in an underhand manner
identify or pick out someone or something
the act of applying torture to the foot and leg
Move as if unable to control one's manner or direction of movement.
arrangement for managing assets on behalf of a beneficiary
make fit for a specific purpose
the act of lifting something
cause to move, cause to be moved
an indication of something, evidence
The state of being absent.
(cause to) break up or cease to function
the selection of a lottery winner
being in a protected state or condition
the act of escaping, fleeing
build, make by combining materials or parts
Create a coating for something.
Create a coating for something.
restrict or limit the range of
the act of annoying someone or something
the act of acknowledging the truth of something
the act of providing incentive to someone
an argument that gives grounds or justification for a position
presentation of a musical theme
cause or permit to fall to the ground
move or sway in a sinuous fashion
sell or transport an item or idea abroad
the act of taking an offer
a group of people appointed to a committee
intuitions, a hunch or feeling
situate, position, come to rest
Sever or remove by pinching or snipping; tend by cutting.
the act of lifting something
Place limits on; form the boundary of or be contiguous to.
the value of a currency's conversion to another currency
the graduated arc of an instrument used to measure angles
the act of lifting something
the act of escaping, fleeing
people who are impoverished, without basic possessions
the act of putting a preparation on something.
the act of explaining or defending something
the act of lifting something
confine in or as if in a prison
Make a copy with the intent to deceive.
the act of sorting things into categories
Fly in or on a glider plane
the act of choosing or selecting
open to members of all races and ethnic groups
Go after with the intent to follow or catch.
the center region of an object
an approximated amount of something
cover completely; form a cover over; expand over.
room where work or repairs are done
the act of shoving something away
take possession of by legal authority (for security).
hand over or put in
cause to turn from one course or use to another
the act of pulling a load
the act of annoying someone or something
The act of talking about the features of something.
turn from an upright/normal position
the act of lifting something
the identification or the realization of something
the act of concealing or disguising
A document granting a right or privilege, as to an inventor.
the central area of an object
the act of lifting something
the act of lifting something
the act of putting a preparation on something.
the act of advocating or promoting something
Have a distinctive or characteristic taste, perceptible by an experiencer.
Be a sign or indication of; have as a meaning.
the general impression or appearance of something
know, realize, and comprehend the meaning
Make or create something for a specific function.
get rid of as if with water (metaphorical)
the act of acknowledging the truth of something
change or conform to fit new or different conditions
the act of providing incentive to someone
a watch with a hinged lid to protect the face
support, sustain, bear, or be responsible for
strive against another or others to attain a goal
The act of testing something.
Gather or remove (from a location) for use.
the act of directing attention, resources to something
Ride on someone's shoulders or back; support on the back or shoulders.
the act of combining, blending, integrating
a solid 3D object with rectangular sides
the translation of an opus from one language to another
the act of annoying someone or something
Write differently or alter a piece or writing, perhaps to suit a different purpose.
a celebrity or entertainer who attracts a large audience
Dispose of something as useless and old; physically tear apart.
The state of being absent.
rise to surface; become visible or known
overcome with astonishment or disbelief
lessen in force or effect, restrain, weaken
the act of intentionally omitting something
the act of advocating or promoting something
a list of items to be consulted and marked off
The act of testing something.
the act of damaging something, causing breakage
put in a particular place or abstract location
the act of perceiving a scent
the act of providing assistance, giving aid
lessen in force, impact, or effect
cover with wooden boards; secure
the act of explaining or defending something
a lid or top of a container
(cause to) separate or move in different directions
cause to vibrate in a different pattern
The act of dividing or disconnecting.
decide upon or fix definitely/specify
provide a seat or base for
the act of explaining or defending something
an observer of a process or activity
make keen; give (new) life or energy to
there exist a number of different possible events that may happen in the future. in most cases, there is an agent involved who has to consider which of the possible events will or should occur. a salient_entity which is deeply involved in the event may also be mentioned.
this frame contians lus which are like those of the desirability frame except the evaluee incorporates the parameter as "associated with a percieved place in a social heirarchy" for all lus. lus are not restricted to positive or negative implications.
a recipient starts off without the theme in their possession, and then comes to possess it. although the source from which the theme came is logically necessary, the recipient and its changing relationship to the theme is profiled.
this frame concerns a specific subset of instances of a type which are evaluated in terms of their similarity to a conceptual prototype of the type. the judgment of exemplariness may be made along a certain domain.
this frame contains words that describe an item's static position on a scale with respect to some property variable.
this frames describes a perceiver who fails to keep sight of a theme. the focus of this frame is the perceiver, which appears in subject position. this frame contrasts with the opposing perspective in losing_track_of_perceiver, where the perceiver is the object and the theme is the subject.
a person takes leave from his or her routine activity (such as work or school) for a duration of time. the duration can be any length of time, as long as the absence is temporary.
a trigger elicits a response. the response may either be some kind of action meant to address the trigger event or an expressed judgment of the trigger event.
a text is an entity that contains linguistic, symbolic information on a topic, created by an author at the time_of_creation. it may be a physical entity that is made of a certain material etc. it may be constructed for an honoree.
an offerer indicates that he or she is able and willing to give a theme to a potential_recipient. in the absence of further qualifications, it is often understood that the potential_recipient accepts the theme.
this frame covers words that name locations as defined politically, or administratively.
an agent actively (yet not always with success) attempts to keep an event from taking place. this event is (usually) an urge which encourages the action that the agent wishes to prevent.
lus in this frame denote a scenario in which a client arranges to retain the services of an organization at a later date.
the words in this frame describe a period of time, as opposed to a point in time.
an agent has attempted to achieve a goal, and the actual outcome of the agent's action has been resolved, so that it either specifically matches the agent's intent (e.g. success) or does not match it (e.g. failure).
a cognizer has a judgment of an evaluee, expressing how high or low their regard for the evaluee is.
a controlling_entity is in conscious control over a dependent_entity, dependent_situation, or dependent_variable.
this is the primary frame evoked by the cardinal numbers.
this frame has to do with people (the residents) residing in locations, sometimes with a co-resident.
a speaker realizes a sign, usually a linguistic one, in some formal_realization. the formal_realization may be described as correct or incorrect in a judgment expression, or it may be partially indicated as a part_of_form. manner may be used as a more general indication of the formal_realization
a living entity intends a tool to be able to fulfill a generic purpose. the material from which the tool is created can be something natural or something manmade, including another tool.
this frame describes a sufferer who experiences the loss of someone through death. the lus in this frame imply a strong emotional connection between the sufferer and the deceased.
this frame contains (transparent ) nouns that are units of measurement for time. the frame elements are count, unit and process. in this frame, we will not annotate deictic, calendric uses of nouns like week, month, etc. as in "next week, this month, in the 21st century".
while in motion, an impactor makes sudden, forcible contact with the impactee, or two impactors both move, mutually making forcible contact.
a customer requests an entity from a supplier. the customer can order the entity himself or via a medium.
this frame concerns people being in an altered mental state that is induced by an intoxicant.
in this frame a group of individuals intentionally come together to form a group. alternatively, a grammatically more prominent party_1 assembles with a party_2, expressed as an oblique phrase. if this asymmetric construal is chosen, purpose only relates to party_1.
this frame contains nouns denoting aggregates of individuals. the aggregates may be described by an aggregateproperty.
there is a gradable amount of light in a particular location. in some cases the source of light may be indicated instead of the location. the negetive lus in this frame can be used metaphorically to describe time periods which can be characterized as bad or lacking in awareness, as shown in the following examples
a customer requests an entity from a supplier. the customer can order the entity himself or via a medium.
a recordable sequence of events is associated with a given topic.
an entity is in a specified state. when not explicitly specified, the state usually concerns the entity's health, repair of functioning. the state is also often assessed with an evaluation and it may be specified to apply only to a particular parameter of the entity.
this frame contains words that describe how potent a chemical is.
this frame describes intentionally formed human social groups (here termed organizations) with some definite structure and members. they may be relatively informal, consisting only of a group of individuals who are aware of who is and who is not a fellow member, or they may be complex and long-lasting, such as the roman catholic church or the conservative party.
this frame contains words that describe an item's static position on a scale with respect to some property variable.
a benefactor confers a beneficial_situation to a beneficiary. unlike in commerce_scenario, the recipient is not necessarily required to pay for the good or service that they receive. therefore, the element of benevolence is profiled. dual fe-layer annotation
an entity is considered worthy of mention for their ability or influence among some type of similar entities. the entity need not be well-known or famous, though if it is, it may be stated by its name only. their worth may be restricted to a time or place.
these are words referring to control by a leader over a particular entity (the governed) or an activity. the frame contains both nouns referring to a title or position (e.g. director, king, president), and verbs describing the action of leadership (e.g. rule, reign). with verbs, it is possible to mention the role played by the leader (often a name of a leading position, e.g., king)
an object theme moves in the direction of a goal. the goal may be expressed or it may be understood from context, but its is always implied by the verb itself.
this frame contains words that describe a set of individuals which possess some commonality, generally a common attribute.
an employee has a position doing work in a particular field, or doing work on a particular task, for which an employer gives compensation to the employee.
a current_instance of a certain type is under discussion. this instance is evaluated as being the same instance or a different instance from a previous_instance encountered in a previous_context.
this frame contains words that denote kinship relations. in annotating the directional uses of these words, we use the standard terms from anthropology, ego and alter. matilde is gilberto's cousin once removed
the entity interacts with the theme with the effect of moving of the theme.
a theme traverses a trajectory. this trajectory consists of a source, path, and goal. if the theme is sentient, the anticipated trajectory will usually be equivalent to the planned trajectory. if the the theme is non-sentient the anticipated trajectory will usually be the result of various forces acting upon the theme.
this frame contains verbs and nouns that communicate the act of a speaker to address a message to some addressee using language. a number of the words can be used performatively, such as declare and insist.
an entity changes from a prior_state to a post_state in a sequence leading to improvement.
an experiencer actualizes a certain pattern of behavior, a lifestyle, which persists for a significant period of time in the experiencer's life and is recognized as part of his character or normal routine. the lifestyle is not necessarily realized intentionally, and may just be the result of circumstance.
a certain idiosyncrasy belongs to an entity distinguishing it from other entities.
this frame describes a particular instance of an event.
an entity has a temperature characterized by the target. the temperature is a value of the temperature attribute. note that in this frame, the entity does not experience the temperature, but is merely described as being in a certain externally verifiable state. is not in frame but rather in subjective_temperature
this frame contains nouns denoting aggregates of individuals. the aggregates may be described by an aggregateproperty.
an agent occupies a role in some institution. this roleis (usually) temporary and can be occupied by other entities at different periods of time. it is common for a duration of the role to be mentionned.
a figure is located relative to a ground location. the location of the figure may be further specified by its distance from a reference location (generally, the deictic center) and the direction in which the figure lies from a reference location (generally, the deictic center).
this frames describes a social event where there may or may not be a permanent or semi-permanent relationship between participants. additionally, participants in this frame are expressed in one representative fe, attendees. note the difference between this frame and social_event_individuals, where participants are grammatically separated.
this frame contains items which, when manipulated, alter the funtion of some device, internal or external.
this frame describes a general situation in which an owner either increases or decreases their amount of a possession. the increase or decrease may either be physical or metaphorical.
an entity is integrated into a vehicle as a part of a (possibly unexpressed) whole which may refer to the whole vehicle or merely to a sub-part of the vehicle.
this frame contains words that describe specific aspects of a color. the degree to which the color being discussed deviates from the prototype may be marked. the description may also target a specific aspect of color.
a record that contains a permanent account of data. this record may be maintained by a recorder for a certain entity.
this frame covers words for body_part(s) (bp) belonging to a possessor (poss), which may be characterized by a descriptor (desc). the location of the bp may be identified in terms of its attachment or its orientational_location. a subregion of a bp may also be indicated.
an agent performs a response action in consequence of a trigger event. in many cases, a non-agentive responding_entity causes the response after the trigger occurs.
a protagonist is in the dynamic, maintained state of being alive or has exited this state.
an agent acts so as to be the strongest force, or most important causal factor in some situation, to the exclusion of other competing actors.
an entity aids in the successful completion of a purpose. its degree of utility may also be expressed. some of the lexical units in this frame (e.g. great, good) can only express permanent, generic states of the entity.
an agent causes an impactor to make sudden, forcible contact with an impactee, or manipulates two (or more) impactors so that they make mutual forcible contact.
an experiencer senses different degrees of warmth that may or may not be related to the ambient temperature. the level of warmth is usually compared against the experiencer's subjective standard of comfort.
a protagonist is in the dynamic, maintained state of being alive or has exited this state.
a prisoner is punished for committing a crime by being confined to a prison for a specified period of time.
in this frame a speaker asks an addressee for something, or to carry out some action.
the temperature in a certain environment, determined by time and place, is specified.
a state_of_affairs is evaluated as good (or bad), against a background assumption that previously, the state_of_affairs was thought to be unlikely to occur. the state_of_affairs holds for a particular protagonist.
an agent makes use of a means (either an action or a (system of) entities standing in for the action) in order to achieve a purpose. (this frame may be broadened to include non-agentive intermediate actions.)
an developer develops a product, in some cases for a company.
a text is an entity that contains linguistic, symbolic information on a topic, created by an author at the time_of_creation. it may be a physical entity that is made of a certain material etc. it may be constructed for an honoree.
an influencing_variable, an influencing_situation, or an influencing_entity has an influence on a dependent_entity, dependent_variable, or a dependent_situation. compare to subjective_influence. words in objective_influence are used to make claims about correlations in the world, where words in subjective_influence are used to explain emotional impacts made on cognizers.
an entity is able to exert a force of the magnitude specified by the target.
this frame is concerned with transparent nouns denoting a piece of a substance. also present is piece_prop which is a property of the piece, e.g. relating to its size.
a speaker addresses an audience on a particular topic. the audience is generally passive, although for many types of address (including academic talks and press conferences), a discussion or question-answer period is virtually always required.
the word(s) in this frame detail a particular moment in time.these often occur with demonstratives such as this and that.
this frame is concerned with nouns denoting a part or parts of a whole entity . the part is not defined relative to the whole's orientation, center, or edge and is not ordered. we also annotate properties of the part, e.g. relating to its size.
an entity is designed for or exists to perform an activity or fulfill a role.
a place defined by an owner.
a law regulates activities or states of affairs within a jurisdiction, dictating what required states should be the case and what forbidden states should not. often it also indicates negative consequences for individuals that violate it, and these negative consequences are generally enforced by some official authority. they may or may not be created by some official legislative body.
the authorities put a prisoner in prison as punishment for an offense.
ambient conditions of temperature, precipitation, windiness, and sunniness pertain at a certain place and time. further specification of the conditions that pertain may also be indicated.
an individual or group (practitioner) or a part of their work life (work) is defined professionally by the activity that they typically engage in. alternatively, the activity may be indicated by a salient_entity conventionally associated with it.
a particular piece of information is evaluated for its accuracy. the degree of correctness may also be expressed. the source of information may also metonymically stand in for the information.
this frame contains adjectives and nouns that describe the truth or sincerity of communication. these words, analogously to behaver-evaluating words, can apply either to speakers or to the messages they produce. they can occur with about-pps expressing topic.
this frame is for objects, physical or otherwise, which are used to grant access to some location or function.
an entity has the ability to contain a theme.
this frame contains words that denote kinship relations. in annotating the directional uses of these words, we use the standard terms from anthropology, ego and alter. matilde is gilberto's cousin once removed
two individuals, the subordinate and the superior have a relationship such that the subordinate generally follows orders given by the superior and has the best interests of the superior in mind.
lus in this frame denote a period of time in which an enabled_action becomes possible. the duration of this time period can be both exact and inexact. an agent who performs the enabled_action may be mentioned as well.
this frame is concerned with words that describe a person based on a salient part of their body.
in this frame, there is a part of a whole in which the part is defined with respect to the canonical or inherent orientation of the whole. in cases where the target is an adjective, it has a special relationship with the noun that it modifies such that a phrase which is a syntactic argument of the noun is semantically available to fill the argument structure of the adjective, as in
an event takes place at a place and time.
there is a certain physical distance within which some other entity can participate in an event (typically perception or manipulation) with the participant. alternatively, the event may be indicated metonymically by a instrument . [note the connection with *distance, sufficiency, and capability. words in this frame can generally be paraphrased "close enough to be able to".]
in this frame a part is part of a larger whole comprised of parts that are ordered. the parts can be ordered temporally (first to last and vice versa) or vertically (down to up and vice versa). the part can be modified by the part_prop or the number of the part can be given by ordinality.
a competitor claims a prize as a result of the outcome of their participation in a competition.
an entity is able to exert a force of the magnitude specified by the target.
an artifact is deliberately made or modified by an intelligent entity to be put to a certain kind of use. various properties of the artifact may be specified, such as its creator, time_of_creation, name, type, and the material of which it is composed. the artifact may or may not be a physical entity.
a helper benefits a benefited_party by enabling the culmination of a goal that the benefited_party has. a focal_entity that is involved in reaching the goal may stand in for it.
a speaker realizes a sign, usually a linguistic one, in some formal_realization. the formal_realization may be described as correct or incorrect in a judgment expression, or it may be partially indicated as a part_of_form. manner may be used as a more general indication of the formal_realization
this frame covers words that name locations as defined politically, or administratively.
the support, a phenomenon or fact, lends support to a claim or proposed course of action, the proposition, where the domain_of_relevance may also be expressed. some of the words in this frame (e.g. argue) are communication words used in a non-communicative, epistemic sense.
the authorities put a prisoner in prison as punishment for an offense.
an agent manipulates an instrument in order to achieve a purpose.
this frame concerns a cognizer's certainty about the correctness of beliefs or expectations. it only includes uses where a cognizer is expressed.
the words in this frame describe situations in which an agent or a cause injures a victim. the body_part of the victim which is most directly affected may also be mentioned in the place of the victim. in such cases, the victim is often indicated as a genitive modifier of the body_part, in which case the victim fe is indicated on a second fe layer.
a useful_location is accessible to some (possibly generic) theme despite a potential barrier, or is not accessible because of the barrier.
in a text, a source_of_information is given that provides a reader of the text with further information relevant to the text. in this frame the author and reader are completely deprofiled, with the source_of_information made salient.
a speaker interprets a written text and speaks the contents, usually to an addressee. the contents may be the text verbatim or a representation of the text.
words in this frame have to do with a cognizer being aware (or not being aware) of the difference between two phenomena, which may be expressed jointly or disjointly.
the support, a phenomenon or fact, lends support to a claim or proposed course of action, the proposition, where the domain_of_relevance may also be expressed. some of the words in this frame (e.g. argue) are communication words used in a non-communicative, epistemic sense.
this frame describes intentionally formed human social groups (here termed organizations) with some definite structure and members. they may be relatively informal, consisting only of a group of individuals who are aware of who is and who is not a fellow member, or they may be complex and long-lasting, such as the roman catholic church or the conservative party.
in this frame an evaluee is described by a (usually implicit) judge with respect to the morality or rightness of his or her behavior.
an author creates a text, either written, such as a letter, or spoken, such as a speech, that contains meaningful linguistic tokens, and may have a particular addressee in mind. the text may include information about its topic, although the latter is not an fe in this frame.
a controlling_entity, controlling_situation, or controlling_variable control a dependent_entity, dependent_situation, or dependent_variable. the latter, dependent, element or some aspect of it is not just influenced, but determined by the controlling element.
this frame describes a situation in which an owner loses his or her possession. the owner may have failed to keep ownership of their possession (i.e. robbery or gambling) or may have unintentionally misplaced their possession.
these adjectives describe the degree of strictness or tolerance of an agent, usually with regard to another person (the controllee) and often with regard to a particular issue. the strictness/lenience with respect to the issue may be manifested in (expressed by) an agent or by some medium (e.g., laws), or by some behavior of the agent, i.e., the controlling_act.
some stimulus causes a cognizer to think of a prior phenomenon due to its perceived similarity.
an artifact is deliberately made or modified by an intelligent entity to be put to a certain kind of use. various properties of the artifact may be specified, such as its creator, time_of_creation, name, type, and the material of which it is composed. the artifact may or may not be a physical entity.
authorities charge a suspect, who is under suspicion of having committed a crime (the charges), and take him/her into custody.the police arrested harry on charges of manslaughter.
the reader attends to a text to process its information. sometimes a particular kind of phenomenon is sought in the text.
this frame contains nouns denoting a rank or level within an established hierarchy.
a text is an entity that contains linguistic, symbolic information on a topic, created by an author at the time_of_creation. it may be a physical entity that is made of a certain material etc. it may be constructed for an honoree.
an insulator is judged for its potential to increase the body temperature of an experiencer. the activity that the experiencer engages in to experience the heat and the circumstances in which the insulator is judged may also be provided.
an entity exists at a particular location, at a particular time, as observed by an implicit observer. a depictive and/or duration phrase is often found. this frame differs from existence in that the location is profiled as a ground where an observer is conceived of as confirming the entity's existence. in some cases, the location may be recoverable from phrases that primarily express peripheral information
an entity undergoes some change (the event) that is (or is construed as) punctual. (this frame exists mainly to allow common fes to be inherited.)
the locale is a geographical location as defined by shape. this frame includes natural geographic features, including land/ice forms and bodies of water.
an entity is judged to be sensually pleasing or intellectually interesting to a (generally implicit) judge.
the words in this frame describe a period of time, as opposed to a point in time.
an agent or entity becomes sufficient enough to meet a standard. alternatively, an action or occurrence can be thought of as event that fulfills a standard. in this frame, the agent, entity, or event can be conceptualized as being on a scale where a change of value or circumstances brings it in line with the position of the standard on the scale.
an entity stands out perceptually in comparison to other members of its type.
the answer to one open question, the outcome, is dictated (partially or completely) by the answer to another open question, the determinant, i.e. if the answer to the determinant is known, the answer to the outcome can be predicted. the degree of predictive power and the circumstances under which the dependency holds can also be expressed.
this frame describes the attributes of a thermodynamic phase of matter.
these words describe the size of message that a speaker is judged by a (usually unexpressed) judge to give, either in a specific occasion or topic or in general. as in other communication frames, medium may also be expressed.
an entity is presented as having been seen or experienced by a (typically generic and backgrounded) cognizer on a certain number of occasions, causing the entity to have a certain degree of recognizability for the cognizer.
words in this frame describe the status of an action with respect to a code of laws or rules. an object may also be in violation or compliance of the code by virtue of its existence, location or possession.
these words refer to parts merging to form a whole. (the parts may also be encoded as part_1 and part_2.) there is a symmetrical relationship between the components that undergo the process, and afterwards the parts are consumed and are no longer distinct entities that are easily discernable or separable in the whole.
a man-made artifact, digital or physical, which is used to display information presented via the object.
words in this frame have to do with a cognizer believing that some phenomenon will take place in the future. some words in the frame (e.g. foresee.v) indicate that the phenomenon is asserted also to be true, while others do not.
a helper benefits a benefited_party by enabling the culmination of a goal that the benefited_party has. a focal_entity that is involved in reaching the goal may stand in for it.
an entity is integrated into a building as a part of a (possibly unexpressed) whole which may refer to the whole building or merely to a sub-part of the building.
the words in this frame refer to facial expressions and the possessors of those expressions.
geography as defined by its use.
a phenomenon is portrayed with respect to the degree of likelihood that it will be perceived and known, given the (usually implicit) evidence, perceiver, and the circumstances in which it is considered. for several of the lus, such as visible, audible, etc., the type of the evidence is fixed by the targets themselves being a perceptual experience.
this frame concerns a specific subset of instances of a type which are evaluated in terms of their similarity to a conceptual prototype of the type. the judgment of exemplariness may be made along a certain domain.
an entity can bear a great outer force so as to resist destruction and damage.
lus in this frame modify a gradable attribute and describe intensities at the extreme positions on a scale.
an authority with the power to make decisions hands down a finding over a question presented in a formal or informal case.
this frame covers words that name locations as defined politically, or administratively.
a speaker characterizes the intensity of an attribute of an entity by a degree.
an agent expends effort towards achieving a goal. alternatively, a salient_entity involved in the goal can be expressed in place of a goal expression.
this frame has to do with scientific taxonomy. the lexical units in this frame include the seven major classifications in which organisms are grouped based on common biological characteristics. these classifications are labeled rank in this frame. the members or subtype of the rank is often expressed with the use of the target-denoting noun.
this frame contains words referring to items of food.
a person or institution is being described in terms of their wealthiness, in other words the amount of money in their possession.
an experimenter conducts an experiment based on a hypothesis. this experiment contains a control_group or controlled_individual which is compared with a treatment_group or treated_individual in order to determine the result.
a speaker characterizes the intensity of an attribute of an entity by a degree.
this lus in this frame refer to biological entities labeled by the fe organism. an organism is described as something that can be alive, or have naturally occuring biological processes and functions, however the concept of life is often used metaphorically for non-organic entities which resemble or act as if they have organic life.
this frame contains nouns denoting aggregates of individuals. the aggregates may be described by an aggregateproperty.
this frame has to do with the repetition (and especially the frequency of repetition) of an event. many of the adjectives and adverbs in this frame are based on nouns in the calendric_unit frame.
this frame contains transparent nouns (and some adjectives) denoting quantities of a mass or of individuals. as opposed to aggregate words such as group, set, these quantity do not have a status as wholes on their own. initially, at least, we annotate both quantity of masses and of individuals in this frame, though we may split the frame along these lines later on.
the size of an entity is assessed in terms of the degree by which it deviates from the norm. the size refers to the amount of three-dimensional space that is occupied by the entity.
an agent or cause makes a new_member part of group. the group may be represented by an individual existing_member if it implies the existence of a set of members.
lus in this frame denote that the instance of a type is contextually notable. this frame typically requires dual fe layer annotation; see below.
in this frame, which is a part of the trial sequence, a judge gives a finding with respect to the charges against the defendant in a particular case.
this frame concerns entities conventionally being referred to by particular names.
the lexical units in this frame have to do with an entity being in a state of order or disorder. often the entity is unexpressed in this frame and is, therefore, marked as a null instantiation.
the lexical units in this frame are descriptions of a cognizer's attitude about or outlook on a state_of_affairs. the state_of_affairs can be expressed without a cognizer in many cases, as shown in the following
a salient subevent has a pattern of recurrence within a larger process.
a cognizer introduces a new_idea into society.
an experiencer actualizes a certain pattern of behavior, a lifestyle, which persists for a significant period of time in the experiencer's life and is recognized as part of his character or normal routine. the lifestyle is not necessarily realized intentionally, and may just be the result of circumstance.
a person has a particular mental state and the ability to engage in an activity with enthusiasm, energy, and positivity.
this frame contains lus that express the form which a piece of artwork represents. the form may also represent the entire body of an artist's work. the form may be further characterized by the time of some artwork's creation or other descriptors.
geography as defined by its use.
an entity meets the pre-conditions for participating in an event. a degree modifier may be included to indicate by how much the entity exceeds or falls short of the minimum requirements.
a person (the cognizer) comes to believe something (the content), sometimes after a process of reasoning. this change in belief is usually initiated by a person or piece of evidence. occasionally words in this domain are accompanied by phrases expressing topic, i.e. that which the mental content is about.
this frame contains verbs and nouns that communicate the act of a speaker to address a message to some addressee using language. a number of the words can be used performatively, such as declare and insist.
this frame is concerned with the likelihood of a hypothetical_event occurring. the hypothetical_event is its only core frame element. notice that in the case where a noun phrase is the subject of the support verb, that np is also tagged as hypothetical_event.
in this frame an ingestor takes a substance into his or her body. the delivery_device can appear as a direct object.
the hearer receives a message or communication on a particular topic. words in this frame denote events of verbal communication, but express the hearer rather than the speaker as an external argument.
the locale is a geographical location as defined by shape. this frame includes natural geographic features, including land/ice forms and bodies of water.
this frame has to do with scientific taxonomy. the lexical units in this frame include the seven major classifications in which organisms are grouped based on common biological characteristics. these classifications are labeled rank in this frame. the members or subtype of the rank is often expressed with the use of the target-denoting noun.
a perceiver determines the location of a sought_entity within a ground.
in this frame a speaker asks an addressee for something, or to carry out some action.
a piece of evidence indicates that an event occured, or metonymically, entity had formerly existed, in a location.
a competition comes to an end, with a competitor tying, winning, or losing against an opponent (or opponents) according to their score. (in the symmetrical situation of a tie, the competitor and opponent may be jointly mentioned as competitors.) according to the score that the competitor and opponent have achieved, they may receive a rank or a prize. the margin may also be mentioned.
Drug lord captured by marines in Mexico
SC dismisses govt's review plea in Vodafone tax case
Explosion hits oil pipeline in Syria's Homs
NATO Soldier Killed In Afghan Attack
Castro celebrates 86th birthday Monday
Israel ex-spy warns against 'messianic' Iran war
Eye Opener: Supreme Court rules on Arizona immigration law
NATO traces path out of Afghanistan
Syria says suicide bomber kills 10 in Damascus
Sachin Tendulkar says I'm not God, I'm Sachin
Tropical storm heads for pass along Honduras coast
Australian PM Gillard set to win leadership challenge
Obama backs Philippines over South China Sea
Teenager in China kills 8, wounds 5 in knife attack
Syrian rebels move command from Turkey to Syria
Knesset speaker: Obama reelection bad for Israel
Netanyahu set to call early vote
Greece bond exchange the largest debt restructuring in history
Putin 'Wins Russian Presidential Election'
Suicide bomber kills 12 in Nigeria church
Indian finance minister quits to run for president
Jerry Sandusky found guilty in child sex abuse trial
Three Tibetans self-immolate in western China: report
White House in damage control over Obama Supreme Court remarks
Annan warns talks of Syria risks
Quartet calls on Israelis, Palestinians to end irritants
Saudis to permit women to compete in Olympics
Nigeria university mass attacked by gunmen
US says ready to help blind Chinese activist
China's Cabinet promises to boost economy
Annan, UN chief call on Security Council to act on Syria
Green Lantern to be reintroduced as gay by DC Comics
Military plane crashes in south France: authorities
Tropical Storm Isaac boosts jobless claims
Gazans fire 2 rockets into Israel; no injuries
Freddie Starr Arrested In Savile Abuse Probe
Romney announces Paul Ryan as running mate
Stocks rise early after Greek deal, then flatten
Suicide bombing rocks elite Yemen military camp
NATO: 2 International Troops Killed in Afghanistan
Moscow protesters demand Vladimir Putin's resignation
Saudi gas truck blast kills at least 22
French election turnout higher than expected
Australia to establish the world's largest marine reserve
Two U.S. soldiers shot, killed by Afghan soldier
Italy soldiers die in Afghanistan
Abbas to lead Palestinian unity government
Egypt’s Coptic Church Names New Pope
Malawi Officially Confirms President's Death
Mali's Tuareg rebels declare independence
Lance Armstrong stripped of Tour de France titles
Egypt votes on final day of presidential election
Berri says ready to help launch national unity government
Is Madeleine McCann Still Alive?
13 dead in Iraq bomb attacks
Aussie surfers find stricken asylum seekers
ISAF: 4 coalition troops killed in attack involving Afghan police
Coty launches $10 billion bid for rival Avon
UN Security Council unanimous vote on Syria
Gunman kills 6 in shooting at Wisconsin Sikh temple
Audi to buy motorcycle maker Ducati
Hurricane Isaac Moves Inland After Landfall
China news agency: Still hope for Syria peace
22 dead in suicide attack on Yemen police academy
South Korea Orders Immediate Shutdown of 2 Nuclear Reactors
Nigeria mourns over 193 people killed in plane crash
US, allies to set demands for Iran nuclear talks
AOL says to sell 800 patents to Microsoft for $1.0 bn
Thousands of troops to march for Jubilee
Middle East: Israel: Hamas Leader Convicted
Navy Jet Crashes Into Apartment Building
Woman dies after abortion refusal
Greece votes in crucial election
U.S. and Turkey weigh no-fly zones for Syria
Death toll rises to 236 after Brazzaville blasts
I'll Have Another retired to stud
Syria journalists rescue bid fails
New sex claim hits Secret Service
Iran warns Moscow nuclear talks could stall
Mohamed Morsi sworn in as Eygptian president
Rimsha Masih released on bail
1 person killed in sectarian clashes in Lebanon
ICC jails Congolese warlord for 14 years over child soldiers
Gains in financial stocks push up European equities
Turkey Raises Alarm Over Syrian Refugees
1 person killed in sectarian clashes in Lebanon
Suspected al-Qaeda financier arrested in France
No damage, tsunami after 6.6 quake hits off Indonesia's Sumatra
IAF strike Gaza terror hubs
Israeli air strikes kill 16 in Gaza
18 killed, 108 wounded in wave of bombings in Iraq
Palestinian prisoner ending hunger strike after deal
Hezbollah confirms it sent drone downed over Israel
Rebel fighters 'capture' Syrian soldiers
Colorado shooting suspect was under psychiatrist's care
6.6 quake rocks Indonesia's Papua: USGS
US senators penalize Pakistan for jailing doctor who aided CIA
What time is Andy Murray v Roger Federer in the Wimbledon men's final? All you need to know about the big game
New Jersey School Bans Hugging
Iran (Islamic Republic of): Iran steps up relief efforts after quakes kill 227
Tsunami warning issued for southern Alaska
'No Evidence' In Afghanistan Massacre Case
Cash-rich Apple to pay dividend, buy back shares
7 soldiers killed, 56 injured in PKK attack in eastern Turkey
Two reported dead in shooting at Empire State Building in NY
Australian unemployment up to 5.1 percent
Shares Move Higher on Wall Street
Halliburton 1Q income rises 23 pct
Syrian envoy to Cyprus defects to Qatar
4 killed in shrine bombing in northwest Pakistan
China stocks close mixed Friday
India bans bulk texts after riots
UN monitors yet to reach site of Syrian 'massacre' – video
Yorkshire soldier killed in Afghan bomb blast
Radical Islamists in Mali enlist new militia
Olympics Opening Ceremony A Hit Around Globe
Schiphol airport partly evacuated after bomb threat
Man killed in French terror raid
Dali painting stolen from gallery
Capello quits as England manager
One dead in Ohio school shooting
2 Palestinians killed in Israeli airstrikes
Pakistan condemns U.S. drone strikes
Massive Hurricane Sandy bears down on U.S. East Coast
Sarkozy to File Complaint in Gadhafi Funding Claim
The Note's Must Reads for Wednesday July 4, 2012
'Iran will attack Tel Aviv if Israel strikes'
Annan urges end to Syria violence, minister defects
Gusmao consolidates power in East Timor elections
Pena Nieto wins Mexico presidential vote: exit polls
Syria tells Russia some troops have pulled out of Homs
Nigeria plane crash: No survivors
MIER ups 2012 growth forecast to 4.2pc
Explosion at Venezuela Refinery Kills at Least 39
Strong earthquake hits Mexico
Russia, China veto UN resolution on Syria killings
Colorado shooting suspect was in therapy
Suicide bomber kills 4 near NATO's Afghan HQ
Pakistani plane crashes with 127 on board
UN security council orders global sanctions against Haqqani network in Afghanistan
Erdogan and Putin talked in raised voice
Saudi Arabia arrests suspected militants with al-Qaeda links
Hurricane Sandy Closes in on US East Coast
Chicago teachers strike: Vacations for students, for good or ill
Panetta says Afghanistan role to shift from combat in 2013
Four men admit London Stock Exchange bomb plot
PM in Tehran, asks NAM to take clear stand on Syria
Israel threatens action against Gaza aid ship
Bodies Found at Russian Jet Crash in Indonesia
Senators can return to playoffs with victory
Syria urges refugees to return
US soldier kills up to 16 civilians in Afghanistan
Rupert Murdoch: I was the victim of a cover up
Barack Obama's bodyguards sent back to US after prostitution scandal
China's yuan rises to new high against USD Wednesday
South Africa train crash kills at least 19
Nissan to sell steer-by-wire cars
Tibetan monk dies after setting himself on fire in protest against Chinese rule
Mumbai is 2nd costliest Indian city to live in
Man, 19, quizzed over teen murder
Israel kills Hamas commander, bombs Gaza targets
Civilians Bear Brunt of Afghan Attacks
Gusmao consolidates power in East Timor elections
UN monitors yet to reach site of Syrian 'massacre' – video
Russia, China veto UN resolution on Syria endorsing
NATO Condemns Syria's Downing of Turkish Military Jet
Activists: Syrian troops storm Damascus suburb
Syria rebels attack Lebanese post near border: army
Five killed in China building collapse
Syrian forces launch new attacks
Syrians trade blame over blasts
Gazans fire 2 rockets into Israel; no injuries
Former Nazi death camp guard Demjanjuk dead at 91
Boris Johnson re-elected London mayor
Breivik drops far-right salute in court
Second teenager charged with murder
French Fear New Serial Killer After Murders
US: Madoff brother to plead guilty in NY in fraud
Hollande defeats Sarkozy in French presidency vote
Libyan government retakes Tripoli airport
Clinton warns Kenya of cost of election violence
Arkansas Supreme Court strikes down execution law
S. Africa's former president Mandela discharged from hospital
UN envoy in Turkey for talks on Syria
Islamist Morsi Wins Egypt's Presidential Election
Donna Summer, the queen of disco
Bangladesh Muslims torch Buddhist shrines, police say
U.S. Drone Kills Five Militants in Pakistan
Mali future interim president readies to take office
9 killed, 168 injured in latest Cairo clashes
Tehran: EU sanctions won't force Iran into nuclear talks
Portugal Drownings: UK Girl And Grandad Named
Romney wins Maine Republican caucuses
Court in Bahrain rejects medics' last rally appeal
Hurricane Sandy powers toward Eastern Seaboard
Clinton calls for friends of Syria to unite
JK Rowling launches her first adult novel
Algerian government parties dominate elections
Security official killed in Yemen
US stocks fall as Greek talks lumber; Apple falls
Romney picks Ryan as vice presidential running mate: source
NATO sticks to transition roadmap in Afghanistan: Rasmussen
Mubarak faces verdict in murder trial
No blocks to investment
Blast kills 11 in northwestern Pakistan
5 aid workers freed in operation in Afghanistan
Two NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Nadal tumbles into French Open final
Russian TV reports foiled attempt on Putin
Putin claims victory in Russia's presidential election
Israeli Leader Puts Off Evicting Settlers From Hebron House
Government promises action on Heathrow queues
Remains of 167 bodies found in Mexican cave
orphaned alps massacre girl returns to uk
Obama team raises debate stakes
Two Kenyan ministers among 6 killed in plane crash
Iran, powers set for high-stakes nuclear talks
Thousands gather for new Russian anti-Putin rally
Syrian forces kill teen in Aleppo protests
Google names new Motorola Mobility CEO
Massive Hurricane Sandy bears down on U.S. East Coast
Egyptian president moves into Mubarak's old office
Another rocket hits Eshkol; no injuries
Japan falls silent to mark 311 tragedy
Thousands more Syrian refugees flee to Turkey overnight
Assange appeals extradition to UK's top court
Strong quake jolts most parts of Pakistan
Lebanese Gunmen Clash Over Syria Crisis
Syrian troops kill 35 in Damascus suburb
Mob kills man for burning Quran
US drone strike kills four in North Waziristan
Salvador Dali painting snatched from New York gallery
Putin claims victory in Russia's presidential election
Sarkozy announces re-election bid
US, UK in pact to release emergency oil stocks
Suspicious object found in Tel Aviv not explosive device
Eurozone unemployment stays at record 11 percent
French Socialist Party wins parliament victory
Salafi Islamists, police clash in Tunis - witnesses
Strauss-Kahn investigated in French prostitution ring
Romney wins Florida Republican primary
US drone strike kills four in North Waziristan
At least 15 killed in Nigeria church attack
2 Traffic Accidents Leave 47 Dead in China
Head of CIA resigns over affair
France's Strauss-Kahn charged with involvement in prostitution vice ring
Sony reports record annual loss
12 killed in Gaza in Israeli airstrikes
9 killed in attacks after deadly Iraq day
Barclays hit by fresh U.S. investigations
US closes embassy in Syria (AP)
Jaguar to create 1,100 jobs in UK
EU heaps new sanctions on Syria
US drone strike kills 8 militants
Russians rally against Putin's rule
Bahrain Grand Prix Underway Amid Protests
China stocks open flat Monday
Sheryl Crow says has benign brain tumor
Obama endorses same-sex marriage
Iraq searches Syria bound Iran plane: officials
Afghan parliament approves U.S.-Afghan security pact
Two German tourists, two pilots killed in Kenya air crash
Israeli, Palestinian negotiators quietly meet
US astronaut Neil Armstrong dead at 82
Amnesty: Syria rebels also committing abuses
Mitt Romney wins Republican primary in Indiana
East German rights activist Gauck elected president
South Africa starts investigating mine violence
Syria fighting rages as Russia urges Western re-think
3 dead, 27 injured in SW China accident
Erdogan's party submits plan for Turkish presidency
Santorum Romping To Minnesota Victory
Jordan Opens First Tent Camp for Syrian Refugees
Space legend Neil Armstrong dies
U.S. and Turkey weigh no-fly zones for Syria
Man arrested over double murder
Florida counties extend early voting
Warship sets sail for Falklands
Newcastle 2-0 Liverpool: Match report, pictures & video highlights
Palestinian prisoners to end hunger strike
Police: Four killed in German hostage taking incident
Egypt lets Mubarak PM back in presidential race
Syrian journalists killed in capital
GOP candidate Romney to call to arm Syrian rebels
U.N. observer patrol arrives at Syria massacre site
Publisher acquitted in privacy case
American Airlines and Pilots Agree on a New Contract
Greek PM to announce new election
Government of Canada Supports Montréal Women Leading Change
No problem if Mulayam forms Third Front: Congress
Bradley triumphs at Firestone as Furyk fades
Samsung overtakes Nokia in phones
Plane crash in Ghana kills at least 10
Gu Kailai murder trial ends in China
Eurozone backs Greek bailout
Six US troops killed in Afghan bomb attack
Syria forces launch Aleppo attack
Romney, Obama fight for edge on Medicare
Two blasts hit Syria capital
BBC director general resigns over 'shoddy journalism'
Rick Santorum wins Kansas caucuses
In Islamist-led Egypt, Coptic Church names new pope
US pledge to rebuild Haiti not being met
Chinese stocks close higher Thursday
Greece to vote on 2013 budget; protesters gather
Not 'hiding the ball' on Russia: Obama
U.S., EU Cautiously Welcome Iran's Proposal To Restart Nuclear Talks
Barack Obama's personal evolution on same-sex marriage
Clinton warns Kenya of cost of election violence
England captain Andrew Strauss retires from professional cricket
Anti-American Protests Over Film Expand to Nearly 20 Countries
Journalists hail London Olympics opening
Aust stocks open lower
WikiLeaks begins publishing two million Syria emails
Palestinians: 2 Gaza militants killed in Israeli airstrike on coastal strip
Mali's President Hands in Resignation
China backs Sri Lanka on UN resolution
Three killed in Nigeria suicide bombers attack
FACTBOX-Security developments in Iraq, February 1
HRW: Jordan biased against Palestinians from Syria
Israel among top arms exporters in world: report
Egyptians to vote for new president
Federer Wins 7th Wimbledon Title
Qaida leader calls for kidnap of Westerners in Egypt
China stocks close mixed Friday
Ton up: Tendulkar reaches 100th international hundred
Police disperse protest in east Sudan - witnesses
43 killed in bus crash
Putin sworn in as Russian president
China trade returns to surplus in March
Highlights of the Vice Presidential debate
2 pro-Palestinian activists arrested at B-G Airport
Full Episode: Nightline 6/29: Katie Holmes, Tom Cruise to Divorce
Syrian regime denies role in Houla massacre
South Sudan accuses Sudan of bombings ahead of talks
Conspiracy against me - Lance
Spanish jobless rate soars past 25 per cent
Nine killed in gun attack in Pakistan
Syria demands guarantees, rebels say peace plan doomed
Minn. terminal reopens after evacuation
Golf: Westwood takes lead in Dubai Desert Classic
Sudan Blocks YouTube Over Anti-Islam Film
Polls open in Russian presidential election
Chavez leaves again for Cuba for radiotherapy
Romanian president declared victory
Russians rally support for Orthodox church over Pussy Riot controversy
Clinton lands in India to breathe life into ties
Mali interim leader takes office
Putin Declares Victory In Russian Presidential Vote
AL renews condemnation on Syria's violence
EU slaps sanctions on Assad family
Air Force Instructor Faces Sentencing for Rape
More than 30 striking miners killed
Israeli PM makes case on Iran to US voters
Music Industry Pays Tribute to Whitney Houston
Iron Dome intercepts 17 rockets
Mali Islamists destroying 'more Timbuktu shrines'
China stocks end higher on PMI at midday
Scientists Resurrect Flowers from Prehistoric Seeds
Man convicted in Vatican leaks case
Romney, Paul vie for Maine caucus win
Sectarian clashes rock Lebanese city of Tripoli
Repsol blasts Argentina over nationalization of YPF
Several dead, 550 injured in Argentina train crash
Aung San Suu Kyi to address British MPs
Sheriff: Man recovers stolen car 42 years later
Google CEO says Android important, not critical
Mursi takes oath of office, becomes Egyptian president
Iran may cut oil exports to more EU states
Factory Fires Kill At Least 260 in Pakistan
Australian among four on plane missing in Indonesia
Romney vows to restore 'promise of America'
Santorum's 3-year-old daughter hospitalized
Syrian opposition pleads for criminal court action
Mandela released from hospital
Sunderland 2-2 Bolton: Davies double gets Trotters a point but they stay in bottom three
Jaya Prada all set to join BJP
Five dead in Pakistan suicide blast
Hezbollah's Nasrallah warns US over anti-Islam film
Syrian forces shell towns, clash with rebels
Nadal tops Djokovic for 7th French Open title
Childcare costs rise by nearly 6%
Obama urges decisive action on Europe debt crisis
Beef burger mix recalled over salmonella concerns
Obama, Romney Prepare for First Debate
First significant gas found offshore Kenya
Red Cross worker killed in Pakistan
At CPAC, Mitt Romney Stresses Conservative Credentials
8 rockets fired from Gaza into southern Israel; none hurt
Glorious triple-gold night for Britain
Bahraini protesters and police clash after funeral
U.S. soldier killed in shooting incident in S. Afghanistan
Polls close in Egyptian presidential election
Police 'did not link' Savile claims
Eurozone unemployment stays at record 11 percent
James Murdoch quits BSkyB
Iconic science fiction writer Ray Bradbury dies at 91
Egypt presidential election May 23-24
Four French soldiers killed in Afghan suicide blast
UN observers find traces of Syrian massacre
AP poll: Majority in US have prejudice against blacks
AP Source: Redskins to trade for No. 2 pick
China says defense budget to rise 11.2% in 2012
String of Iraq blasts kills at least 32
Ecuador President Correa says no decision made on Assange asylum
Apple buying security firm AuthenTec for $356 million
US offers US$10 mil. for Pakistan militant
6 NATO troops killed in Afghanistan IED attack
Osama Bin Laden Wives to Be Jailed
Egyptians vote in landmark presidential election
JetBlue pilot who disrupted flight declared insane, not guilty
Tsunami warning: No need for SA to panic
US Hands Over Bagram Prison to Afghan Authorities
Jeremy Hunt distances himself from adviser who 'overstepped the mark'
Obama praises U.S.-Latin America trade ties
Blitzbokke ousted by Fiji
Obama and Romney focus on swing-states
Trade newspaper Variety up for sale
'Grenade attack' kills one and injures at least 11
Toulouse siege: Police surround flat of 'Islamic warrior' suspected of being serial killer
'Scores of bodies' found in Syria
Shooter charged with murder of US black teen
Jonny Bairstow and Eoin Morgan shine for England in Mumbai
Australians flee homes amid floods
How wind farm developers 'use camera tricks to make turbines look smaller than they really are'
US drone kills six militants in Pakistan: officials
Wigan 3-2 Wolves: Match report, pictures & video highlights
UK spends £3m on foreign prisons
Nigeria: Nigerian troops swarm after 40 killed in student massacre
Nerves Calmed -- For Now : Markets Jump on Relief over Spanish Bank Bailout
Heavy Fighting Reported in Syria's Aleppo
France says Greece must show credibility for eurozone
Avengers sets box office record
4 French Soldiers Reported Killed in Afghanistan
Spanish bailout dilemma gets more acute
NATO soldier dies in Afghanistan
Chinese stocks open lower Wednesday
Palestinian leadership condemn Israeli FM call to oust Abbas
Mitt Romney wins Maryland GOP primary
Man finds car on eBay 42 years after it was stolen
Sylvester Stallone's son found dead in Hollywood
NATO: 4 aid workers rescued from Afghan insurgents
Russia jails Pussy Riot protest punks for two years
Germany dodges recession with growth in first quarter
Israel bars German writer Grass from visiting over poem
The Note's Must-Reads for August 1, 2012
NATO US troop detained over shooting of Afghan civilians
Hollande wins French presidential election
Lance Armstrong drops fight against doping charges
Military: Syria chemical stocks threaten Israel
Fitch upgrades Ford to investment grade
Syria peace plan conditions “unacceptable,” opposition says
Asian stocks rise after Greek vote eases fears
Clashes as Greeks protest against more cutbacks
9 dead, 11 hurt, 4 missing in Mont Blanc avalanche
Taliban pose as 'attractive women, on Facebook for spying
China activist Chen lands in US
City Room: Empire State Building Shooting
Mohamed Morsi sworn in as Eygptian president
British soldier killed in southern Afghanistan
Attack on Nato base in Afghanistan kills 15
Yemen Suicide Blast, Drone Attack Kill At Least 30
Torres moving on after Olympic bid fails
Obama silent on China dissident
Pakistan begins demolition of bin Laden compound
Sudan blames Israel for Khartoum arms fire
House-Senate deal reached on payroll tax measure
Prince Philip hospitalised in London
Tropical Storm Isaac drenches Haiti, swipes Cuba
'Desperate Housewives' Actress Kathryn Joosten Dies
Gaza rockets lands in Ashkelon Coast area; none hurt
Foreign pro-Palestinian activists seek to enter West Bank
Suicide Bomber Kills 6 in Afghan Capital
World stocks rise on hopes for EU, US stimulus
Gore Vidal dead at 86: Legendary author, playwright, and politician dies
Egypt's Coptic Pope Shenuda III dies
World stocks fall before Greek debt deal deadline
South Africa police shot dead 30 miners
Isaac drenches Haiti, heads toward Cuba, Florida
Britain reaches out to Syria opposition
Denver shooting: Police to detonate devices in suspect's home
Obama relaxes deportation rules for young immigrants
Microsoft's Surface a big bet on future: Analysts
'Whitey' Bulger's girlfriend gets 8 years
Mauritanian president shot by army unit
Syria hands over bodies of journalists
Man sets himself on fire at Breivik trial
U.S. drone strike kills 10 in northwest Pakistan
9,000 U.S. Marines to leave Okinawa
Toys R Us waives fee for layaway program
EU Set for New Sanctions on Iran
Iran expands nuclear enrichment activities: IAEA report
Donna Summer, Queen of Disco, dies at 63
Assad meets with Red Cross officials in Syria
Iraqi Attacks Kill General, Four Police
At least 80 dead in northwest Iran quakes
Brazil's 'pop-star priest' gets mammoth new stage
Washington: More Than 100 Are Charged in Medicare Fraud Sweep
Putin claims victory in Russia's presidential election
Clinton ready to fight for Obama
Romney announces Paul Ryan as running mate
European markets rise on Greek bailout hopes
Edwards Acquitted on 1 Count, Mistrial on Others
Ukrainian weightlifter gets four-year doping ban
Gunman may have filmed school massacre
Hong Kong stocks close down 0.28%
Coroner: Whitney Houston died in bathtub
Suicide bomber attacks Algerian security base
Thailand: Iranians planned to attack Israelis
Israeli military court rejects appeal of Palestinian hunger striker
Japan suffers severe flooding - in pictures
Avengers sets box office record
Putin 'Wins Russian Presidential Election'
Japan to deport Chinese held over island landing
Putin casts ballot as Russians vote
UN Chief Finds His Voice, Remains Cautious on China
Some Syria violence amounts to civil war-Red Cross
Libyans begin handing in weapons
British Archbishop of Canterbury changes career to Cambridge
Punjab Mail derails near Rohtak, 19 injured
George Zimmerman 'to be charged' with killing Trayvon Martin
Indian Maoist rebels offer talks to free Italian hostages
Two reported dead in shooting at Empire State Building in NY
Five dead in Pakistan suicide blast
Penn State football players react to sanctions
Israel must release or try Palestinian on prolonged hunger strike
UN report says both sides in Syria abuse rights
Girl accused of burning Koran goes into hiding
Manchester United slashes price for US IPO
Romney Wins Nevada Caucus
Soggy solstice: Stonehenge gets soaking
France warns Syria over chemical weapons use
Life-threatening Midwest storms feared
Chicago teacher strike nears end with 'framework' agreement in place
Indonesian president to visit UK
ICC lawyer detained in Libya on security concerns
Storm delays start of Republican convention
Freight train derails, catches fire in Columbus, Ohio
At least two Nato killed in Afghanistan helicopter crash: military
President Mills must quit - Lecturer
Miami Heat wins NBA Finals
Japan closes last nuclear reactor
Ryanair in new bid for Aer Lingus
Russian Air Force celebrates 100th anniversary
6 NATO troops killed in Afghanistan
China yuan weakens to 6.3282 against USD Monday
Apple iPad mini makes debut
Not so Super Tuesday for Mitt Romney
Putin sworn in as Russian growth falters
ArQule, Daiichi stop lung cancer trial, shares tank
Teenager and father killed in crash
6.1-magnitude quake strikes Indonesia
2 Americans Killed as Afghan Unrest Enters Fifth Day
Breivik complains of 'ridicule'
Officials: Romney to get Secret Service protection
Japan PM calls for quicker tsunami waste processing
Syrian fighter pilot defects to Jordan
Syrian Arab Republic (the): Syrian Arab Republic: Syrian Refugees (as of 28 June 2012)
Suicide bomber kills 16 in Afghanistan
Hamas hangs three Gaza prisoners
Airlines cancel 'flytilla' activists' tickets to TA
Spain asks for bank rescue
East Timor votes in presidential election
The murky waters of the South China Sea
Sri Lanka seek one-day revival against Pakistan
SpaceX docks with International Space Station: Up next, public travel?
Romney rocked by secret video
'Million Muppet March' to defend Obama backing of PBS
Syrian opposition in reconciliation talks
Sensex down 193 points on budget blues
Facebook boosts size of IPO by 25pc to raise $15bn
Iran's Parliament Questions A Dismissive Ahmadinejad
Yemen suicide attack kills 7 soldiers: officials
Sunday Times journalist Marie Colvin killed in Syria
KL shares higher at mid-afternoon
Chicago teachers strike in bitter contract dispute
Presidential vote polarises Egyptians
Three more US soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Police raise death toll in bus accident to 8
Four foreign soldiers killed in Afghan east
Eurozone agrees to lend Spain up to $125 billion
Red Cross worker killed in Pakistan
Afghan, US govts sign deal on controversial night raid
China mine accident kills 10
Australia can eclipse England in Windies
Protests at Pussy Riot verdict
Secret Service sees its 'biggest scandal' over prostitutes
Kuwait: Activists storm Syrian embassy; two injured
Details of Aung San Suu Kyi's visit to Ireland
Key says marae visit a lost opportunity
Norway marks anniversary of massacre
South Korean economic growth falls to 3-year low
Woman killed by falling debris
Aust shares up 1% after interest rate cut
Germany warns Greece: No more money without reforms
Israel to free Palestinian hunger striker
Obama to meet families of shooting victims
Obama widens lead over Romney despite jobs data: Reuters/Ipsos poll
Russia, China Veto UN Resolution on Syria
Two killed, 19 injured in Toronto shooting
What the Pope's butler saw – aide arrested over Vatican leaks
Anti-Putin protesters form human chain in Moscow
Juror: Sandusky appeared to accept his fate
Washington's Acts of Congress sells for $9.8M
Lakers Fire Coach Mike Brown After 1-4 Start
Canadian Muslims issue fatwa against 'honor killing'
U.N. to take up Syria resolution
Soldier 'can't recall' massacre
Not a good beginning: Hollande's plane hit by lightning en route to Berlin
Libya PM names new cabinet after protests over original
4 foreign soldiers killed in Afghan east
Syrian forces storm central town
Pak: 20 dead in anti-Islam film protests
Cause of Whitney Houston's death could take weeks
N Korea warns of retaliation for South Korea drill
A Tale of Two Passes: How The New York Giants Won The Super Bowl
One dead in new Israeli strike on Gaza
Germany Likely to Press Russia on Syrian Crisis
Four seriously injured in M23 motorway crash
UN aid chief Amos enters Baba Amr with Red Crescent
Dozens killed in Nigerian riots
Profiles of Egypt's main presidential candidates
Actor Gazzara dead at 81
British gold rush silences gripes over cost
Avalanche buries at least 100 Pakistani soldiers
Inflation falls to 15-month low: what the analysts say
Komen won't cut Planned Parenthood funding
Forex &amp; Gold 25 August 2012
Afghan Parliament Votes to Oust Key Ministers
Iran says UN nuclear talks will continue
Agribusiness: Mad cow disease found in California
BP sells some Gulf of Mexico assets for $5.55 bil
300 potential Jimmy Savile victims: police
Romney leads rivals, not Obama, in fundraising
Armstrong steps down from Livestrong
US drone strike kills 5 militants in Pakistan
9/11 defendants ignore judge at Guantanamo hearing
Syrian govt wont stop attacks
Chinese stocks close higher midday Friday
Myanmar: Opposition claims Suu Kyi win
Obama's poll rating drops in boost for Republican rivals
Two Aust soldiers wounded in Afghanistan
Attacker in Afghan uniform kills 2 NATO troops
New Syria opposition chief wants no-strings aid
Cheap generics no panacea for India’s poorest
Egyptians vote to pick president for first time
South Africa mine clash kills at least 30
Syrian forces bombard Homs, Russia warns of civil war
Egypt presidential election results delayed
Deadline passes with no new Iran sanctions
Arrested Russian killer denies ties to Pussy Riot
Norway memorial honours 77 massacre victims
US Afghanistan general linked to Petraeus scandal
'Arrest warrant' for Maldives ex-president
Chinese stocks fall after RRR cut - May 14
HRW: Jordan turning away Palestinian refugees from Syria
NKorea makes "significant" nuclear reactor progress - IAEA
Maldives president quits after police mutiny, protests
NATO strike 'kills civilians' in Afghanistan
Al-Qaida says it captures 70 Yemeni soldiers in Abyan's battle
Navy jet crashes into US apartments, pilots eject
China stocks open higher Wednesday
IDF to deploy Iron Dome in Central Israel
4 Killed in US Drone Strike in Pakistan
US teen held in Chicago 'jihad' car bomb plot
PC David Rathband: twin brother's fears for his 'bestest mate'
Syrian forces move to retake Aleppo
20-member parliamentary, trade team leaves for India
Sly Stallone's Sone Sage Found Dead in LA
Wall Street Opens Lower
Clinton: US, Europe must do more against tyrants
Europe shares bounce as more China stimulus seen
Syrian forces overrun rebel stronghold
Stock index futures point to lower start
Man charged after MP hurt in attack
Chinese stocks close higher midday Friday
Nokia apologises for 'faked' ad
US drone strike kills 5 militants in Pakistan
Syria rebels leave besieged Homs
U.S. orders non-essential staff to leave Sudan, Tunisia
Egypt's Mubarak critical
Sandy slams into Northeast; at least 18 dead, 7.4M without power
Romney, Obama clash on tax, economy in first debate
Assad says mercenaries are behind Syria unrest
Putin Declares Victory in Russia Presidential Vote
Japan PM dissolves lower house for election
Two killed in new Israeli strike on Gaza: medics
Navy jet crashes into Virginia buildings, injuring six
One NATO soldier killed in S. Afghanistan
Spain jobless rate hits new high
Roadside bomb kills 10 Afghan civilians: police
Turkey scrambles jets near border
Supreme Court to Hear Voting Rights Act Case
Two die in Syria violence after UN monitors land
Remarks by the President at the White House Science Fair
Civilian, defector killed in Syria, says NGO
Malawi confirms president's death
Taiwan rattled by strong earthquake
Bank of England's Paul Tucker tainted by Libor mess
Libya postpones assembly election to July 7
Red Cross says negotiating halt to fighting in Syria to take aid
Syrian forces shoot civilians on bus
German parliament overwhelmingly backs Greek rescue deal
Bombings, clashes continue in Syria
London 2012 Olympics Opening Ceremony 'to feature a green and pleasant land'
Burma's reforms bring easing of U.S. sanctions
Usain Bolt wins 200m – Steven Howard reaction
Dozens dead in Taliban resort attack
Heavy fighting rocks eastern Syria ahead of poll
China yuan weakens to 6.3282 against USD Monday
7 dead in Christian school shooting
Indonesia anti-terror squad kills two suspected militants
US Election: Mitt Romney concedes defeat as Barack Obama wins second term
Armenians vote in parliamentary elections
Pakistan blocks Twitter over anti-Islamic material
Annan to visit Syrian refugees in Turkey Tuesday
Venezuela's Chavez in Cuba for 3rd anti-cancer treatment
Sachin Tendulkar is sworn in as Indian senator
Residents near Gaza instructed to stay near shelter
Navy Jet Crashes Into Apartment Building
Romney wins big in Puerto Rico primary
Yahoo! to name Google's Mayer as CEO: report
US soldier accused of Afghan massacre hires prominent criminal lawyer
6.0-magnitude quake hits northern Italy: USGS
US gov't officially designates Haqqani network as terrorists
Motor Racing: Button fastest in year's first F1 practice
Rangers voted into Division Three
Syria in ceasefire observers call
Newark mayor saves neighbor from fire
Spurs get revenge on Lakers, lead West
F1 protests in Bahrain
New York Stock Exchange to reopen Wednesday
China's CPI growth slows to 1.8 pct in July
Homs mortar fire kills 105
Hundreds honor student killed in Ohio shooting
Bombs in southern Thailand kill 5, wound 50
US lawmakers take next step on new Iran sanctions
Barack Obama admits US has 'more nuclear weapons than we need'
2 rockets hit in the Eshkol region; no injuries
'Betrayed' disabled workers protest against Remploy closures
DR Congo rebels kill park rangers
Nine Pakistani troops killed in militant ambush
74 dead in Egypt soccer violence
Unrest in tense Nigeria leaves at least 95 dead
Hurricane Sandy makes landfall in southeastern Jamaica: NHC
Gaza militants fire 40 rockets into Israel, 3 hurt: police
Remarks With Prime Minister Elkeib After Their Meeting
Iraq Releases Suspected Hezbollah Operative Wanted By U.S.
Pakistani PM shocked at avalanche trapping army personnel
Barrick in talks with China firm over African assets
the Republic Geagea also be elections,
Deputy Walid Junblatt a set of titles that read it indicators to what the situation.
The visit comes de fries of the Philippines as part of his Asian tour, which will also include Australia, Thailand and Indonesia.
It is said that suicide by hanging is the easiest, quickest and least expensive not to one, this is not a few to speak it in comparison
The PFLP said in a statement: " abused in these results and not recognized.
mexico wishes to guarantee citizens' safety. 
spain currently holds the rotating presidency of the osce. 
the treaty was first signed in 1990. 
gorgich and pashtoon were executed in prison. 
safe bourada was sentenced to 15 years in prison. 
santos stated the radioactive material was the primary basis for generating crude weapons of mass destruction and terrorism. 
fulvio berghella stated that the digital worm named sq hell was particularly virulent and replicated itself at the rate of 8000 times an hour. 
ingo kober stated there is larger interest in intellectual property rights now than 20 or 30 years ago. 
investigators claim the british company was a cia cover. 
russia and nato member countries will hold meetings this fall on the conventional forces in europe treaty (cfe). 
the united states government and other nato members have refused to ratify the amended treaty until officials in moscow withdraw troops from the former soviet republics of moldova and georgia. 
russia would not immediately increase military strength along russian borders. 
the center will be operational in august 2008. 
brazilian police surrounding slums north of rio de janeiro to rid them of violent drug traffickers. 
regional and international non-proliferation issues should be addressed through dialogue and negotiations. 
bombing occurred in afghanistan as attacks by anti-government insurgents increase in recent days. 
georgian government websites are under intense cyber attack following russian military strikes against georgia late last week. 
switzerland's trade and diplomatic relations with iran have been criticized in recent months after foreign minister micheline calmy-rey traveled to tehran in march 2008 to sign a deal with iran's state gas firm. 
the conventional forces in europe treaty limits the number of military aircraft, tanks and other non-nuclear heavy weapons in europe. 
the african union has proposed a peacekeeping mission to help somalia's struggling transitional government stabilize somalia. 
reports state that the syrian government was concealing a nuclear facility at the attacked site. 
the drug is also known as ice or shabu. 
national, regional and international efforts to end the illicit trade in small arms and light weapons. 
religious extremism continues in pakistan despite the banning of militant groups. 
russian officials have called for a conference on the conventional forces in europe treaty to discuss ratification of the amended treaty. 
russian president putin signs decree suspending russia's application of european arms control treaty. 
myanmar was formerly known as burma. 
alto huallaga is located northeast of the capital lima. 
nato regrets russia's decision to suspend participation in the cfe. 
human rights violations in myanmar include summary executions, torture and the recruitment of child soldiers. 
general nikolai n. urakov stated by telephone that the state scientific center of applied microbiology has quite reliable systems of protection in case of emergency. 
alstom is in competition with japanese and german countries for the contract. 
the legislation is the most recent effort by japan to ascribe more freedom to its tightly controlled military and would overturn a ban on the military use of space. 
south korea launches new bullet train reaching 300 kph. 
russia is a member of the quartet on the middle east. 
anatoly sokolov announced-- soviet-built a-135 missile defense system around moscow is obsolete and inefficient. 
the deal has been in process for several years. 
adherence to non-proliferation obligations will enhance mutual trust and foster international cooperation in nuclear energy. 
french energy and transport company alstom may sign a contract to build a high-speed rail link between beijing and shanghai. 
no other drug has become as integral in decades. 
the international atomic energy agency reached an agreement with iranian officials that stated there were no remaining issues and ambiguities regarding iran's nuclear program and activities. 
beijing police apprehend more than 20 people including 8 foreigners in suspicion of using and trafficking drugs in 2 pubs in a popular downtown area. 
russia ratified the updated treaty in 2004 but the united states and other nato members have refused to do so arguing that moscow must first fulfill obligations to withdraw forces from georgia and from moldova's separatist region of trans-dniester. 
there is conflicting opinion as to the extent of damage suffered by the insurgency. 
helmand province is the world's largest opium-producing region. 
police stated tsai wen-huang would be extradited to taiwan. 
2 of the individuals arrested were released. 
mexican president felipe calderon has sent 2800 special agents and soldiers to sinaloa due to the high degree of organized crime and drug trafficking. 
berlin will host top-level meetings in october to save key european arms control treaty conventional forces in europe (cfe). 
the osce meeting lasted two days. 
the cfe treaty was signed in 1990. 
iran insists that the program is aimed solely at peaceful pursuits such as the generation of 
china is an important force for safeguarding world peace. 
north korea denies involvement in any nuclear program in syria. 
a spokesman for stockwell day was not immediately available for 
kim myong-chol warned that if there was an interdiction of north korean vessels the north korean government would retaliate with a nuclear missile attack on major cities such as new york and washington. 
iran is the most prolific applier of the death penalty in the world after china. 
john duncan is great britain's ambassador for multilateral arms control and disarmament. 
the treaty was amended in 1999 after the collapse of the soviet union. 
kashmir is divided between india and pakistan. 
south korea and israel oppose proliferation of weapons of mass destruction and an arms race. 
kadhafi warns that us and britain's failure to compensate libya for nuclear disarmament will deter iran and north korea from disarming. 
russia ratified the amended treaty. 
a staff of 30 specialists will conduct research and training on cyber warfare and will be prepared to assist nato members with response to any future cyber attacks. 
jamaat-i-islami's youth wing staged a separate demonstration in kashmir. 
iran is the most prolific applier of the death penalty in the world after china. 
china will resolutely oppose the means of the delivery of mass destructive weapons. 
a breakdown of order in china will lead to significant global turmoil. 
north korea has claimed nuclear ambitions and currently north korea is reported to have missiles aimed at japan. 
abuja is the capital of 
the united states government has accused the iranian government of trying to develop nuclear weapons under the cover of a civilian nuclear program. 
tirana is the capital of 
in an armed clash iranian police kill 4 alleged drug traffickers, arrest 2, and seize nearly 5 metric tons of opium and morphine. 
iran's nuclear projects are for peaceful purposes. 
china will resolutely oppose the proliferation of mass destructive weapons. 
china is north korea's closest ally. 
libyan foreign minister abdel rahman shalgam visited london during the first visit by a libyan foreign minister since 1969. 
goff stated that this presents a major threat to global security. 
cambodia and vietnam finalized an agreement to stop asian and european drug traffickers. 
activists have stated that russia is imprisoning people without evidence of illegal activity. 
restraining extremist groups is becoming increasingly difficult because of how the groups are financed. 
zabol is a town in southeastern iran. 
detainees to be accused of homicide, criminal collaboration, kidnapping and the funding of terrorism and include members of the military and police. 
existing rods could produce 3-6 atomic bombs in 6-8 months. 
the international atomic energy agency may have been tricked because it was eager for a deal. 
myanmar government has stated myanmar will become opium-free by 2014. 
jewish-american group the anti-defamation league (adl) published full-page advertisements in swiss and international papers in april 2008 accusing switzerland of funding terrorism through the deal. 
france provides the rockets, guns and engines. 
capital offenses in saudi arabia include rape, murder, apostasy, armed robbery and drug trafficking. 
bae systems is the uk's largest defense company. 
lavrov has told us secretary of state condoleezza rice that russia remains open to dialogue. 
additional individuals and entities are subject to an assets freeze. 
withdrawal from the treaty would allow russia to bolster forces near russian borders. 
fan stated the commission is primarily concerned with the term of future investment in taiwan. 
government spokesman maseko stated that if administrative papers are in order the government of south africa cannot intervene to prevent weapons from being transported through its territory to a neighboring landlocked country. 
president dmitry medvedev's statement was posted on the kremlin website and carried in full by state news agencies. 
turkmenistan borders afghanistan. 
the number of executions increased in iran last year amid a campaign that is aimed at improving security in society. 
syria denies having an undeclared nuclear program. 
amnesty international is a rights group based in london. 
the number 254 was tabulated with an afp count compiled from press and witness reports. 
the iranian government stated-- the iranian nuclear program remains peaceful. 
shingarev said it is very difficult to make a nuclear weapon from the plutonium in this fuel. 
paris is the capital of france. 
an indian government official spoke on condition of anonymity. 
russia had threatened several times to withdraw from the cfe when it was at odds with the united states over u.s. plans to install a missile defense shield in eastern 
the plan for tunisia is the creation of electronic databases to facilitate tax collection. 
china has been praised by the international community for efforts to resolve the korean peninsula nuclear issue. 
the russian foreign ministry stated that russia has not suspended dialogue. 
arms smugglers and drug cartels must be eliminated from southeast asia. 
the new law attempts to remove any legal obstacles to building more advanced spy satellites and to help innovation in japans's space industry. 
zhang stated-- china opposes restricting the peaceful use of nuclear energy by non-nuclear-weapon states on the basis of non-proliferation because the peaceful use of nuclear energy is a crucial objective of the npt. 
non-proliferation expert at the international institute for strategic studies mark fitzpatrick stated that the iaea report -- had an unusually strong tenor. 
the treaty limits the number of aircraft, tanks and other non-nuclear heavy weapons around europe. 
estonian officials stated that some of the cyber attacks that caused estonian government websites to shut down temporarily came from computers in the administration of russia including in the office of president vladimir putin. 
britain has struck an agreement to supply saudi arabia with typhoon jets in a deal worth an estimated 8 billion pounds (about 13.9 billion us dollars). 
opium is the raw ingredient for heroin. 
wi sung-lac refused to give any details about the north korean nuclear reactor project. 
the agreement aimed to establish a wider cooperation covering national security and the fight against global terrorism. 
many of those executed in iran are hanged in public. 
the united states and the allies of the united states believe iran is pursuing nuclear arms. 
the cfe is very important for european security. 
indian troops already fighting rebels in kashmir are now engaged in a massive campaign to destroy poppy crops in the region. 
the matter is delicate. 
last week russia announced that it will suspend participation in the cfe. 
the u.s., other western nations and nato condemned the violence. 
indian nationals constitute the largest number of foreign inmates in nepal prisons. 
the judicial order accused raghad of funding terrorism. 
myanmar's military rulers burned approximately 250 million dollars worth of illegal drugs to mark the international day against drug abuse and illicit trafficking. 
iranian officials have increased executions in 2007 as officials enforce a campaign purportedly aimed at promoting virtue and boosting security in society. 
india accuses islamabad of funding and training guerrillas. 
the ensuing battle and airstrikes killed at least 10 militants. 
the panamanian foreign ministry communique stated that the task force will facilitate the technological transfer and promote the biofuel production and consumption. 
vietnam has among the world's harshest drug laws. 
the indian government has prohibited direct or indirect export and import of all items, materials, goods and technology that could contribute to iran's enrichment-related, reprocessing or heavy water-related activities. 
the vietnam news agency reported that the ministry of public security stated that foreigners involved in drug trafficking cases in vietnam came mostly from laos, cambodia, australia, china, the united states and taiwan. 
saferworld team leader on transfer controls and small arms roy isbister stated-- the eu embargo prohibits direct or indirect supply of military equipment for use in myanmar. 
the united states and other nato members have refused to ratify the amended treaty. 
the cfe limits the use of armed forces and heavy weaponry and prescribes measures aimed at confidence-building, transparency and cooperation between member states. 
bulgaria is located on the southeastern part of the balkan peninsula. 
elbaradei stated that this is the last chance to build security in the middle east based on trust and cooperation and not on possession of nuclear weapons. 
the iranian government has dismissed the allegations in the intelligence presented to the international atomic energy agency board as baseless and the intelligence used to support the allegations as fake. 
the cfe treaty was established in 1990. 
the conventional forces in europe treaty is considered a key arms control treaty. 
nicaragua commemorated the 25th anniversary of the sandinista revolution that toppled the dictatorship of anastasio somoza but imposed a cuban-style leftist regime. 
13 kurds from turkey were arrested near paris on suspicion of money-laundering for the kurdistan workers' party (pkk). 
the meetings lasted 2 days. 
the villagers are inadvertently involving themselves in drug trafficking. 
the russian government strongly opposes u.s. plans to install antimissile defenses in europe and dismisses u.s. assertions that the interceptors are needed to defend against threats from iran. 
hong kong universities collaborate with universities, businesses and government sectors of mainland china to coordinate training programs and research centers to promote high-tech research, commercialization, and technology transfer. 
the chinese government gave active cooperation and assistance to the organization for the prohibition of chemical weapons inspections. 
the mexican government has adopted a series of measures against drug trafficking and organized crime within mexico since 2006. 
the statement did not specify the quantity of warheads the missile is capable of carrying. 
it is a serious threat to international security. 
nicaragua commemorated the 25th anniversary of the sandinista revolution. 
russian president vladimir putin states that the decision to cease implementation of the conventional forces in europe treaty is a response to u.s. plans to establish missile defense sites in eastern europe and to nato's failure to ratify an amended version of the treaty. 
dutch national research institute tno carried out chemical weapons experiments for the dutch defense ministry during the 1950s. 
a report issued by security software vendor mcafee inc., said government-affiliated hackers in china are at the forefront of a brewing cyber cold war. 
the treaty limits the number of aircraft, tanks and other non-nuclear heavy weapons around europe and was first signed in 1990. 
many of the attacks originated abroad. 
police arrested 2 honduran drug trafficking suspects. 
if japan rises to the occasion japan will never be beaten even in terms of military power. 
egypt and jordan have signed the nuclear nonproliferation treaty and have long called for a middle east free of weapons of mass destruction. 
russia already participates in the european space agency's 
myanmar is a military state. 
it did not say if the men had been hanged in prison. 
amnesty international's report was compiled by european and international non-governmental organizations such as saferworld, which opposes armed violence. 
an institute for public policy research report said there are 27 weak states that pose a threat to britain's national security as the states could provide bases for terrorists. 
the iranian government denied the accusation and insists the nuclear program is for peaceful purposes only. 
the proliferation security initiative calls for stopping and searching ships suspected of carrying weapons of mass destruction. 
the international community should modernize and seek a fair, reasonable and effective way to enhance the nuclear non-proliferation regime through extensive consultations. 
amnesty international has published a report stating that an indian project to sell attack helicopters to myanmar threatens a european union arms embargo against myanmar. 
naeem m. smuggled 10 kilograms (22 pounds) of heroin. 
29 people were convicted by the quang ninh people's court of participating in a drug ring that trafficked heroin from vietnam to china. 
the lawyer of michael karras named s.s. dhillon could not be reached for comment. 
the countries oppose the weaponization of space and an arms race in space. 
france, belgium, germany, sweden, italy and britain provide parts and technology for the advanced light helicopter (alh). 
illegal arms trafficking increases in kenya due to easy availability and neighboring conflicts. 
n.r. mohanty stated that an agreement had been signed between the defense research and development organisation, hindustan aeronautics limited and the indian air force to upgrade india's ageing fleet of mig-27 m aircraft. 
elbaradei states that a middle east peace deal can only be reached in parallel with a security agreement based on eradicating all weapons of mass destruction from the region. 
drug traffickers face the death penalty under tajik law. 
international atomic energy association is the united nations watchdog. 
wen states that the main purpose of the germany visit is to advance trade, economic and technological exchanges. 
united states officials do not know how far north korea's nuclear weapons program has progressed. 
7 police officers were killed and 4 officers were wounded. 
defense chiefs from estonia, latvia, lithuania, germany, italy, spain and slovakia will sign the agreement to provide staff and funding for the center. 
the bill proposing the new law allowing the use of space programs for defense was already approved by the lower house of japan's government last week. 
van der merwe sentenced geiges to a total of 13 years imprisonment. 
zahedan is a city in southeastern 
president putin stated that russia would take countermeasures. 
china has so far balked against united states pressure on china to stop and search north korean ships. 
brazil's strategic affairs minister roberto mangabeira unger stated brazil's new national defense plan calls for establishing partnerships with countries including russia and france to build a state-of-the-art weapons industry. 
the accused will be charged with international drug trafficking. 
variants of the advanced light helicopter (alh) contain rocket launchers from belgium; rockets, guns and engines from france; brake systems from italy; fuel tanks and gearboxes from britain; self-protection equipment from a swedish company and have received crucial design development and engine control manufacturing from german companies. 
indian defense ministry has increased spending on defense purchases. 
the iaea report is restricted. 
the conventional forces in europe treaty was signed by russian and nato members in 1990. 
sheik doon salad ilmi said civilian casualties resulting from overnight mortar and rocket attacks happen every day. 
the south african government maintains very good relations with the united states government. 
nuclear weapon systems at a high level of readiness increase the risk of those weapons being used including unintentionally with catastrophic consequences. 
blix stated that it is essential to increase efforts to eliminate nuclear arms and weapons of mass destruction. 
helmand province is the world's largest producer of opium. 
the afghanistan-iran border region has been the scene of frequent clashes between police and drug smugglers. 
physicist danilov was convicted of selling classified information on space technology to china. 
myanmar is the world's largest producer of illegal opium but has limited financial and technical resources for ending the drug trade. 
the abductee support group hopes parliament will change the laws soon. 
santos stated colombian police found the evidence in 2 computers discovered with slain rebel leader raul reyes. 
do quy doan is a spokesman for the vietnamese ministry of culture and information. 
a siemens spokesman in germany stated that heinrich von pierer stated that siemens was beginning talks with interested chinese parties about a sale of the plutonium-processing facility. 
vietnam has among the world's strictest drug laws. 
government initiatives to disarm have been ineffective. 
putin stated that the russian government could withdraw from the treaty altogether if western nations refuse to ratify the amended treaty. 
russia ratified the amended version of the treaty. 
the osce discussed the possible extension of the osce's mission in kosovo. 
elbaradei is the international atomic energy agency chief. 
the nuclear nonproliferation treaty is 37 years old. 
chinese foreign ministry spokeswoman jiang yu stated that cyber hacking is a global issue. 
the plant will be constructed next to an existing plant and is projected to be operational in 7 years. 
cyber attacks are considered a growing threat to military and civilian computer networks. 
if india blames foreign militants it is part of its propaganda to mislead the international community. 
the riyadh-based naif arab academy for security sciences said in a statement that it was running a two-week workshop for 50 anti-terrorism experts. 
88 percent of the liberal democratic party supports economic sanctions. 
sharia is islamic law. 
a number of suspected islamic militants with alleged al-qaida links have been arrested in malaysia and singapore, and officials stated the militants' network extends into indonesia. 
in september 2007 jordan signed an accord with the united states aimed at supporting the peaceful development of the jordan's nascent nuclear program. 
according to the statement the rs-24 reinforces the military potential of the strategic forces to overcome anti-missile defense systems. 
naeem m. was hanged in zabol, sistan-baluchestan province. 
iran lies on a major drug route between afghanistan and europe and the persian gulf states. 
it will be hosted by the australian government. 
the 5 permanent united nations security council members are britain, china, france, russia and the united states. 
in july 2006 jordanian prime minister maaruf bakhit stated that-- raghdad hussein and family were living under the protection of king abdullah ii. 
a siemens spokesman in germany stated to the agence france-presse that siemens was confident about the outcome of the talks to sell the plutonium-processing facility. 
the cyber attack occurred after the french president sarkozy's meeting with the dalai lama angered the chinese government. 
the south african government imposed a ban that prohibits the recruitment of people inside or outside of south africa for mercenary or foreign military assistance. 
ukraine almost has all of the necessary approvals to join the european space agency's program. 
the north korean government has warned the south korean government against participating in the proliferation security initiative program. 
china's council of agriculture opens a special office in charge of agricultural technology transfers and intellectual property rights management and consultancy to enhance development of china's knowledge-based agriculture and applications of agricultural technology. 
iranian parliamentary speaker gholam-ali haddad-adel visited cuba. 
tibet suspects chinese government of creating the virus to spy on tibetan exiles and the dalai lama. 
chinese authorities were not immediately available for comment. 
the european union and the united states have frozen al-qadi's assets. 
the chinese government has strengthened china's anti-proliferation capacity in recent years. 
a group representing mainly white south africans called afriforum stated it would organize protests along the route to zimbabwe. 
putin announced that the cfe treaty does not duly protect russia's security interests. 
ahmad is fighting extradition to the united states and lodged a formal complaint alleging that british police concocted intelligence reports to implicate ahmad in terror activities and desecrated the koran. 
russia has ratified the amended version but the united states and other nato members have refused to do so until the russian government withdraws troops from the former soviet republics of moldova and georgia. 
the part of the purpose of the united states plan is to increase pressure on north korea. 
tskhinvali is the capital of georgia. 
an indian government official stated that india does not attach much credence to reports by amnesty international. 
china's cabinet the state council announced that it will amend regulations on "dual-use" nuclear technology to prevent nuclear terrorism. 
japanese prime minister junichiro koizumi said the shift of the rods was proactive. 
the opposition japanese communist party was against the new law and feared it would lead to a stronger military. 
some asean officials stated such standardization would be difficult due to different countries' political systems. 
iraq has been lobbying for the security council to stop using the country's oil revenue to pay compensation to victims of the 1991 gulf war and the salaries of the united nations monitoring, verification and inspection commission inspectors and to have all money remaining in the united nation's oil-for-food accounts transferred to the government's development fund. 
a key european arms control treaty must be maintained. 
the golden triangle region was 1 of the world's biggest producers of opium. 
the united states dismissed the action as nuclear blackmail. 
the meeting was 3 days long. 
the ministers from china, laos, india, myanmar and thailand will also address crop substitution initiatives for impoverished ethnic minorities who still rely on opium cultivation. 
china is a nuclear power and member of the u.n. security council. 
north korean officials are suspected of building nuclear weapons. 
australian television reporter peter lloyd faces 3 new drug charges in singapore. 
president vladimir putin signed a decree suspending russia's participation in the conventional forces in europe treaty. 
the extradition conditions stipulate that the tunisian can only be prosecuted for the single charge of falsifying documents that italian authorities can provide sufficient evidence to prosecute. 
the attacks are believed to have come from russian administration ip addresses in response to the relocation of a soviet statue in estonia. 
india and pakistan remain outside the treaty. 
china is a member of the ballistic missile club. 
russia may pull out of the treaty if the us and other nato allies refuse to ratify the amended version. 
this is particularly true in the poorest countries. 
iran has noticeably increased the number of executions in recent months as officials enforce a campaign aimed at promoting virtue and boosting security in 
a statement issued by the official spa news agency stated that-- al-dosari was convicted of drug trafficking. 
both tajikistan and uzbekistan share a border with afghanistan and have experienced raids by taliban-backed islamic militants in recent years. 
russia said the system is a clear threat to russian security. 
the gang engaged in illegal activities including racketeering, blackmail, arms smuggling, cigarette smuggling and money laundering and allegedly used proceeds to fund terrorist groups in chechnya. 
at the state scientific center of applied microbiology there is every kind of deadly bacteria that was studied for use in the secret biological weapons program of the soviet union. 
the international atomic energy agency has no access to people, documents, sites. 
the book states that the drug conveys a completely positive image. 
40 inmates are serving sentences for murder. 
russia is fulfilling obligations and decreasing forces. 
executive director of the arms control association in washington daryl kimball stated that-- the iaea report is 1 in a series of bad signs. 
the cfe is 1 of several issues negatively impacting russia's relations with the united states and europe. 
korobeynichev's laboratory worked with the u.s. lawrence livermore national laboratory. 
lugar and nunn are senators. 
officials state that decision about the treaty will depend on u.s. action on its plans to deploy missile defense systems in poland and the czech republic. 
signing of the agreement is a peripheral issue of the meeting of chiefs of defense staff from the 26 ally countries of nato. 
in early may 2002 officials from the philippines, malaysia and indonesia signed an anti-terrorism agreement to share airline passenger lists and other intelligence. 
after the first meeting between leaders of the european union and leaders from albania, bosnia and herzegowina, croatia, macedonia and serbia and montenegro, leaders from the western balkan countries pledge to diminish organized crime and corruption in the balkans to meet requirements of european union membership. 
the resolution requires all 192 united nations member states to adopt laws to prevent terrorists, black marketeers and other non-state actors from manufacturing, acquiring or trafficking in nuclear, biological or chemical weapons or the materials to make them. 
the international atomic energy association stated that jordan has agreed to the additional measures. 
there is much concern over the drug. 
the amnesty international report suggested that-- belgium begin immediate talks with india to prevent future sales of the alh, components or military technology to myanmar. 
capital offenses in iran include murder, rape, armed robbery, apostasy, blasphemy, serious drug trafficking, repeated sodomy, adultery, prostitution, treason and espionage. 
saudi arabia is an absolute monarchy that has taken steps towards reform. 
the spokesman said there will be an exchange of opinions on topical international and regional matters based on a joint working relationship at the heart of the u.n. kamynin said russia recognizes the participation of libya in the work of the u.n. security council. 
shalgam's visit to london is the first by a libyan foreign minister since 1969. 
indian and pakistani governments nearly engaged in a fourth conflict in 1999. 
iguaran stated that the detainees will be accused of homicide, criminal collaboration, kidnappings and the funding of terrorism. 
3 suspected extremists were released on bail. 
6 czech hospital employees are charged with human organ trafficking. 
this further aggravated the situation. 
How about some testimonies from real health experts?
"Then the captain was gone.
The problem is simpler than that.
NEGATIVE RECONNAISSANCE REQUIREMENTS.
So, I am dropping, for now, asking you the question: " Where ' s the Marx " ?
go figure You're asking me to prove a negative?
I am OK with MEDICAL use!
The prices for everything you need have gone up due to inflation.
War in the middle east.
Originally Posted by Vienna How was it authoritarian?
Imagine a place that's % white and % black.
There's no chance of a fair trial.
Nirvana is very different than oblivion.
We in Britain think differently to Americans.
If you answer yes to and no to you are probably straight.
The whole earth combined produces enough food for billion people.
BTW he had appropriate deferments for the time.
Hey, Blue-Eyes, How's things in London?
but in the news broadcasts i have seen they did call him white.
According to the girlfriend and Zimmerman, he did.
My parents have told me it is bad for you.
.Nazi is a slang term for the NSWP.
I oppose the death penalty.
Well, whatever, you are now.
They produce nothing I can eat, wear, live in.
DICKSHOT Matt Holliday owns.
People exploited the laws.
Funny, I thought the same thing about some math.
I have years of "Neener Neener" rights I use lettuce too.
I don't prefix or suffix everything with "you hate Jews."
I wood have asked her if she is up for a treesome.
It still makes no sense.
More expensive homes.
Martin said, "Why are you following me?"
ALTHOUGH SATELLITE INTENSITY ESTIMATES FROM TAFB AND SAB ARE ONLY T./
"Fairies don't exist" - fine.
You wanna know what I find curious?
When did I compare homo sexuaity with a developmental disorder?
If you asked , conservatives, the numbers will be skewed to the right.
You didn't mention PFA before that one post.
Ramblin' Rose by Nat King Cole We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
from the year prior.
Still love this show.
their vast properties are protected by the govt.
Fundimental difference, please?
How exactly is Germany being 'punished' for the stupidity of WW?
Z stalked him down, then shot him.
I'm not outraged, I'm disappointed.
We never got out of it in the first place!
Freedom of speech has consequences!
My parents have told me it is bad for you.
if you could kill one person to save four, would you?
It's not imposing morals.
It depends how you define extreme.
At least Mexico had a presence in California.
So YES, we DO read the bible to learn about Christianity.
Ah ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!
And that's why you're yelling at me and refusing to answer my questions?
You have too much regulation, not too little.
The Human Element You could sign Lance Berkman at the end of the year I guess?
Why was the Book of Thomas left out of the canon?
You mean, you believe the word of the Mainstream Media?
We are meant to explore.
Israel doesn't give a ****, accept it.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Slutstamp! A dear friend from Ohio sent me this.
And yet, the Titanic story is the one that holds up to scrutiny of the evidence.
Can he really make mone from google ad sense.
They know that the video doesn't show a gas chamber.
Warm , maybe record.
"Bright but scatterbrained" becomes "treat with drugs".
What is your definition of "life"?
Could be a lot of things.
No extortion, no bribery, no money involved He's asking for money for his vote.
Dr. Neander's revised version.
Should I just tell her how I feel?
I. ATLANTIC REQUIREMENTS .
you have no remains of a missile at the pentagon.
"Jane" wants me to ask the helpful party guest to pay for it.
any woman that wants birth control can get it.
Is it legal to grow?
pressing one does not "do" english.
What's my opinion regarding the series?
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Does he have supporters?
but okay, ultimate sovereignty?
that is not an answer.
The Nazis increases the longevity of a handgun permit from to years.
But we can't do it without help.
No healthy person needs gambling.
I said it wasn't a person, in the legal sense.
Do you see Obama calling for regulation reform?
"Leprechauns don't exist" - fine.
Got some Heine and coors light i started it last night xanis.
Iran is also a signed of the NPT and the IAEA.
"Gorgons don't exist" - fine.
Best way to get money out is to get rid of lobby, all of it.
I have years of "Neener Neener" rights Usually I get pretty decent care.
Dutchy Has anyone heard from Dutchy?
Commodity Expanded Value-Form, .
You are a Christian.
And the simple fact today?
Morals have absolutely nothing to do with it !
"Oh, you're such a good person!
Fern I think stories like this are stupid.
CYCLONE FORMATION IS NOT EXPECTED DURING THE NEXT HOURS.
Do you not understand what that string of words means?
There is no freedom of religion.
Originally Posted by SolInvictus The messahe of all the scriptures is oneness.
How long after the obliteration should the kid return to school?
A man and a woman are different yes.
Double Jeopardy actually enforces a jury nullification.
Facilitator : Show me the smart child.
religious fiction Isn't that redundant and repetetive?
Originally Posted by anabelle What's wrong with that?
Cracklin' Rosie by Neil Diamond We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Some people have complete confidence in the people running these institutions.
loose change started out as a work of fiction.
If it wasn't a life, then it would not be able to be born.
GL, Terral That is absolutely amazing.
lets assume we have % white and % black.
Freedom of speech has consequences!
"Fairies don't exist" - fine.
If so, state that is why they're not true.
-Not- talking about it 'and' -Not- doing anything.
"Being against nukes" does not mean "not wanting to use nukes".
My niece is married to a black man.
The UK population is just over million.
I Shot the Sheriff We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
I hope this is nothing.
The money I spent adopting Velociraptor.
So, you actually believe every word of what Terral wrote?
What isn't how what was sold?
I know I'd hate to be him.
there were no weapons.
It's so stupid that it just has to be true.
Personal responsibility much?
Do you notice the nonsensical things you are saying?
I guess I pulled it out of the census's rear end in a top hat.
How is this slanted against Bush??
If it wasn't bollocks it wouldn't be homeopathy.
I've never accused him of over-milligraming, nothing.
The bailout was bigger than TARP Bloomberg news.
My parents have told me it is bad for you.
His position is that it is the individual's risk to assume.
I. ATLANTIC REQUIREMENTS .
Read More: You have never met anyone that is Pro-Abortion?
I have no problem with those that have money!
Nixon, Ford and Carter shut down the oilfields?
i don't want a president who 'cares'.
It doesn't have to be braindead.
no missile evidence.
My teachers have told me it is bad for you.
My gosh, I'm the one with the pregnancy ticker.
Then he is not omnipotent.
tin foil hat for the dog face, what size do u wear?
Like this year old who was shot dead in a marijuana-related crime.
If you leap up to make a hit, you're getting a penalty.
ALL of the electrical energy comes from the battery.
Do you know how many passengers testified or what they said?
Imagine a place with % men and % women.
Scenario A assumes that the CO growth rate accelerates by .%/yr.
They have actually showed a cooling trend since due to the recent decline.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
to repeat: They are NOT as sovereign as they were before.
Out of touch and completely untrustworthy, however, wouldn't.
It is mostly just the Dutch.
We're talking about angels and common pins again, right?
claims about trayvon's character And when did I do that?
% How much money does PP take in for abortion services?
Why did that transaction take place.
There is no more egg cell post-fertilization.
Lacey - welcome back!
More factchecking: I don't know why anyone is making a fuss over the $, bet.
If you haven't made any claims, then just say so.
No Thatcherite can ever call themselves a libertarian.
the problem isn't who has money.
But do you actually believe there was an iceberg in those waters?
not astros or orioles bad Gameday for the orioles game is frozen for me.
If so, alot of cops should take presciption drugs.
Tell us what the charges were.
Those are partial psychopaths.
those who ignore history are doomed to repeat it.
this is NOT a war deployment.
Nutrax The plural of anecdote is not data Did gentlemen need chaperones?
Alright just got in.
h and i both read the books and thought the movie moved so quickly.
That's not the Moloch scene, though.
@Lustig Andrei, So Lyndon Johnson and John Kennedy were compatible?
You need to make up your mind.
The one that has walks home afterwards and goes to sleep.
- Admin DrPizza and i'd forgotten what a whiny little bed wetter you are.
The argument was "Albert Einstein didn't go to college".
Capital gains, top rate: percent.
Bienging is unaccptable.
He hasn't been funny in years.
If the universe has an explanation of its existence, that explanation is God.
What do we get in return for doing the fighting for them?
It wouldn't stop joke marriages.
If they were Jews, I would call them Jews.
She was a great lady.
He's not wealthy because he's successful.
Not as irritated as you.
It's a common sense/deductive reasoning thing.
You already did that - we have a Muslim in office right now.
I said she has not ever had to be a part of any workforce.
DreamTech never been ejaculated on as far as I know.
I didn't say we had gotten soft since / Rand.
We all believe that we are getting what we expect.
Despicable Ben, Stop trying to find excuses for the man.
Unless it's different in different countries?
The new study does not support your claim.
He said at EVERY level.
morals do not exist, so technically nothing can be morally wrong.
I thought that was mostly just the Dutch.
Toyland by Johnny Mathis We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Let's let this play out in court.
Being in a gang isnt a crime.
I'd offer Iran a deal.
Yes, they are both different.
It's not imposing morals.
Has Annie ever used her sexuality like that?
PURE COMMUNISM: You have two cows.
You should put scientists on a pedestal.
What are they trying to hide?
That would make you partially responsible for their death.
"Would you like to pay for others health care?"
They are NOT as sovereign as they were before.
I don't see Obama as the lesser of two evils.
Or this one by Jim Croce We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
The point is an unarmed child was murdered.
Zimmerman replied, "What are you doing here?"
Irreligion that does that I have a problem.
If I'm angry, it will show up in one of those scans..
If you want to buy $ billion in XYZ Inc. common stock, who cares?
billion . Everyone in the world at Mexico's current prosperity level.
If you answer yes to and no to you are probably straight.
Sometimes I fantasize about having power.
My parents have told me it is bad for you.
Atlas Shrugged It's also a stellar performer in terms of blithering idiocy.
How would Martin not know that that was not the case?
Regulation get the government into everything.
It's a common sense/deductive reasoning thing.
Yes, I've assumed that all packaging would be recyclable in my argument.
Jury nullification does not mean that a law is unconstuitutional.
It's just a bunch of cells.
Mann's work was all about math.
I'm so sorry to hear this Kelly.
I don't like flavored beers.
I hope everything is ok!
any woman that wants birth control can get it.
S As you wish: Do you see Hitler killing Jews?
And I'm your friend Mitt.
It means its AN option.
I think you need to reread what I wrote.
lets assume we have % white and % black.
Mom busted in and said, "What's that noise?"
My best, Kutte My ex-fiance wouldn't use the VA or Navy doctor's.
Holder filed a three-page letter.
@Lustig Andrei, Lustig, agreed.
This eclipses the old record of set in .
Zimmerman replied, "What are you doing here?"
I don't know how legitimate this is, but I heard he's kind of suicidal.
council tax Hasn't council tax been frozen for most people?
Your schtick is getting stale.
Is that how it works?
Breathe In, Breathe Out, Move On.
wait until they become more consistent and closer together.
Obama is extreme and leftwing.
@Frank Apisa, What you want to call it is up to you.
Jury nullification has NOTHING to do with the Constitutionality of laws.
What conviction where you talking about before?
So I actually read the OP and guess what I found out.
The government does not determine if you are married or not.
Democracy is a threat to liberty.
Hi Pro and Corn: How many threads do you plan on making?
Tell me exactly which system isn't working right now?
Oh, and again asserts that marriage is a fundamental human right.
Why are Russians in Damascus?
Yes, it's about dilution.
Yeah, I don't think this is that controversial either.
Operation Chaos is merely people voting.
Originally Posted by JonD Doubtful.
Classical Gas We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
to repeat: They are NOT as sovereign as they were before.
Morals have absolutely nothing to do with it !
i be having conversations will cornell west My dear brother.
There is no war in the Middle east.
He had no intention of apprehending him.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
You're "a bunch of cells."
What is a girl douche?
Jury nullification means a law isn't Constitutional?
It's definitely NOT what it used to be.
The onus is on the manufacturer of a product to convince consumers it is safe.
I think you are missing the point with entrepreneurs.
"Cyclopes don't exist" - fine.
"In it was a mental illness, now what are they teaching you?"
Landon And So This is Christmas We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Bush gets zero credit for the budget under him.
. Sinful people do not get to heaven.
How long after the obliteration should the kid return to school?
Holly Holy We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
What was the "answer" in Chicago?
The entire thing just makes no sense.
Who supposedly operated the homicidal gas chambers?
Therefore, the explanation of the existence of the universe is God.
Genetic predisposition to cancer resistance is superior genetics.
Do you notice the nonsensical things you are saying?
Use of force in defense of person.-A
That's what the data available shows.
Joy to the World We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
I thought that was mostly just the Dutch.
Ive watched kids play.
David @OmSigDAVID, I think Santorum's more likely than Gingrich.
They're looking at each other!
Are you driving one?
Religion that does that I have a problem with.
I think he'd be better for American business interests overall.
not a constitutional issue.
YOU FOOLS..bought the cover-up..hook..
"What does pressing the number one do?"
What conviction would that be?
Originally Posted by spikdboy Not wishful thinking, rather realistic.
For the trillionth time, I've never said rehabilitation doesn't work.
Charlie Rangel Censured Did anyone see the footage of this?
Red October standing by.
That's just not how legal briefs are written.
No, none of those factors account for the recent warming.
Stone notified Captain Lord.
The primary focus of Systematic Dialectics is syn chronic, not dia chronic.
Are you driving one?
And that is happening in GOP controlled states.
in Foxe basin was frozen.
@Frank Apisa, Frank, I observe and perceive.
Government deciding what pregnancies need to be carried to term, that's fine.
Put a Little Love in your Heart We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Higher than per cent but not very high.
What isn't how what was sold?
God definately does not exist.
Breathe In, Breathe Out, Move On.
It is an excellent indicator of climate change.
The great thing about living here is there's space.
Ah ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!
I don't understand how freedom of speech will be prohibited.
The question needs to be asked.
You purport to value life very heavily.
The Infestation posts.
i don't want a president who 'cares'.
do you have anything to make it less compelling or not?
For the trillionth time, I've never said rehabilitation doesn't work.
Classical Gas We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
peeve So we agree that it came down essentially in freefall?
Pro-life people do not want a woman to be able to choose abortion for herself.
So answer the question.
Haiti is a shithole.
I absolutely do believe there was an iceberg in those waters.
The Face Of The Franchise: The worst part is that he's not even a Leafs fan!
I agree completely I am hoping he is into a second term of office.
Jake with the assist.
Is it possible his home was affected and the school was not?
The people had awakened.
Umm the California was a cargo ship I dont care what the article says.
Umm, that pretty clearly states, "the statute is presumed constitutional."
Florida The ignorance is yours!
I'm going to shout for justice for Trayvon.
How do you know what's right and wrong?
Ha, ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!
And Nugent was a complete fool to say what he said.
It is all Bush's fault.
You should stop prefixing or suffixing everything with you hate Jews.
I missed the point where he said that black people were going to riot.
Yet you didn't have to declare it.
Proverbs John the Baptist was a Nazarite from birth.
James : says faith without works is dead.
billion . Everyone in the world at Mexico's current prosperity level.
and videos Seismic data does not equal duration of collapse.
Originally Posted by Lone Fox You've said that multiple times now.
You might not like Obamas views, but he has them.
But do you actually believe there was an iceberg in those waters?
There is simply no winning for Obama among conservatives.
Satan represents indulgence instead of abstinence!
Just so long as the tax on that sale is paid.
fix?: Islam itself is not political.
March is also the date for the uprising in CHINA.
I hope everything is OK!
Do you understand why it's absurd to limit the question to US residents?
I have seen UFO over Warsaw in the past.
depending on which action furthers their loony-tunes agenda of the moment.
Do you further agree that I have made no claim?
Zimmerman says that he was sucker punched by his car.
There is no "WAR" in the middle east.
Part of pro-life is the opposition to legalized abortion.
Capital gains, top rate: percent.
Time of the Season by the Zombies We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
No, I show you are willfully ignorant.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
the problem isn't who has money.
Sadly Ford did accept taxpayer money.
The Muslims would say the same thing about the Qur'an.
Your confusion doesn't make me a liar.
When Christians are extreme its just simply religion.
Some believe the 'right' is most important.
Evolution is not an opinion, not a belief.
I am not the one claiming the right to decide over another woman's body.
Where in the world is Ron Paul?
you have no remains of a missile at the pentagon.
The point you quote should say "I never said rehabilitation could never work."
billion . Everyone in the world at Mexico's current prosperity level.
my hair is pretty thing tho :/ Quote: Ditto.
It wouldn't stop joke marriages.
You seem to think that poor people are not responsible for their actions.
Why did that transaction take place.
It's about the baggage attached.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
the problem isn't who has money.
What makes you think the owl didn't participate?
lol Looking forward to seeing your built-in's!
Originally Posted by jacko!
Thanks Candy for starting the thread.
Except that it wasn't.
If I owe you , dollars, I have a problem.
If evidence is not provided to support a position; then it should be rejected.
Everyone else at the current prosperity level of Mexico.
Bush gets zero credit for the budget under him.
LOL Don't you have to take a test to drive a vehicle in the US?
We both thought the movie was good and we didn't find it confusing in any way.
If God does not exist can anything be morally wrong?
A law is constitutional if it does not conflict with the Constitution.
Originally Posted by muslim girl ooops sorry!
This is not your country.
Originally Posted by zaf I suppose the water in the middle makes a difference.
Cone threw an game.
Edited by LashL: Edited to properly mask profanity.
The jury is not told about juror nullification.
runs victim down Got any proof?
you don't use the search button much, do you?
I don't think Paul has a shot.
Time of the Season by the Zombies We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Do you notice the nonsensical things you are saying?
What if they messed up a study?
Specifically a Baptist.
And a large part of the east coast.
Why are you talking about women within the Hebrew tribes?
Last night Japanese forces attacked Hong Kong.
. What is your definition of "life force"?
That is not direct responsibilty to the constituents.
The ideology was built around violent expansion, so yes - VIOLENT expansion.
Could this have been an enema?
my final word: ignoring has the effect of normalizing.
Global online #education is a key to democratizing access to learning and overcoming societal ills such as poverty -
Hollywood Accepts Chinese Censorship (Will Movies Get Any Better?)
#Bloomberg: Assault weapon ban tough sell Pub. enemies 1 and 2 according to minor mayor: Big Gulps and #guns. #ocra
Car bomb detonates outside #Afghan intelligence agency; casualty toll unclear.
What's in Feinstein's gun bill - #tgdn #pjnet
Linda Greenhouse: Roe v. Wade was abt drs facing prosecution for acting in what they saw as patients' best interests
Special measures for Beijing polution:
SYNTHAX_tERROR 2: : "American Taliban" John Walker Lindh wins case over Muslim group prayer in prison
The questions Oprah should've asked Lance Amstrong
Cc ": At least 90 killed in Brazil nightclub fire "
Not a tear here: Red Brigades jagoff dies, year older than me, fuck him:
so many places to go...
As #California Bounces Back, Governor Calls For Lofty Goals
NYTimes: #Leishmaniasis: A #Genetic Link Found in Far-Flung Victims of a Lethal Form of a Parasitic Disease
Jesus... At least 245 dead as fire sweeps through nightclub in Brazil.
So the company mad, isn't this what most companies are doing?
Taking Aim #Stopgunviolence #Congress #NRA
#NRA releases target shooting app, hmm wait a sec..
Broken limbs, torn lives in northern #Mali #Africa #conflict #humanrights
slams guest over AR-15s
A truckload of flaming brown cheese closed a road tunnel in Arctic Norway for the last six days.
Sex abuse common, but so is our inability to face road range of behaviors common to humans A Pedophile in Plain Sight
Death toll climbs to 220 in #Brazil nightclub fire, official says.
(I love him!!!!) 10 reasons we can't get enough Gosling -
U.S. withdrawal is 'tough love' for Afghans
NYTimes: Andrew Revkin on next steps for China in cleaning up pollution.
Justice Clarence Thomas Breaks His SilenceTELL THE JUSTICE THAT COURTESY WILL NOT PROTECT CITIZENS RIGHTS.GET WITH IT!
NATO: Missile battery opens on Syrian border this could set forth an unwanted chain of events here.
What's wrong with the Boeing Dreamliner? ". Airlines must be SO happy!
Hopefully not together ": Richard Pryor & Dick Cheney Focus of Showtime Documentaries "
We will pass a milestone this year: the majority of the fish we eat will be farm-raised rather than wild
Design, design, design. ?We?re on the tail end of technology being special,? says John Maeda.
Interesting article on the CNN homepage. "Mickleson has a point on taxes."
Pictures of the Day: Pakistan, Syria, Indonesia, Germany, Phillipines and Mali.
How #Vine video may change Twitter #in
+1 MT ? "I loathe writing with..a kind of phobia.. only a sort of perverse masochism keeps me at it" Styron
SPORT: MT Lance Armstrong confesses to doping. Next step? Testifying against the higher-ups in cycling.
Bloomberg chips in a billion
U.S. government-supported rescue mission of French hostage in Somalia failed.
NYTimes: Is Delhi So Different From Steubenville, USA?
Cardinal Mahony, abuser of liturgies and shielder of child abusers. So sad and frustrating.
"Tennis: Djokovic claims Aussie triumph ZmerchNews dot Com"
Man Crapping Killed in Fall Between Subway Cars
#US details help in failed #hostage rescue. #Somalia #France
Microsoft's Windows 8 sales are OK, not great CNNMoney
Internet Activist #AaronSwartz,Creator of #RSS, Is Dead at 26- Suicide. Was the pressure of pending lawsuits too much?
The truth about publicity... Bad publicity does exist. #pr #media
#Revolution Hits the #Universities by #distance #education #sustainability
VICKI HUDDLESTON : Why We Must Help #Save #Mali
This is a weird article. "Ray Kurzweil Says We’re Going to Live Forever"
Daannngg! ?: Lance Armstrong tells Oprah he couldn?t have won 7 Tour de France titles without doping ?
Apple makes a $13.1 billion profit, sells 28% more iPhones and 48% more iPads. Stock dips 11%
When does life begin? Catholic hospital argues that an embryo is not a person.
Two years after the Egyptian Revolution... U.S gets it wrong on Egypt again -
After Armstrong Admits Doping 2 Oprah years 2 late, he now says He Will Testify Against alleged Doping Officials
Wait, bribing kids is bad? #notmomoftheyearafterall
#Disney 's new #videogame , via NYTimes: Video Game Combines the Worlds of Disney
In the Gowanus Canal, a dolphin
Senator Schumer Says He?s Satisfied With Chuck Hagel on the Mideast. His endorsement should settle that issue.
Producer of popular gun-related videos shot. Every gun death is a tragedy.
interesting and sensible
Sign of inaccessible, culturally incompetent mainstream care? As ?Bodega Clinicas? Fill Void, Health Officials Are Torn
Rome's colorful Colosseum
": Samsung profit at record $6.6 billion "
Spanish police seize items intended for Iran. Qu? mal rollo...
This is a pretty amazing read. #howstuffworks NYTimes: Coins, Bills and the National Debt
Fitness Center in a #Hotel Room
I'm surprised by the lack of coverage of the N Ireland riots.
Saudis defend #SriLankan maid's #execution
The worst kind of poor flying judgement. Stunt plane barely missing two people prompts FAA probe.
on Hillary Clinton's FP approach
An Insider Returns to Politics in Italy #memofromrome #politics
Sign of the #apocalypse: Voice of Charlie Brown arrested, charged. ?
A really nicely written story: In the Subways, a Voice to Stir the Soul
CES keynote: Young people today are 'born #mobile' #hitech
What prevents people from being able to die at home is not their medical needs, but the needs of their #caregiver #hpm
U.S. Warplanes Enter Somalia Airspace MR. POTUS; WRITE ANOTHER LETTER&TELL FRENCH WE'RE NOT IN THE MOOD FOR THEIR MESS.
Climate Change at CNN: Next step: Obama's State of the Union speech on February 12....
RSS and Reddit co-developper Aaron Swartz commits suicide
Charlie Brown voice actor charged
NJFF is showing this film on Jan 26 at Rutgers University:
Dreamliner having fitful rollout. How tough is this for Boeing?
What We Don’t Know Is Killing Us The gun industry can't handle the truth.
India Ink: Woman Raped by Seven Men in Punjab, Police Say: Police said Sunday that a 29-year-old woman had been ...
#Photos: #KimJongUn and his army forces
Indonesian official: Rape victims enjoy it Oh hell no they don't
So wait, you think I want to search #Facebook, and use Bing as the back up? ha.
ICYMI, Facebook unveiled a new search tool today: "Graph Searchl"
"humanitarian emergency."declared by Aid groups in Syria "
President ? If she wants it
They deserve such unkind words.
A great piece in the NYT mag on story, lit, and media.
Review: Facebook's Graph Search not v. useful - CNN "only two of my 526 friends like cats"...say no more
Ukraine signs shale gas drilling deal with #Shell at #Davos #energy #marketentry
By the numbers: Women in the U.S. military nah not good idea
Try something new on your next vacation.
": Britney Spears calls off engagement " loool CNN reports this? Where is this world going?
Pooping Man Killed in Fall Between Subway Cars
Thank goodness. ?: Man charged with murder in Philadelphia doctor's death. ?
Teen murdered in West Bank by Israeli military occupation force , activists say -
live to eat or eat to live? I take the former.
Boosting Your #Flu Shot Response With #Exercise
Smartphones are lifes remote control -
Er diab... ": At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire "
2013 Oscar nominations: Who got
NYT reports on my intvu with Ehud Barak, links to Daily Beast #wef #israel #iran #nukes #war
Convicted in Thailand of *implying* an insult to the king. ?There was no mention of the king?s name in the speech.?
"Escape from La Crosse" The Preppers Next Door
Can Oprah save Lance Armstrong? She's not convinced #Doprah
Notre Dame linebacker victim of a Catfish type hoax?
Morning athletic inspiration (let everyone compete!): Forging Path to Starting Line for Younger Disabled Athletes #NYT
Michael R. Bloomberg credits #JohnsHopkinsUniversity for turning him into a leader
This is ludicrous. Sheriff: I won't enforce Obama's gun laws. Really?
Man outsources own job to China
Morsi?s Slurs Against Jews in 2010 Uncovered
thins just don't add up just when North Korea successfully lunched a rocket now America allows this. Or am I...
you are an #inspiration! #Keepfighting
Study: College-educated weathered downturn best:
sadness.": Dolphin stuck in polluted NYC canal dies. ”
"Errors may have exposed veterans to viruses" Uh oh...
Today I learned "Currently, there is no federal law that defines gun trafficking as a crime." I am at a loss for words.
President Obama turning to Ex-Prosecutor Mary Jo White to Be Securities and Exchange Commission (S.E.C.) Boss
Wow. A brief but eye-opening piece in the : A Pedophile in Plain Sight
Good read...Why the Net grieves Aaron Swartz -
Finally Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify
Great informative article that shows PepsiCo's cooperation with resolving this health issue and placing consumers first
How the US has changed in my lifetime:
The New York Times: Chinese Firm Buys U.S. Solar Start-Up
In France, Protesters rally against allowing same-sex marriage
FOLLOW THE DINERO: Cuomo Raises $22.5 Million for Re-election Bid
China is investing in #education - #highered #edpolicy
Can Livestrong survive Lance Armstrong doping admission ?
Build a fence around your good health! Your top flu questions answered.
Johnson & Johnson Aware of 40% Failure in Hip Implant #hipimplant
'Is there a worse way to live?' (cc: ) #JIDF
Gun violence is absolute a #publichealth issue. Good work, on your gun reform for a generation #itsastart
AZ Gov Jan Brewer changes her mind and will expand Medicaid: #Medicaid
Worth reading for the column excerpts: Pauline Phillips, Dear Abby, Dies at 94
#Myanmar s Fight With Armed #Rebels Edges Toward China #burma #kachin
Truly a sad day. At least 90 killed in Brazil nightclub fire
US inadvertently trained rebels: French Strikes in Mali Supplant Caution of U.S.
Calorie bomb on the menu will make eaters feel guilt after finish those meals
Facebook was the most popular mobile app in the United States in 2012
An Alarm in the Offing on #ClimateChange #ExtremeWeather #globalwarming #eco
Syria: Deadly airstrikes in Damascus
Two of our favorite partners, and , have teamed to bring more music to your commute.
Amazing, you can play violent shooting games &nobody says anything but the NRA draws heat over new target-shooting game
Worth Watching. "Set for Life" Documenting a Generation?s Fall. #work #unemployment #babyboomer
Dreamliner fix: 'It's not easy' - this a big mess that is not easy.
NYT Editorial: What We Don’t Know Is Killing Us #research #guns #violence
Think so? They don't think so!
Pulitzer-winning poet Tracy K. Smith's Sunday routine:
Position "eliminated". Hmm. I read "exterminated". Times Executive Is Leaving
Mr. Drummond, yep...showing my age: Conrad Bain, Father on ?Diff?rent Strokes?, Dies at 89
Saudi Arabia defends maid's execution
"Facebook has a lot of data, but it?s very noisy data."
CNN Recent nightclub tragedies: On Saturday, a massive fire at the Kiss nightclub in southern Brazil killed at l...
North Korea sendin them threats again
We're all human, No MORE DEATH Please! Another Tibetan sets himself on fire, dies to protest Chinese rule
Coca-Cola joining the fight on obesity
Prayers for Burt Reynolds
'Taliban' is plural, but that is apparently too esoteric for CNN or any other journalists: .
Saudi activists say they won't be silenced~~I hope they find a way to get their rights peacefully!
When doctors don't listen what can you do?
Jodie Foster would care more about Syria Launching Deadly Airstrikes in Damascus Suburbs
Bending the Steakhouse Rules #food #eatingout
Excellent step with tricky legal issues.New York Lawmakers Reach Deal on New Gun Curbs #law #cdnpoli
'Anonymous' threatens Justice Dept. 'Anonymous' threatens Justice Dept
At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire, such a shame
Internet addiction of the day: 'What Happens When You Cast Lindsay Lohan in Your Movie'
Great piece by in NYT showing China too has what McKinsey sees as a global education-to-work problem:
On the virtues of procrastination: This Was Supposed to Be My Column for New Year?s Day
France: We're not the pacifists you think we are - Mali
The Bizarre World of Online Relationships: Image of Manti Te'o Becomes a Puzzle as Theories Swirl
Washington's Economic Boom, Financed by You Real life "Hunger Games"
Finally confirmed - chapped lips are the first sign you?ve got Mad Cow disease.
Swatch plays a big hand on $1B Harry Winston acqusition get it, big hand... #iexplainmyjokes
States get extension on #healthexchange timetable: : States Get Extra Time to Set Up Exchanges #ACA #HCR
"Live by the sword ... " Sad and ironic. Producer of popular gun-related videos shot
Kobe Bryant, wife to call off divorce yaayy! lol.
Excellent!?: #Obama accelerating troops withdrawal from #Afghanistan, several months ahead of schedule: ?
obit: Vincent Sombrotto, leader of 1970 strike that shut post offices across country 'til Nixon sent the National Guard
So heartbreaking “: At least 90 killed in Brazilian nightclub fire, officials say. ”
More reason to review a more progressive pro-domestic tax structure "America's Productivity Climbs, but Wages Stagnate"
This is interesting: "What We Don’t Know Is Killing Us" .
When i first saw this sing guy on the subway, i thought he needed an article. And NYT has delivered!
Germany to Move 674 Tons of Gold from Downtown Manhattan to Frankfurt..
This just warmed my heart: Ada Bryant and Robert Haire
#New York City Ties #Doctors? #Income to #Quality of #Care
NY Times: Dot Earth Blog: Is 'Wild West' Era for Fracking Coming to an End?
Children handcuffed 4 violating dress code! #MS fills #school2prison pipeline reports grantee .
Congratulations to #Fruitvale and #BloodBrother! Sounds like #Sundance had some powerful films this year.
Sleep, perchance to dream And our memories not unseem MT : Brain ageing & Sleep-Related Memory Decline ”
My PBK membership, finally explained. Parents? Financial Support May Not Help College Grades:
Tennis: Sharapova takes on boys
FDA may find that poop is a drug. NYTimes: When Pills Fail, This, er, Option Provides a Cure
Only great things can happen at the cheese monger : In the Dairy Case, Ripe Prose
Peter Likes: DealBook: Dell Shares Rise on News Company May Go Private
Kaepernick Backs Harbaugh's Gamble With Playoff Win
Republican Governors Open New Front in #Tax Debate Offering Bold #Solutions!
For the record, I chopped my hair into "The Karlie" before Karlie ; )
Familiarize yourselves: #NorthKorea
New mutations discovered in #melanoma Useful in decoding how it develops. #cancer
Not so good news.... NYTimes: German Economy Shrank in Fourth Quarter
U.N. agencies: Stop the suffering in Syria Again. Powerless.
Conservative writer Nicholas Kristof: Guns are "an instrument not of protection but of escalation."
NYTimes: Robot Makers Say Automation will create new and better jobs and not only delete jobs
New low for water levels in the Great Lakes #Drought
Britain to Auction 250 MHz for High Speed Mobile -
NYTimes: Apps and Other Digital Tools Lend a Hand...
Compared DNA from 6,000 visceral leishmaniasis blood samples from India & Brazil shows similar variations.
So, can we just pass the ERA now? Pentagon Is Set to Lift Combat Ban for Women
Germany to Move 674 Tons of Gold #germany #europe #USA
“: Secret Service Dog falls to its Death ”😢🐶
*****NYTimes: Security Firm Discovers Cyber-Spy Campaign*****
#Obama plan: Tougher checks, no assault weapons - - from #guncontrol
Ken Salazar leaving to spend more time with his bolo ties.
Nike unveils Rory McIlroy as Tiger's heir apparent. $200 mil deal?!? Makes no business sense to me.
Should babies be allowed to 'cry it out'? #attachment #parenting
Look of The Moment: #TaylorSwift
The plight of the Atlanta Falcons
New York State Has Gun Control Deal, With Focus on Mental Ills
Tribal Lessons -'The World Until Yesterday'
So. Odd. ?: In his own words: Manti Te'o on his girlfriend, and her death - now revealed to be a hoax: ?
J&J was aware of 40% failure rate in DePuy Hip Implants.
Following #Colorado #marijuana legal decisions closely. Maybe some lessons for CA dispensaries mess
NY Times - A Sprint That Is Littered With Pitfalls
Returning Zing to Dutch Cooking ?Let?s go Dutch?? #Gartine
Obama must prove himself on Palestine: NYTimes: Netanyahu Issues Veiled Barb in Response to Criticism From Obama
America, the Saudi Arabia of tomorrow - Good or Bad?
It hurts my stomach.
Do you need a "Stop Day"
What happened in Australia ... I Went After Guns. Obama Can, Too.
Will President Obama's gun proposals work? Recalling Pain, Mayors Urge Bills? Passage
NYT Books - Books of The Times: ?The River Swimmer,? a pair of Novellas by Jim Harrison: ?The River Swimmer,? Ji...
Baby boomers getting tech savvy:
v Kerry says #Iran must come clean on #nuclear program
Woah. Fox News did not renew Sarah Palin's contract, which just expired.
Awe - one of the original "bloggers" passes away. Pauline Phillips, Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
Don't get any ideas, . U.S. programmer outsources own job to China, surfs cat videos -
Filmmaker Jason da Silva on the challenges of navigating NY with #MS: The Long Wait? #sundance
This thing reads like one of those pre-written 'death' articles. Creepy.
UnfairRT : Readers sue Lance Armstrong for book refund after doping admission: What do you think?
200 dead in night club fire
NYT- Pentagon Lifts Ban on Women Serving in Combat Roles
"An earlier version of this review misidentified the torso that was featured when Picnic opened on Broadway..."
Here's to two more years of Reince Penis jokes.
New York passes gun control bill Interesting, I like that they actually focused on mental health.
Miss Montana has a great story to tell. #autism
CGG - 30 die when bus plunges off cliff in Nepal -
A surprisingly refreshing view from old Johnny Howard. I Went After Guns. Obama Can, Too.
": In today?s Gun Challenge editorial, Obama puts politics aside and takes action on gun reform. "
In N.A.A.C.P., Industry Gets Ally Against Soda Ban I'm not one of them!
And they never wondr WHY!! U.S gets it wrong on Egypt again -
Hurricane-flooded cars ruined by Sandy lure unwitting buyers
In Oz we love to scoff at US politics, gun laws etc. Worth remembering US population debate years ahead of ours.
Paging Orval Faubus: "Oregon sheriff: 'Unconstitutional' gun control laws won't be enforced" #guncontrol #newtown
Golden Globes: How did Tina Fey and Amy Poehler do as hosts?
In #Turkey, mourners protest killings of #Kurds
Chim: A Vivid Retrospective of Post War Europe #photography
isn?t it sad, that events like the massacre in Conneticut have to happen for us to notice it #challenges
Video: Rome's colorful Collosseum:
What the what?! ?: Voice of Charlie Brown arrested, charged. ?
Here we go again.. A man says he's 'certain' he knows where Hoffa is buried.
Man held after subway attack in Philadelphia
Even thought I've downloaded #Google maps for #iPhone, I'm still using #Apple's built in maps. They're easier to use.
Buried Memories talks on a never before told true story of survival, memory and recovery.
The Gulf's 'green' buildings #Amman #CNN
NYTimes: N.R.A. Attacks Obama & Daughters in Video \ repugnant.
Awful. ": More than 800 NYC rape cases to be reviewed for forensic mistakes "
Here is my question, is lance being punished for cheating or for cheating better?
The reason Kindles exist: The Onion's tossing out an e-book biography of Biden
Info Miami’s Design District Looks for an Upgrade: A proposed $312 million renovation is expected to transform t...
Broken limbs, torn lives in northern #Mali - #Islamism #Sharia
Journalists, take a hint from Andrew Sullivan -
This sweet love story made me weepy. No, really:
North Korea beats war drums...
Russian influence on rise in #Israel
Life under Islamist Militants - Broken limbs, torn lives in northern Mali
Good Grief indeed, Charlie Brown gets arrested
“: “: Death toll climbs to 220 in Brazil nightclub fire, official says. ” incredibly sad” horrifying
Sad but brings back memories of ink-stained hands reading her column. What a life. NYTimes: Dear Abby Dies at 94
In Desert Outposts, Border Agents Keep Watch #elpaso #elchuco #lafrontera #mexico
The closest I'll every get to Hollywood: #GreenFashion on the Red Carpet
Again: NYTimes: 787 Jet Leaks Fuel During Safety Test
Some Daily on Daily crime right here. MT : on filib. reform?unintelligible:
North Korea?s Missile Movements Worry U.S. THOM SHANKER and DAVID E. SANGER
We are excited to see what happens!! ?South Park? Creators Start "Important Studios" #southpark
CNN: Helicopter crash rains debris on London street
Online prodigy Aaron Swartz commits suicide God why ?
Is Studio 54 like the '60s- if u can remember it, u weren't really there? Selling Some Old Sparkle Fr Studio 54:
The climate is changing, not in the distant future, but now:
Extreme weather: expect the unexpected
Ada Bryant and Robert Haire You go girl!!
NYT on Aaron Swartz: A Data Crusader, a Defendant and Now, a Cause
Ignore the headline: more than 220...click on the link for updated via CNN. We're seeing the numbers climb higher...
I'm regretful that it has to come to this for some.
scaryyyyy...Questioning Greek Growth
Tragic news: A Data Crusader, a Defendant and Now, a Cause
You better believe in climate change, it's real! @ Federal Report Sees Big U.S. Impacts from Global Warming
: Popular gun nut* shot dead in own home, NRA thinks he needed more guns
This is so sad “: 245 people killed in Brazil nightclub fire, police tell state news agency. ”
Former Australian PM says "I Went After Guns. Obama Can, Too."
NYTimes: Diderot, an American Exemplar? Bien Sûr! A free thinker
Good grief! Charlie Brown voice actor charged - #law #legal
SL Putting a Number on Smoking's Toll
Is it a coincidence the most Miss America's come from the South?
Britain teeters toward triple-dip recession CNNMoney
Million Man March; promises to bring change in bleeding Pakistan- #TahirulQadri #14Jan
America, the Saudi Arabia of tomorrow - Good Luck Saudi :)
French Twitter case involving the identities behind racist comments is only latest skirmish over Internet speech
"Not all smoothies are created equal!"
US Hospitals Turn Away Visitors With Flu Symptoms - NYT
NYTimes: 232 Dead as Fire Sweeps Through Nightclub in Brazil (locked security doors and band pyrotechnics)
v?a Supreme Court Hears Argument on the F.C.C.?s Authority to Rule on Cellphone Towers
IHT: Xiao Shu, former journalist at Southern Weekend, gives insider take on iron grip of censorship.
#Wtf it happened again. Police: 7 men gang rape bus passenger in #India -
#Youth: The wants to know: "Does #Facebook Ever Make You Feel L-O-U-S-Y?" Share HERE
Da CNN: ' At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire Update'
Horse meat discovered in hamburgers meat in UK and Ireland
Dear Abby, Dies at 94 . Dear Abby: Are birth control pills deductible? Bertie Dear Bertie: Only if they don?t work.
Jared Diamond book worth reading? "The World Until Yesterday"
#Socialmedia makes folks more honest, says #Cornell prof #Facebook #LinkedIn
World's best white-water rafting? geekkenya
Casey Anthony has two of her four convictions thrown out.
Workers being seen as just a cost ... we all build this society and will get what we pay for
on the need for humanity in online learning.
Weird, just the voice? ": Voice of Charlie Brown arrested, charged. "
Opinionator: Misconceptions(Linda Greenhouse)
Frum: U.S. gun problem is not a race problem (must read)
Free speech is a basic democratic right except in France #Twitter
Goed initiatief, inkomen op kwaliteit en niet op verrichtingen#New York City Ties Doctors? Income to Quality of Care
Art meets technology before tragedy: photog Taryn Simon & computer genius Aaron Swartz create a project , via NY Times
Wow, what a story: In the Subways, a Voice to Stir the Soul
Microsoft's Windows 8 sales are OK, not great
Death is bad enough:
"Husbands of Hollywood"??gender-flipped satire of reality TV...& subtle commentary on limited options for black actors.
President Hillary! There are few things I would like more!
NYT, "Mouse Study Discovers DNA That Controls [Burrowing] Behavior [and Whether Escape Tunnels Are Made]"
": Social media making us more honest? talks to "
Thinking about how we can calm down our civic discourse. Labels are powerful.
Public takes its shots at Armstrong--What do you guys think of Armstrong's doping?
After U.S. threat, North Korea turns ire on South #military #SKorea #NKorea #US #politics
Sen. Feinstein announces bill to limit semiautomatic weapons:
NYTimes: Victory for Anthony and for Knicks
The Mexican gun-tablet exchange...
From : Cond? Nast Writer Deals Stir Dispute #CondeNast
Fires threaten parts of Australia -
Feel good morning read! :) Note on a napkin, 'This meal is on us' -
Exercise Can Boost Flu Shot?s Potency #flushot #exercise #health
The telecom industry just took away our rights. As of today, it's illegal to choose a different cellphone carrier
Awesome! #Republicans can't win on their ideas so they will change the rules!?
77% of Americans use search to find diagnosis. ?: Turning to the Web for a Medical Advice ?
The tricks of moving from Wall Street to Tech #dealbook
Should babies be left to "cry it out?"...
Interesting perspective on #Broncos playcalling -
Rivals watch as Shell's #Arctic drilling hopes hit snags. $RDS.A #Alaska #KeystoneXL #oil #politics
Russian Military Ordered to Switch to Socks I learned something new today!!!
Justice Clarence Thomas Breaks His Silence nytimes or the onion article? can't tell
Interesting article. ASAP Yams, Partner to Hip-Hop's ASAP Rocky
they were so young :( #SantaMaria #tragedyinthenightclub
An architect is building a mobius band house with a 3D printer. I knew those things would come in handy.
TheWritingGenie Supernatural Tales: Manuel Gonzales Talks About 'The Miniature Wife': Mr. Gonzales's first colle...
Philly high schoolers, join the conversation. : Would You Feel Safer With Armed Guards In Your School?
some good news for a change More lives being saved - cancer death rates drop 20%...
Apparently a Suicide
This is an inspiring exhibition. The way to the future. ?Making Room? in the City
Jeanne Vertefeuille, who played a key role in unmasking infamous spy Aldrich Ames, died recently.
Wait, what?! - 'Universal background checks' defined
Our Economic Pickle: America's Productivity Climbs, but Wages Stagnate
Weak Protection Laws For Domestic Workers: Saudi execution: Brutal, inhuman and illegal? - CNN #p2 #p21 #tcot #ccot
Reading: How to Get America Online via
New York Times Top Public Relations Exec to Depart
What's so wrong with researching it? What We Don’t Know Is Killing Us
Benjamin Millepied to take over Paris Opera Ballet, with all the details:
#Java compromised take necessary action
#Morsi: "Nurse our children and our grandchildren on hatred for them: for Zionists, for Jews"
NYTimes:Armstrong, a Confession Without Explanation-the most sophisticated, organized and professionalized? in history
Lean in Sisters....NYTimes: She’s (Rarely) the Boss
Pakistan bomb victims' families end protest
This could play out very interesting....
Senator Schumer Says He Will Vote For Chuck Hagel for Secretary of Defense Good news!
This man can sing better than some big names who will be at the Grammy Awards Geechee Dan Plays the 42nd Street Subway
Security Firm Discovers Cyber-Spy Campaign #itsecurity #cyberspy
Great NY Times article: “: “: A Saint in His City: Archie Manning in #NewOrleans
Great article &comments on what biz owners face trying to figure out how to choose the right bank.
PUT UP YOUR NUKES [dukes]! "North Korea says new nuclear test will be part of fight against U.S." jacques
Calorie bomb disasters on the menu
ICYMI:"As Disabled Athletes Compete, Questions of Logistics"
If uv not seen #Crazy #Love, u should. NYTimes: Linda Riss #Pugach, Whose Life Was Ripped From Headlines, Dies at 75
Question is: Does this mean Civil War? Probably not. But still not a good situation #Iraq
Couldn't agree more with the facts here:
Interesting article for parents who support their college kids: Parents? Financial Support May Not Help College Grades
New York's Cuomo signs gun control bill. 1 down 49 to go!
SYNTHAX_tERROR 2: : More than 800 NYC rape cases to be reviewed for forensic mistakes
WTF India?!! This has got to stop.
CNN Soccer's 'bounty hunter' takes on FIFA: A leading football agent fined by FIFA for using social media has ta...
Dey stay preppin'... The Preppers Next Door
Family uses pot to manage son's autism... Wow
“Long Island: ‘Attack of the Bloodsuckers!’ at the Long Island Children’s Museum ” if you want to scare leo
a must read . my amazing friend cynthis schneider has done it again, bravo
Why the Net grieves Aaron Swartz - the innovator who embodied what's best about the Net.
Female Directors Gain Ground, Slowly The storyteller?s gender matters.
wtf?? » ": At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire Update: "
#Cosmos Unveil Plan for #Soccer Stadium Near #BelmontPark #NYS #NY #LongIsland #EconDev
Theme? Ppl trying to sell stuff that's not theirs... cc: #JoyDivision #music
NYTimes: Smartphones Become Life?s Remote Control --- amazing
Breaks my heart ": 245 people killed in Brazil nightclub fire, police tell state news agency. "
op-ed - Why We Must Help Save #Mali #Africa #HelpMali
Omg. At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Another GangRape in India! WTF! :( 7 men gang rape bus passenger in India -
Social media can be a friend or foe but it doesn't raise your IQ - - Police: YouTube videos lead to pot bust
He's dead! ?: Venezuela says Hugo Chavez's condition is improving ?
NYTimes: Tunisian Style Baked Cauliflower Frittata
Salivating! ?: Exotic culinary tours from around world ?
"Still own a Livestrong bracelet? Tell us about it." (CNN)
Leave it to a lawyer from #Lakechuck to get Justice Thomas to break his silence.
#coder #outsources own job to #china for a #profit, gets fired.
Africa: The Top 5 stories of the week are ... -
Awkward! Notre Dame linebacker says he is hoax victim
When Pills Fail, This Option Provides a Cure For C-Diff
Dear Abby, we miss you already. How fortunate you are to have Margalit Fox write your obit! "Dear Abby, Dies at 94"
A Data Crusader, a Defendant and Now, a Cause #AaronSwartz #MITfail #badbranding
How an all-American hero fell to earth - . (Where have all the REAL heroes gone?)
Tibetan man sets himself on fire in protest. Again.
More accurate (albeit less catchy) title would be "India is 2nd place" not "losing", but still interesting:
Awesome Jeanne Vertefuille told to take a secretarial course by C.I.A. She Helped Catch a Notorious Spy, Dies at 80
In awe of the courageous Russian LGBT rights advocates NYTimes: ‘Propaganda’ by Gays Faces Russian Curbs Amid Unrest
Families of #Newtown Victims Look for Answers on #Gun Violence #NRA
Really? Man says he's 'certain' where Hoffa is buried
NYTimes: How to Get America Online - excellent op-ed by on regulating the big ISPs
Time to ban nighclubs.
'here is what happens when you cast lindsey #lohan in a movie' & get unlimited on-set access: superb journalism.
North Korea Turns Its Ire on the South #North #South #Korea #UN #sanctions #war #R2PH
In complete shock! Catholic hospital argues fetus not a person
Armstrong's confess ruined all the cancer survivors and cycling fans who thought his fairy-tale story was true.
This is what happened in Brazil if you don't know x
Although Truth is a the higher standard...: Readers sue Lance Armstrong for book refund after doping admission
NYT story on Grounding of Boeing 787s
Aww ?: Britney Spears calls off engagement ?
The top baby names of 2013 - (gee, my name is not on there ;o))) )
This shouldn't be the problem that it is. Ready-set-go. NYTimes: As Disabled Athletes Compete, Questions of Logistics
Damn smh ": Death toll climbs to 220 in Brazil nightclub fire, official says. "
Could it be good? Sounds intriguing... ABC to look at 'Star Wars' live-action TV series -
Online courses still need a human element...
Gun ban argument continues but will it really solve anything except to disarm the innocent? #pols1101
The history of temp agencies: Using the sexism of the '60s to expand "right under the noses of powerful labor unions."
great hire by Robert Wolf and his new firm Austan Goolsbee is a great guy
Amen! ": Good news .... My shero Robin Roberts Plans February Return to 'Good Morning America' "
Who stole precious relics from Mo. church?
Firefly: 2015 is happening...... as a NASA mining vessel. #fireflyreturnskinda
Algerian field strike retaliation over Mali, reports say -
I wish I could be this man #PaulTheroux My #Travel Wish List via
40 Miles to Work, on a Bike: -- Incredible!
Oh so clever, weighs in on #obesity fight
The entrusted Muslim brotherhood
I need a 'stop day' in my life. #CNN
Great piece by "The gruesome toll of deadly #clusterbombs in Syria" -
Illuminating Jewish Life in a Muslim Empire via Talmud Blog
Highlights From Katie Couric's Interview With Manti Te'o
Apps to help you ski: via NY Times
We mourned the loss of an Open Access advocate this past weekend ~ A Data Crusader, a Defendant and Now, a Cause
nsfw ?: Best obit opening I've read in a long time. Dear Abby Dies at 94 ?
Taking foodie culture maybe a bit too far...The Unaffordable Luxury of Food
I'd like to read this. MT : Interview with DL Weiss, Who Put Her Child on a Diet and Wrote About It.
NYT botches description of "crushed beer can" fiasco in mostly v. good piece on Shell's Arctic troubles
The Preppers Next Door Who wants to join MY group?
Driven by a need to compete or remorse? Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify
Sheriff: I won't enforce Obama's gun laws. Good for him.
Love this--Forms at the doctor's office just got fun -
Dreamliner battery studied by NTSB (via Instapaper)
setting the bar, good move! "Wal-Mart Plans to Hire Any Veteran Who Wants a Job"
NYTimes: Apple May Be Big, but It Isn’t a Bellwether (my column)
Schrecklich! 😢 “: At least 90 killed in Brazil nightclub fire ”
Fortunes of Facebook may hinge on search - is this the Big Reveal?
What is the price of insulting the #king in #Thailand? 10 years in #prison for #activist Somyot Pruksakasemsuk
Sheriff: I won't enforce Obama's gun laws He's 1 black guy, they r US laws & calm the fuck down #overparanoia&racism
Mining Electronic Records for Health Data May Greatly Benefit Medical Research, Not Necessarily Reduce Costs of Care
NYTimes: ?Mad Men? Set to Return on April 7. Excellent news.
Greek FM: Small chance Greece leaves EU
'Dad, it's only my books I am friends with.' #Malala #womenonthefrontline
lovely tribute, her responses to readers' qtns priceless. Read bacon frying and you could move. Dear Abby Dies at 94
Which country has most economic freedom? #economy #economics
'4-hour' work guru on China outsourcer: Bad karma - CNN International
Part 4: Answers to Your Questions About the #FAFSA #finaid #scchat
Chilling fact that the biggest safety concern for women serving in military is risk of sexual attack from comrades.
Finally a little RESPECT for Vets! Wal-Mart Plans to Hire Any Veteran Who Wants a Job
": Breaking: 250 killed, 200 more injured in Brazil nightclub inferno. " Crazy
"Pray for Me". Defense Secretary Panetta in Audience With Pope
John Cale in Paris and Along the Borderline. #music
An rising star on London's thespian scene tells his story of - Being Bin Laden
Casting: Lindsay Lohan, careening debt and porn stars. What could go wrong? What Happens When You Hire LL.
Saudis Monsters try to defend Sri Lankan maid's execution #p2 #tcot
HE nvr gives vision wo provision & he'll use whoevr2bring it?Winfrey's LowRated Cable Channel Is Poised 2 Break Through
A MUST READ! by ! How #Turkey Can Make Peace With the #Kurds
Lovely piece in the NYT on a 40-year marriage, and how their gay son?s struggle became a unifier
What exactly is going on in Mali? @
Gabby and Mark: The new Bradys of gun control #TGDN LIBS PLAY DIRTY AS NORM
NRA's video game smacks of hypocrisy #NRA #guncontrol
Frum: #US. #gun problem is not a race problem
All from a kid starting an online petition. NYTimes: PepsiCo Will Halt Use of Additive in Gatorade
Al Pacino to play Joe Paterno in Brian De Palma's tentatively entitled film "Happy Valley" #sportsbiz
Source say at least 150 ": At least 90 killed in Brazilian nightclub fire, officials say. "
NYTimes: Debunking Darwin. Was He Wrong About Dating? #sex #gender
From the She Owns It business group... More Thoughts on Growing Your Business -- and Helping Employees
Well, at least we know the slides work now.
NYTimes: What We Don’t Know Is Killing Us -Couldn't agree more! e.g., research on IPV homicides & guns is critical.
BHO Gun Proposal 2 Look Beyond Mass Shootings in taking steps to completely disarm Americans so that only Elites prtctd
The deadly toll of cluster bombs in #Syria
! pay it forward - Note on a napkin, 'This meal is on us' -
Jacqui Weaver tells the NY Times: ?I do have friends in Australia who now refer to me as ?Hollywood Jack??
Flowers in winter? Camellias are some of my favorite prerennials.
Go #Obama. Obama Calls for Broad Action on Guns
Is #Pakistan becoming "#SouthAsia's #Dreamliner"? - Official refuses order to arrest Prime Minister Ashraf
Google Gains From Creating Apps for the #iPhone #HealthIT #hcsm
I was definitely spending it on obscure sheet music and concert tickest. #MisspentYouth
A Generation Gap? Not on This Web Site (Harvard Business School)
Eddie Huang in the NY Times. i vibe this dude so hard
Rangel: More equal military? Bring back draft #deployment #usaf #military
France confronts Mali jihadists
The amount of organizations and clubs at #college is overwhelming! Choose carefully before dedicating your time:
Lol..errm.."test" on the U.S. of A.? #damn!: North Korea says new nuclear test will be part of fight against U.S.: ?
#Morsi ?s Slurs Against #Jews Stir Concern Does any one in #Obama 's administration know how to read #English?
"Vine is Twitter's attempt to be the Instagram of Video," Form a nerdier sentence. Don't try! Its Impossible!
Mark Sanford, the ex-Governor of South Carolina & "Hiking the Appalachian Trail", to Run for Congress
Where to Go in 2013 by ! offers insightful explorations to most of these!
peter is not in the top ten but mo, bertie and gus are?: "The top baby names of 2013"
NYTimes: #Queens #School Is Locked Down After #Gun Is Found in 7-Year-Old?s Backpack is there no end?
What choo talkin' bout Mr. D......RIP Conrad Bain, Father on ?Diff?rent Strokes?, Dies at 89
Facebook unveils new search tool:
#GunReform for a Generation
Is it me, or is the main ingredient in Coke sugar? In Ads, Coke Confronts Soda?s Link to Obesity
Excellent analysis of the housing market recovery - Housing Offers Hope of Strength in the Economy
Williams Starts Fast, but Pace Suits Rockets
QUEBRA TUDO!!! J.J. Abrams to Direct Next ‘Star Wars’ Movie
WOW: announcing plan to hire EVERY veteran who wants a job - w a few conditions. They anticipate 100k+ hires:
In Britain, Basketball Can Be a Tough SellWHY WOULD BRITS GET EXCITED BOUT PRO BB,THEY GOT "FOOTBALL"2 KEEP THEM BORED.
At least 90 killed in Brazil nightclub fire " Kropp left that country in the nick of time.
dutch automat Returning Zing to Dutch Cooking
Man held after subway attack in Philadelphia omg!
Who Decides the Laws of War? It belongs in civilian courts.
Former Alaska Gov Sarah Palin is no long a commentator for Fox News
New York lawmakers agreed on changes to gun laws Ills
Lance Armstrong [Finally] Admits Doping, Says He Will Testify
Hong Kong takes the Internet speed title with 54.1 Mbps.
Where is justice? 'They ran him over because he was black'
reflects on doctors who take time off & then start seeing patients again.
Sheen wants to return to '2.5 Men' but has his past image ruined that? #coePR205
Good Read: Challenges for Women in India:
NYTimes: Richard G. Stern, Writers? Writer, Dies at 84 Big loss
Fantastic read from on imprtnce of narratives: "...stories, not algorithms, give order to our hectic world."
"2012: The Year of Extreme #Weather" : #ClimateChange #Drought #NationalClimateAssessment #GlobalChangeResearch
La vision am?ricaine sur M.Kaspersky est peu flatteuse Security Firm Discovers Cyber-Spy Campaign
Sweet, sweet story. NYTimes: A Doll?s Magic, Free to Renew
A New Housing Boom? Don’t Count on It - By ROBERT J. SHILLER -
" (UK fave) "Mate, why don't skip killing people night? It's too cold." -NYC murderers in last 9 days
Take that Texas. White House Rejects Petitions to Secede, but Texans Fight On
No Deal on Teacher's Union Evaluations; NYC Risks Losing $450 Million
Interesting perspective... NYTimes: A New Housing Boom? Don’t Count on It
Battle behind China's 'Firewall'
NYTimes: Analysis of Armstrong?s Interview With Winfrey it's shame (but we know it) #congrutalionlance
Too many s*tty men in India: another gang rape
Vodka is saving lives! Well, a puppy's life...
jl #NYT: U.S. Military Stops Sending Some Detainees to Afghan Custody #p2 #topprog
Loving the street style from the #Couture in #Paris #Fashion
asked many people (including yours truly) if #LanceArmstrong deserves another chance. Interesting views
Travel photos that you wish you had taken -
#Pentagon to lift combat ban for women... How about banning combat for men??
Doing Good (and Burnishing Images Too) #celebrity #charity
Iran Currency Falls Further on U.S PRESSURE Over Banks transactions
'Kitty Cams study found that four of the cats were two-timing their owners,' and more in this cat story.
Union membership falls to 97-year low, 11.3%. People will still find ways to blame them for everything.
Who spends so much money on food? That's so retarded :) The Unaffordable Luxury of Food
Sent from the CNN App for Android At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire
#Google Gains From Creating Apps for #iPhone. Google Maps is #1 #App.
Get it together Sun (#Oracle)! Homeland Security warns users to disable Java. #CyberSecurity
unreal ?: If you have not heard of the acid attack on the Bolshoi director. ?
Tragic. My thoughts and prayers go out to all..."At least 220 killed in Brazil nightclub fire"
Potentially explosive legal battle: Catholic hospital argues fetus not a person
Kyle Stanley Gained from Pain of Squandered Lead at Torrey Pins: Kyle Stanley this week is back at Torrey Pines,...
Scarcity and Financial Decision-Making.
Holy crap! :( "2 killed as helicopter crashes into crane in central London"
U.S. single-malt #whiskey has arrived
Allergy-bullying? Apparently this is a real problem.
World awaits Oprah's Armstrong interview not me I'm not watching
Homicide #2 cause of death in 15-24-yr-olds in US- 4 out of 5 of these deaths from guns
A Library doll is loaned out to children:
Senate holds key to fixing Washington - thanks for that insight Ari #p2 #tcot
#Cuba restricts travel for 'skilled' people
what is driving our growth in government spending #facts
It's a start! Kudos to this kid!!! PepsiCo Will Halt Use of Additive in Gatorade
Obama-backed gun bills a long shot. "This is ONE issue that me and the president happen to agree on."
Beyond the media's coverage of her emotions, #Clinton put out good info: Five things we learned from Benghazi hearings
2#France: We're not the pacifists you think
Change the rules = Prez Romney: “: Electoral College Changes Would Pose Danger 4 Democrats ”
As Seen on TV! ~ Black and Famous but Out to Pasture
: Report: 650 hostages freed by Algeria forces
Pray they'll stay together for the right reasons - Kobe Bryant, wife calling off divorce -
Harrowing stories: Broken limbs, torn lives in northern #Mali
#NHL Players Begin Voting on Labor Deal; Approval Expected by Saturday #ABASAL #Antitrust
Over 50, and Under No Illusions Over 50? Invent yourself everyday!
The power of user reviews - wielded for good or evil? NYTimes: Swarming a Book Online
Cool stuff: 6 trends we saw at CES 2013 -
At least 233 dead in Brazilian nightclub fire. :(
So sad news : 245 people killed in Brazil nightclub fire.
Ouch, possibly? “: NYTimes: Japan’s Business Culture Hovers Over Boeing’s Battery Choice ”
What a loss of a great & inspirational mind! Internet Activist, a Creator of RSS, Is Dead at 26, Apparently a Suicide
It's Jail Time, Charlie Brown
At long last, the truth... Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify
I am calling BS!!! NYTimes: Morsi Says His Slurs of Jews Were Taken Out of Context
If you're a skier or snow-boarder, you'll dig these: On Snowy Slopes, Fingers Glide Down the Touch Screen.
David Gergen says Obama's 2nd inaugural will deepen division. #Didn'tSeeItComing
Please Read: 's piece on the gruesome toll of deadly cluster bombs in #Syria:
#CSIS388_Dave Facebook disrupting online dating
U.S. steps up involvement in Mallpp#pppj##p#pl###p###p
I Went After Guns. Obama Can, Too. One of the only things I would agree with Howard on.
So Wang Lijun did build a surveillance network. - Chinese Party and Business Officials Fired in Sex Scandal
NYTimes: She’s (Rarely) the Boss smart, as usual
Wow": At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire Update: "
Hot #Luxury news: Japanese airlines suspend Dreamliner flights after emergency land? , see more
Everyone should read 's CNN column from today:
#BREAKING: #Police clash with #protesters calling for dissolution of #Pakistan's government -
Mubarak goes to jail
Honestly where are people's rights being ruined in Obama?s Gun Control Proposal
This is odd! tsk! - Catholic hospital argues fetus not a person
Great to have in the Press Pool to discuss his piece on the President's push for gun control.
The classic American fame and blame game. The Point of Lance
#Djokovic sets sights on #Paris party
#Pakistan’s Premier Intervenes in Fire Inquiry
Kinship care & siblings: After #FosterCare Yrs, a Woman Becomes a Role Model for Her Sisters
Looks like we could get something right
You should read this: The Lifting of a Veil, Discreetly
Interesting Piece! Being Bin Laden #films #zerodarkthirty
U ds boi ehn": Piers slams guest over AR-15s "
Bad tweet (news) of the day": For Rape Victims in India,Police r Often Part of Problem reports "
These Law Enforcers Will Stop at Nothing
Populist without a backbone elected by popular vote supported by heavy media campaign #Zeman #CzechRepublic
Artley: Getting 10 million Twitter followers
hmmm she's filing for bankruptcy..
#Mali Need Not Be France?s Afghanistan
War on Evil? War on Sociopaths? Banning guns sounds like it will work a lot better than that War on Drugs stuff.
be safe. i've heard on the news about china's air pollution that is terrible
A Heroic Doctor Returns to Congo
NYTimes: D. Brainerd Holmes, a Leader in Space Race, Dies at 91
179 republicans vote no ... House Approves $50.7 Billion in Emergency Aid for #Sandy Victims
Nobel-winning economist on why we should care about #climate change.
NYT Most Emailed: Pentagon Set to Lift Ban on Women in Combat Roles: The groundbreaking decision overturns a 199...
It is laughable to believe the whole story, they never met? Image Becomes a Puzzle as Theories on Te?o Swirl
Who'd have thought an American hero could be a Canadian? NYT: Man Who Sheltered Americans in Tehran, Dies at 88
'Vampire Diaries' spinoff coming to The CW, it's based in Nola!
Poor creature MT Amid 2d-guessing, marine rescuers decide not to remove stricken dolphin from Gowanus Canal.
CNN: Egypt clashes: A stern Egyptian court ruling tied to a soccer riot spurred clashes that left at least 30 pe...
lance armstrong quotes, pure gold
Gas prices creep up a bit
Indian Star (Sania Mirza) Tells of Life and Marriage in Media Fishbowl
Parent is defined as a point of origin. I'm not done being the best parent I can be for Ben. Not by a very long measure
New #Facebook changes afoot - not to your profile (phew!) - rather a new feature, #GraphSearch.
Parsing What Jodie Foster Did (and Didn't) Say Gotta be honest: I had not idea what she was saying. #goldenglobes
Aaron Swartz, Internet Activist and a Creator of RSS, Is Dead at 26, Apparently a Suicide.
MT : NY Health Chief Defends Decision Not to Evacuate Hospitals \\ the importance of disaster OM
a case when you might want to take someone else's shit...
Good article on the economics & culture that fuels pro cycling. NYTimes: Looking Upstream in Doping Cases
#Wal-Mart Plans to Hire Any #Veteran Who Wants a #Job
awful way to go out...": At least 220 killed in Brazil nightclub fire "
The importance of taking a day off
Care of the Elderly: the opportunity of food is more than meals on wheels.
NYTimes: Talking, Walking Objects (this is a fantasy world for geeky me)
I think a bunch of UCI suits need to change their pants NYTimes: Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify
What a dope(r)... NYTimes: Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify
'Million Man March' Threatens #Pakistan Capital - CNN,
This is gonna be fantastic for entertainment:
": Voice of Charlie Brown arrested, charged. " Please tell me he said good grief...
, is this anti-free speech new French law about Twitter must identify racist, anti-Semitic posters, via
Flu season is here, let's clear something up: "Do I Need a Flu Shot if I?ve Had the Flu?"
Kobe Bryant, wife say they are calling off #divorce -
Inspiring article by Chelsea Clinton about volunteering this Saturday - National Day of Service
Did you read the #Opinionator the relationship between parents & teachers? Liza Lee was interviewed. #edchat
MT Design Now Rivals Technology in Importance
uhhhh 10 reasons we can't get enough Gosling yummie
Java vulnerability due to incomplete patch (from )
NYTimes: GREAT OBIT on Dear Abby.
Robots making US more competitive in manufacturing:
Florida's Burmese Python issue leads to snake killing contest. - ...
Homicide Tracking Site Expanding to #Chicago Love it. Great call & Congrats
180! “: At least 90 killed in Brazil nightclub fire ”
Are you better off "playing for a tie" in #investing:
Boost Your Flu Shot Response With Exercise
For Obama?s New Term, Start Here - Nick Kristof for NYT
Worst nightmare! ": At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire Update: "
Anyone tried this?? Amazon giving you free MP3s your CDs
Damn, maybe I shouldn't be so sanguine about the London fog:
#NYC school bus drivers go on strike NYC school bus corruption & in some cases organized crime
How about a path to #citizenship for those already caught crossing the #border ? #Citizenship Path in One Fast Push
Good Read. Agree - Mostly ": Parents? Financial Support May Not Help College Grades "
J.J. Abrams set to direct ?Star Wars: Episode VII?
To face someone that already shot a student.. ": I'm no hero, says teacher who talked down armed student. "
() Brazil hosts largest fag parade in the world. #FagsDoomNations 245 people killed in Brazil club fire.
Tea Party Unhappy. Fox News Fires Sarah #Palin
on point...5 Wine Words Not to Fear
See also: NYTimes: In Quebec, a Celebration on Skis
Life begins at conception, unless cas is involved.
This would be a very, very bad idea DPRK. North Korea threatens South Korea ove UN sanctions:
In N.A.A.C.P., Industry Gets Ally Against Soda Ban hmmmmmmmm . . . .
About damn time!!! New York governor signs nation's first gun-control bill since Newtown -
Unemployment in #Spain Climbs Again, With No Relief in Sight...
Timothy Cook, Apple?s CEO, said the pipeline of products was ?chock-full.? ?We feel great about what we have in store?
Read that Facebook has launched a new tool () to search its huge database of social graph data.
Don't know why I can't stop reading about him - A Data Crusader, a Defendant and Now, a Cause
I wish I could see this, it sounds cool! Second Stage Adds 'Nobody Loves You'
NYTimes: #LindaRissPugach, Whose Life Was Ripped From Headlines, Dies at 75 #crazylove
3D version of ?Top Gun? was rejected by #China's censors. The line "religion is darkness' in "Life of Pi" gt the X too
. Kobe just saved about $100 Mil
NY Times Communications Executive Bob Christie Is Leaving . One of the industry's few good spokespeople.
RIP I have no words :( At least 245 killed in Brazil nightclub fire -
Property Values: What You Get for ... $1.6 Million
#Twolves fans should read this piece on KG by in the NYTimes
India is a shockingly bad place to be a woman - how can it be so backwards??
Be careful what you eat -- particularly at restaurants!!!
#Britain’s Prime Minister Defends Decision to Seek Vote on #EuropeanUnion
Where in the world is Àfrica? Selection of the Boeing 787's Battery Maker Raises Questions
women have 'taken their posts with such seamless calm that the country barely noticed.'
Justice Thomas hasn't said a single word in the Supreme Court in 7 years.He broke his silence.He said "Well he did not"
Kids can't trust anyone!! ": 50 arrested in Florida child sex sting - including several teachers: "
Pentagon to lift combat ban
U.S., other nations ground Boeing Dreamliners over fire risk (CNN)
I don't normally agree with former PM John Howard - but he is spot on about gun control in the US
Need a rubber stamp of Chairman Mao or Lady Godiva on her horse? Ink Pad in the W. Village has got 'em. #NabeJoint
HE Arts Beat Producer Says James Brown Biopic Is Finally a Go: The producers says he's gotten the rights from th...
This is interesting - NYTimes: Parents? Financial Support May Not Help College Grades
Ishikawa and Wiratchant Invited to Augusta
Great idea":Should make capital gains regressive over time, based upon how long capital invested #StartupAct"
Pentagon breaking news, this going to be a big debate.
Omo dey go tey : Opinion: Nigerians still waiting for their 'African Spring' Sowore -
Not in my diet but hamburger eaters should be aware *Horsemeat found in hamburgers in Britain & Ireland -
Online internet Aaron Swartz commits suicide, relative says
Got a flu shot? Exercising can make it work even better. from
For #Armstrong it's about rebuilding a revenue stream the same as always. #doprah
Disruptions: Design Rivals Technology in Importance : Nice quotes!
Before there was Dear Sugar, there was Deary Abby: Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions, Dies at 94
"France Is Increasing Security at Sites in #Niger and at Home." #Uranium #Mali
On trial over the illegal use of sea unicorn parts: #dailywhale
N. Korea defiant on U.N. sanctions
Training Tips From Star Athletes #motivation #fitness
Interesting article! She’s (Rarely) the Boss
Christensen: We are living capitalist's dilemma
the ginger in me loves that world's #1 bachelor is part of the #gingerfamily
:-\ HMV gone into bankruptcy equivalent...
Really people??? ?: Readers sue Lance Armstrong for book refund after doping admission ?
British Woman Sentenced to Death in Bali Drug Case
DAILY REVIEW: Selected Letters of William Styron #Review
A cat standing on tree branches.
Two green and white trains sitting on the tracks.
A small white cat with glowing eyes standing underneath a chair.
A large boat in the water at the marina.
a bus driving in a street.
The lamb is looking at the camera.
A passenger train waiting in a station.
a woman at a dinner table writing on her notebook.
An Apple computer sitting on the floor.
A close-up of a brown horse's head.
A group of people eat at a table outside.
The curious boys look in the shed.
A jockey riding a horse.
A bull standing in the field.
The man is riding a motorcycle down the road.
A woman riding a brown horse.
The black and white cows pause in front of the gate.
A kid jumping a ledge with a bike.
A moped in front of steps of ruins.
A man sleeps with a baby in his lap.
A group of four people in a dinner having cake.
A black dog standing in front of yellow flowers.
Close up of a bottle of water.
A close up of a brown faced cat.
sheep standing in afield.
A group of people eat at a table outside.
A longed-haired cat with it's eyes closed.
A woman in a gray shirt smiles for the camera while the woman behind her makes a face.
A silver and blue Amtrak train on the tracks near a small train station.
A person in a blue shirt reclines near a coffee table and television.
Two cats are looking at a window.
A black and white photo of a woman showing a horse.
A dark brown horse standing in a field.
A pitched tent with a horse in the background.
Older man wearing beret with mountains in background.
The cows feed in the trough.
A small red and gray bird perched amongst the bare branches of a tree.
A person wearing a helmet rides a bike near a white structure.
A group of people sitting around a table with food on it.
A black and wood colored dining room set in a small apartment.
A brown horse stands in a lush green field.
a black and white cow in hay.
An elderly woman stands in a kitchen with two cats at her feet.
A school bus is driving uphill on a rural road.
A bag of cotton in front of a couch.
Camouflage airplane sitting on grassy field.
Three young women standing in a room together.
Red double decker bus driving through the streets.
A white sheep on a hillside looking at the camera.
A group of sheep in a field.
A close-up, distorted photo of an empty glass Coke bottle.
Very crowded office desk with computer monitor on.
A man sitting in a cluttered room.
Two white cows in a green pasture.
A man with a bicycle at a coffee house.
Black cow walking under trees in pasture.
Two horses standing in a field with trees in the background.
Two people sitting at a table at a restaurant.
Red double decker bus driving down a street.
A smiling woman with a beer sitting outside with another smiling woman.
A bird holding on to a metal gate.
The skinny cows are standing on the grass.
A women laying across two men sitting on a sofa.
a woman with a big necklace.
Brown cow with horns standing in a field.
A cruise liner docked at the shoreline.
Black and white cat lying under bush.
Brown and white cow standing in grass at side of road.
A small dog looking up at the camera while standing on grass.
A tan calf with a yellow tag on his left ear looking at the camera.
Black and white photo of couch with purse at one end.
The lamb is looking at the camera.
A red double decker bus on a crowded street.
A jockey riding a horse in a pen.
Two men on boat floating on the water.
This is a rear view of a Chevrolet sports car.
A person wearing a helmet rides a bike near a white structure.
A black and white photo of an old train station.
A grey and white tabby cat is sleeping on purple fabric.
A black and white cat is high up on tree branches.
A woman holding a small baby.
Group of horses grazing in grassy field.
Three men are sitting down at a table that has drinks on it.
Two people dressed in white standing on a grass field.
A young blonde girl wearing a helmet sits with a red bicycle behind her.
An orange tabby cat sleeping on the sofa.
Two Eagles perched on a branch.
A striped cat laying down on a bag of cat litter.
Blue couch and twin bed in a living room.
A man and small child in a living room posing for the camera.
A home office with three computer monitors and other equipment on a desk.
Five birds stand on the snow.
The udders of a dairy cow that is standing in a pasture near a large building.
A black vehicle parked with a vies of low-lying mountains.
A passenger train in the snow.
The black bird is sitting on the ground.
The black and white bull is looking at the camera.
A woman posing by a pillar with a U2 sign.
A young girl riding a white and grey horse.
A black and white sheep is walking next to a white sheep.
A living room with a dining table in the background.
The dining room table gets some afternoon sun.
A red moped parked on a sidewalk in front of graffiti.
The seagull is floating on the water.
The flock of sheep are spread out in the field.
Two dogs and one cat sitting on couch.
A black dog stands next to materials at a construction site.
A woman posing in front of an apartment building in the snow.
One Asian and one occasion woman in glasses smiling with their thumbs up.
A black train moves down the tracks.
Five cows are grazing beside the road.
Two mountain goats grazing in front of an alpine lake.
Black and white cows behind a fence.
A passenger train waiting in a station.
A white animal running through snow covered woods.
A bicycle is parked by a shop.
A man sitting on the grass looking toward the sky.
A black, flat screen television placed on the floor.
A silver bicycle is parked in a living room.
A orange and white cat laying on a blanket in a black leather chair.
The brown dog is resting his head on a white pillow.
Black train on train tracks.
Black train on train tracks.
Young couple sitting on a black couch.
A group of black people in front of a building with a moped.
An orange tabby cat sleeping on the sofa.
Elderly woman sitting on red patterned couch with her arm around younger woman.
The bald eagle is perched on a rope.
A couple posing for a picture on a couch.
The men are playing a guitar and having a drink.
Two cats sitting together on the sofa looking out the window.
Red double decker bus.
A close-up of an animal with a long face standing on grass near a tree.
A brown and white dog sits on a floral-patterned chair.
The black and brown cow is looking at the camera.
A man riding on the back of an orange SUV.
A group of people sitting at a restaurant table.
Two sheep on to of a cliff looking at the camera.
A black and white photo of an empty train station.
A row of locomotives on a siding in a field.
A white Apple computer sits on the beige carpeting of a bedroom.
a dog napping under a small table.
Red and white bus driving down road.
A boat with four sails is sailing on water.
Red sports car racing down track.
A smiling woman holding a small baby.
Black bird sitting on a concrete slab.
A Victory Liner bus is white with red and gold stripes.
Red double decker bus on side of street.
A group of river barges with trees in the background.
The seagull is floating on the water.
A motorcycle parked next to a car.
A cat laying on a red cushion looking at the camera.
Gray cat looking out the window.
a black and white photo of a cow under a tree.
A potted plant in sunlight from a window.
Two green and white trains sitting on the tracks.
Four people are rowing a boat near the shore.
A girl in a red shirt is riding a brown horse.
Two airplanes in the sky.
A coal train traveling down the tracks.
There is a small desk and chair in front of the laundry room.
An Amtrak passenger train waiting at a station.
A large jet on the ground at the airport.
A cat looking at the camera.
World news headlines displayed on a large screen.
Two women posing with a baby.
A young girl wearing a helmet riding a pony.
A grey cat lying on a wooden table.
People sitting on the porch.
Two horses standing in a pen.
A man sitting in a back yard playing the guitar.
The red train and the yellow train on on the tracks.
Two people sitting at a table at a restaurant.
A lamb stands near two tiny animals.
A father napping in a chair with a baby on his lap.
a close up head of an ostrich.
A person riding a dirt bike in the outdoors.
Tan cow with ear tags on a grassy field.
Green and white bird perched on tree branch.
Sail boat sailing on the water.
A red and white plane flying on a sunny day.
A man in a top hat rides a white horse.
A black and white photo of an old train station.
A bicycle in front of some ruins.
a woman with a viking hat on.
Parked white double decker bus.
Red double decker bus on side of street.
A woman riding a brown horse.
A field of black faced sheep.
Two birds are perched on a metal band.
A bus drives down a busy road.
Table with blue table cloth in kitchen.
An elderly Asian couple pose with a yawning baby at a dinner table.
Brown and white ducks walking on green grass.
A young woman with a bracelet is wearing a bikini top and jeans.
A brown horse grazing in a field of green grass.
A pot of liquid is at the center of a tinfoil covered plate.
A black and white cow standing in a grassy field.
A yellow and blue airplane is flying in the sky.
Two men standing in grass staring at a car.
A women sitting in a chair at Christmas holding make up.
Four Asian young people sitting in a den or living room.
Train going down the tracks.
A young woman dressed in black.
Two Indian women with two Indian girls near the water.
Group of people sitting at table with drinks.
A table is set with wine and dishes for two people.
A plane flying at a distance.
A group of river barges with trees in the background.
A living room with a dining table in the background.
Yellow striped cat resting on blue sofa.
A passenger train coming into a station.
Two people paddling in a red canoe with trees in the background.
A moped in front of ruins.
People ride mopeds in an urban setting.
A black train moves down the tracks.
A white jeep parked in front of a store.
Two women standing in front of tour bus.
A person driving a cart pulled by a bicycle.
Large silver locomotive engine in a shed.
A man rides a large black motorbike.
A bicycle is parked outside a bookstore.
Plane in mid-flight at sunset.
Two people sitting on a large motorcycle.
Two red buses parked up with gardens in front of them.
A yellow parrot clings to the side of its cage.
A dog sniffing the bottom of a door.
Couple sailing in a small sailboat.
A silver and blue motorcycle sitting next to a car.
Red double decker bus.
Feet standing on a pretty day with large building in background.
A small white dog chews on a twig while lying on a wooden deck.
Man standing in front of silver train.
A close-up of a sheep with its tongue hanging out.
A black and white horned cow standing in a field.
a small bird sitting on a branch in winter.
A yellow bird is eating fruit on a wire grate.
A man riding a white horse in an arena.
A brown duck and white duck stand on the grass.
A black and white cat and dog on a striped couch.
A train sitting on the tracks near a field.
A women and small child sitting at a dinner table smiling at the camera.
A buddha statue sits on a table with a wooden table runner.
A man wearing black formal wear & a black top hat is riding a white show horse.
Two red buses driving in front of a garden.
Cows grazing in a snow covered field.
A man riding a white horse.
A small brown birds is eating from a bird feeder hanging from a tree.
This a picture of the countryside with a large city in the background.
Man with blue shirt standing in front of a fountain.
A girl in riding gear sits atop a brown horse.
A scantily clad woman is standing next to a car.
Several televisions are on the floor and stacked up on top of one another.
Sheep are grazing in a grassy field near a stand of trees.
A clear plastic chair in front of a bookcase.
A dog is wearing a gray jacket.
A sheep stands on a hillside.
A black and white cow standing in a grassy field.
Blue and red plane in mid-air flight.
A woman in a black bikini top and jeans.
A girl riding a brown horse.
Man standing in front of yellow corvette.
Three men posing in a tent.
A man sitting on the grass looking toward the sky.
A man poses in front of a large fountain with a statue on top.
The small dog protects its owner.
Children looking a sheep.
A white cat standing on a carpet.
A flat screen TV on the floor.
A close-up of a gray cat with green eyes.
Two brown horses standing in grassy field.
Two sheep stand in a doorway.
A train is at a train station.
Room with several computer monitors.
A line outside of a bookstore on a street.
The train heads down the tracks and along the hedge.
A passenger jet sits on a runway.
a little girl is laughing at the camera.
Old green bottle sitting on a table.
Three young women standing in a room together.
A black-and-white photo of a loveseat.
the back of a stop sign with many stickers on it.
Two white horses staring over a fence.
Living room or den with large screen television.
The black and white cows pause in front of the gate.
A black and white cow standing in a grassy field.
Two women sitting in lawn chairs.
A doubly decker red bus driving down the road.
a black and white photo of a cat lying down.
A man and woman stand, smiling for camera.
A orange and white cat asleep on a leather chair.
A white cat standing on a carpet.
Grey and white domestic kitten lying down on a desk.
A white bird with long orange legs standing by a lake.
A woman posing in front of an apartment building in the snow.
A young woman with a bracelet is wearing a bikini top and jeans.
A red train driving through a snow covered city.
A table and chairs are in a room with a picture on the wall and a ceiling fan.
The black bird is sitting on the ground.
A man sits crossed legged on a bed watching a small TV.
A Das Air Cargo plane sits on the runway.
The headlights on a blue car.
A cat sleeps on purple sheet.
A passenger train coming into a station.
A close-up of a cat on a cream sofa.
Three bicyclists crossing a bridge in a city.
A red and white bus drives down an England street.
An airplane facing the camera.
A woman riding a brown horse.
a jockey riding a horse.
The two dogs blend in with the stuff animals.
A kitchen with wood cabinets and dining table.
A train is running on the tracks.
A motorcycles is parked near a wall covered with a graffiti scene of a cityscape.
Someone standing on a snowy mountain, watching a plane.
The birds are swimming in the water.
A bird is flapping its wings in the water.
A black dog looking at the camera.
A cruise liner docked at a port.
A red double decker bus on a crowded street.
A woman pets a dog in a fenced area.
A black and white cat playing with a blanket.
A man on a mountain bike going down an incline.
A cat reclines on an office chair.
A group of horses grazing in a field.
A group of people having a drink.
Two dogs in a fenced kennel look ahead.
Three sheep on a dirt road viewed from a passenger vehicle.
A yellow and blue airplane is flying in the sky.
The train sits at the train station.
A train sitting on the tracks near a field.
Red double decker bus taking on passengers.
Two guys sit on a couch holding beers with a girl lying on their laps.
Two women in the kitchen looking at a object.
A race horse galloping without a rider.
A steam engine and train moving toward the camera.
A group of horses grazing in a field.
A black and white photo of a glass bottle of Coca Cola.
A small bird perched on an icy branch.
Several people on motorcycles in a market square.
Three sheep on a dirt road viewed from a passenger vehicle.
Boy with glasses typing on a computer.
Group of people posing with two men dressed as Elvis.
A red truck spins their tires while a black one leaves the frame.
A living room with table, chair and sofa alongside a large palm.
A smiling woman holding a small baby.
An Esso gas station with trees in the background.
Four blue and yellow planes flying over four boats.
A horse standing near a gate with another horse in the background.
Three bottles are on a table.
Two boys sit facing one another at a table and one points at the other.
A steam engine comes down a train track near trees.
A train is at a train station.
Two white dogs are swimming in the water.
Parrot pushing a small shopping cart.
a woman sitting on a sofa holding a baby.
Man in yellow canoe paddling through water.
Two birds flying towards water feeder.
Two cows standing in a large field.
Beer bottles (-LRB- Harp Lager )-RRB- lined up on the floor.
Two women sitting outside laughing.
A group of sheep grazing on a hill.
A man stands in front of a train.
A steam engine and train moving toward the camera.
Two women are posing for the camera and giving the thumbs up sign.
A women holds a small baby while sitting on a sofa.
A double decker red United bus on a city street.
Two women sitting on brown couch.
A grey cat with green eyes looking into the camera.
The bird is sitting on the branch.
Group of people sitting at table of restaurant.
A black and white cow stands on grass against a partly cloudy blue sky.
A brown and white cow in a field looking into the camera.
A guy on a white horse.
Two dairy cows drinking from a pond.
There are several sheared sheep in a pen.
Black and white cow standing near pile of snow.
The black dog is lying in the grass.
Home office space with bright green walls and artwork.
Large white cruise ship floating on water.
Two young people are sitting at a table next to a sliding glass door, with one person pointing at the other.
A black and white photo of a man driving a car and someone with a motorcycle.
A man and a woman holding hands walking along the beach.
Ten sheep looking at the camera.
A black and white dog looking at the camera.
A black table with white fuzzy chair.
Red double decker bus taking on passengers.
Sail boat sailing on the water.
A blue bird perches on the gloved hand of a person.
Three people are by the water with yellow canoes.
A girl riding on a brown and white horse.
A mostly black train on a track.
A young boy coloring with a red and blue crayon.
Two bald eagles perched on a branch.
A backpack standing beside a train.
A group of people in a living room.
A mallard and a tame white duck on the grass near water.
The cat is sitting between two bicycles in front of a door.
A girl with a red bag standing on the street.
A girl in a riding hat on a horse.
A horse rider is riding a white horse.
A man dressed in a pale scarf with a stick.
The bird is sitting on the branch.
A long train is on train tracks.
A black and tan dog looks at a black sheep.
A room with several computers and pictures on the wall.
A very retro living room with a television in it.
A black and white photo of a cow walking under a tree in a field.
A silver AreoMexico Jet Liner sitting on the tarmac.
a man on a dirt bike jumping very high.
A girl in a riding hat on a horse.
Two people sailing a small white sail boat.
A white airplane is parked on the cement.
A group of peoples posing in fur hats.
Three cows grazing in a field.
A car is pulling off the side of the road onto the street.
The man is sitting at a messy table and using a laptop.
Black domestic cat lying on brown table.
A dining table with candles, wine, and a teapot.
Four children looking at barn animals.
A black and white cat playing with a wool basket.
Two people paddling a red canoe are reflected in the still water.
A scantily clad woman is standing next to a car.
Red double decker bus taking on passengers.
The man is sitting cross legged wearing a cloak and holding a stick.
A buddha statue holding a candle is sitting on a table.
Two black and white dogs at the bottom of stairs.
Three people sitting at dinner table smiling at camera.
A multi-colored train on a track.
A white and red bus traveling on the street.
A red and blue plane flying with its landing gears down.
Small boat going down a creek.
Four women and two men sit at a long table in a restaurant.
An old fashioned wooden sailing ship in the ocean.
Two goats standing in a field by a tree.
A man sitting cross legged on the grass, with a tree in the background.
A black and white photo of a living room with a large window, sofa, and chair.
Close up of a brown horse with a blue halter.
A large black bird is sitting in the water.
A close-up of a cat on a cream sofa.
A person is jumping a bicycle and performing a trick.
A yellow school bus is parked in a rural area.
A pug dog wits on a yellow chair next to a green dumpster.
The woman is sitting on the red motorcycle.
A sheep standing on a table at auction.
A close-up of a black train engine.
A orange and white cat asleep on a leather chair.
a train rides on his tracks.
Two men on boat floating on the water.
Black and white cow standing in grassy field.
A double decker red United bus on a city street.
Two cats sitting on a couch looking out the window.
The television and desk of hotel room with lamp lighting.
A man riding a small bicycle.
Three goats are being rounded up by a dog.
A woman wearing a navy dress is cutting a cake on a white table.
A man doing a wheelie on a mountain bike.
A tan puppy on a carpeted floor.
A black train moves down the tracks.
A close-up picture of a white and purple motorcycle.
A young girl riding a brown horse.
A black dog standing in a grassy area.
Two women in the kitchen looking at a object.
Two women posing with a baby.
A group of people sitting around a table containing food.
Train in a station.
A blue motorcycle is parked on the sidewalk.
A blue bird standing on a lawn.
A red double decker bus on a city street.
Two trains inside a train station.
A woman equestrian riding a horse.
An empty office cubicle.
A man riding a white horse.
Train going down the tracks.
A man and two women smiling at the camera while sitting on a blue sofa.
A man and woman sit at a table in a restaurant.
A young man wearing a striped shirt is holding two bicycles.
A large cruise ship in harbor with trees behind.
A white plane on the runway.
Two cows crossing a road intersection.
Several cows grazing on the median by the road.
A television, upholstered chair, and coffee stable in a bright room.
The white ducks are standing on the ground.
A black cow and a brown cow stands in a plain in front of an uprooted tree.
Red double decker bus driving down street.
A group of people eat at a table outside.
Tan cow with ear tags on a grassy field.
A close up of the front end of a purple and white motor cycle.
Two women shopping at a clothing store.
A group of people sitting at a restaurant table.
A close-up of a brown horse's head.
A person in a red cap standing next to a brick support beam.
A bay foal is walking next to its mother in a grassy field.
A women standing next to a brown cow.
Two cats sitting on a couch looking out the window.
A dog peaks out the back of a truck.
Woman in blue shift dress cutting into food.
The black and white cat is looking up at the camera.
Two brunette girls sit atop a red an yellow motorcycle with a side car.
A small white cat standing in a sink.
A man on the back seat of a red tandem bicycle.
The small dog is wearing a sweater and looking up at the camera.
Two men standing in grass staring at a car.
A computer on a desk.
A small child smiling at the camera.
A little bird floating in the water.
A woman stands in front of a building in the snow.
A white bus with the word Julia is near water and a big ship.
Home office space with bright green walls and artwork.
Old blue and white train on tracks.
Young baby girl sitting on table.
A green car parked at a saloon.
Yellow boat on a beach.
Group of people sitting around a restaurant dining table.
A kitchendiner with papers laying on the blue clothed dining table.
Train in a station.
A gray cat is sitting on the window ledge looking at the camera.
Two ducks are standing by the water.
A black and white cow in a pen with hay.
Man playing guitar while sitting down.
A man and woman are posing for the camera.
Red double decker bus driving down a street.
A green and white cargo plane taking of from an airport.
Three cows are grazing in a grassy field.
The brown train is sitting on the railroad tracks.
A black and white horned cow standing in a field.
Two cats are close together inside and black and white furry enclosure.
A tiny blonde child in a blue dress sits on a table near her mother.
A group of people sitting at a restaurant table.
A black and white cow in a pen with hay.
A red, double-decker bus.
A yellow school bus parked in a field.
A close-up view of a horse's head.
An elderly man works on his laptop at home.
An old fashioned wooden sailing ship in the ocean.
A sheep standing in a mountainous area.
A group of people sitting on a small sofa next to a kitchen.
A white plane on the runway.
A tan puppy being petted.
The cat is sitting on a bag of cat food.
Elegant dining room with wood furniture.
A women laying across two men sitting on a sofa.
two motorbikes on a dirt track.
A man jumping his dirt bike.
The black and white cat is looking up at the camera.
A large pile of wooden items piled high.
A gray cat with green eyes looks at the camera.
Two lambs stand on a grassy hill.
A black and white photo of a bottle sitting atop a rock carving in front of a line of bushes.
A woman riding a brown horse.
Black and white photo of a girl on a sofa.
A black and white cat is sitting on a brown chair looking up.
A black and white horned cow standing in a field.
A man in white with a wine bottle and a woman in a red turtleneck with a white vest.
A lone cow sits in the cold of the yard.
A double decker bus drives on a city street.
Large black and white cat resting on a windowsill.
Boy feeding a sheep.
A black dog stands next to materials at a construction site.
A girl in a black desktop holds up an open box of Corn Flakes and a carton of milk.
a close up of a small cactus in a pot.
The white sheep is standing on the green hill.
A long-haired man with a hat standing between two large, half-empty Coke bottles.
A black and white bird on a body of water with grass in the background.
A wooden bicycle with an awning.
A black and white photo of a dilapidated wooden fence.
Two women sitting in chairs in a shop.
Two brown horses standing in a green meadow.
Two men wearing bike helmets.
An AeroMexico jet taxing along a runway.
A red bird and four other birds sitting in the snow.
A women painting a chair with a dining room in the background.
A man playing a video game in a store.
A group of people sitting around a table on a porch.
An older Asian couple poses with a newborn baby at the dinner table.
A young girl wearing a bike helmet with a bicycle in the background.
the back of a stop sign with many stickers on it.
A bicycle is parked outside a bookstore.
a brown double decker tour bus on a street with a ferris wheel behind it.
A black and white chair sitting in front of a brick wall and a window with a bamboo plant in a vase.
Domestic cat looking out window.
Two cows graze in a field.
A man in a black uniform on a white horse.
A cat sleeping on the coach with a pillow behind it.
Two women stand in a living room with a black dog.
Two motorbikes racing on a dirt course.
Two people paddling a red canoe are reflected in the still water.
A close-up view of the headlights of a blue old-fashioned car.
A person is standing underneath an overpass near a highway.
Cars driving near a model building.
A woman and child push strollers down the sidewalk.
A blue and orange airplane flying with its landing gear down.
A young woman is riding a Bay hose in a dirt riding-ring.
A white bird flying up onto a tree.
A black and white cat lying on a blanket.
A building with a temporary sign over the entrance to its parking lot.
A group of people sitting around a table containing food.
A man and women sitting on a sofa holding a small baby.
A black and white cat lying on a blanket.
A black and white photo of a love seat.
A living room with a dining table in the background.
A woman at the dining table with wine, beer, and lemons.
A red and gray train is going through a tunnel.
Red double decker bus with hood open.
A laptop computer and a computer monitor.
A man riding a white horse.
View of a living room with a dining room in the background.
An orange kitten lay on a leather couch.
A white cat laying on an office chair.
A small yellow boat sitting on a tropical beach.
Two women are sheering a white sheep inside of a wooden building.
A person wearing a bike helmet talks on a cell phone.
A subway train pulling into the station.
A bicycle is parked by a shop.
Two men standing on beach.
A man with glasses and two plastic bottles in the foreground.
Long-haired black dog standing in grassy field.
A small desk with chair near a laundry closet.
Red double decker bus driving through the streets.
A goose flapping its wings in a body of water.
A gray cat laying on a brown table.
Motorcycle parked next to a car outside.
A close-up of a brown horse.
Boy laying on couch with dog.
A black and white image of a cat laying on a rug.
A large jet on the ground at the airport.
A pile of used wooden building materials with a chair on top.
Two women are sitting in a cafe.
Eight bottles of Harp lager lined up on the floor.
An office with multiple desks and green walls.
A woman leading a white horse.
A small child smiling at the camera.
A woman riding a brown horse.
photo of a television screen showing a movie.
A bird perched on a flowerpot.
White cat sitting inside of a sink.
Young woman in riding gear on top of horse.
Two people are sailing a small boat.
A small bird on a tiny branch.
Two animals sitting on a rock.
Two cats sit on the back of a couch looking out the window.
A man on a motorcycle performing a wheelie.
A passenger train waiting at the city train station.
Two young women shear a sheep.
Left side of a silver train engine.
The young rider takes a ride on the brown horse.
Six people are seated at a restaurant table and looking into the camera.
Little white lamb with nose to wood.
A black train moves down the tracks.
A Philips flat-screen TV is shown with its two remote controls.
A cruise ship is in front of a docking area.
A young girl riding a white and grey horse.
A black dog stands next to materials at a construction site.
Blue couch and twin bed in a living room.
A bird is flapping its wings in the water.
A black and white cow standing in hay looks back at the camera.
A black and white cat lying on a blanket.
Young woman in riding gear on top of horse.
A plane being readied for take-off.
A white leather couch with a purse and throw blanket on it.
Four people rowing down a river.
A dark brown horse standing in a field.
A kitchen with wooden cabinets and furniture.
A white bicycle stands on a floor.
A bird eating from a bird feeder.
Black bird sitting on a concrete slab.
Two men talking in front of a plane.
Dark colored dog standing in grassy field.
A young blonde girl wearing a smile and a bicycle helmet.
two cats, one brown and one white laying on a bed with a blue blanket.
The cat is attacking a corn husk broom.
The train sits at the train station.
A couple holds a baby.
A small bird eating from the feeder.
Close up of a white sheep with a black head.
Two brown horses standing in grassy field.
A young boy laying on a sofa with a dog.
A red bird is perched in a tree.
Two buses parked on a street.
A black and white dog looking at the camera.
Two animals sitting on a rock.
A train is on the railroad tracks.
Boy lying on couch with small white dog.
Large silver locomotive engine in a shed.
A women sitting at a table drinking with a basketball picture in the background.
A green steam engine traveling on the railroad tracks.
A small red car on top of a semi truck.
The man poses for a photo in front of the train.
A bicyclist in black on a black and red racing bike.
A kitchen sink and countertop with bowls on shelves.
A woman is laying down on the floor and holding a baby up above her.
A black and white cow looking through the fence.
A television in a messy room with several bookcases.
A black and white cat sleeping on its side on a purple blanket.
A woman riding a bicycle on a large concrete area.
Two cows standing in a large field.
A bald man touches the nose of a black horse on the other side of a fence.
A man is standing next to a yellow sports car.
A grey house with a red door.
Two women in a clothing store.
A woman with a white horse.
a black and white photo of cows in their stalls.
Older gentleman looking at red motorcycle.
Depressed woman sitting on couch.
Double decker bus with the London Eye ferris wheel in background.
A yellow and black bird eats from a bird feeder.
Black and white cows grazing in a pen.
A small camouflaged airplane parked in the grass.
A man stands in front of a train.
A small plane parked at an airfield with a cloudy sky overhead.
A boat is on the water near a small plane.
A man riding a white horse in an arena.
A Macintosh computer sitting on the floor.
An elderly woman catches a ride on the back of the bicycle.
A black and white cat is sitting on a brown chair looking up.
sheep standing in afield.
Group of elderly people sitting around a table.
A black and white photo of a love seat.
Three women with brown hair are smiling.
A black and white photo of an empty train station.
The brown and white cows are eating in the trough.
Two dogs in a fenced kennel look ahead.
Black bird standing on concrete.
A black and white cow looking through the fence.
Several people on motorcycles in a market square.
A close-up of a sheep in the grass.
Domestic cat laying on back of cat litter.
Crowd of people walking past a giant mushroom.
Two green birds fly towards a wooden telephone pole.
A person sitting on a motorcycle while a man stands by.
Three cows grazing in a field.
A young woman with outstretched arms stands in front of a "Going Places" bus.
A sheep beside a road and a lake.
Black and white cow standing in grassy field.
A blue bird perched on a gloved hand.
A group of people having a meal outside.
A baby holds a ketchup packet.
A close-up view of a horse's head.
Two cats sitting together on the sofa looking out the window.
A train is at a train station.
A dark brown horse standing in a field.
A man sitting on a bench looking at a dog on a leash sitting on sidewalk.
A small cat laying on a wooden beam looking up at the camera.
The black bird is sitting on the ground.
A group of people sit at a table in an Italian restaurant.
Tan cows look closely at the camera.
A blue scooter parked on a sidewalk.
Older woman holding newborn baby.
A small brown birds is eating from a bird feeder hanging from a tree.
Mall attackers used 'less is more' strategy
Opposition leaders emerge to commemorate Cambodian workers' deaths
Weak earnings drag stocks lower
6.8 quake strikes off Solomon Islands
Liquid ammonia leak kills 15 in Shanghai
Friends of Syria recognizes opposition coalition as legitimate representative of Syrian people
Weiner stays in NYC mayor's race amid new sexting scandal
Death toll rises in Russia plane crash
Indian media: Commonwealth summit
Suicide bomber hits funeral in Iraq
7 detained for 'house sister' scandal
Syria military police chief defects to opposition
Boeing 787 Dreamliner catches fire; stock takes a beating
Yvette Cooper backs gay marriage bill
Five killed in Belgian coach crash
Gunmen abduct seven foreign workers in Nigeria
Swiss tourist 'gang-raped' in India
Palestinians clash with Israeli forces in West Bank, Jerusalem
Israel planes strike inside Syria
Iranians Vote in Presidential Election
100 killed in new Darfur tribal clashes
Protest against US drone strikes in Pak postponed
12 killed in bus accident in Pakistan
Carney sets high bar to change at BoE
8 arrested after deadly Bangladesh building collapse
Suicide bomber kills 3 at US base in Afghanistan
Afghans flock to colleges, even as Taliban loom
North Korea Postpones Family Reunions with South
Apple revenue misses again, iPhone disappoints
Gunmen kill 10 foreign tourists in northern Pakistan
David Beckham Announces Retirement From Soccer
Matt Smith to leave Doctor Who after 4 years
Generations divided over gay marriage
23 killed in Iraq car bombings
Man Who Set Himself on Fire on National Mall Dies of Injuries
Taliban attacks kill 17 civilians in Afghanistan
China Yuan Strengthens to 6.168 against USD Monday
Egypt minister survives assassination attempt
Texas residents seek healing at church after deadly blast
Shinzo Abe Selected as Japan’s Prime Minister
Ex-first lady Barbara Bush leaves Texas hospital
2 dead in Bangladesh clashes over Jamaat leader’s execution
Schumacher in a coma after ski accident
11 killed in Chinese police station attack
Mali due to vote for president
Bradley Cooper and JJ Abrams in talks about filming a Lance Armstrong biopic
Boeing airliner crashes in Russia, 50 killed
EU ministers 'determined' to resolve horsemeat scandal
De Blasio sworn in as New York mayor, succeeding Bloomberg
Thai opposition party to boycott general election
Bangladesh building collapse death toll hits 540: army
Pussy Riot member Alyokhina released from jail in Russia
Jagan Reddy shifted to hospital, power crisis continues in Seemandhra
Asiana jet crash lands at San Francisco airport
Central African Republic president overthrown by rebels
Brazil tied 2-2 by England as Maracana re-opens
China to resume US investment talks
California wildfire: 1,900 on the lines as firefighters labor to limit damage (+video)
George W. Bush warns against bitter immigration debate
Mandela hospitalized, responding to treatment
Russia condemns North Korean nuclear test
Hundreds of Bangladesh clothes factory workers ill
Yemen suicide bombing kills soldiers
18 trapped in Russian coal mine blast
Thai protesters break into army headquarters
Israel conducts airstrike on Syria
Police fire tear gas to disperse protesters in Tunis
Blizzard hammers U.S. Northeast, five dead, 700,000 lose power
Egypt's main opposition rejects president's call for dialogue
Tokyo to host 2020 Olympic Games
'Around 100 dead or injured' after China earthquake
Housing starts up 6.8% in May
2 French Journalists Killed in Mali
&gt;Cuba's Castro assumes CELAC presidency
Vehicles ablaze in collapsed Japan tunnel
6.9 magnitude earthquake hits New Zealand
Dozens feared trapped in India building collapse
Nelson Mandela taken to hospital
Daily Press Briefing: South Sudan
Islamists attack north Mali city after suicide bombings
Cardinals enter Vatican for historic vote
Britain set to deport of Abu Qatada
French parliament backs reform of law on prostitution
Shots, Explosions Heard as Thais Continue Protest in Bangkok
Israeli military focuses on northern border
North Korea blocks Kaesong access
AU leaders meet for Africa Day
Today in History, April 23
Manning sentenced to 35 years in prison
US Senate approves fiscal cliff deal
Zimmerman stopped for speeding in Texas, released with warning
Iran's Rouhani warns of Talibanisation in Syria
Syria denies reports of deadly Damascus nerve gas attack
China stocks close higher after economic meeting
Russia unveils $30 billion oil link to Pacific
Police kill gunman, find 3 more dead in Colo. home
Dolce and Gabbana convicted of tax evasion
7.2-magnitude quake hits Pakistan: CENC
UK alert on Syrian chemical arms
China stocks close lower on Friday
Asteroid zips between Earth and satellites
Fight for Mali Town Reflects Islamist Tactics
Two Santa trackers competing this Christmas
Ships Train for Syrian Chemical Weapons Transport
Mayor says 14 dead in Texas fertilizer plant blast
2 killed, 11 wounded in attacks in Iraq
Can the U.S. trust Syria to hand over chemical weapons?
Mexican singer Jenni Rivera believed killed in plane crash
Bangladesh court sentences first lawmaker to death for war crimes
Mugabe declared winner of disputed elections
Death toll climbs to 15 in Indonesia boat sinking
Egyptian court bans Muslim Brotherhood
Rouhani leads in Iran presidential vote - preliminary results
Israelis, Palestinians convene over prisoner swap
Police attacked in Belfast flag protests
CBN reiterates plan to phase out polymer notes
S.Korea proposes 'final' N.Korea talks over Kaesong
India gang-rape victim "struggling against the odds"
Gunmen kill 9 foreign tourists, 1 Pakistani
Statement by the Spokesperson of High Representative Catherine Ashton on the latest spate of attacks in Iraq
Egypt increases security before pro-Morsi protests
Yacimovich urges cabinet to approve Palestinian prisoners release
U.S. files espionage charges agains NSA leaker
Palestinians build another West Bank tent protest
Bangladesh building collapse death toll hits 362
Israeli envoys summoned over settlement plans
Chinese general's son gets 10 years jail for rape
2 dead, 2 injured in Nevada middle school shooting
Moderate earthquake jolts NW Pakistan
Hamas mixed sex schools ban takes effect
32 die in Bangladesh protest
Man arrested after police officer shot in Leeds
Ukrainian Prime Minister resigns amid protests
Obama to refocus on economy in State of the Union
Google launches internet-beaming balloons
Iraq Backs Egypt Crackdown on Morsi Supporters
Russia gives initial OK to American adoption ban
Five convicted in Kosovo organ trafficking case
Hrithik Roshan, wife Sussanne part ways
Gunman Among 7 Dead After Florida Apartment Shooting
Obama lauds progress on gay rights in inaugural address
Wave of bombings kills 15 in Iraq
In shock move, Obama puts Syria strike on hold
Israel strikes Syria as tensions rise on weapons
Gunmen kill nine people in northwest Pakistan
The San Francisco plane crash at a glance
8 arrested after deadly Bangladesh building collapse
X'mas cruise passengers hit by Norovirus
Murder claim over Diana's death New information which has been passed to the police relating to the deaths of Princess Diana and Dodi Fayed is thought to include an allegation that they were murdered 
Snowden asks to stay in Russia
Chinese shares close lower Wednesday
Stomach bug to cause ailing Nadal to miss Australian Open
Narendra Modi pledges tough stand against Pakistan
Thai police use tear gas against protesters
Calif man pleads not guilty in girl kidnap case
Egyptian court considers Mubarak’s release
Boy Scouts delay decision on admitting gays
2 car bombs kill 8 in southern Iraq
Van der Sloot to Marry in Prison
Tokyo stocks close down 0.26pc
China stock index futures close higher -- Dec. 4
Pictures of the day: 7 August 2013
Palestinians 'hit' by Israeli fire in Gaza
Where's Rusty? Red panda vanishes from National Zoo
Jesse Jackson Jr. and wife to plead guilty to fraud
USA expels Venezuela diplomats in row
BBC veteran Hall admits child sex abuse
7 killed, 3 injured in south China road accident
Ryanair reports record profits but warns growth likely to slow this year
Stocks to watch at close on Monday
50th anniversary of JFK's death remembered
6.3-magnitude earthquake hits Taiwan
Books To Help Kids Talk About Boston Marathon News
Tech Sector Heats Up: Google and IBM Post Strong Earnings
Queen Beatrix of The Netherlands to abdicate for son
Motorists killed after Japanese tunnel collapses
Profiles of Kenya's presidential candidates
Israel frees Palestinian prisoners
Philadelphia building collapses, 8-10 people may be trapped
Obama meets with Mandela family
U.S. Senate sets off gun control debate
Chinese shares close lower on Wednesday
Car bombing kills 53 in Damascus
'Friends of Syria' in Doha talks on arming rebels
Syria condemns Israeli air strikes.
Egypt's leader imposes state of emergency in 3 cities
ABVP protesters clash with police at Jantar Mantar, throw stones
Turkish PM urges to end protests in Istanbul
Red grapes and blueberries boost immune system, scientists say
Two men charged with terrorism offences
EU receives Nobel Peace Prize
Start of San Fermin bull-running festival briefly delayed as view obstructed by Basque flag
Up to 21, mostly foreigners, killed in Kabul suicide attack
Former LAPD officer sought in Irvine slayings
Tokyo shares close 0.88pc lower
Pakistan court demands 'blasphemy' rampage answers
Intel's McAfee Buys Cloud-Based, Networked Firewall Specialist Stonesoft For $389M In Cash
4.1 magnitude quake strikes U.S
Bangladesh Opposition Leader Sentenced to Death for War Crimes
Alleged cop killer died from shot to head
2 police killed in eastern Afghan explosion
Car bomb at Swedish consulate in Libya's Benghazi, no casualties
Musharraf arrested in Lal Masjid case
Iran hopes nuclear talks will yield 'roadmap'
35 militants killed in Afghan raids: official
North Korea reportedly test-fires short-range missiles
Thai protesters obstruct vote; 1 dead in violence
Venezuela's Hugo Chavez dies of cancer
North Korea's third test brings it closer to nuclear power status
North Korea conducts third nuclear test
Indian stocks open flat
Macau Gambling Revenue Hits Record $38 bn in 2012
Israelis, Palestinians resume talks in US
The Note's Must-Reads for Monday, November 25, 2013
Nelson Mandela memorial service
NM County Prepares for Same-Sex Marriages Hearing
Lebanon businesses strike in protest at political impasse
Four U.S. Air Force helicopter crew members killed in UK crash
Tokyo to host 2020 Olympic Games
Malaysia detains Australian senator at airport
Indian police round up all five suspects in Mumbai rape case
Security tightens for Thatcher funeral
South Korea Says North Fired Missiles
Britain shuts down plants as horse meat scandal reaches France
US warns Syria on chemical weapons
37 killed in bus crash in Italy
U.S. dumps bombs at Great Barrier Reef
38 Taliban militants killed in Afghanistan
China yuan strengthens to 6.2689 against USD
U.S. recognizes Syrian opposition
Google invests $200 million in Texas wind farm
Egypt votes in new constitution
Preston and England legend Tom Finney dies at 91
China strives to avoid economic traps
Car bomb kills one and wounds five in Benghazi
Roadside bombs kill 5 in Afghanistan
Sri Lanka's Tamils Vote for Greater Autonomy
French-led troops close in on Timbuktu
Nato airstrike kills two Afghan kids
Gunmen Kill 11 Foreign Tourists in Pakistan
N Korea to halt work at joint industrial zone
Delhi Gang Rape Suspect 'Beaten, Poisoned'
Demolition work begins on Don Valley Stadium
France pledges military aid in Mali
Most powerful typhoon of 2013 hits the Philippines
Egyptians vote on divisive constitution
Reid cites 'tremendous progress' in debt ceiling talks
Calls for more Egypt protests
6.2 magnitude quake jolts Sarangani
One dead, 11 hurt in LA car chaos
Chairman of easyJet to step down
Obama renews offer to cut social safety net in big budget deal: aide
Suicide Bomber Kills 14 at Afghan Province Council
US confirms al-Qaeda leader has been captured
Committee nears final big immigration decisions
US Troops Killed in Afghan Insider Attack
Mother arrested on suspicion of manslaughter after dog kills daughter
London Marathon observes silence for Boston bomb victims
Messi nets 300th, 301st goals in Barcelona win
Five dead, 40 missing in Canada train disaster
Tunisian opposition politician shot dead
Ukrainian Prime Minister Azarov and entire government resign
UN presses need for major boost in Syrian aid
Stocks soar on Wall St lead
George Zimmerman found not guilty of Trayvon Martin murder
Whistleblower Edward Snowden flies to Moscow
17 killed, 133 wounded in bomb attacks in northern Iraq
Insiders Reveal 2012 Election Secrets
Royal sorrow over nurse's death
N Korea says it may delay controversial rocket launch
Two NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
US government 'on the edge of shutdown'
Critical Gates memoir rocks Obama administration
Jeff Bezos Bets $250 Million on Reviving Washington Post
Brooks pleads not guilty to hacking charges
Purge sends chilling message to North Korea's elite
South Africans mark ailing Mandela's 95th birthday
Obama declares health care law is working
Heavy rain raises threat of Christmas Day flooding
Thousands protest gay marriage
Taiwan gang leader nabbed at airport after 17 years
The Note's Must-Reads for Friday, December 6, 2013
Iran nuke talks begin amid hopes of progress
Thai political protests paralyse more ministries
Amazon's Bezos to buy the Washington Post for $250 million
Obama economic tour buffeted by low expectations
Israel vows to deny Hezbollah after air strike
France Welcomes US-Russia Deal on Syria
More French soldiers to Central African Republic
UN resolution orders Syria chemical arms destroyed
Exclusive-UPDATE 2-Egypt pro-Mursi alliance signals flexibility in talks
David Beckham to retire at end of season
Deaths confirmed after helicopter crashes into Scottish pub
Libya abruptly closes its borders with four countries
6.0-magnitude quake hits Greece -- USGS
Search after man swept into sea
Militants stage Pakistan jailbreak
Meteorite hits central Russia, more than 500 people hurt
North Korea Nuclear Test Sparks Worry
Blizzard brings US northeast to a halt
NATO protesters acquitted of terrorism charges
'Credibility on the line over Syria'
Taliban on agenda for US in Pakistan
123 killed in fighting in northern Syria
Egypt interior minister survives bomb
China's yuan weakens to 6.2767 against USD Thursday
Obama holds talks over Syria action
Egypt 'freezes Muslim Brotherhood assets'
Zen Report: Ain't easy being high maintenance
Critics say Putin’s security restrictions violate rights
Tony Abbott sworn in as new Australian PM
Egypt army cracks down on Brotherhood
Venezuela assembly meets amid Chavez health crisis
Egypt braces for more protests, prays for calm
Syria opposition threatens to quit talks
Morsi supporters protest in Egypt
Suicide bomber kills policeman in Pakistan
Anti-government protesters storm the streets of Kyiv
Chicago man to be sentenced for terror convictions
US drone strike kills three in northwest Pakistan
Track fault disrupts train service between Raffles Place, Marina Bay
Stocks rise in early trading
Manning Sentenced to 35 Years for Leaking Government Secrets
UK police say no terrorism link to helicopter crash
Suicide bomber kills 13 in Russia's south
41 killed, 22 wounded in violent attacks in Iraq
Bangladesh building collapse death toll hits 540: army
Kerry to visit Jordan, Israel-Palestinian peace on agenda
Eurozone jobless hits fresh record high
Defiant Mugabe sworn in for seventh term blasts 'vile' West
Nelson Mandela's real hero was not Gandhi, but Nehru
Facing Bailout Tax, Cypriots Try to Get Cash Out of Banks
Obama signs up for Obamacare
Lance Armstrong confesses all to Oprah
Andy Murray deserves knighthood, David Cameron says
Hushen 300 Index closes higher -- Oct. 14
US State Department faulted over Benghazi
Soccer-France to host Australia for first time in October
Honduran ambassador to Colombia sacked after wild party
Syria must destroy chemical weapons
Moderate tremor in the Central Mediterranean
Three Afghans killed in suicide attack
Suicide Bombs Hit Egypt Military in Sinai, Kill 6
Asian markets gain on upbeat US economic data
Nelson Mandela in Hospital for Tests
Iran, six global powers sign landmark nuclear deal
Suicide bomber kills 9 at Pakistan political rally
Four Morsi supporters killed in Egypt clashes
Students take a ride on airwaves
Pistorius officer dropped from case
Vinnie Jones reveals cancer battle new
Stocks close 0.39% higher
Pakistani Taliban chief Hakimullah Mehsud killed in drone strike
Dozens killed in air strike on bakery in central Syria
Gunmen kill one soldier, injure two others in Pakistan
Police confirm how suspect was captured
Destruction of Syria's chemical weapons begins
Flooding in Canada forces evacuation of another city
UN says US drones violate Pakistan's sovereignty
Obama Praises Mandela 'Inspiration'
Obama coming 'to listen' to Israel, Palestinians
The e-mails - Oil firm asked trader about meeting with minister
Death toll in Nigeria police attack rises to 30
Syria 'to declare chemical weapons and sign convention'
Australia to scrap soaring national debt ceiling
Asian markets hit 3-wk high on hopes of US debt deal
Italian Prime Minister Mario Monti Resigns
South Africa Admits Mistake Over 'Schizophrenic' Mandela Signer
Iran says serious issues remain in nuclear talks
Crowds Gather in Bethlehem for Christmas
Seven peacekeepers killed in Sudan's Darfur
NATO: Patriot missile battery operational on Syrian border
US stocks tumble on third day of shutdown
Guinea votes in long-delayed legislative poll
NATO: 3 troops killed in Afghanistan attack
Israeli soldier hits Palestinian child in Hebron
UN voices alarm over Israeli strikes on Syria
Egypt Army Launches New Air Raids on Sinai Militants
French forces attack al-Qaeda's Mali allies
Egyptian police fire tear gas at Brotherhood protesters
Syria Regime Agrees to Attend Peace Conference
Afghan legislators approve new election law
Algeria Mounts Military Operation to Rescue Al Qaeda Hostages
Dozens injured as Boeing 777 jet crash lands at San Francisco airport
13 children die in fire Myanmar mosque fire
US Senate to vote on fiscal cliff deal as deadline nears
Delhi gang rape victim dies in Singapore hospital
Birth Control Linked With Higher Glaucoma Risk
Man with knife arrested at entrance to Buckingham Palace
5 people buried in Colorado avalanche
Ban Ki-moon to Review Syria Chemical Arms Accord
Iraqi president in hospital due to health problem
Malaysia's long-ruling coalition hangs on to power
Almagor blasts Netanyahu over prisoner release
Explosions Near the Iranian Embassy in Beirut
19 hurt in New Orleans shooting
Hagel laments "political" changes to US defence budget
U.S. bans carry-on liquids, gels on flights to Russia
Egypt's Brotherhood stands ground after killings
Malaysia sets May 5 as date for closely contested election
Nato troops kill two Afghan children
Iranian president calls for new nuclear talks
Floods kill two, forces 75,000 from Calgary homes
4 NATO Troops Killed in Afghanistan
Typhoon Fitow makes landfall in east China
Mandela to spend Christmas in hospital
Exit polls suggest Putin ally wins Moscow vote
Judge enters not guilty plea for James Holmes
At least 45 killed in Spain train crash
Dhawan smashes India to big win over South Africa
Chris Froome rides to Tour de France endgame
Apple app directs drivers to Alaska airport runway
Suspected US drone kills 3 militants in Pakistan
Hospital: 61 killed in Venezuela prison riot
Clashes erupt as Islamists push back in Egypt
N Korea postpones family reunions
Francis begins papacy with prayer
US Senate to meet as path out of fiscal impasse still elusive
Egypt's Brotherhood as Beleaguered as Its Leader
Queen pays tribute to Nelson Mandela
China's new stealth frigate commissioned
Iraq violence kills 11
Protests continue in tense Ukraine capital
Syria rejects US, UK chemical arms claims
Britons released after kidnapping in Egypt's Sinai -sources
Syria welcomes Iran's nuclear deal
Israel faces European backlash over settlement plan
Iran says it captures drone; U.S. denies losing one
Egypt arrests Muslim Brotherhood Supreme Guide
Obama jokes about himself at reporters' dinner
Allen responds to Farrow's abuse claims in letter
Gunmen kill nine people in northwest Pakistan
More than 1,000 inmates escape from Libya's al-Kweifiya prison
What is the nuclear option?
Forex &amp; Gold 6 March 2013
Islamists kill 21 in suicide attacks in Niger
U.S. has determined Syria used chemical weapons
Snowden's father arrives in Moscow
No radiation leak at Iran's nuclear plant
Pakistani Taliban names new leader after drone strike
Twin bombings in Pakistan kill at least 40
Muslim Brotherhood supporter dies in Cairo clash
Facebook earnings jump 63% as mobile ads accelerate
Syria envoy calls for National Unity Government
News summary for March 11
Thirty-Seven Dead In Italy Tour Bus Plunge
Rogers, Videotron extend reach with network-sharing deal
China stocks end lower Thursday
Topless Women Protest Against Berlusconi As He Votes In Election
Indonesia: Schoolchildren among 14 killed by Indonesia volcano eruption
Bangladesh Islamist execution upheld
Iran leader Rouhani says nuclear deal with U.S. possible within ¿three months¿
Deal reached on new Italian government
Obama mourns death of icon Nelson Mandela
Hawaii passes gay marriage bill
Goa first step in Modis march to Delhi
Singapore stocks close 0.4% higher
Maldives holds fresh election for president
Egypt announces arrest of 1,004 Muslim Brotherhood supporters
New World Trade Center declared tallest building in U.S.
What the Papers Say, Mar. 12, 2013
Israel green-lights 1500 settler homes
Piers Morgan questioned by police
Syrian Opposition Urges EU to Send Arms to Rebels
Singapore stocks end up 0.11 pct
Mumbai photojournalist gangrape case cracked, five accused arrested
'Israeli' arrested in Yemen Mossad spy
Pakistani girls learn a hard lesson
Egypt's interim president appoints 2 advisors
Funeral of Oscar Pistorius' girlfriend Reeva Steenkamp takes place
China launches first air-to-air missile from chopper
UK confirms fears over Syria's chemical weapons
Egypt Crackdown Draws Condemnation
Two firefighters killed in New York ambush
Egypt swears in new interim leader
Car bombing kills 17 in Pakistan
Ten rescued off Waterford, Dublin coasts
2 Pussy Riot Members Reunited in Krasnoyarsk
Senior Pakistani Taliban commander captured in Afghanistan
Driver in Spanish train crash faces questions from judge
Stocks close 0.39% higher
US releases initial report on fracking impacts on water
Russia 'alone' in blaming Syrian rebels for chemical attack: US
Philippines, rebels reach wealth-sharing deal
Death toll from west Chinas violence rises to 35
Israel launches airstrike in Gaza
Floods leave six dead in Philippines
Mars rover collects first bedrock sample
Imran to contest from four NA seats
Trailblazing Israeli electric car company Better Place to fold
Houston Texans head coach Gary Kubiak hospitalized after collapsing at game
Pro-Pak Taliban warlord killed in US drone strike
Ankeet Chavan granted conditional bail for marriage
Car bomb kills 20 in northwest Syria
South Korean soldiers kill man trying to cross border into North
Up to 50 dead in Spanish train crash
Five foreigners sentenced to death for drug smuggling in Egypt
French train derails south of Paris
Former spokesman for U.S. President Ronald Reagan dies
Egypt votes on new constitution
Obama meets Mandela family as icon remains in hospital
Iran Moderate Wins Presidency by a Large Margin
Weak earnings drag US stocks lower in early trade
Man who battled Fukushima disaster dies of cancer
Three feared dead after helicopter crashes into pub
Nigeria lawmaker charged over alleged bribery
Rupee down 8 paise vs dollar in early trade
Iran says nuclear talks to resume next month
Israel's Peres urges return to peace talks
Obama set to speak on Syria from White House at 1:15 p.m. EDT
Indian stocks open lower
US readies possible solo action against Syria
Brief clashes with police in Belfast
New World Trade Centre tallest building in US
US authorities charge man in ricin probe
China quake: Death toll rises
Four arrested as Bangladesh building toll rises to 352
25 bodies found at raided Algerian gas plant
RI condemns use of chemical weapons in Syria
Strong new quake hits shattered Pak region
Indian troops kill Pakistani soldier along Kashmir line of control
Pope Benedict XVI Says Goodbye to Cardinals
Fashion designer Lilly Pulitzer dies
China’s new carrier extends military modernization drive
Brazilian leader holds crisis talks on street protests
Tropical Storm Andrea zipping up the East Coast
New Japan govt hints at joining Pacific trade pact: Report
Four dead in Indonesia train accident
Israel advances plan to build 900 settlement homes
Miss New York wins Miss America crown
Websites battle nasty comments, anonymity
Austrian found hoarding 56 stolen skulls in home museum
US set for Obama inauguration
Suspected Saudi militant dies in Lebanese custody
Man sets himself on fire on the National Mall
7 killed in attacks in Iraq
Thousands protest gay marriage
India Ink: Image of the Day: January 27
US Capitol Hill on lockdown after shots fired
China's 1st Pilot Free Trade Zone Opens
12 killed, 25 injured in bomb blast in NW Pakistan
Select images from Bangladesh building collapse
Chinese court upholds death penalties for Mekong murderers
Egypt protesters 'to be dispersed'
Gas cylinder blast on Pakistan school bus kills 17
North Korean cargo reveals missile repair trade with Cuba
Israeli forces detain 5 Palestinians in West Bank
Protests sweep Brazil despite concession
Angela Merkel wins third term in German elections
Turkish police mass near Istanbul park protest area
South Korean Workers Start Leaving Joint Factory Zone
Senate to vote on moving ahead on Hagel nod
15 killed and scores injured in suicide bombing at Russian train station
Guatemala arrests software guru John McAfee
Cambodian opposition leader Sam Rainsy returns to stir up election
West hails Syria opposition vote to join peace talks
Obama travels to tornado-ravaged Oklahoma
No deal on fiscal cliff as Obama goes on holiday
Biden calls for trust in US-China relations
Syria car bomb kills at least 12 in rebel-held town
Kerry: $4b Palestinian Economic Plan Could Work
Bangladesh building collapse death toll hits 359
Dozens dead in Central African Republic fighting
Libya threatens army action against oil protesters
2 Turkish unions call for strike on Monday in protest over police violence
[Ticker] Fitch upgrades Greek credit rating
Gunmen ambush police boat in Nigeria oil region
Russians leaving Syria cross into Lebanon
Two U.S. soldiers killed in "insider" attack in Afghanistan
South African icon Nelson Mandela hospitalized
Ferrer cruises into Australian Open quarter-finals
UBS settles US mortgage lawsuit
Pope Francis condemns global indifference to suffering
Top judge Mansour sworn in as Egypt interim president
North, South Korea agree to talks
Blast kills 10 young girls in eastern Afghanistan
Kenyan police arrest key Al-Shabaab recruiter, financier
Obama to announce gun control plans Wednesday
Bombs kill two people, wound dozens at Boston Marathon
Syria’s chemical weapons could end up at sea
President for early conclusion of Eco Partnership with Sri Lanka
Three freed in centre abuse probe
Bomb explodes at Greek shopping mall, two people injured
Six Australians killed in Laos plane crash
Three dead, including gunman, in Maryland mall shooting
UN confirms sarin used in Syria attack
7 killed in monster truck crash
4 dead after boat capsizes off Florida coast
Cannes thief 'steals $53m of jewels' in armed heist at hotel
Merkel Vies 3rd Term in Office in Germany Elections
Gunmen kill female politician in Pakistan
Ex-Virginia governor Bob McDonnell charged with corruption
Sprinters Tyson Gay and Asafa Powell test positive for banned substance
6.3-magnitude quake hits Honshu, Japan: CENC
Pakistan to release most senior Afghan Taliban prisoner
Kardashian Divorce Ready for Trial
Egypt court orders release of Mubarak
American investigators waiting to question arrested Boston bomber
Nelson Mandela undergoes surgery
10 dead, five injured in SW China road accident
Bollywood cuts costs by a third as rupee collapse bites
Women to face higher car insurance premiums
Tornadoes rip through Midwest, killing 6 and devastating neighborhoods
China gives US regulators access to audit records
Singapore stocks end up 0.26 percent
Iran, atomic agency in first talks since Rowhani election
China's new PM rejects US hacking claims
US Military Aircraft Hit in S. Sudan, 4 Wounded
New Zealand set to legalise gay marriage
Dzhokhar Tsarnaev pleads not guilty to Boston bombing charges
Pictures of the day: 7 August 2013
Chinese general's son gets 10 years jail for rape
P.G. police seeking driver in crash that killed child
Egypt to hold presidential elections before parliamentary polls
Pentagon adjusts plans for more intense attacks on Syria
East Timor bans martial arts clubs amid killings
Afghan legislators approve new election law
In Pakistan, army adamant on fighting the other Taliban
Egyptian army pushes to attack kidnappers
South Africans Mourn as Mandela Buried
Witnesses hear 'loud booms' at Boston Marathon
Cryptic crossword - Saturday 27th April
Costa Concordia captain to be tried for manslaughter
Israeli Minister Slams Kerry's Boycott Warning
Kenya Supreme Court upholds election result
Angelina Jolie's aunt dies of breast cancer
Myanmar’s Suu Kyi urges party unity amid squabbles
10 Things to Know for Wednesday
White House, defense contractors discuss harm of automatic spending cuts
Venezuela's Hugo Chavez dies of cancer
Death toll in Colorado floods rises to four
Former Zambian president arrested
US Senate confirms Yellen as Fed's next chair
26 Palestinian prisoners released from Israeli prison
Asian shares rally after string of upbeat data
17 killed, 133 wounded in bomb attacks in northern Iraq
Officer injured in India anti-rape protests dies
Syria regime claims evacuation of 5,000 near Damascus
Cyprus bailout remarks alarm markets
Faction Names Bianca Ojukwu APGA National Leader
US Cannot 'Conclusively Determine' Chemical Weapons Use in Syria
Twelve killed as gunmen raid village
Egypt shuts down Muslim Brotherhood newspaper
Strong earthquake in western China kills 47 people
Nobel Prize winning author Doris Lessing dies
Snowden thanks Russia for asylum
Senate confirms Yellen as Fed head
French forces take key Mali town
Nicaragua, Venezuela offer asylum to Snowden
Boston bombing suspect buried in Virginia
'Large and extremely dangerous' tornado heads towards Oklahoma City
Hostage drama drags on after Alabama school bus shooting
Palestinian president assigns academic to form West Bank gov't
5 killed, 50 injured in Pakistan blast
Pakistan's Malala leaves hospital to await surgery
Internet, phone service restored in Syrian capital
two found dead in swimming pool at essex hotel
Syrian PM Survives Bomb Attack
Pakistan condemns US drone strike in Shawal Area
Residents return to Texas blast site
South Africa prays for Nelson Mandela
Iran's Ahmadinejad may face charges over election appearance with aide
At least 38 Morsi supporters die in clashes
Miliband pledges to strengthen minimum wage
Singapore stocks close 0.44 pct lower
Sniper waiting for result of appeal
US stock futures edge up ahead of jobs report
Chinese shares close lower on Wednesday
Apple shares hit hard on iPhone disappointment
EU renews sanctions against Zimbabwe
occupied Palestinian territory: Palestinians rebuff US peace talks blueprint
Owners, others charged in Bangladesh factory fire
Egypt set to lure Gulf investors
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria
Palestinians, Jordan coordinate stances on peace talks
Voting canceled in three provinces in tense Thai election
Miss New York Crowned Miss America 2013
Obama cancels Moscow meeting with Putin
KLCI Futures traded mixed at mid-day
Suspected U.S. drone strike kills 5 in Pakistan
Egypt court orders Mubarak release
Hollande 'threatens legal action' after affair allegations
Iranian exiles report deaths in Iraq camp
'Blade Runner' Pistorius to dispute murder charge
Bomb blast kills 10 in southwest Pakistan
Israeli forces detain 2 in Hebron arrest raid
Egyptians vote on Islamist-backed constitution
David Cameron puts Sri Lanka on notice over war crime allegations
Mexico swears in president amid violent protests
Morsi supporters clash with riot police in Cairo
Four killed, scores wounded in clashes across Egypt
Helicopter crashes near rail station in London
Indonesian capital prays for metro to ease traffic chaos
Japanese planes flew into China's new defense zone
Typhoon survivors raid Philippine stores
Car Bomb Wounds 15 in Hezbollah Stronghold in Lebanon
RF FM urges Syrian opposition to assist in immediate release of all foreigners captured in Syria
Five dead, 40 missing in Canada train disaster
US Senate confirms Janet Yellen as US Federal Reserve chief
Afghan police kill 5 Taliban fighters
Khan Said named as new Pakistani Taliban leader after Hakimullah Mehsud killed in drone strike
At Least 66 Killed in Bomb Blasts in Iraq
Russia Destroys Over 75% of Its Chemical Weapons Stockpile
Iran earthquake death toll rises
Suarez set for Cup comeback
Maldives team in India to observe an election
Death toll rises to 6 as Storm Xaver batters northern Europe
Pakistan releases top Afghan Taliban prisoner
Gunmen kidnap airline pilots in Lebanon
Mixed reactions to NZ same-sex marriage
TV weatherman Fred Talbot arrested over sex claims
U.S. drone strike kills 5 in Pakistan
Building collapses in India; 25 feared trapped
China detains city workers after fruit seller dies
Somalia's Shebab claims responsibility for Nairobi mall attack
Syrian troops push into strategic rebelheld town
Israel agrees to release Palestinian prisoners
Dozens die as clashes erupt at Morsi rally in Cairo
Thai opposition protesters begin Bangkok shutdown
Spanish train crash driver to be questioned
France Hails Breakthrough after U.S.-Russia Deal on Syria Weapons
ISAF soldier killed in Afghan 'insider attack'
About 60 Crushed to Death in Ivory Coast Stampede
Glasgow Helicopter Crash Search Ends
Three dead in US marathon bomb
Swiss tourist gang-raped in India
India Braces for Massive Cyclone
US Senator McCain meets opposition leaders in Ukraine
Discipline against student gunman thought to have sparked Colorado shooting
Many killed in Japan road tunnel collapse
No plan to shut petrol pumps at night Moily
Clinton to testify this month on Benghazi attack
Tens of Thousands of Ukrainians Protest in Kyiv
Karzai to visit Pakistan for Taliban peace talks
Thieves snatch English Channel swimmer's custom-made wheelchair
Three die after car crash at Tian'anmen
Singapore shares open lower on Friday
Obama pledges to reignite economy
Kurdish rebels to withdraw from Turkey in March: report
Two Earthquakes Hit Northwest China, 11 Dead
'Whitey' Bulger given two consecutive life terms
Kenyan forces caused mall collapse
Japan revises GDP growth to annual 1.1 pct in Q3
Pak missions in UAE gear up for elections
Bangladesh building disaster death toll passes 500
Algeria hostage crisis ends; death toll unclear
Egypt ministry again urges end to pro-Morsi protests
South Africa's Mandela taken to hospital
China yuan strengthens to 6.2689 against USD
Police question man in deadly LA boardwalk crash
the activity of learning or being trained
thin metal strips used in typesetting
falcon: abandon intended game and pursue lesser prey
the act of designating a role to someone
make pure or free from sin
leave undone or leave out
a social set or clique of friends
The upper part of a column.
sink to a lower level; descend
create code or computer programs
release from confinement, obligation, or a burden
(Cause to) sully the good name and reputation of.
a company that provides public service commodities
Physically extend or spread outward from a center or focus or inward towards a center; physically spread from a start point.
Distribute systematically or strategically; initiate.
create something in the mind
(cause to) become less clear or indistinct
exempt or free from a burden, duty, or requirement
a straight length of road or racetrack
(cause to) emit a brief burst of light
stretch to the utmost, causing stress or injury
move in a group or flock
a temporary debarment, revoking of a privilege
An imperfection; the quality of being inadequate or falling short.
clear mucus from one's throat
preserve, keep in safety, use frugally
an address used for postal communication
An organization that sponsors a large public event
legally approve or ratify a person for a position
Try to cure by special care or treatment, of an illness or injury; treat carefully.
anything with the form of a thin strip
the controlling component of a grammatical constituent
reach a destination or goal
Shrivel, wither, or mature imperfectly, as of a flower.
Part, cease, or break association with (something).
a cue given to someone for assistance
make more common, uniform or general
(cause to) burst or open, usually with a sharp sound
Make (undue) claims of owning.
the political head of city government
to cause to become quiet
More forward in a leaping or skipping manner.
give up right or possession to another
come as a logical consequence, be inferred
the event of gradually vanishing from view
feel anxious, concerned, uneasy, or apprehensive about
travel in or be shaped like a zigzag
create a mess or disorder
the state of being employed
a sculpture of a human or animal
(abstract) characterize, commemorate, make special (or respectful)
operating or traveling via a vehicle
(cause to) fall or subside to a lower place, level, or value
the ability to recall things
An animate agent utters with a spitting sound, as if in a rage.
the noise of something rapping against a surface
Ask for and get something for free.
a general condition of soundness of a system or machine
an area enclosed by walls or buildings
raising the stakes or bet of a game by a factor of 2
the act of surrendering an asset
protect or speak up against criticism or opposition
A relation of affinity or harmony between people.
save from an experience, action or harm
go around the rim of
take in (mentally or physically)
separate (as if) by passing through a sieve
a cultivated plant that is now growing wild
speed up the process of
Provide evidence for; show by one's behavior, attitude, or external attributes; embody.
a computer program that performs system support
the length of time of a temporary cessation
rhythmical thrusting of the legs in a swim stroke
Make more temperate, acceptable, or suitable.
confine in or as if in a prison
make amorous or sexual advances toward
Put down by force, intimidation, or authority, as of a person; correct by punishment or discipline.
break up a solid, usually into a solution
A movement (physical or abstract) back from an impact.
the act of putting something to use.
(cause to) relax, be at ease, assume a friendly manner
a physical framework of crossing strips, often wooden
an itemized statement of money owed
positively-charged center part of an atom
An event that causes someone or something to die.
indicate a decision or prediction
state of being active, bustling about
cause to become awake or alert
Look through a book or some other written material (for information).
the conclusion of a communication
meet or encounter on social or professional capacity
assembled group of spectators at a performance
give interlinear explanations or citations for text
Leave to someone after one's death.
cause to vibrate in a different pattern
compel, enforce, or insist on something
draw a cross in the air over something
give away something that is not needed
(Cause to) become less interesting, attractive or vigorous.
have a disagreement or quarrel over something
endure or experience a painful event
the manner in which something or someon functions or operates
the event of coming to a stop, ending something
return to a prior state
the United States, especially the North during the Civil War
(cause to) become overloaded or overcharged
the act of substituting one thing for another
imagine; form a mental picture of something
indicate a decision or prediction
carry a burden, real or metaphorical
An official task or undertaking, usually funded
the complete haploid sequence of DNA of an organism
stamp or emboss with a block
(medicine) the capacity of an organism to defend against disease.
a flock of sheep or goats
a unit of atmospheric pressure
a winning shot in tennis against opponent's serve
a messenger deployed on a mission on behalf of someone else
the act of taking an offer
hit or return before it touches the ground
a thrusting weapon, as a sword
mix or breed things of different varieties or qualities
Walk heavily and firmly (like a cat) as when weary or over soft terrain.
pay unsolicited sexual attention to
Release (gas or energy) as a result of a chemical reaction or physical decomposition (perhaps in a metaphorical sense)
reshow a play or broadcast
a figurative position in relation to other positions, as in arguments
state of being under control
a vehicle race on public roads
Amount that can be contained
take legal action to seek compensation for a wrong
move into and stay in a particular position
opening shot in billiards or pool
an instrument of torture applied to foot and leg
(cause to) separate or move in different directions
An established or recognized right, formal or informal.
fetching something from a source
communicate or make known by gestures, action, or signs
strike the upper part of a ball giving it forward spin
the act of spending, disbursing funds
recording tracks of music made on some medium
an inherent aptitude or talent
Make liberal or more liberal, become more liberal, usually in terms of laws or rules.
free from obligations, service or confinement
twist a body part suddenly so as to sprain
a cause or source of duress, worry
a state of an authority managing or dominating a circumstance
move (as if) by lowering
Process, or refine in a reverberating furnace
economic term: raise economic demand, expand the money supply, or raise prices to experience reflation
clean, cleanse, or able to be cleaned
Summon into action or bring into existence, often as if by magic; ask for the aid or protection of.
the act of throwing a baseball
Break the skin (of a body part) by scraping; impact something else.
Allocate or dedicate; set aside or apart for a specific purpose or use.
(attempt to) convince to enroll, join or participate
give a specific interpretation to
Organize anew, as after a setback; collect or compose oneself.
to catch in or as if in a trap; immobilize
an exclusive, privileged group of people
come into conflict, meet in opposition
react, or respond to a call, command, or stimulus
provide with a soundtrack or voiceover
a lever that activates a firing mechanism, especially with a firearm
Advance; contribute to the progress or growth of.
cause someone's attention, goals, thought to turn in another direction
The human act of making something new.
move or gather in a hive
rinse one's mouth with mouthwash, gargle
Provide or equip specifically with furniture.
Make or create something for a specific function.
lowest employee salary permitted by law
watery rot on produce caused by fungus
room where work or repairs are done
Sever or remove by pinching or snipping; tend by cutting.
compress out of shape or into small pieces
a single tall stone, e.g., obelisk or monument
(cause to) gradually become weak
move or execute very quickly or hastily
Prove or suggest to be false or incorrect.
(cause to) be overlaid with something
carry as a backpack, go backpacking
(Cause to) separate into constituents, weaken, or destroy specifically by soaking.
GRATE ON: gnaw into emotionally; make resentful or angry.
glare or strike with intensity
rightful portion or stake of something
Be shiny; be a physical or metaphorical source of light.
the rotating motion of an object
a romantic partner, girlfriend or boyfriend
grip, penetrate or tear off with or as if with the teeth or jaws
exceed or surpass, go beyond, be greater than something
the outermost part of a car or truck wheel
turn in to get something in exchange
the act of perceiving a scent
relative darkness of a color
express or transform in a new form or language
freshen, to make fresh; refreshen
a work area for manufacturing or repair work
fall between two taxonomic groups
bubble over with a certain feeling
scoop up, as if with a ladle
The action of opposing some other social or military force.
Incline or bend; changle configuration.
(cause to) spray or wet with a spurt of liquid
To move (the head or body) quickly downwards or away (from something).
a specified portion of a whole
Join or attach (as if) with glue, possibly to cover the surface of an object.
move from one location to another
to make a great mental or physical effort
FISHING-exhaust by allowing to pull on the line
completely use up a resource
secure and protect a lifeform, maintain from injury or harm
a local non-residential college offering two years of courses
Throw a glance at; take a brief look at or examine hastily.
an air force military unit, smaller than a squadron
interfere with someone else's activity
assign to or arrange into categories
be eligible or suitable, meet requirements for/as
Treat a substance with some agent; add an agent to.
build, make by combining materials or parts
make colder, or icy, using ice
provide a seat or base for
Expose to air as to cool, freshen, or allow to escape.
the act of perpetrating a crime
support by placing on or against something solid
not succeed in achieving some abstract thing
a pointed instrument for writing, stylus
partake or provide a banquet
a participant who is a beginner in some activity
fasten by passing a rope through or around something
line up or make parallel; bring into proper adjustment
the act of enumerating or tallying a total
remove substances from a liquid or solution
study intensively as if preparing for a test
decide the amount to be paid on an insurance claim
bribe, make payments to in exchange for benefits
a detention center for prisoners or drunks
a small gift or souvenir given to guests at a party
Run at a moderately swift pace, as for exercise.
Oppose or approach, as in hostility or competition
the techniques and principles of artistic composition using paints
owned territory of a sovereign government
(Cause to) change from a gas to a liquid.
an operation that groups items according to specific criteria
Force to go away by blinking one eye.
the tactile (touch) quality something has
Manipulate or move something in order to operate.
drag loosely along a surface, trail
Influence or control skillfully and often deviously.
Cause to be perplexed or mentally confounded.
symbolize, serve as an example of
the activity of removing a resource
pass (a thread) through or into,on or as if on a string
changing one thing for another
lack of agreement, not harmonious
build, make by combining materials or parts
the act or capability of seeing
an assertion offered as evidence, a line of reasoning
stain with a dirty substance
Appoint, ordain to a clerical post
expect, predict, or forsee something in the future
state or explain the meaning
immerse briefly into liquid or container
A contract granting use or occupation of property under certain terms or conditions.
pass or put a vessel through a lock in a waterway
cause to assume a condition
the inclusion of all members of mathematical sets
drench periodically with liquid while cooking
Raise to a higher energy level (as in physics)
make certain the failure or destruction of; destine
function in a particular manner when moving
a set of pieces of creative work for showing
a person who takes pictures, often a professional
Come into existence; reveal its presence or make an apprearance.
Reduce to small pieces by pounding or grinding.
discern, identify, or know because of a previous experience
perform or supervise a ritual
An object impairs the respiration of someone or something.
the close approach of one object to another
act in accordance with rules, commands, or wishes
cost or monetary value of goods or services
a functioning unit of a larger political organization, a cadre
Involve as a necessary accompaniment or result; have as a logical consequence.
regard with consideration or respect
the act of lifting something
Lie at an angle; bend along a path.
hinder or conceal the progress or occurrence of
The act of coming to rest after a voyage.
Put down by force or authority; come down on or keep down by unjust use of authority.
remove facial hair by tying a fine string around it and pulling
manage, handle, or control something
physical force that draws objects together
deal with according to routine or procedure
Enclose in a protective covering.
reverse a direction, attitude or course of action, perhaps perceptually.
a fixed entrance fee to a club or venue
the act of allowing, bestowing something
Draw in and expel air through lungs.
starting page of a website
(Baseball) Tag the base runner to get him out.
(cause to) move abruptly, often making a short, sharp sound
people assembled together in a rhythmic movement
a conveyance or transporter, often wheeled
365 days from January 1 to December 31, the Gregorian calendar
Apply conditioner to make smooth and shiny.
a vote, a public and legal choosing of officials
approach a certain measurement, whether of age, speed, temperature, etc.
to fill with coal or oil
assign to a particular task
leave isolated with little hope of rescue
an organism infected with another parasitic organism or pathogen
make coincide in time or operation
confine in or as if in a prison
the forceful exhalation of air from nose or mouth
a social system of production, distribution and consumption
keep something intact, maintain unchanged condition
a result or outcome of a previous cause or condition
regard something likely or reasonable to happen
an increase in size as measured per unit of time
have a great affection, liking, or desire for
keep something or someone under control; stop something from happening
Find out or determine, perhaps after a calculation or investigation.
Something that serves to suggest a certain fact.
A fee levied for the use of roads or bridges.
Obtain from a storage device, as of information on a computer.
repeat; reestablish or begin again
COMPUTERS: obtain data/images from magnetic tapes or with a beam of light
Improve or perfect by polishing, pruning, or making more concise.
signify or mean to express or convey
Strike heavily, especially with a fist or implement.
a self-propelled projectile driven by self-contained propellant
Break open or apart suddenly and forcefully; separate or cause to separate; go to pieces.
cause to match (ideas or acts); be compatible
(Cause to) be firmly attached or closed.
a chart or map showing the dimensions, movements or progress of something
Identify, establish location or identity
put or set into, between or among
a person or thing in the role of being a replacement for something else
division of a university that offers degrees beyond bachelor's degree
Subsist on a meager allowance or supply.
provide, raise, or supply funds to
an official with responsibility to supervise some domain of social activity
The act of creating written works.
take or capture by force or authority
Go after with the intent to follow or catch.
an official campaign against a perceived societal harm
Remove feathers, pits, shells, skin, husks
aggressive willingness to battle, pugnaciousness
Pat or squeeze, especially under the chin.
give a neat appearance to, neaten
the spatial, geometric contour of an object
the physiological activation of an organism or organ
supporter, advocate of something or someone
make up something fictional or untrue
regulate or set the time of (a clock)
the act of substituting one thing for another
the foremost part of something
the state of being in contact
measure the time or duration of
Create an electrical short in something.
Move or cause to move with a sudden, jerky movement.
the concluding section of a communication
final stage of an event or activity
the act of governing, administrating
the act of moving, turning something
the state of being retained
hold in a given state or situation
the act of putting a preparation on something.
Soak up (as if) with a sponge.
register formally as a participant
The act of creating written works.
the state of having options, alternatives
the activity of examining or assessing something
the act of forecasting or predicting something
the act of concealing or disguising
the act of providing help or aid to someone
the state of being retained
Provide sexual gratification through oral stimulation.
act or do something in reaction to something
the quality of being useful for something
protect with or as if with a shield
Declare invalid; take away the legal force of or render ineffective.
bind somebody or become bound emotionally
assimilate into the mind or a situation
The human act of making something new.
put up with something unpleasant
the manner in which something or someon functions or operates
location sheltered from the wind
the act of choosing or selecting
Move or cause to move with a sudden, jerky movement.
the act of intentionally omitting something
the noise of something rapping against a surface
(Cause to) form a cluster in either abstract or physical space.
incline from a vertical position
the act of moving, turning something
make an incision or separation
an established linear path of travel
behave in a certain way, usu. joyful
make purer, more intense, as by removal of extraneous elements
the spatial, geometric contour of an object
a physical difficulty or obstacle
ABIDE BY: act in accordance with rules, commands, or wishes.
want, desire or perfer to do something
look at or observe something or someone
the nature, makeup or constitution of something
make sense of, give meaning to
move, transfer or carry something or someone
the state of being retained
the act of providing help or aid to someone
FARM OUT: arrange for contracted work to be done by others.
Fasten (as if) with a rivet or rivets.
cause to be immersed in
the act of moving, turning something
build, make by combining materials or parts
(cause to) happen at a later time
the act of preserving or protecting something
the act of preserving or protecting something
(Cause to) become less tense; rest or take one's ease.
the act of arriving at a certain place
the act of grasping into one's arms
a state of being encircled
incline from a vertical position
(cause to) be overcome with sudden fears
leave undone or leave out
changing one thing for another
Reduce to small pieces by pounding or grinding.
put into or keep in a stall
The appropriate or desirable thing.
the act of concealing or disguising
a visual characterization of something
physically grapple with an opponent
the scent or odor of something
The human act of making something new.
(cause to) separate or move in different directions
a state or act of gaining pleasure
Change the meaning of (someone's) words with intent to deceive.
the act of preserving or protecting something
put up with something unpleasant
the act of appraising, critiquing something
(cause to) appear suddenly or briefly
take action or behave in a certain way
the state of being retained
An instance or action of being incorrect.
the act of expressing approval, support of something
the act of putting something to use.
Discourage or frighten with threats or a domineering manner; intimidate; be bossy towards someone.
sacrifice or toll required to achieve something
the act of advocating or promoting something
the state of being employed
the quality of being useful for something
a person who memorizes or learns quickly
the state of having one's weight supported
the act of forecasting or predicting something
give a detailed account of
An exciting or stimulating experience.
the act of forecasting or predicting something
the act of providing incentive to someone
the act of putting something to use.
the root or base form of a word
be or come into conflict
make or become more acute or intense
Move or arrange oneself (oneselves) in a comfortable and cozy position.
Literally cause to become unable to see.
attract; cause to be enamored by (one's) nature.
visual representation sketched by hand
a person who is a member of the senate
Cover or back with foil.
The state of being pleased with life.
look at or observe something or someone
give a neat appearance to, neaten
an abundance or profusion of something
request or demand a response from someone; challenge someone
the act of moving, turning something
the state of being employed
set forth as an introduction or preface
the act of concealing or disguising
The act of beginning something new.
(cause to) separate or move in different directions
live in the bushes as a fugitive or guerilla
The act of purchasing back something previously sold.
Bring, lead, or force to abandon an evil path or lifestyle and adopt a right course of action.
(Cause to) run at a moderately swift pace.
(cause to) meet or intersect
settle or deal with something
cause to turn from one course or use to another
search (as the bottom of a body of water) for something
realize and regret the absence of something or somebody
Follow one's own or another's path
the state of being in contact
the act or means of getting rid of something.
set forth as an introduction or preface
severance from a social connection or tie
The human act of making something new.
the state of being retained
An instance or action of being incorrect.
DELIVER THE GOODS: attain success, reach a goal
the act of harming or hurting someone
give a detailed account of
the pulsation of the heart
behave or move in a certain manner
move or execute very quickly or hastily
infer or believe to be the case
a border or boundary of an object
the act of providing incentive to someone
The act of beginning something new.
administer or bestow, as portions
Entreat; ask for some information or action.
The act of indicating or pointing out by name.
The act of beginning something new.
move from one location to another
set forth as an introduction or preface
the action of placing or situating an object
the act of putting a preparation on something.
the state of being retained
a consequence, outcome or result of something
the act of confining, preventing or blocking something
the act of preserving or protecting something
lessen in force, impact, or effect
the act of accusing someone or something for being at fault
a rationale or reason for something
request or demand something from someone
register formally as a participant
the act of turning, rotating an object
defining, distinctive form or shape of something
RUN AGROUND--(cause to) come to the ground
Expel or eject (saliva, phlegm, sputum, or vomit) from the mouth.
an aggregation of things or people
trace the form or outline of
the act of preserving or protecting something
the act of preserving or protecting something
Manipulate or move something in order to operate.
the process of becoming less or smaller
the state of being retained
Rise or heave upward under a natural force such as a wave.
make a proposal or overtures to with a specific end in view
the activity of examining or assessing something
combine so as to form a more complex product
Understand the meaning of something.
the flavor quality of something
estimate or calculate the numerical value of something
put in a dangerous position
a store or supply of something
Understand the meaning of something.
an allotment or percentage of something
the act of concealing or disguising
give a deceptive explanation for; cover up
take legal action against, as in court
The act of searching for or buying goods or services.
bring to a certain pressure
penetrate or cut with a sharp instrument
(Cause to) run at a moderately swift pace.
the way something conforms to a shape
realize and regret the absence of something or somebody
Make receptive or willing toward an action or belief.
an agent or company that insures something
the event of proposing or volunteering something
remove from a place or from office
(Cause to) become less tense; rest or take one's ease.
free (from restraint), let loose
the act of turning, rotating an object
remove to or from a place or situation
The act of beginning something new.
the quality of heightened light on areas of an object
act of moving or conveying something
the act of preserving or protecting something
the act of putting something to use.
draw a cross in the air over something
the act of forcibly taking the opposition
the act of choosing or selecting
Provoke someone to do something through (often exaggerated or false) promises or persuasion.
Refuse to recognize something as valid (not a person).
an indication of something, evidence
the act of improving something's quality
create a new entity by putting components or members together
small metal plate on toe of a dancing shoe
the act of accusing someone or something for being at fault
the state of being in contact
Amount that can be contained
collection of names and addresses to serve as recipients of information content
turn, twist or fasten (as if) with a screw
the act of forecasting or predicting something
become or cause to become obstructed
have the financial means to obtain, buy, or do something
the act of forcibly taking the opposition
The human act of making something new.
put up with something unpleasant
(cause to) happen at a later time
a small, indefinite portion of something
be given to, come into the possession of
put up with something unpleasant
Make a crushing noise, possibly as the result of pressing or grinding.
place or lay as if in a pile
the act of rubbing a surface
Move or arrange oneself (oneselves) in a comfortable and cozy position.
Refuse to recognize something as valid (not a person).
the act of confining, preventing or blocking something
the act of choosing or selecting
the act of putting something to use.
meet or encounter on social or professional capacity
the context or setting in which something takes place
the state of being retained
Advance; contribute to the progress or growth of.
cause or become accessible state, make or become available
remove from a place or from office
the act of preserving or protecting something
get or find back; recover
regard something likely or reasonable to happen
An object impairs the respiration of someone or something.
carry out or complete an activity
Droop, sink, or settle from or as if from pressure or loss of tautness; become less intense.
cause to turn from one course or use to another
(cause to) appear suddenly or briefly
the act of harming or hurting someone
the act of moving, turning something
the act of preserving or protecting something
(cause to) come apart, separate, or split
remove from a place or from office
give a detailed account of
the act of flipping an object into the air
the act of preserving or protecting something
the act of protesting, dissenting
the activity of pretending to be someone or something else
make an image or sound clearer; put into focus
the act of turning, rotating an object
the act of appraising, critiquing something
(Cause to) run at a moderately swift pace.
pass time in a particular place or way
(Cause to) be covered with something.
(The act of making) a measurement of something.
write all the required information
abrupt state of disbelief about something
the act of concealing or disguising
the cause or instigation of something
Lose clarity or turn aside, especially from the main subject of attention or course of argument.
a context or situation that hinders or impedes
Create an electrical short in something.
Have a complexion with a strong bright color; reflect emotion via one's complexion.
ascribe or place in association with
A plant structure near the top of the plant.
the act of rubbing a surface
the act of forecasting or predicting something
Amount that can be contained
rounded end of a bone
the action of placing or situating an object
the act of harming or hurting someone
administer or bestow, as portions
the assertion of a proposition offered as true
the act of entering a structure
the act of preserving or protecting something
An area that is central within some larger region.
reduce the price of something
An instance or action of being incorrect.
the state of being in working order
the state of being retained
the action of placing or situating an object
the act of conscripting soldiers for an army
the act of forecasting or predicting something
the state of being employed
have in mind as a plan or purpose
the act of protesting, dissenting
class of students taught together
Advance; contribute to the progress or growth of.
Put in motion or move to act; make active or more active.
the act of cutting off length, snipping off
the act of moving, turning something
(cause to) separate or move in different directions
cover with a primer base
the state of having options, alternatives
the act of preserving or protecting something
behave or move in a certain manner
the essence or gist of something
prepare for/put to action or use
cause to be immersed in
a type of military aircraft
pass into by penetrating or permeating
a boundary area or edge of something
the activity of examining or assessing something
The act of beginning something new.
the quality of heightened light on areas of an object
unite; merge with something already in existence
the act of moving, turning something
the state of being retained
the act of governing, administrating
the quality of being useful for something
the act of choosing or selecting
be in direct physical contact with
the place within which an authority has power
the foremost part of something
mark or cover with or as if with dots
the act of putting something to use.
Vomit, either in a controlled or uncontrolled fashion.
the act of putting a preparation on something.
the act of advocating or promoting something
(cause to) separate or move in different directions
the act of putting something to use.
a spatial terminus or farthest boundary of something
the act of substituting one thing for another
the act of preserving or protecting something
the act of concealing or disguising
the act of applying paint to a surface
behave or move in a certain manner
Reduce to small pieces by pounding or grinding.
the act of concealing or disguising
Put on cream, as on one's face or body.
supporter, advocate of something or someone
Advance; contribute to the progress or growth of.
Wear or display, as in a facet of something or an article of clothing.
move into and stay in a particular position
(cause to) move back and forth or side to side
Sell something to or obtain something from by underhanded activity.
state of being unclothed, naked
the noise of something rapping against a surface
the act of forecasting or predicting something
Supply with water for crops, as with channels, ditches, or streams.
snatching or capturing a freely moving object
(Cause to) become widely distributed.
The human act of making something new.
trace the form or outline of
Hollow out in the form of a furrow or groove.
The act of purchasing back something previously sold.
the activity of examining or assessing something
Complain; talk in a tearful manner.
exist in a certain manner, mode, or style
the act of harming or hurting someone
glean or gather natural products
put up with something unpleasant
Saturate or inocculate with a substance.
the act of turning, rotating an object
make tracks on a surface
the act of putting something to use.
the identification or the realization of something
to make ready, fit out
the act of intentionally omitting something
the act of substituting one thing for another
Cause to move forward with force.
the manner in which something or someon functions or operates
injure by turning or rotating
the act of forecasting or predicting something
cause to be in a state or location
protect with or as if with a shield
The human act of making something new.
the concluding section of a communication
the crown of a flowering plant
want, desire or perfer to do something
the activity of pretending to be someone or something else
Supply with water for crops, as with channels, ditches, or streams.
the act of combining, blending, integrating
the activity of pretending to be someone or something else
the act of harming or hurting someone
put up with something unpleasant
You'll need to check the particular policies of each publisher to see what is allowed and what is not allowed.
You should check the conditions of your journal using the SHERPA/RoMEO list.
It is not completely true that failures are not published.
I started one with that goal in mind back in high school (I'm in college now).
I am not aware of any university run participant pools.
Citing online articles without a clear author depends on the citation format.
http://www.higheredjobs.com They have jobs broken down by Job Category, Region, and Institution Type.
Apart from admission (which normally should not be related to age), there is something that's related to your question.
Receiving an invitation to help out at a NSF or NIH study session is highly unlikely and logistically difficult.
It might be worth mentioning this while you are applying for PhD positions.
So far, I think this is better to make a rotation of the instructor.
I think it predominately depends on how you are accessing the other university's resources.
Yes, high-profile journals do typically edit figures for style and consistency.
Aeismail makes an important point about location: what's standard in Germany differs from what's standard in the US.
I have been using a mode for Emacs called Org-mode to track my research and do project planning.
What's the best way to make corrections to a published paper?
I recently attended the annual meetings of the European Economic Association.
If you're a first/second year grad student, go because you have to.
To add to other answers: How often one publishes in the most prestigious general journals (e.g.
I think that the problem is that often many professors underestimate the PhD student's will and personal scientific aims.
This post refers to research in the STEM fields, and may not be applicable to other research topics.
HaL ("hyper archive en ligne") is a French open archive repository that covers all fields.
If you don't want to pay for Adobe Acrobat Pro, as @schultem mentions, LaTeX can do this with embedded hyperlinks.
I think your method (thesis title in the education section) is the standard one.
I think it really depends on how long you plan to work without salary.
My practice is to replace the initial preprint with the postprint as soon as it is accepted.
Doing outstanding research is what ultimately matters, not the rank of the university.
I don't think there are likely to be any standards that address this issue specifically.
Your question likely indicates that you need to work on your communication with your advisor.
If your paper are on arXiv you can use myarticles widget.
I know that TikZ was mentioned already, but I think it deserve its own answer.
plain text/markup language For mathematics, I think TeX/LaTeX is the way to go.
I've seen three common ways of funding staff - undoubtedly there are more.
My answer would be depending on which GRE are you referring to?
A good starting point would be to talk to your research advisor about how to handle this, and follow his/her advice.
You could ask members of your doctoral committee to write you a letter of recommendation each.
You should do what makes you happy and you find interesting.
If you have access to it, you can very easily do that with Thomson Reuters’ Web of Science portal.
I did this in the earlier stages of my career, when every little bit of CV weight helped.
I can also add some other pointer I've come to learn over the years on what constitutes a good reviews.
A strong factor for most people will be the financial impact, i.e.
I would allow rescheduling, but be sure to use a different exam.
I have frequently had to micromanage my students' presentations and writeups.
I'm going to answer this question based on my understanding of copyright law in the United Kingdom.
In general there are a number of different distinct workflows that lead to a poster.
In my field a peer reviewed article counts for a lot more than a chapter in an edited book.
For everything that have been reviewed AND permanently archived then the bibliography is fine.
Many universities have a unit devoted to providing support with grant applications.
I agree with the other answer that this is a normal occurrence.
It is perfectly okay to ask for the figure knowing well that the other person may not give.
There are no services to help you get that coursework accredited.
In my very personal opinion MDPI is an reputable publisher, but their journals are not first-class.
I think what you are asking can be carried out using Web of Science.
aeismail's answer points out two very important points: the deal-breakers and the PD purgatory.
The biggest problem with such repositories is that someone has to maintain them.
In general, I believe, that graduate science education is not a good choice from a purely financial standpoint.
As you do more things, you can become more selective with what you list.
I have one addendum to the great answers by F'x Pedro, and Henry.
One thing that I haven't seen mentioned yet is intellectual property rights.
The academic year does start around September in the USA and I think most European countries.
A book I would recommend is Kosslyn's Graph Design for the Eye and Mind.
If you can re-take the GREs without undue burden -- yes, re-take them.
I will advise exactly the contrary of what bravo just said in another answer : go for A !
http://www.glassdoor.com/ works by getting anonymous information from users and sharing it.
"All of the above"... but maybe not wanting a book that started from a primer on Linear Algebra.
This is such a loaded question I'm hesitant to answer.
At some universities, a Post-Doctoral Fellow is a different title than a Post-Doctoral Researcher due to federal regulations in the USA.
For presentations, when you are using graphics from other papers, you refer to the paper.
Remember that Europe is a big place, comprised of lots of different countries.
Here's an answer based on my experience in the United States.
A link to a profile page that makes it clear you're a grad student should be enough.
is there a way to measure my own reviewing bias?
I'll tackle the easiest side of the question first: bringing nothing should not create trouble.
Applying to Masters Program does not really depend on one single factor but a variety of factors.
I feel like pointing out that the very use of the word 'productivity' reflects a certain kind of bias towards "quantity".
PubMedCentral gives you full text and their API may be able to do it.
This recent Nature news item would seem to suggest rather strongly that SCIRP is not a serious outfit.
I checked the peer review policy of Nature and Science, I guess that should is the best we can get.
I don't know how common it is, but certainly some institutions allow student papers.
Edit, again: The question seems to have changed, yet again.
True story: a bottle of wine (well, maybe just half a bottle).
Script only the introduction I can only echo what Artem said about the disadvantages of a script.
I agree with Seteropere completely, "Network Science" is a very broad subject.
I prefer to group definitions of notation and symbols with the typical "List of ..." elements.
If you use bibtex, then you can batch edit with things like sed, awk, or simple find/replace in any text editor.
I think the answer to your question is very dependent on your subject and the culture of that research area.
The first rule, as usual, is: what is expected of you?
I would say that it depends on the complexity you get out of it.
How many publications or conference papers would you get out of this work?
Supporting an ideology in an ostentatious manner (rather than privately or discreetly) is a personality problem.
When asking a question, it is desirable to explicitly establish a non-confrontational tone.
I will advise exactly the contrary of what bravo just said in another answer : go for A !
If there's a medical reason for it and the student can produce an appropriate doctor's certificate or what not.
This does not fully answer your question, but it is certainly one consideration.
TV-L is the German public servant remuneration grade table (Tarifvertrag für den Öffentlichen Dienst der Länder (TV-L)).
nobody cares about your university, the only important thing at least in Europe is your CV.
The biggest obstacle is that you haven't been through a Ph.D. program.
A few possible problems: 1) Such an ID system seems a little intrusive.
Short answer: The full name is Izvestiya Akademii Nauk SSSR, Tekhnicheskaya Kibernetika.
In your case, how do you find 14 good leaders from 70 students?
It depends on whether the black hole is rotating or not.
As an complement to the other answers, let me address the question of why planets tend towards tidal locking.
Stars are rotating, but that's not the cause for their stability.
Of course the apparent relative sizes of the sun and moon are coincidental.
It indeed appears the Andromeda galaxy (M31) and The Milky Way (MW) are en route to a collision.
Stellar mass black holes form from the collapse of massive stars at the end of their lives.
The metal content of the Solar system is completely dominated by the Sun.
The short answer is: we are made from the "stuff" contributed by many stars.
All we know is this : Distant objects are receding from us at a rate proportional to their distance from us.
When you sit in a car, and you suddenly brake, you feel the change in velocity.
There is no 'still' that is not relative to some other object.
Like Chris said above, stars rotate to conserve their angular momentum.
The light will eventually reach galaxy B even though the space between them is expanding.
According to this website the peak visible magnitude will be about 10.5 around February 2nd.
All of these effects are related to the 11 year solar cycle.
Dark matter, is just a name for something we know nothing of.
Compared to the planets the moon changes it's rise and set times very quickly.
We are moving "... relative to the comoving cosmic rest frame ... at some 371 km/s towards the constellation Leo".
Yes, it's true that the apparent size of the Moon is 30 arcmin.
Let us assume the data for a globular cluster to be equivalent to that of M13.
You'll probably need spectrometer data to distinguish and identify spectral lines.
To complete Envite's answer, I would point that you can easily experience that irregularity yourself.
4 billion years is the same timeframe of the life remaining to our Sun.
The outer shell of the star contains still a lot of hydrogen, after running out of fuel.
Why is the speed of light 299,792,458 m/s, and not (for instance) 3,1 or 4,3 x 10^44 m/s?
Molten Iron and hot sand - it's not easy to think of something more extreme than this.
What you're asking, basically, is whether there are any proofs for the heliocentric model of the Solar System.
It very much depends on where on the globe you are in terms of your latitude.
Only a very small fraction of the elements in the core the supernova get converted into heavier elements.
As per your definition, a star formed in a binary system (hence near some gravitating body) is a generalised planet.
One additional source of evidence comes from other spiral galaxies.
What you're asking, basically, is whether there are any proofs for the heliocentric model of the Solar System.
Naively, I would say that you're looking for a periodicity in the luminosity.
The energy density of the universe is quite well known.
Even though I'm a professional astronomer (but not an expert on this field), I don't have a good answer.
Light may account for a small portion of dark matter, but it is unlikely to account for most/all of it.
The mass luminosity relation is non-linear (L = M^3.5 for the main sequence) so more massive stars burn at a much faster rate.
Well, when two black holes collide a new black hole is created.
There is a prior answer here claiming that "a moon with a moon would be an unstable system".
As far as I know all accretion disks are prograde.
From 1979 to 1999, Pluto was the eighth planet from the sun.
A method used to calculate the distance between stars is 3 Dimensional trigonometry.
The light will eventually reach galaxy B even though the space between them is expanding.
Like Afzaal Ahmad said black holes evaporate through Hawking radiation, proposed by Stephen Hawking in 1974.
You're experiencing a few issues all of which have one solution.
Space, as we experience it, is simply three-dimensional Euklidean (flat) space.
Stars can form in circumstellar disks, that are, in general, disks surrounding forming stars, but not in protoplanetary disks.
The farther away, the faster the galaxies move away from us.
The programs I am aware of that you could use do require some programming expertise to operate.
Main difference (beyond mass, which we can extrapolate to make giant clusters and small galaxies touch) is star age.
No, the orbiting rocket was not visible to the naked eye.
From a (more) physics standpoint our acceleration on earth is basically zero from what we can feel.
After all these astronomic answers, I will add a computer one.
I think you mean to ask, "What is the local sidereal time of Greenwhich?".
I believe your confusion is from combining two popular simplifications of our Universe.
Yes, we always look into the past, when looking somewhere.
This is one of the great remaining mysteries of the universe.
Yes, binary comets do exist; 8P/Tuttle is an example of one.
No - Distances between objects get larger, but galaxies and clusters are dominated locally by gravity.
Nickel plating can improve the surface, but it's not easy in detail: paper on nickel plating.
The colorful patterns of gas are caused by excitation of gas atoms, e.g.
This has not been answered yet for sure I guess.
There are a few more elements which you might consider.
Gravitational lensing is the effect that large amounts of gravity have on the path of light.
Pluto: It was disqualified as a planet because orbital dominance was not achieved in the case of Pluto.
No, not all total lunar eclipses will turn the Moon deep red.
What I mean to say is, how are the characteristics of event horizon related to Space-Time?
In addition to Undo's fine answer, I would like to explain a bit about the motivation behind the definition.
charon and pluto are tidally locked, as is the moon to the earth.
Stars form in star-formation regions, which itself develop from molecular clouds.
If so by how much does it "spoil" the view of stars and galaxies etc.
Well, Kepler has explained that 2 randomly moving objects, attracted towards each other, will always form elliptical orbits.
Dark matter, is just a name for something we know nothing of.
A black hole (briefly), is nothing more than a dead star whose mass was more than 3 solar masses.
I'm not sure I understand your question entirely, but i'll do my best to offer a decent answer.
Astronomers use this system simply because it is (was) convenient.
In the upper photosphere, the electrons join with the ions to neutralize the atom.
Over the past 150 years, telescope technology has improved immensely, so we can now see much further than in the past.
Temperature ($T_{eff}$) can be quite tricky to determine accurately as it interrelates to a number of other fundamental measurements.
We have not discovered every galaxy in existence, nor have we watched each to see how it is spinning.
Asphalt roads do a great job at heating up cities!
It appears that way because there is more land reflecting sun light to your retina at the edges.
Molten Iron and hot sand - it's not easy to think of something more extreme than this.
Yes, but it does not stay in the same constellation.
There are a few incorrect assumptions in your post, so it is difficult to answer as asked.
It depends on what you plan on using it for.
yes, the equinox will drift over time, but the seasons will not invert every 13000 years.
Asteroids are what are called minor planets - small inner solar system rocky bodies.
The objects in a galaxy orbit it's center as a planet does with it's star, they keep the same distance.
Yes, stacking Barlow lenses is a common practice to effectively increase focal length by multiplying their individual focal lengths.
It turned out to be not real GRB event, just a false alarm.
The simple answer is yes, because magnetic fields extend to infinity.
It may be specified from South westwards(0° to 360°), or from North eastwards and westwards(180° to -180°).
The answers provided to this question so far seem to be good.
Short Answer: We won't have to worry about the Galactic Empire any time soon.
As Yashbhatt said, we can detect light: with our eyes (visible light only) and with special machines.
the composition of an exoplanet is what is being referred to when someone calls it earth-like.
Black holes can evaporate through a quantum process known as Hawking Radiation and that's it.
The simple answer is (as with so much in astronomy): We Don't Know Parallel universes may or may not exist.
They don't attract gravitational force; they have mass, so they exert a gravitational influence upon other objects.
This discussion of intrinsic and extrinsic motivation covers most of what you are after.
I can only think of one way to attempt to experience death.
Time perception is active field of study in psychology and neuroscience.
Here is a lexical decision task I wrote years ago using PHP and Javascript (github link).
Here is a way to ignite curiosity about certain objects.
I am not an expert, but I have given this question a fair bit of thought.
It's pretty difficult to imagine a person with Social Anxiety Disorder being an extrovert.
It is hard to delineate emotion completely from thoughts or sensations, because emotion can contain both.
I've found an additional concept that may be related to the original question: prototype theory.
I just realised that I could share something more helpful and so another answer.
In addition to Mike's suggestion, see the Ratcliff diffusion model and variants thereof.
Scientists studying the matter generally believe multitasking, and women's superiority at it, to be a myth.
Here is an interesting article on NPR about an AI version of the famous Milgram experiment (i.e.
It could be the case that it takes time to like some thinks.
I'm using your example, because another example would lead to a different interpretation.
In short, there is no simple answer to your question.
Yes -- I would look into the literature of attitude change.
There's a very small percent of people who enjoy the adrenaline of mental exhaustion.
In chimpz, we see stronger chimps beating up weaker chimps that have consensual sex.
Just a very brief note: in some cultures, sex does not appear to have been confined to private space.
(2006) provide the most comprehensive overview of models in this domain.
No, that is not the current model of human vision.
Let me give you some background to your question first.
It sounds like you are interested in the Spacing Effect.
There are individuals who possess extraordinary memory ability, sometimes called eidetic memory.
Currently, no such high-level maps based directly on human cortex exist (as far as I can tell).
Yes, writing increases the modality and attention given to a piece of information.
Spike trigger is a specific type or you could say a sub-set of reverse correlations, covariance and probabilities.
As mentioned in the other comments, ANOVA is problematic when mixing types of predictor variables.
In my experience, there are people who like to follow instructions and those who don't.
It's a little unclear to me from what you've said that your efforts are truly affecting your brother's ideas.
The problem with this question is that the answer depends on your definition of psychological health.
Q: What is the reason for people to implicitly trust their peers in extreme (or not) situations?
You think that minor changes would make the scale better (e.g., by adding/removing an item; tweaking the wording).
The remembering of specific events is known as Episodic memory, and you can find plenty about it online.
Trolling is a complex subject now under serious study in science fields (e.g.
Just a very brief note: in some cultures, sex does not appear to have been confined to private space.
The location of a sound is defined on three dimensions: distance, elevation, and azimuth.
In the scene, it looks like the therapist is confronting a correctly identified repressed belief.
I don't know if this is helpful, but I would chime in as a programmer.
Sounds no more dubious than the pop-psychological view of Neandertals in general.
I think a good option would be to use a general purpose language.
If a problem is complex, it means that it has many components.
Intrinsic reward is the emotional pay-off that you get by completing an activity.
Kinda : p The overwhelming consensus is that it has more to do with brain/body mass ratios.
Presumably the decision of drivers to slow down in response to work zone signage is influenced by many factors.
Another option is to program in C/C++ using the Tscope library.
This question asks about Psychological journal that focuses on publishing interesting psychological datasets journals where you can publish psychological data.
This answer is meant to add more information in addition to the one above.
The question is slightly confused I feel, so I am not sure there is a good answer.
Henderson summarizes very well a number of approaches on human gaze control during real-world scenes and tasks.
I'm not sure the article really covers the economic aspects.
I'd suggest checking out the Linear Ballistic Accumulator (Donkin et al., 2011) model for a scenario like this.
@Jeromy Anglim: I'm actually creating a serial response time task (a widely used learning task) for the iPad now.
When studying adult IQ, general adult norms are often used.
Some ancient historical precedent exists for preferring $10$, but also for $6$, so that's mixed support from Wikipedia on perfect numbers.
According with the description of Mary, I think that she would devalue her best friend.
As he says, it's a "cybernetic cycle linking the organism to its environment".
I imagine most software designed for creating psychological experiments will be able to do this.
There is a processing fluency theory that explains it quite nicely.
I believe these two beautiful articles target just what you are looking for: Niv, Y., Joel, D., Meilijson, I., & Ruppin, E. (2008).
As a neuroscientist, I would be highly doubtful of any neuroscientific 'evidence' about this phenomenon (if it exists).
The answer presumably depends on how you conceptualise the experience of the time traveller relative to the time travel.
I can only provide a vocabulary with which someone else may answer your second question.
If your time constraint isn't too strict, I would say its well worth it.
Reading list As @Jeff has mentioned Tom Griffiths has several useful resources.
It's interesting to note that until 1973, homosexuality was classified as a paraphilia.
These are interesting studies, but the bottom line is: yes, environment affects cognitive abilities.
I've discussed a lot of this recently on my answer to this question: Are there recent theories on physiognomy?
The conclusions drawn in Inoue & Matsuzawa's (2007) study, which seems to be available here, are suspect.
This phenomena is much more common than most people realize.
It seems that it is still a matter of debate whether animals are capable of mind wandering.
There are multiple reasons why we may like or dislike certain kind of music.
I wonder if Hungarian is particularly good in this way.
Another relevant resource might be Stephen Kosslyn's Clear and to the Point.
What you're thinking of is called an Intermittent Reinforcement Schedule.
One might argue that the skill of critical thinking is the sum of the goal of higher education.
It is possible that hiccups are a psychological response to excitement, stress or as a way to generate attention.
If I understand you correctly, you are trying to learn about good practice in designing studies involving subjective scales?
Since this is a relatively new problem for behavioral researchers, I don't know that there is a common consensus.
As I am from an education background -I can't do, so I teach.
The basic effect can be accounted for by connectionist models.
If non-human animals do have intelligence too, why is their intelligence not as advanced as humans?
So your independent variable is the bug, and your dependent variable is apple size.
I know 2 explanations to such seemingly irrational behaviour in cognitive science.
The cardinal diagnostic trait of "multiple personalities," or dissociative identity disorder (DID), is dissociative states.
The Hare Psychopathy Checklist is often used to assess psychopathy in clinical settings.
It sounds like you are talking about random allocation of participants to groups for the purpose of running a between-subjects experiment.
Some of the experiences you are describing (e.g., psychedelic states, daydreaming and sleep) are examples of Altered States of Consciousness.
For a comprehensive review, see: Berg, D.A., Belnoue, L.,Song,H., Simon A.
From an article entitled Can You Call a 9-Year-Old a Psychopath?
Biological Neural Networks : It refers to our brain neural activities.
In the book "Six Impossible Things Before Breakfast: The Evolutionary Origins of Belief", Wolpert (2007) discusses the evolutionary origins of belief.
One could say that brain is not hardwired for abstract ideas... why?
Because a majority of the people are just too plain stupid.
These lines seem to be anchored on non-arbitrary points, but their flatness (lack of curves/bumps) may be somewhat arbitrary.
Human-computer interaction describes the creation of programs that use colors effectively.
The number of samples that are necessary for a good parameter estimation does indeed depend on the estimation method.
This seems related to the literature on multiple-cue probability learning (MCPL).
Some ancient historical precedent exists for preferring $10$, but also for $6$, so that's mixed support from Wikipedia on perfect numbers.
I wrap steaks individually in freezer paper, then put them into ziploc freezer bags.
Do not store coffee in a refrigerator for daily use.
French Toast is called Pain Perdu in French, which means reclaimed bread.
I've got quite a few recipes that use chickpeas on my blog.
You can do it sans machine, but you are limited to small batches, and it tends to form crystals.
If the alcohol isn't a problem, you could mix some Irish Whiskey with cream and sugar to approximate Bailey's.
If I have good beef broth I'd make French Onion soup which needs a very meaty stock.
The syrup makes it much easier to sweeten the lemonade.
You can also try cooking the entire bird at a high temperature for a shorter time.
When I make French Onion soup I slice my onions very thin.
In addition to oil, make sure the grill is nice and hot before you start cooking.
I compare it with several other recipes of the same, similar dish.
Your cooking oil breaks down because of particulate that suspends in the oil as you cook in it.
The best way I have found is to soak the ears in husk for several hours before grilling.
I scrape any crusted-on stuff (like pizza cheese) then rinse with water to get any soot off.
There are actually quite a few differences between the different types of flour.
The best thing I've figured out about turning eggs is: do not do it too early.
As long as there hasn't been a recent chemical, biological, or nuclear attack you should be fine.
I use a similar recipe, unfortunately I don't remember the original source, but I've changed over time anyway.
I place mine in an oiled bowl, covered with a damp tea-towel on top of the heating boiler.
My guess is water evaporated from the coppa and the flavors got more concentrated as a result.
I haven't tried this, but I've heard summer squash makes a good substitute as well.
What may be easier is to get unsweetened chocolate (Baker's is the most common brand around here).
I've never adjusted the length of time based on number of eggs.
I just use a blogspot blog to post them on, works pretty well.
The Hairy Bikers have made a Beer Sabayon before to serve with seafood.
I just hold the cheese closer to the edge away from the grater.
This site will convert weights to volumes, and says that you should use .53 of a US cup.
I've stored pancakes in the freezer for over two month and not had any freezer burn.
I thought I hated chili growing up because my mother made it with straight kidney beans.
Break the bulb into cloves, breaking off the bottom and the dry stick that goes up the middle.
A light syrup is what the pros use, so I wouldn't worry about it making anything too sweet.
Keeps the Dog from stealing the meat on the grill!
I store most of my home-made granola in Food Saver canisters.
If you're cooking something that is likely to spill over, you might want to remove it.
Yes it's possible, they just won't be nearly as fluffy and yummy.
I managed to find this recipe, I think this is where I got the idea.
I believe one cannot taste the difference between minced(canned) and fresh garlic once it is cooked.
Since you note that the inside was nice and juicy, I doubt that salting 30 minutes in advance was the culprit.
As long as you complete the salmon's cooking in the sauce, it's fine.
I would recommend Bottomfeeder if you're interested in this topic.
I grill salmon that I get with the skin on.
Throw it in the oven on about 200 F for 20 minutes or so.
Another way to remove impurities from water is to just let it sit.
The recipe I work from has you put the meat in the freezer, then pan sear it.
I belive you also want to move more at the wrist than at the elbow.
They don't taste identical at all, and even more important, they don't smell the same.
If you can figure a way to thaw them safely, I'd use frozen beer in beer bread.
First they will absorb water so the cooking will be different, if only for a reduced time.
Similar to @Nick's CSA suggestion, I've got friends who formed a (sort of) food conglomerate.
I've always cooked it on top of aluminum foil, at 350°F (~175°C) for 20 minutes.
This depends on the shelf life of the cultivar of tomato you purchased.
I use a baking pan, and a dough recipe that results in more Sicilian type pie.
Bar Keeper's Friend in powdered form and some elbow grease will solve this problem.
The best thing I've figured out about turning eggs is: do not do it too early.
Agreed on the OXO Good Grips - I've purchased some for a relative with Parkinson's.
I don't know about "lighter", but one of the thing missing from what you've listed are vegetables.
ClearJel is a product you may want to look at.
Since you specified the 'bbq' tag, I'm assuming you're asking about barbecue.
I can't see any reason for the marinating itself to make any difference.
I don't think I've ever head of a kitchen tool like that.
I've never put oil on spaghetti's water and i've never seen anyone doing it here in Italy.
Turn your heat down and leave it on the grill longer.
Since we don't drink alcohol at home, I don't ever have real wine at home.
Didn't wanna just add this since it's not free, but cooksillustrated.com has almost all of CI's well-tested, easy-to-follow recipes.
Just add half a teaspoon (or even less) of white sugar.
I was taught to sift then measure, and to scrape the excess off with a knife.
If you're going to use the egg yolks without freezing them you'll typically need to use them the same day.
I don't do sourdough in warm weather, it wastes too much flour.
Fairly standard fonduta recipe: dice fontina and just cover with milk, leave to sit for a few hours.
For something requiring no preparation, my first choice would be Maggi Sauce, which is non-soy based.
It's not dangerous but it significantly impacts the quality of the meat.
Another option is to put the cream in a well-sealed jar (i.e.
And of course (setting aside any actual food safety concerns), you should just trust your nose and palate.
Since your example is guacamole, can I very highly recommend (ta-da) Authentic Mexican, by Rick Bayless?
There are two general approaches to making chicken juicy in the oven.
Gourmet Sleuth can help you with its advanced conversion calculators.
Bread machines only make loaves the shape of the container.
Various references, including this one from Lantic sugar note the shelf-life of granulated white sugar as indefinite or effectively forever.
First of all, I highly recommend you buy an Aeropress.
I've had a few Label Rouge chickens and definitely found them more tasty and richer flavored.
Coagulated egg proteins in combination with gluten give baked goods the supporting structure they need.
The Guardian just put out a list of the "top 50 best cookbooks of all time".
I've come across two great, and very different, types of steak.
(Storage note: do not wash the bulbs before storing them; place in plastic bag in the refrigerator.
The meat 'is ready' when certain temperature inside it is reached.
That happened to me with margarine instead of olive oil.
Dijon has a strong taste from the liquid they use in it (it's not quite vinegar, not quite wine).
Unless you're really space limited, why not grow several varieties of peppers?
There are the temperatures recommended by the USDA and then there are the temperatures recommended for taste.
You know, I'm right there with you on the sacrilege part, but nowadays I microwave pasta all the time.
It actually depends on the quality of the shortening you're able to get.
A common one is haddock and is in season pretty much year round.
The primary flavors of Greek meats are lemon, oregano, and olive oil.
A lot of Asian recipes use it as a simple form of batter.
If you're in the UK Lakeland sell Stayfresh Longer bags: http://www.lakeland.co.uk/stayfresh-longer-bags/F/keyword/vegtable+bags/product/1932_1094_1092 which really work extremely well.
Use a vegetable peeler to peel of large strips of rind.
What about Tofu It's essentially the coagulated soy milk, pressed into blocsk.
Good cheddar has little chunks of calcium lactate on/in it - could it be that?
Copper can be useful for certain tasks due to the its metallic properties (heats quickly, distributes heat evenly, etc.
She obviously has a legit excuse, although she could have been more responsible and "have" told you in advance.
In some cases the implication could even be that Tom does not love her.
I agree with others (and yourself) in that I have never heard this phrase in English.
The assertion is false, at least as you've restated it here.
Usually, blue moon appears in the phrase, once in a blue moon.
I would expect (and accept) native speakers of the language in question to use the foreign pronunciation of foreign words.
It is seat, as reported in this article or this blog post.
I'd suggest you look to the constructions of the native language(s) of your students.
And the Irish are the niggers of Europe, Roddy Doyle tells us.
I see some references to status as uncountable as well, but that doesn't make much sense to me.
If I understand you correctly, you are looking for a hypernym of inclusion and exclusion.
As you stated in the question, “if it were me” is more common.
“The D Word”, in the context of an article about marriage, is divorce.
Most people don't know how to use whom and get it entirely wrong, but that doesn't mean it's archaic.
Firstly, you should be aware that there are two different kinds of dashes: the en dash and the em dash.
I've always understood it to be 552 (units of) horsepower, where units of is understood and rarely spoken.
It's a joke on mistakes made with the English language by foreign countries.
Neither word is a proper noun, so technically neither should be capitalized.
In the U.S., "buffalo" and "bison" are used interchangeably for the species Bison bison (latin name).
I think the main reason is a rhythm of pronunciation.
I've had people tell me I'm wrong for saying kludge, that kluge is the right pronunciation.
I actually believe that there are some Germanic influences in the British English pronunciation of the word.
Pardon the brevity of this answer, but I would say "named" is preferred within the context of your example.
In standard English, I think "don't got" has the same register as "ain't".
He doesn't is correct, because it is the contraction of He does not.
This situation, where a pronoun comes after a form of the verb "to be", is called a predicate nominative.
Irritation is relatively mild and is something you find annoying but can handle without a lot of grief.
I think both are technically correct, but the former sounds much better.
In this particular case the correct word to use is 'less', since 'people' is a mass/collective noun.
The "more posh" words are usually Latin (occasionally Greek) in origin.
I'm American, and I've never heard the bathroom referred to as St. John's.
As a native speaker of American English, I'll say that it's at least not a widely used variant.
The room used for defecation is almost always referred to by euphemism.
In general English disallows using two different direct possessives together in the some noun phrase.
I believe "try and do" is more of an oral expression, but has the same meaning as "try to do".
I don't think I have ever heard the second version in the US before.
There's a lot of variation because of the specific sounds involved.
To me, it's not a matter of gentleness or political correctness.
I always assumed it's like the difference between "readable" and "legible".
I prefer engaging, although Mike's captivating is a pretty close synonym and also good.
In American English, the contracted form ’ve is only possible as an auxiliary verb.
The best answer I have found so far is here.
A New York Times search reveals it is fairly common in the US.
"Keep score" is a (slightly) idiomatic expression that means "keeping track of the score".
Shade often deals with being sheltered from the sun and does not necessarily have strongly defined edges.
I can only think of context using insofar as or insofar that.
If there's no conjunction at the end of the list (and / or for example), then a comma is required.
I believe that disk is American English whilst disc is English English.
As an American English speaker, I have never heard borrow off, always borrow from.
The New Oxford American Dictionary reports that Pardon my French is an informal phrase used to apologize for swearing.
It makes a bit more sense if you consider quotes that contain several sentences.
I'd leave it singular unless talking about a range such as "0.25 - 2 miles".
The subject of the sentence were the payments, and not the total number of payments, therefore were is correct.
"Religious practice" is far more common than "religious praxis" (500 000 vs. 15 000 results in Google).
As others have said, "ten of six", though not used in many English speaking areas, would be understood as 5:50.
In this case at the end is the only proper answer.
As adjective, the NOAD defines yearling as having lived or existed for a year; a year old.
Google found 12.900.000 (approximately) matches for benefiting , but only 1.210.000 for benefitting.
We discussed this in a linguistics course I took in college.
These terms actually have fairly precise definitions, although they're sometimes used with a bit of liberty.
This sounds more like a cultural difference that is reflected in the usage of the language.
Certainly many usage guides have advised against use of this "singular they" on various "logical" grounds.
I'd say the Oxford English Dictionary is the definitive British English dictionary.
I'm a native English speaker (American) and have trouble with American movies.
I'm a native English speaker (American) and have trouble with American movies.
Based on your revised question... Generally, one doesn't refer to a task as being "due" without including a date.
A person would only actually say "quote" and "end quote" if they were trying to be clever or different.
This may be overly obvious, but in American English, saying "you're welcome" is certainly polite and standard.
Back in the day, "cable" was used to describe communications sent abroad.
Those expressions could have slightly different meanings especially when talking about finance.
This is an example where prescriptive grammar fails us (in practice I mean).
In the United States, jails are operated by cities and counties (or equivalent).
You used the generic term in your question ('I have a transaction') so use it: 'transaction'.
All three are essentially interchangeable, but many think I believe reflects uncertainty on the part of the speaker.
I personally feel that the idea of a "real" version of any active language is unrealistic.
Detectors (and sensors) are generally rated on "sensitivity" and many systems allow the sensitivity setting to be set or "tuned".
I live in Melbourne, Australia and there's this sport called Footy which is believed to be "the real football"!
In American English, "learned" is the usual spelling; "learnt" is too rare.
Besides those in others' answers, there are: attorneys general, secretaries general, solicitors general, postmasters general, governors-general, etc.
This may be related to the sentence Rose is a rose is a rose is a rose by Gertrude Stein.
I would use frighten when I mean something with the hint of a surprise.
I believe that "it" in the case of "it's me" or "it's John" is an expletive.
Yes, your sentence will be clearer if you write the actual word instead of the slash.
"The press" is used to describe both reporters and news outlets or media.
Since Pac-Man can run off on side and onto the other, then it's a cylinder.
I would advise that you should just learn by reading, especially more thoughtful and observing books, not quick and just-the-facts ones.
Cant help adding James May's eminently english way of saying "stupid" to this list.
Looking in some dictionaries, it seems there is no such word.
Green's Dictionary of Slang offers two possibilities, either "sexually involved with" or "interfering, involved with".
I agree with @John Weldon that integrity and honesty aren't synonymous.
One common tense I error I have noticed has to do with the verb to be.
"Setup" is noun, not a verb, so you wouldn't "Setup something".
Well, the short answer is that it does not matter.
I believe that in case of written English, the sentence does not indicate the mood of the author.
It's an adjective in the sense that it modifies the meaning of the noun it applies to.
My thought is that "purpose of" refers to an intended function of an item.
If you understand yourself and your enemy, you will be far more likely to win any battle.
It's the equivalent of debating which of color/colour is the correct spelling.
I've always been told and believed that \ˈī-thər\ is the correct pronunciation, albeit both are indeed common nowadays.
Because I don't know your teacher, I can't know her motivations.
There are a lot of push up variations you can do and they all stress different muscle systems.
You definitely do NOT want to be supporting your weight with your arms on the bike for normal riding.
An hour of cardio will burn more calories than an hour of weightlifting.
High-protein diets only pose a serious health risk if you do not take in enough fat and/or carbohydrates with them.
I find that compression shorts help me reduce chafing when biking.
According to research (Source), the body only needs 0.36g of protein per pound each day for maintenance.
If you want size, you don't want to rest very long - perhaps under a minute between sets.
Yes, you should stretch before running, but not the sit down and reach kind of stretching.
There can be no blanket answer to this question as there is quite a difference among available cheeses.
Stronglifts is a beginner program, and the heavier the lifts go, the more likely you will need to change something.
I've experienced that feeling before, when I was a student in college.
I was doing regular workouts 2 times a week, and am now doing Jui Jitsu 1 time a week.
If you're focusing on strength and mass gain, you do best by prioritizing strength and mass gain.
For SAMBO you are going to want to focus on core strength as much as possible.
If you round your back when bending over and touching the ground, you're taking the hamstrings out of the equation.
I really advise you to take a look at Mark Sisson and Robb Wolf's websites.
Do you live in any sort of shared or communal housing (such as a college dorm)?
I feel your pain - I absolutely pour with sweat with any vigorous exercise, even in cool conditions.
Start with cardio and progress to weights Start by targeting a 'moderate' heart rate to burn the fat you already have.
Any time you change something fundamental to your form, you will have to go through a relearning process.
I wear the shirts for my back, it basically gives you an extra layer of skin and huge support.
I would recommend doing a search on Endurance Plantet's itunes page for podcasts on Recovery, over training etc.
Sounds like you need to modify your exercise, diet and life style to get you where you want to be.
Arguments about low-carb vs. low-calorie diets aside, going much below your recommended daily calorie intake will send your body into starvation mode.
Are you also tracking your body fat percentage and waist circumference?
My first thought would be that you are holding your breath.
I agree with @Dave Liepman and @Fredob that yoga is a great way to keep flexible and balanced.
At the end of the day, sitting is still really bad for you even if you exercise later.
Running downhill is the BEST way to strengthen your quad muscles.
There's a couple of things going on here, and they are both cultural and practical.
There is a big difference in lifting for aesthetics and lifting for strength.
The number one thing you can do is train with a coach who knows about good running form.
Height and weight are one factor another is your current strength level.
I recently stumbled on a great article that talks about protein consumption for the purposes of building muscle (recovery included).
You want to have enough protein to protect your muscles.
The Nike Free 5.0 was one of the first running shoes designed to simulate barefoot running.
Take a look at this article on Alcohol and Nutrition Facts.
I'm not sure about 10kg in one month, but I know of one person who added 11kg in 8 weeks.
I really love the New Balance MO10 (W010 for the women's model).
Rotate through square, lunges and calf raises doing each until you feel a little burn.
I use a small camel bag (not too full) for that.
If you're doing a full body workout 6 days a week, you absolutely need the rest week.
If you mean purely muscular fitness, I doubt it's much.
To get a flat chest carry out the various push ups.
It is the immune system that is responsible for inflammatory responses.
I've noticed a remarkable difference when I run on the treadmill vs when I run on the road.
You are probably lowering the barbell too high up your chest which causes your elbows to flare out.
One food that you may want to consider adding or increasing the amount you have in your diet are Avocados.
Google search for Travel WODs has whole lots of results which you can use.
It's unlikely that whey protein would contain a significant amount of lactose.
I am 29 years old, battled being overweight for a number of years.
To further stress the muscle/muscle group, to get that final pump, to force more blood into the mucle.
This is a tough question to answer and requires a lot more information about body mechanics than I have.
Avoid You may think that this drink is only 100 calories.
I would also highly recommend to add chin-ups as an additional exercise.
Getting interested in exercising has been a life-long struggle for me as well.
Since you're being kind of vague here, I can only give you a vague answer.
Only one way you could increase the count just try to add one count more everyday.
Rhea's covered a lot in her answer but another option is to sign up for a race.
Varying up the positive/negative tempo and time under tension will target slightly different muscle fibres and other supplementary muscles.
The strength training classic "Super Squats" recommends a gallon a day.
Feedback is critical, regardless of what you're doing--photos/videos are an awesome learning tool.
It depends on a whole bunch of variables: age, gender, type of work.
From a weight loss perspective, the most important factor, by far, is overall caloric intake.
Is there another exercise, or group of exercises, that can replace a squat?
I found this this Website lately and I think this is great for Beginners.
I have also never been able to touch my toes, not even close, even in military basic training.
Strength work, particularly deadlifts, is very beneficial for sprinters and middle-distance runners.
I nix the second set at 45 pounds, but do full sets of five for all my warm-ups.
This is how I clean my five fingers, it's my little secret and it does not smell afterwards.
I think this might be off topic for F&N.
A good breakfast for me can consist of a 2-3 scrambled eggs mixed with half a can (~150g) cottage cheese.
I cannot answer all but I will do what I can...
Spark People has a 10-minute jump rope cardio routine that you can check out here.
First of all, as a general matter of fact you suppose to change your workout routine in every 3-4 weeks.
When I get low blood sugar levels, I get drowsy.
According to research (Source), the body only needs 0.36g of protein per pound each day for maintenance.
Creatine supplements can improve your ability to perform brief, intermittant, high intensity exercises.
From what I've found so far, there is still a need for a well-rounded training regimen.
I have tried for the past 6 mos and i still have a little gut.
The most appropriate answer is to consult a physician before starting any workout program.
One of the greatest things that helped my energy level was to cut caffeine.
Properly executed weight training will increase, not decrease, your flexibility and mobility.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Nfvd8ZgU8rw I turned up this on a search for "Yoga for Beginners" on YouTube.
I've been buying the DVDs and seminars of Cressey and Robertson and their friends - all functional sport trainers and rehabbers.
Just a suggestion, but try more potassium in your diet (found in, among other things, bananas and radishes).
Incorporate a 10 day cycle in your lifts... that is squat every 10 days, dead every 10, ft. squat every 10.
If you're stressed out, take a week off, of course.
Let's take a step back and understand some basics about nutrition as it relates to exercise.
I am also evaluating TRX, but many of the exercises are geared to the beginner.
If your problem is simply fat, just regular weight loss will get you there, like md5sum said.
In general, your body will maintain its muscle mass with .5g of protein per pound lean body weight (i.e.
For me, a hard, aerobic workout is by far best.
I really love the New Balance MO10 (W010 for the women's model).
High reps isn't the primary metabolic booster--increased muscle mass is.
"Normal, healthy (physically, nutritionally and mentally) individuals have little reason to worry about accidentally consuming too much water.
You need to answer that question yourself, the way to get to it is, what is your goal?
The main factor holding one back is the fear response.
I went through a similar situation with my C25K back in 2009.
You can read books by people who talk about it or read biographies of people who have it.
I think it is still feasible to store seeds until the next year.
The simple answer is to water when the garden needs it.
My guess is that painting the metal would not hold up well.
You aren't feeding your plants enough during the growing season so they are slowly starving to death.
It is not recommended to use greywater on vegetables that you will eat directly.
The Wikipedia page on Nitrogen Fixation says the nitrogen is released after the plant dies.
Yes, you can add coffee grounds with their filters to your compost pile.
Green peppers are "unripe" (even though we often eat them that way).
There are no post-emergents that specifically kill crabgrass without killing lawn grass.
You're likely going to need to consult with two experts: An arborist and a foundation expert.
Cut the suckers at the lowest point to can get near the roots to control the growth of each sucker.
Pick them as soon as they are as ripe as you want them.
If you leave the stump to dry out it will be easier to burn.
Best guess based on the video is that you have some sort of aphid.
I think there are specific types or sources of rock dust that you are referencing here, such as glacial rock.
I'm actually going to answer my own question, because it turned out that the answer above was not correct.
The two insects that I know of which would do this are leaf cutter bees and flea beetles.
There are import restrictions in Australia (as in most countries), to avoid spreading diseases, etc.
That looks like either kentucky Blue grass, maybe you installed Bluegrass sod?
They are way too hot in the greenhouse: try to regulate it better and more evenly throughout the greenhouse.
Summer is the time to remove vigorous growth and keep the tree to a manageable size.
Thistle is classified as a noxious weed in most places and must be controlled.
I wouldn't use the compost anywhere I was going to grow food or walk barefoot, or where children might play.
No products are currently registered with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for use as woodchuck repellents.
I've grown Pak Choy a few times and I get a bit of colour variation.
Support is good for eggplants as the fruit may become heavy and can even break the branches.
To paraphrase a common saying, "One man's weed is another man's lawn".
Just about anything can be grown indoors without natural sunlight.
Sounds as if you want to check the current ph of the soil itself, before amendment with your ashes.
Chances are picking the seeds once it's gone to seed isn't going to actually encourage new growth.
So you know, I do not have personal experience with this.
In the past it has grown almost like a weed in our pots on our deck here in North Texas.
Eliot Coleman talks about planting multiple onions, beets, or similar other crops in the same planting hole.
In Canada some areas experience snow and ice on a regular basis.
It's a slime mold, a weird primitive organism that has spores but isn't fungus.
I would pull it out of the ground and replant.
I know of someone that used oleander branches in their barbecue.
I found a few university studies that showed the healthiest height for most types of grass is about 3 inches.
I have used it as a mulch for the path ways.
Well, I'll make my comment an answer: Use rainwater for your plants (but please, do not drink unfiltered).
I always do my repotting and trimming of roots and heavy pruning during the time the plant is dormant.
There is a very full description of the various types of hormone rooting compound here.
When taking cuttings from a plant, I try not to take more than 1/3 of the current healthy growth.
In this answer I went through the math on figuring out how far fish fertilizer goes.
I found it difficult to mark just one answer as correct because all are.
Simple answer is yes, flower shoots on lettuce is a sure sign of bolting.
You're just smelling the fresh shredded bark, it's still got the oils in it that give it "that mulchy smell".
I've been reading up a lot on garden railways recently.
Dirt can mean pretty much anything, from good to poor quality soil.
Further to my comment above, it seems the OP is looking for questions to ask.
You can aerate your lawn with a sturdy pitchfork (as well as weed it).
Contact your county's local agriculture extension that works with your land grant university.
Unfortunately, the only effective means I've found of removing it without damaging nearby plants is pulling it up by hand.
I'm going to break with the pack here and say I don't think it's a Bradford Pear.
The reference I have says that eggplant flowers are usually self-pollinating.
Coffee is considered a tropical plant and is not going to overwinter in the Netherlands.
One option is to get a powerful jet washer and just blast water through the gaps to loosen the dirt.
Very good information but I'm going to add some correction after much help from reddit.
Agreeing with @bstpierre but as I find they are usually a pest (bites,etc) I put ant powder on them.
If you can get over the "ick factor," you have an easily-applied source of organic nitrogen fertilizer close at hand.
Bad smelling compost is usually a sign of too much nitrogen material in your compost.
The point of aerating your pile is to get oxygen to the microbes that break down the organic matter.
I bought a book, which talks about this, so here's an answer to my own question.
If you add enough carbon, then you can't really put too many grounds in.
You should be able to save both the tree and the house foundation.
It's going to depend upon the plant (weed) as to how effective tilling the soil will be.
If you have open fires in your home you're likely to have a supply of kindling/starters.
So, some design questions are: What would make a good mesh?
Yes, if your lettuces are putting up a long tall central stalk and/or flowering then they have bolted.
In the Piedmont, it is best to plant fescue in the fall.
You've said its on a windowsill which has full sun exposure (if there's any sun at all that is).
Re RoundUp - don't use Round up, if you must use a weedkiller, buy glyphosate.
Something people in germany do to get rid of moles is to bury empty bottles (e.g.
It's Euphorbia maculata (or a closely related species), commonly known as Prostrate Spurge or Spotted Spurge.
Here's a picture of my mint plant showing a flower (left) and most of the plant (right).
In the fall dig the peony and the rose out.
Lay a circle of artificial lawn in its place, then put the pool on top of that next summer.
Washington state removed the restrictions on rainwater harvesting for homeowners.
If not good for compost, could it be useful anywhere else in the garden?
I agree with the advice already given as regards outdoor plants.
Lettuce often runs to seed prematurely when it is stressed.
I've heard of dried blood working well as a repellent for rabbits as well as deer.
Hang the empty seed packet over a stick shoved into the ground on the end of a row.
I have been using "Slug Stop" non-toxic granules for some years now, and they do the job - and withstand heavy rain!
Fat and rotting meat are better suited to creating manure.
Oregon's Agricultural Extension Service has the best Extension Service web site I've ever seen!
I wouldn't worry too much about what exactly you've got.
I agree with winwaed - you may be watering too much.
My decades ago hort 101 class said fertilizer is not really necessary if you use a mulching mower.
There's no benefit in installing it low other than that children (and small adults) will be able to reach it.
If you are looking for a manual method try using a hoe.
For #1, Its not really possible to determine the variety exactly without genetic analysis.
If its just the odd weed here and there, any of the methods described in the other answers.
Separating young seedlings can be tricky because their roots tend to be quite tender and easily damaged.
The leaves have to be jagged and "must" be slightly ruffled.
Personally I don't think you can use anything better than good quality compost.
As to whether or not a fine mist spray will benefit your Japanese Maple, I can't say.
Aloes, like most succulents, are very hardy and will withstand considerable neglect .
chemically, you may use a spray containing malathion @ 1% with a sticker-spreader.
You only need about 4 inches of topsoil for grass to grow - with probably 6 being the optimal.
This looks a lot like an invitation to a No True Scottsman argument.
I know this question is old, but the previous answers did not touch on truly intercontinental trade.
Some villages had histories and thus names going back to Ancient Roman times.
The Ruby Theatre in Chelan, Washington was built as a movie theatre by the Kingman brothers and opened in 1914.
The USA is the world's strongest country because of its military force.
Frankly, this is something that could be argued either way.
Hitler wanted to expand the living space of the German people, that is, Germany proper.
The French Légion étrangère has the closest interaction between officers and soldiers that I know of.
Nearly all countries grew quickly in the 1950s and 1960s for pretty much the same reasons.
For many years, the Extremadura region was the border region between Christian and Moorish Spain.
We should note that many of the people in these places are NOT of British ancestry.
The examples from history we have are revolutions against autocratic regimes, monarchies.
American Catholic and Roman Catholic are two completely different concepts.
Genocide is one of the hypotheses brought forth for the extinction of the Neanderthals, 30.000 years ago.
I've heard that the Jin are the first people that used cannon to defend Kaifeng when attacked by the Mongols.
Saudi Arabia encompasses large deserts, and industrial goods have a low "value to weight" ratio.
While Queen may refer to both Queen regent (sovereign) or Queen consort, the King has always been the sovereign.
To no extent at all is the wars in the middle east caused by trade making the area heterogeneous.
Nigel Harper has given the correct chronology for Roman land grants to soldiers.
"What I am really looking for is an estimation of the Muslim population..." @ThanosK and @T.E.D., an overall, general population estimation f.e.
The last major pagan group in Europe was the Sami in northern Scandinavia.
See PBS.org's section on the show American Experience for this article: The Works Progress Administration (WPA).
The secret protocol was known to the US government as early as 24 August 1939.
Several reasons (my answer is based mostly on the book "Dreadnought" by Robert Massie).
The man in the top right corner is Philip II of Macedon.
There was considerable political opposition to the US becoming involved in European affairs again.
Assuming this truly did happen, there are a couple of reasons that might explain why.
This one could be interpreted a number of ways, and most of the interpretations could be answered with a book.
I'll start with the archetypical story of the type: Troy.
Rommel's men were not accused of war crimes and he regularly ignored orders to execute captured Jewish soldiers and civilians.
In Hinduism and Buddhism there is message of peace and an encouragement to not be materialistic.
I guess those are greek tickets (εισιτηριον) for excavation sites or museums.
In 1936 Trotsky was convicted by a Moscow court to death in absentia.
I think a simple google search will reveal the answer.
Re: Is there a way for countries to become legally independent without the bloodshed?
The argument for Heisenberg being intentionally incompetent is that he made two "incorrect" choices in which path to follow.
These are tickets to the archaeological sites of Epidaurus (which includes the still in use theatre) and Mycenae.
First of all, France's goal is not to "undermine its relationship with Turkey" as you have implied.
It is really, really hard to assign guilt or blame like this in most wars.
Looks like you've rediscovered Jaspers's concept of the Axial Age.
The Silk Way was not a single road, but rather a net of roads.
Adam Smith in the Wealth of Nations has a short section on this question.
Yes, I can tell you from personal experience that they certainly did whistle.
The effects of the Cuban revolution has been wholly negative.
One reason appears to be the success of (Confederate) General Stonewall Jackson's Shenandoah Valley Campaign in late spring of 1862.
There is nothing special about borders of former Russian Empire when considering Soviet expansion.
There are many examples of propaganda in the American revolution.
By the time that Qin had totally collapsed, Xiang Yu was China's hegemon.
Michael's answer is a very good one but I'd like to add a couple of details.
The British tried a large scale amphibious landing during WW1 (1915) at Galipoli.
As one might expect, it is a tricky business to talk generally about practices on the Indian subcontinent.
There were indeed some serious issues surrounding Kennedy's election in 1960, one of the closest elections in History.
Malaria I'd actually leave it at that, if the posting software let me.
Religions are cultural concepts, they evolve through the time, adapting some ideas from others, providing some new ones, etc.
The US government alleges that this has occurred - see Superdollars.
To a certain extent there's a wider question to ask - why did German armies fight so well in WW2?
"The grass family is one of the most widely distributed and abundant groups of plants on Earth.
The Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York has a great page on this exact topic.
The main trade in the Caribbean in the 16th and 17th centuries was the sugar trade.
Economic motives: Many people saw colonies as markets for their finished products, and suppliers for their raw goods.
By this time, consul is more a status title than any position giving political authority.
Manned exploration of the Moon has an aspect that is now seldom remembered, but was pretty obvious at the time.
There are several safeguards against the Chancellor - or any other part of the government - acquiring too great powers.
These are early model Stahlhelm (shape changed over time, see Yannis' comment) from WW1.
This is a very hard question to answer, and it's a hard question to even define!
Japan was interested in extending its influence in Asia and for that it had to confront either USSR or USA.
Attempts to produce quantitative history, ie cliometrics within Economic history; may make more computationally intensive demands than traditional text interpretation.
Photography was in use by many artists from the Impressionists onwards, many used photographs as a basis for their paintings.
I'm not saying this is The Truth®, but here's the argument typically given for the Ancient Romans you mentioned.
Ivan IV the Terrible of Russia had put another man, Simeon Bekbulatovich to the throne and retired to a monastery.
Time and again India has seen some reformers who revolutionize the thoughts of the masses.
I think the main reasons are demolition of Takshashila and Nalanda universities.
Wunderwaffe (literally, wonder weapons) - absolutely, they had many, many designs under way.
Fredericksburg is directly North of Richmond on the direct road to Washington.
I would suggest reading Chapter 4 of the book Hidden Horizons.
Germany, was, without doubt, defeated, even though the siutation of the Armistice allowed the impression to develop that it wasn't.
The USA had won the wars in Afghanistan and Iraq in any military sense.
From a military perspective, an "all out war" deep into enemy territory without any logistics is a rare occasion.
At the moment of his election (1641), it seems that Mazarin was in minor orders - so called "lay cardinal".
There was actually a trade route through Ukraine - "из варяг в греки" - that is "From Varangians to the Greeks".
This is a very simplified example but hopefully it will help: Assume that there are 10 nobles and 100 workers.
Languages are not static things; they evolve with the times and the needs of the users.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_Delhi#Early_history shows that the city was called Delhi (or Dilli) at least since the 12/13th century.
Let's do the math: 100,000 mounted archers * 4 horses each * 10 kg/day * 250 days/campaign = 1,000,000,000 kg of forage required each campaign.
Actually most of the defence force was successfully evacuated, not surrendered.
I think this question presumes far to much determinism on the part of the "Great Purge" process.
You can get a breakdown of the major causes of death here.
For Mongols specifically, it was in part their unparallelled-till-20th-century tactical flexibility.
Encouraged by the kind words about my comment, I have turned it into an answer with more details and sources.
Here are some rough specs for common planes (as I said in the comment, the endurance depends on various factors).
Yes, SU did its best to make sure that its satellites were controlled as tightly as possible.
Dominus, plural Domini, in ancient Rome, “master,” or “owner,” particularly of slaves.
Every 1000 years or so you can expect a large "1000-year-flood" near large rivers.
Germany was fortunate to have a large batch of officers born in the 1890s.
The bulk of India then was not controlled by Porus, but by the Nanda dynasty, centered at Pataliputra.
I agree with the New World statement, classes are something inherited from kingships, Like the nobility is the highest class.
Song of Solomon (as you mentioned in your comments) does have some erotic contents.
The Soviet Union's invasion of Afghanistan in the late 20th century has its roots in the "Great Game" of the 19th century.
There is evidence of English longbows shooting farther than 250 yards, particularly at Crecy, where the longer bowshots were around 300 yards.
It did exist but no one is sure what it was.
Yes, this is true and yes, in most cases indefinite articles indeed developed from numerals, as @MGN already said.
The Hawaiian language has seen a big revival in the past 20-30 years.
I'll also throw in that some languages also have grammatical gender in their verbs.
Preserving grammaticality and preserving meaning of the sentence are two different things.
Let's say that a future participle is a non-finite form of a verb which is marked for future tense.
In some nowadays Indo-European languages you can still see rests of base-20 numeral systems.
Just to add this: what is usually called Hebrew script was in fact borrowed from Aramaic.
I'm going to answer about just the words for "pineapple".
Only to the degree that all Slavic languages are somewhat mutually intelligible.
Language can "improve" over time as well as "just changing".
Well there aren't phonemes in signed languages because phonemes are specifically sounds.
The classical, pure versions of Mesoamerican languages used for the most part a base-20 system.
No, this is not the only example of a language that was developed de novo.
Partially, it depends on how you think of what the goal of Linguistics is.
I disagree partly with this answer claiming that 'aa' and 'ağ' are identical.
I have not heard of a language that lacks numbers entirely, and doubt one exists (happy to see proof though).
As many pointed out, 'free word order' is a complete misnomer.
The difficulty arises not from the various linguistic properties of the language pair as many here suggest.
The question can be explored in terms of N-ellipsis (noun ellipsis, also known as NP-ellipsis).
Regarding Romanian's history: it's a member of the Eastern Romance (sensu strictu) subfamily or the "Vlach" languages.
Matt Davis provides a useful summary related to this meme.
To begin with, the Chinese phoneme is not exactly sh but it sounds more like k in Swedish käften.
That's actually a diagnostic test for what is a "Proper Noun" in English-- it resists taking an article.
The picture of the synthesis degree is not very clear in many languages.
I say option D. When in doubt, you can try what Web browsers do.
There are curious adjunct uses of "of-phrases" as in "a man of honor", which correspond to the Latin genitive of description.
What the hearer perceives must clearly be called a phoneme.
Is your question about an analysis or about automated parsing?
Remember that the intersection of the outputs of two context-free languages is not necessarily context free.
In English, certainly the most common use of do is Do-Support.
A caveat: I'm experiencing the tail end of a three day migraine.
A long time ago, LanguageTool used to be usable with just OpenOffice.
This issue is discussed in some detail in this paper by the late, great linguist Larry Trask.
The reason for this is that Russian is a much more tonal language than English.
Palatalisation of /k/ before front vowels happens all over the place: Russian, Greek, Turkish, Persian etc.
All the same methods of analysis that are used with spoken languages apply successfully to signed languages.
Newspeak, a "deliberately impoverished" language designed to prevent people from communicating and thinking about subversive ideas.
The dirty little secret of English is that syllable boundaries mostly do not matter (unlike other languages).
Well since your question contains nothing to compare to and is therefore ambiguous, the answer could only be yes.
Contrary to some of the other answerers, I do think "intuition blurring" is a real thing.
Perhaps you could start by studying how you pronounce English /w/, which consists of simultaneous labial and velar approximation.
In Russian, for example, animacy is not clear-cut in the distinction animate/inanimate.
As you can see from this map on the Wals.info site, there are many.
One interesting source of information comes from what old prescriptive grammarians found to gripe about.
If you want a very quick and simple program to slow down a sound file of speech, use VLC Player.
There's a lot of types of signed languages (some more like sign vocabularies), so not all have the same properties.
Sounds like you have a great idea for developing linguistics software!
With some help from Rocío, I have found a fairly useful resource (in the bibliography of Greenberg).
It sounds like what you are really looking for is linguistic evidence of a Semitic substrate in Old English.
Another example of the same combination of gnarly syllable structure and tone is Tlingit, where words like [tʃχánkʼ] ‘grandkid’ and [ɬʔùɬ.tʃí.nì] ‘vest’ occur.
It actually has nothing to do with a phonological rule, per se.
English spelling did deteriorate, due to almost abruptive historical changes.
It is, however, main-stream Indo-Europeanist theory that the suffix * -es marks both the genitive singular and the nominative plural m/f in proto-Indo-European.
Zipf’s law, as I understand it, is not really about languages, but about statistics and probability.
Palatalisation of /k/ before front vowels happens all over the place: Russian, Greek, Turkish, Persian etc.
I may be missing something but isn't this more a question of negation scope.
I think there is a need for a comprehensive review of the origins of the features of Indian Linguistic Area.
In speech, of course, rhythm and intonation would probably make it clear what the speaker meant.
If you want to go in depth, check the links.
The modern Moscow school asserts that PIE was predated by Proto-Eurasiatic.
I agree completely with the comment by @Alenanno, Jun 29 at 15:07.
The example of Piraha shows that Chomsky's basic claim about language is incorrect, and that's it.
There is at least one case I can think of in English similar to this.
One powerful husband and wife couple had created an organization before Interlingua was formalized.
The Japanese case marker =ga (a post-clitic), was not originally a subject marker.
Wikipedia's page on lenition seems to suggest that a /t/ -> /θ/ change can actually come from a /t/ -> /tθ/ (affrication) -> /θ/ (spiratization) change.
Most English words have roots in Indo-European, either through original Germanic or through borrowed Latin, French, or Greek words.
I'm afraid this is wishful thinking on the part of some instructor.
In Witness for the Defense, Elizabeth Loftus describes how police questioning can influence witnesses into recalling events that never happened.
What those "childish errors" really show are that children are generating language, not just repeating it.
A part of the question thusfar unattended is whether the concept of phoneme has always been contentious.
You should clarify the question a bit to make sure you mean 'writing systems', not languages.
If you arecomming from the non-linguistics environment, the best book is to start with Is Fromkin, Introduction to language.
My estimation would be between 1000 and 500 years ago, after population drifts but before the European conquest.
From what I'm seeing it's generally accepted that most English speakers have a vocabulary size of 15000 to 20000 words.
"Not fast" is in Arabic ليست سريعة (pronounced something like "lessat sahirah").
A quick search of جید on Google returned two relevant results.
-er a derivational suffix because it changes the word class to which the entire expression belongs.
It seems you don't understand the difference between Morphology and Phonology and therefore, the difference between morphemes and phonemes.
This answer does not address the source of the Vietnamese word, just the Vietnamese/Lao connection.
According to this WALS page "Passive Constructions", there are five necessary properties of a passive construction.
What could really be hardly translated into Russian is 'privacy' (although some might disagree stating that it is translated as покой).
In traditional Principles and Parameters Framework 1, noun phrases (NP) are considered the topmost lexical head.
The Farsi word "جادو" /dʒɒ:du:/ is thought to be cognate with Sanskrit "यातु" /ja:tu/, with a similar meaning.
passenger: How long will the bus stay at the station?
Latin semen comes from sero, "to sow", which in turn comes from the Proto-Indo-European *sē(i)-, "to sow".
You are right - it is the vibration of the vocal cord that adds "voice".
British popular singers do tend to sound American -- but obviously not the choristers at King's College!
It was too long for the comment, so had to post it as an answer.
Jane, I disagree on two points: Hebrew wasn’t (morphologically) simplified because of European Jews; it was mainly syntactically Europeanised.
I can think of two main factors which would motivate such a decision.
As pointed out by others, "true synonyms" do not exist.
I'm not aware of any publication which has exact percentages for the origins of Monguor vocabulary.
At least, in night the "t" came from the original PIE word for night, noqu̯ts.
Things like the Swadesh List are an attempt at a vocabulary list along the lines you are talking about.
In French, all the words are the same if they refer to the same animal or product.
let me give you a maths example: pentagon, hexagon, heptagon, octagon, nonagon, decagon，??
To decide if a language is related to another language requires showing that they descend from a common ancestor.
There's actually been a lot of work on this kind of issue in morphosyntax.
In medieval Christian theology, things that were left-handed were things that belonged to Satan (or were corrupted by him).
I have a pair with the big-toe strap, and they're very comfortable when I wear them with toe socks.
A tent may give you slightly more protection than sleeping out in the open, but not much.
Although I agree with AM_Hawk as down being both light and compressible, I'd also suggest layering your clothing.
A few points to add here: Coyotes are not know to be aggressive towards humans.
In case you don't have anything to put on your bites, i found out the following.
In case of ascending on a rockface it does not really matter which way round you use it.
As mentioned in other answers, it will depend on the type of your backpack.
Bear spray is a more humane option; however, you do ask about legal repercussions.
We use a padded bag that goes around the waist like the dreaded fanny pack.
The outside of a tent is designed to get wet, the key trick is to keep everything else dry.
I recently hiked in the desert in April and drank 8 oz per half hour, which was a pint an hour.
In Latvia, Lithuania, Estonia, Poland You can camp almost anywhere in forest and near public waters.
If boiling isn't an option, aqua mira is usually a good choice.
Nylon dries fast, is resistant to ripping and tearing, and fairly breathable.
The band actually works like a taut line hitch knot.
GPS (wikipedia) is based on orbiting satellites and so is accurate worldwide.
The simple solution is not to rub your arms against your torso.
To actually load a person onto a boat, try a parbuckle.
The main reason it's buried is to keep it from washing into water supplies.
Warmth -- This is after all why you are buying the bag.
Different parts of California have different wildlife, so you should probably narrow the region.
So it's important to have a basic understanding before you even get on skis.
I would consider using OSM as they are available for garmin devices.
I follow a paleotic diet (which is gluten-free) for fairly similar reasons.
So there is a known reason for the order not to drink tap water.
As I noted in my answer to that question, plasticene or stress balls work.
My favorite fireside activity is my family's version of 20 questions.
You may have luck with a thermos flask, or similar insulated flask above a regular water bottle.
What I do is wrap the duct tape around a pencil.
If you drop a belay plate you can use a Munter Hitch to descend down the rope.
Icebug specializes in shoes made for running on ice or other very slippery surfaces.
You need to have clothes for the coldest part of the trip, at the mountaintop.
In a gym, the toprope will be wrapped over a cylindrical bar.
Glucosamine is for cartilage, and finger pain from climbing is probably tendon problems.
I visit AZ every summer and include some hikes in the desert when I'm there.
The obvious thing to consider would be how loud the whistle is.
A wonderful woman I know has the Habenera bag by REI (link).
Cross-loading with certain belay devices - take a look at the Rhino carabiner which is specially constructed to prevent cross loading.
A few others I could think of: Foxes Foxes are generally not aggressive are easily scared away by humans.
We've camped for a month (4 adults/no kids), no TV, no phone, no radio or power & one water spigot.
There are several factors you should considering when judging the severity of a fall.
Close your eyes and stay in a prone position with as few bounces as possible.
An embolism in a medical context refers to any large moving mass or defect in the blood stream.
If you have space, you can seperate the tent body and the tent poles and pack them on the inside.
Go to your nearest military surplus store and ask if they have any arctic water bottles.
First off, let me admit, I have never made crack-climbing gloves with tape.
I wouldn't say it's necessarily better for the things you outline than the other common options.
For hard-packed or icy snow, steel runner sleds are quite fast.
If you haven't climbed in a while I would recommend staying away from doing fingertip pull-ups on hang boards.
On more than one occasion, having forgotten DEET, we have just rubbed down with raw garlic.
Although technology has brought us many conveniences most of them require supporting power or other technology.
Mosquitoes love me, so I've had opportunity to try many variations of repellent.
well there are many ways to prevent this, the easyiest way would be to trim the hair between the paws.
If I already had the right to vote I would give a +1 to Patrick Scott's answer.
Many fish will strike at any moving object of roughly the right shape.
When talking about fresh, dry clothes then it's not true.
I think if you're seeing damage your concern is valid.
I haven't used this trick for your exact issue but I have used it for similar issues.
There are a few techniques that amount to just this.
Children are a relatively high risk on board a small boat.
Google maps is free as in beer but doesn't usually show hiking trails.
You need to distill it - I'm assuming that freezing is not an option (unless you're camping in the extreme latitudes).
It would be unusual for a snake to attack a stationary person.
I am near Seattle and I am getting some miles in around Snoqualmie and Middle Fork Wilderness areas.
As I wrote above, it's hard to rate this wall.
You are right, if you gain 3000+ meters within 6 hours, you are susceptible to AMS.
I picked up a memory foam travel pillow for around $5 at Canadian Tire a few years back.
What was already said: pee and don't drink before sleeping.
This doesn't directly answer your question and might not be to your liking, but it's what I do.
Probably the best thing you can do to acclimate to the cold is to live in it.
In average to less than average physical shape, I'd say that is pushing it a bit.
There are a few differences between the SOT kayaks and a touring kayak that you'll want to consider.
Imsodin's answer is good and covers a lot of good points.
Once you open it up to toxins, the answer is clearly no, boiling is not enough.
I use Oil of Lemon Eucalyptus(OLE) and it works great.
If you are being asked to boil water it has a biological contamination.
Couscous is one of the best sources of carbohydrate I've found.
Oh friend, I have been down this miserable road just like you.
The most common for rock climbing are with fingerboards or campus boards.
Different parts of California have different wildlife, so you should probably narrow the region.
The rucksacks that I own, have extra long straps as well.
I like the question although I am not a geocacher at all.
You can sit on your hands or cross your arms over your chest, clench a fist, and pump your muscles.
If you have children with you, you will have no worries about keeping yourself busy, you'll be plenty busy.
The British Mountaineering Council (BMC) has a downloadable helmet guidebook which addresses this question pretty well.
If you're staying out overnight, consider digging a snowhole instead of using a tent.
If you wear a bear bell on your backpack, your fellow hikers will kill you for being annoying.
To deal with low oxygen environments you need more red blood cells.
If you wear a bear bell on your backpack, your fellow hikers will kill you for being annoying.
I clean my drinking system with lots of hot water then sterilise it using baby bottle sterilising tablets.
Figure 8 pattern is good but there is also another pattern which can be useful.
Oh friend, I have been down this miserable road just like you.
For every item, I weigh up the regularity of use, vs the urgency of use.
Sleeping pads: I was on a motorcycle trip with very little storage space.
If it's honeydew, then soap & water should do the trick.
I wouldn't buy an ultralight tent if you're going to put the tent through severe trauma or require significant space (e.g.
I believe the threads are generally compatible, BUT that's not the issue.
I would consider "Rock Climbing" as something in the Class 5 definition of the YDS grading system.
There are 2 things that you need to watch out for: Wind chill and getting wet due to sweating.
Actually, electric fences with an attached alarm are pretty common when camping in Svalbard (lots and lots of polar bears).
My opinion is to wait for the child to ask for it.
You are safe to use the bottles as long as they have been properly sterilised.
He is taking the diaper off because he is uncomfortable.
I recommend fewer, longer stops instead of short, frequent stops.
First of all, you should get past the idea that you are going to get her to change.
There is something that a teacher told us regarding the bullying between our toddler (3) and our infant (1 year).
I'd ensure you got professional advice before committing your children to a vegan diet.
I would recommend asking questions in a way that doesn't require a yes or no answer.
I'm multilingual too, able to turn the language switch in the brain without effort.
Yes, twins can develop their own language, but it's not a given.
Whatever you do, don't bite him back to show him that it hurts.
A rule of thumb that I've heard is "for small children, big dogs".
You can try cutting the nails when they are asleep.
My opinion is to wait for the child to ask for it.
They should be rewarded for good behavior in the process of learning the good behavior.
I know of no firm evidence indicating that baby talk is either helpful or detrimental in language development.
I've always used the 1-2-3 countdown method, but as stated in the chosen post, this requires training.
A possibility is to have a family meeting with the stated goal of working out the reward(s) for chores.
At a certain time, the answer would have been a quick spanking or at least a swat on the behind.
There are actually more than 2 methods of teaching a child to sleep through the night.
Pacifier use too early, or, indeed, any artificial nipple use too early can definitely lead to nipple confusion.
The point is to get the air out that the infant sucks into the stomach while feeding.
You make sure to praise hard work rather than natural gifts.
Most martial arts schools don't take kids until they are 4 or 5, depending on the class and the school.
I wouldn't say this was an absolute necessity, but I absolutely love having a video baby monitor.
Nicknames - people (especially in Australia) will always have their names reduced to the minimum number of syllables.
Remember also that there are no foods that cannot be eaten at breakfast.
Would you be concerned with the mind changing if he wasn't shouting and/or misbehaving?
Yeah, that schedule is an excellent way of making sure you get enough sleep.
You should have a consultation route with the school head which can lead to direct consultation with a health professional.
A very good friend of mine helped my wife and I cope when the strain of a strong-willed toddler.
You will be hard pressed to find scientific studies that answer these questions with any certainty.
Although cheese is very healthy and also good during pregnancy, some types might contain Listeria, which can cause serious problems.
I actually involved my Daughter in with helping me and my son when he was born.
I would suggest you to look into baby sleeping bags.
Since you're allergic, what sort of detergent do you use personally to prevent negative reactions?
Praise is a wonderful motivator as long as the praise is for the "right" things.
The fact that she played with her toys for 3 hours indicates that there is NOT anything physically wrong.
My sister is a dentist, so she gave a cute toothbrush with lights on it.
The Met Opera has showings of operas in local movie theaters.
You only need to bath your baby 2-3 times a week.
If the child falls and cries unusually then make sure to check.
As a teacher and a recently back to work mom, I think there are more cons than pros.
Both of my kids have some form of lactose intolerance.
Another strategy is to survey the nursing staff at the hospital asking who they use for their children.
With our twins (13 months old) we have a bedtime routine starting around 7 (earlier if they are cranky).
It sounds as though you're going through something I went through a little while ago.
Peer pressure is empowered by the drive to belong and be accepted.
Both of our children slept in a portable pen for at least their first year, and there were no problems.
In addition to reading, flash cards are also a great way to increase vocabulary.
First, constantly reassure her that she has nothing to fear.
I have never read anything that said teethers were bad--where did you read that?
First and foremost you and your partner need to identify what styles of learning work best for you.
Alternative hubby perspective: Nothing went wrong, and I still don't think it was a waste of time.
As a speech language pathologist, I've been trained in treating stuttering.
Interesting that she was happy with it for about 2 weeks.
I struggled at bath time with my children (now 2, 3, and 4) when they were very little.
We have a routine called 'going to the window'-- the preschool/day care has a window overlooking the parking lot.
I had a problem with grinding my teeth when I was young.
I'm facing a similar situation; being Danish and living in (German-speaking) Austria.
I've done a lot of road trips and a few airplane trips with my now 6-year-old and often alone.
My son didn't become potty trained until about his 4th birthday.
We use the 1.2.3 rule, and I'm a computer programmer, and my oldest son (6 years old) loves math.
According to Web MD a seven-year-old should get about 10 to 11 hours of sleep per day.
As other people have said, it sounds like your parents did you a disservice by not preparing you correctly.
My daughter, also 10, tends to have great plans but no follow through.
I would think of this as a gift that your son has.
Be honest about how everyone has flaws and makes mistakes.
I know for a fact that sucking the lower lip does cause a bulging misshaped blob on the lower lip.
I evaluate based on what my parents did or didn't do.
This is anecdotal, but: One of my cousins had a similar problem when he was a child.
Is it possible that you gave up swaddling too early?
When a baby cries, it gets more and more worked up.
You didn't specify how you put him to bed, so here are a few suggestions.
I had a bedtime routine and followed a 3 hour cycle for my infant (at the time newborn).
I assume your child is also being addressed by someone else in English?
Show her how much fun splashing is - that's what we did, and made a game of it.
Let him know that you love him very much and that you have rules for his betterment.
It's difficult for everyone when a child is fighting sleep.
From my own and others' experience, I'd say around 6-9 years of age is the time when they figure it out.
My 13 month old son has been transfixed by the TV since day 1.
Our daughter has always loved her bath, but coming out... not so much.
As a programmer i would propose to you the following: Abstract thinking, Pragmatic Thinking, Higher problem solving.
Bring lots of toys for your child to play with, books, activities.
I think a daily family supper is a good idea.
Playing doctor is something all kids want to try at some point.
Coincidentally, we watched tv with our 6 week old twins last night for about 3 hours.
One concern I have about bring my baby in wooded areas is ticks.
20 years ago my wife and I took Lamaze classes during the pregnancy.
We had a problem with an older one (partially related to a younger child's birth) as far as #2.
Most doctors do recommend rice cereal as the first food, as there is almost no worry of allergic reaction.
This question is rhetorical because it answered itself by using the word "profanity".
After doing some research on this, it seems that some tantrum behaviors might be warning signs of problems.
Most of the literature I can find about infant sleeping has to do primarily with waking habits, not eating habits.
Being excluded from normal classes to get remedial work is definitely not good for your self-esteem.
our daughter had, what we were told were, night terrors.
Given the opportunity, children will play computer games all day, and ignore everything else going on around them.
Here is my advice based on my personal experience pumping breastmilk for twin boys for a full year.
Perhaps the easiest thing to do would be to keep more balanced snacks readily available.
Most modern baby monitors use digital transmission (most often the DECT standard).
It is possible, but it will have to be a docile female betta and a bigish tank.
You indicate in your comments that your hamster does not have hay.
Turtles love eating goldfish and lots of things that fit into their mouths.
Given that the amount of shedding is normal, I don't think there's anything you can do to lessen it.
You're looking at roughly 3-4 cups of food twice a day.
My experience with Danios has that they always have been "bossy" fish.
My answer's going to be the same as one I've previously given.
Okay, so you've got a dog running around without a leash and one that won't let you catch him?
To be honest, this just sounds like normal puppy behavior.
Another issue you might want to consider is that as cats get older their colon response gets weaker.
I have seen cats not like using the litterbox for a variety of reasons.
So, in general I would avoid bathing a cat unless there's a real strong need to do so.
I have had really good results using carPET Scratch Stoppers in doorways and under doors.
I always leave Bear (7 months old, now) with a Kong when I leave for the day.
Cats (and all animals in general) do not understand the concepts of order or tidiness.
It does sound like your cat is upset about something, and trying to communicate it to you.
I have noticed most cats don't lick people a great deal.
How could be you so sure that the fish died a natural death.
I have a Siberian Husky that is not much older than your dog.
For performance dogs we like to wait until 18 months on average.
You could increase the fiber in the diet just like a human would with this issue.
I actually like Nature's Miracle as far as pet stain and smell removers go.
Cats nails keep growing and they have the need to scratch to shorten them and keep them dulled down.
My cat has lost a number of teeth - but refuses to go on a solely wet food diet.
Ah yes, I had that problem with some of my cats, years ago.
My cat has lost a number of teeth - but refuses to go on a solely wet food diet.
First, double-check the dog's body language to make sure that it is truly aggressive.
The answer on backward chaining was very good and I would like to suggest an augmentation to that approach.
The appropriate pH level of the water does vary a bit by fish, but too acidic can definitely kill them.
My guess is that means your cat only marginally likes the food you're feeding him.
I would look into how much water the dog is drinking in a day.
Nearly any cover you buy or build will allow enough air to circulate.
You say that you have scratching posts around your house, but they may not be the right type.
We never gave our foster pup (who LOVES to chew) rawhides because we've heard that they're dangerous if they splinter.
Cover the entrance to the doorway with a old carpet and use a staple guns to secure it.
As long as it's not completely sealed air will get in.
Teaching a retrieve is a great example of when you can use backchaining to get your desired effect.
You should feed your cat twice a day but in summer they won´t eat as much as they do normally.
I have had very good luck with two different obese cats using a Tiger Diner cat bowl.
I wouldn't recommend keeping the giant gourami with any of the fish you have in Tank 2.
As a reminder: There are many cats who have lived long and happy lives on dry food.
With descending paralysis the strong rear leg muscles will have lots of strength.
It is normal for a cat to get upset if an unfamiliar creature passes 'their' lawn/street/window.
It is major surgery and there's always a chance that the cat won't wake up from anesthesia.
One piece of advice I've seen is to use bait to lure the snails out, and then physically remove them.
Try switching to rats; weanling rats if you need something smaller.
You should take this animal to a vet right away.
The main cause of the allergies is proteins in the saliva.
Ammonia is present in urine as a by-product of meat consumption, so its presence is entirely natural.
The ASPCA website has an exhaustive list of toxic and non-toxic plants for dogs, cats, and horses.
I have had great luck with Thundershirts in calming my pets, both cats and dogs.
I would say start by familiarizing the dog with the baby's scent.
For most of mine I do what Kyle does: stand the carrier on end and put the cat in rump-first.
The behavior in wolves is known as "scrape behavior"; it is also present in their domesticated relatives.
There are a few things to help your bun gain a bit of weight.
Stocking is very subjective to the specific inhabitants as well as the setup and your aquarium experience.
I've found that having existing tartar on the teeth is the worst culprit for stinky breath.
Sadly, you can't communicate to the female "hey its only play... he actually likes you".
It may be worth trying one of the artificial pheromone sprays.
As he goes to get the food, you'll want to say your command.
Zaralynda has a fantastic answer, that runs counter to my in belief the "badness" of iceberg lettuce for bunnies.
The antibiotics should hopefully help keep the itching down, so that he won't scratch at it.
Another alternative for feeding pills is to just put the pill in the rabbits mouth.
Odds are, the cat's as wary of you as you are of her.
Neutered cats may, or may not, consider it less important to go outside and examine/defend their territory.
I agree with Beo and Zaralynda... both are good advice.
Is there anything that you would want to do at 3am when you've just been woken up by your cat?
I adopted a dog who ate fast (the way he was raised and Cushing's Disease).
Your cats are still closer to kitten than to true adult and they want to hunt and pounce for practice.
Pipolino Kong for cats Catit feeding maze SmartCat Tiger Diner Portion Control Cat Bowl, cf.
Pet stores do sell "Pet Grass" which gives them something to chew on (or grow your own).
This is a good example of overstocking a fish tank.
Going by your pictures, no, you can't combine these fish.
Diet management of iodine intake for your cat is going to be very difficult with food intended for human consumption.
The best approach is play with your cat each night in the evening before bedtime.
Perhaps she will respond to the sound (or smell, if applicable) of treats.
I don't have direct experience with bettas, but I've never heard that pairs will work long-term in any male/female combination.
Cats are sensitive and highly strung, and can sometimes have odd reactions to being over-stimulated.
Since the risks and pitfalls of wire floors are largely mentioned, I'll mention pros...
We always put it crushed up in a bit of butter or on a sardine.
An experiment with chicken: Two cages of chickens had a similar food automatic device.
Odds are, the cat's as wary of you as you are of her.
I ended up using a combination of the three answers provided with a slight twist.
The biggest reason I can think of is that you're taking away a defence mechanism for the cat.
People here has answered very well but if nothing helps then barking control collars can help as a last resort.
Depending on where you live, burying your pet in your yard may be illegal.
The two primary consideration here are the dogs safety and the ease (or budget) of improvement.
Breed Zebra Danios are extremely hardy fish, they are almost difficult to kill.
Diatomaceous Earth claims say that it works on fleas/mites by microscopically abrading (cutting) their exoskeleton, essentially drying them out.
Cats are descended from desert dwelling animals and have their kidneys concentrate the urine very strongly to recover water.
It's just her style.... My cats all have different eating styles.
At this stage, I would look to add fish and stop artificially adding ammonia to the system.
How could be you so sure that the fish died a natural death.
Gastric dilation, also know as bloat, is a veterinary emergency.
It's possible that your cat, like some people, has simply gotten more finicky with age.
No, goldfish do not "pair up" — not socially, and not even in breeding.
When a carrier is not a thing to be afraid of, things get a lot easier.
The thing they hate in citrus is the oil (which has the smell).
Clean the urinated zone with vinegar (I used to do that when my feline daughter was a baby kitten).
I have one Maine Coon but she does not do this behavior.
Aristotle didn't put the world at the center of the universe per se.
I don't think that positivism is a position of mostly leftist philosophers.
It's a non-sequitur, which means that the conclusion "doesn't follow" from the premise.
If everything has a cause, then God must have a cause.
I do not think the possibility of holding contradictory beliefs is controversial.
Strictly speaking I believe definitive knowledge is never obtainable, as Karl Popper has convincingly argued.
You don't write a dictionary first and then tell people to learn it.
"To cause" means that there is an unbroken chain, ordered in time, that links from cause to effect.
In structural terms, the second sentence isn't incorrect, you just read it incorrectly.
Well for one a being could have a non-physical existance and yet not even be in your mind.
As a thoroughgoing occasionalist, Malebranche held that all causal activity is divine.
Dr Julin Jaynes speculates in his book; The origin of consciousness in the break down of the bicameral mind.
In modern evolutionary biology, teleology is considered to be an irrelevant explanation for what caused things to be.
People who are good at the philosophy of mathematics are mathematicians and not philosophers.
I'm afraid I don't have an answer for you, but perhaps I can offer you a somewhat useful non-answer?
Rational explanations follow from a specific set of axioms plus rules to go from step to step.
I too am interested in this Budhist topic and offer a humble answer.
The difference between "necessary" and "sufficient" is the direction of the logical arrow.
This is much more a biology/evolution question than a philosophy question.
I have no idea why it is voted up, but Rex Kerr's answer begs the question.
In the case that B, assume A and derive B to yield A implies B.
Yes, if "natural numbers" is the commonly agreed on term from arithmetic.
In the above process, nowhere the eyes are actually reading Chinese, but converting it to signals.
It's true that, under one understanding of "accessibility" and "determining", your accessibility relation is determined by your axioms.
I think this would be an example of a fallacy known as a Red Herring.
I think that the only difference between the two is the semantic objective of the definition.
Answering my own question, I've found MIT's OpenCourseware to be a good starting point.
Though I mostly agree with Cody's answer, I wish to answer from different perspectives.
3 is in the set of integers but not in the set of even numbers.
You say this thing is older than the other, when both has measurable and finite age.
I once met a physicists who held the strong AI position.
The list is long, and will depend a lot upon your eventual area of specialization.
Consequentialism not only admits but advocates cruel treatment in exactly those cases where there is an overall benefit.
I can not refute the argument as it is perfectly sound.
I don't think you can find a consistent distiction across philosophers.
Well, you can always limit the number of iterations or timeout to recover from "infinite loops" in decision procedures.
The most simple example i can think of is the category mistake, a kind of fallacy.
Not necessarily tied to philosophy, but in formal debates the sides agree on a proposition to make arguments about.
If a statement is not provable an inconsistency or self-contradiction may or will develop that invalidates the system.
First of all, one needs to separate mathematical model from reality.
I gave this a lot of thought a few years ago and came up with a test.
I work in a quite technical field, that my wife knows nothing about.
No measurement from inside the observed system can be informationally complete.
The Question is (from Hinduism); do you exist because of pregnancy?
let's see - God made human and able to improve it, people made computers and can improve them too.
Marxist theory was developed in the 19th century by two German philosophers, Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels.
Are we anthropormising the world when we incorporate cause & effect into our understanding of how the world acts?
I don't know about Hinduism, but you jumped of the track right off the bat with Islam.
Off the top of my head, I think it's better to look at the criteria you've proffered for identifying "God".
The existence of different logics is interesting, but not particularly relevant, because of Gödel/Turing universality.
First, you've got to be more specific about the "laws of physics".
Sophie's World by Jostein Gaarder polarises opinion as it is a history of philosophy wrapped up in a children's story.
"God is exactly this Substance underlying who supports, exist independently of, and persist through time changes in material nature.
I think that for an understanding Wittgenstein's "solution", you must take in account the original (historical) context.
This line of thought has a rich tradition in philosophy.
Forget for a moment that you ever learned anything about so-called "complex" or "imaginary" numbers.
The question of time is an incredibly difficult one, which has been treated of philosophers from Aristotle to Heidegger.
What you are asking about is the nature of causality, which is one of the stickiest problems in philosophy.
Here is an example of philosophy helping a breakthrough in mathematics (in differential topology).
Discussions about the contingency of mathematical properties should definitely consider the existence of Non-standard Models (see the related MathOverflow reference request).
Not all negative claims can be validly reformulated into positive claims.
This is classic "Nature versus Nurture" debate, and if you study psychology you'll never hear enough of this.
Our greatest asset For comparison, basically, human and animal have similar purpose in life, those are, survival and enjoyment.
First, you must be using humanist in an idiosyncratic way.
Most contemporary philosophers would interrogate the concept of happiness, pain, and even "human nature".
I haven't read it myself, but I've heard good things about Delacampagne.
This is much more a biology/evolution question than a philosophy question.
People almost always have "rational explanations" for the things they do.
They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety, deserve neither liberty nor safety.
As I understand it, nothing that can be changed, or broken down into smaller parts is inherently real.
Knowledge, of the kind you're asking about, I think, usually requires evidence and reasoning.
First, other sciences can have their concepts explained without math.
This varies depending on which logical system you're working in.
"How objects are named" is something of a mystery to me.
I can imagine a scenario where a single all powerful god create the universe that we know of.
The similiarity between Kant's and Wittgenstein's trains of thought has been expounded before for sure.
A more idiomatic paraphrase of ~(x)Bx is: not everything is a bird.
On a temporary basis and as an ongoing personal philosophy selflessness is possible but a consistent selfless life is unsustainable.
This argument is about as sensible as saying that -1 is absurd because a negative apple doesn't and can't exist.
If not, what is preventing "happiness" from being quantified, in principle?
personally, i think u just identified one of philosophies greatest weakness, the lack of practical value.
Nothing is very difficult to conceptualise - we only approach it by analogy.
In Zen, validation occurs by recognition by a validated practitioner in a ceremony/event called Dharma Transmission.
Interpreting infinity=0 mathematically is problematic for reasons that Niel de Beaudrap outlined.
They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety, deserve neither liberty nor safety.
Please see "A Foray into the Worlds of Animals and Humans" with a theory of meaning by Jakob Von Uexkull.
So, I will tailor my response to your comment to ChaosAndOrder.
From an atheist philosophical standpoint, how is existential contingency explained or accounted for?
Read the paper Friederich Nietzsche and the seduction of Occam’s razor by Danesh-Meyer, Helen V.Young, Julian, 2010.
Death penalty is a punishment, (in theory) reserved for the most heinous of crimes.
His theorem applies to the way the mind works as well.
Zizek actually has touched this subject a couple of times.
Expanding upon Joseph's comment: Special relativity rules out the possibility of absolute simultaneity.
Download the reading Guide on logic books from http://www.logicmatters.net/students/tyl/ §1.2 gives recommendations for complete beginners.
You might try Carnap's famous (but often neglected) Der logische Aufbau der Welt (The Logical Structure of the World).
In Solipsism everyone else is a "philosophical zombie"; and all the time.
Time is a physical factor and the term used to capture this concept is the word 'TIME'.
will be supertrue (superfalse) iff under all (no) acceptable precisifications of the predicate "bald", the sentence comes out true.
It seems that you are really asking what we mean by "rational".
You may find in recent philosophical letters (e.g., Collapse, in particular vol.
When I needed a travel tripod, I also opted for a Trekpod.
I finally found one of the best astrophotography articles I've ever found on the net.
To answer your question, yes, this is a design issue.
Fast Picture Viewer has an extensive pack for the low price of $9.99 and it appears to cover them all.
There are many compact cameras with underwater housings available from Canon and Olympus.
Apart from aperture and focal length, depth of field also decreases with camera-subject distance.
I can't speak for Canon cams, but in the Nikon world generally one should stick with Nikon brand batteries.
When printed on a lens the f-stop is usually expressed as a ratio with a colon (i.e.
The key is adding some specific tags every time you import.
Some of the newer point and shoots do great in manual mode.
The interface between ACR and Photoshop has changed a couple of times over the years.
A more expensive option is a remote trigger like the wireless pocket wizards and the cable for your camera.
It is important to remember that RGB is an additive process, and CYMK is a subtractive process.
There's no simple rule of thumb due to the inhearent nonlinearity in the equations.
Although you could fix this problem in lightroom with reasonable results, you can fix it when taking the picture.
Ken Rockwell claims, and I agree, that the D5000 in quiet mode is pretty darn quiet.
I used to think that blurring was one of those things that was impossible to recover from in post.
If you took a look at the image that your camera initially takes, you'd be disappointed in it.
In my (admittedly limited) experience, in-lens stabilization (Nikon D90 + 18-200mm) works a lot better than in-body (Pentax K200D + 18-250mm).
For what it's worth, dirt on the lens might not be as detrimental as you would think.
You need to be embedding a color profile in you image, as also using a browser that supports color management.
Firstly words, even technical terms, change meaning over time with usage.
I have a few Nikon lenses, and a Sigma 10-20mm for super-wide shots.
If you are looking for something that really won't move, I do recall of the Cotton Carrier line of products.
I have found there is no single best way to increase size.
The smaller the camera sensor size, the higher the crop factor, and thus the higher the effective focal length.
Use a large aperture (small F number) when you take a photo.
You need either to remove the offending light or supply much more additional light to wash out the reflection.
I simply got a refurbished older model point and shoot for my 5 year old.
Bokeh is a bit like evaluating wine, there's some technical evaluation and some subjective evaluation of it.
Cleaning the glass is a great suggestion, however, even with clean glass you have a few more issues.
A Canon at 300ppi, you have the same tonal range as an Epson at 288ppi.
It simply means there are lots of pixels in your photograph at that brightness level.
Shutter priority for shots that I want to control how much the action is frozen or blurred (panning).
I've used Paint Shop Pro and DxO Optics Pro on Windows.
The only construction-agnostic term would be long lens to compliment the other lens classes: wideangle and normal.
Apart from dpreview.com, you can use Snapsort if you'd like something more flashy.
A class 6 card in theory should be more than enough bandwidth for HD (1080) video for the 550D (48 MBit).
Bear in mind that the aperture will usually have to be set manually too.
They could, on the other hand, more easily extend their own RAW format(s).
Personally, I just guess, take a shot and look at my histogram and tweak as needed.
Aside from the better quality of the EF-S 10-22mm lens, it offers a significantly wider angle of view.
Bibble Pro is a cross-platform program similar to Lightroom and Aperture.
Here are many samples: Pbase.com Out of the 16k photos there, I'm sure some are with a d700.
There are literally dozens of tripods that can handle more than two pounds.
The one clear benefit of digital that I see is the ability to emulate color filters in software.
I second the approach of a standalone GPS Tracker and then using some software to sync it into your metadata.
I would thoroughly recommend a read of Trey Ratcliff's excellent HDR tutorial.
Depends on your budget obviously, but some cameras have dual card slots and can write identical files to both.
I believe you're out of luck with IE, though perhaps that may get corrected in IE 9.
Same here, I've the 50mm f/1.4, and as my fastest lens I couldn't live without it for concerts and low-light photography.
I use Elinchrom Skyports, but if money is not an issue then go for PocketWizards.
I had good luck switching the image into LAB mode, then adjusting the luminance layer only.
The short answer is that yes, you can do this.
There is no set rule for this; it all depends what you want to photograph.
Well, I've searched for this for a good long while.
Dodge and Burn normally applies when you want to change the relative exposure of part of an image.
I'd go with the SD 1300, just check if you mother-in-law feels comfortable with its size.
Photoshop Elements is $99 and is very close to Photoshop in terms of features for photographers but much cheaper.
The most important fact - which is buried in one of the previous responses - is focus speed.
To follow up on Genius' reply, DP Review had a Waterproof Camera Group Test last year.
They could, on the other hand, more easily extend their own RAW format(s).
Chinon CEII that My Dad gave me as a student.
Nick Miners.com Nick is a friend of mine who posts articles on his blog covering a range of photography topics.
I don't know about nikon, but I did the same thing on the Canon side.
The terminology is usually called "Destructive vs Non Destructive" editing.
Use a high speed page feed scanner like the DR-2010C from Canon.
You can use free, open-source utility Exiftool to extract the metadata from the JPG files.
Two things need to be considered here: focusing speed and adequate sensitivity to light to achieve a fast shutter speed.
I think this is an example of: use the opportunities you have, rather than the ones you wish you had.
There's really only one thing you need to memorize and it's easy: a list of standard f-stops in graduations of one f-stop (1, 1.4, 2, 2.8, 4, 5.6, 8, 11, 16, 22, 32, 45, 64, 90).
I upgraded from 400D to 7D and things just got sharper (and you should expect the same).
Reid is right - that VR does not help at all in stopping motion.
In short: you can enlarge it as much as you like.
If you can find a used 7d I'd jump on it, but chances are, you won't at a price oyu'll like.
There are numerous kinds of optical abberations that you may encounter with a lens.
Sometimes the amount of exposure compensation available (ie +/- 2 stops) in Aperture priority mode might simply not be enough.
The camera will only ever do a "quick format" as there is a limit on read/write operations on flash memory.
I have the 35mm 1.8 and the 50mm 1.4 - and for people wanting thier 1st fixed prime I always point them at the 35mm 1.8 1st.
For what it's worth, dirt on the lens might not be as detrimental as you would think.
Polarizers do block light, as they are designed to filter out light coming from certain directions.
If you're not feeling the limitations of your point-and-shoot camera, then you probably don't need a DSLR.
If you are a member of Costco, their prints are great.
I don't bracket with digital unless I'm blending multiple exposures to get greater dynamic range.
Definitely shoot in AV (aperture value) mode and vary the shutter speed!
I know you asked for free stuff, however given that I whole-heartedly agree with Reid about how valuable your time is.
Large-format cameras are very much worth buying used; they're often extremely well-cared-for, if not coddled.
Basically, you must understand three settings: Film speed, aperture size, shutter speed.
Most dancefloor lights are tungsten, so unless you're using flash you should be okay with that.
Adobe Photoshop Elements is actually a pretty good package these days.
The exposure settings to stop moving objects depends entirely on how fast the objects are traversing your frame.
First of all, what you have is probably mirror pre-fire rather than a true mirror lockup.
If you're primarily interested in video, the Nikon option offers 1080p and 24 frames per second with autofocus.
If the photo is blurred due to camera shake, you really don't have many options.
Anil, there certainly is a difference in results, mainly in image quality.
I just found a page that has some information about this.
Most digital cameras use a 10 to 14-bit A/D converter, and so their theoretical maximum dynamic range is 10-14 stops.
Understanding Exposure by Bryan Peterson is a great and easy to read book that covers these topics.
Freezing motion generally requires one, maybe two things: fast shutter speed, and flash at the right time.
I'm a bit biased, but you might find my site, Snapsort useful.
The answer is No, since Russia is one of the five permanent members of the Security Council.
Federal DOMA does not test the full faith and credit clause so much as the 9th and 10th Amendments to the Constitution.
Public employees can unionize because the law allows them to.
There are two challenges to online voting which can be seen as well technological as cultural.
The U.S. appears to have a smaller shadow economy for a few reasons in no particular order.
The United States has had a constant 435 members in the House of Representatives since the Reapportionment Act of 1929.
Leaving aside heath care angle, you are working from a flawed premise that waging war doesn't save lives.
The following is a synopsis and explanation of common beliefs the Libertarian free market philosophy.
"opportunities for the people to control their leaders and to oust them without the need for a revolution".
The president is not really all that important for German people.
Executive orders are not permanent, they exist at the will of the president and can be changed at any time.
There are 2 problems with the viewpoint you presented in the question, which explain the seeming contradiction.
In a "first-past-the-post" system, it is difficult to sustain more than two parties.
Great Britain is used to formally refer to the UK (including Northern Ireland) in a number of international associations.
Most democratic countries have a written constitution, but it's not a requirement.
The legal reasons why public employees can unionize have been elsewhere described.
Over time, Parliament (the Lords and Commons) took more and more power from the monarch.
They WERE called "freedom fighters" in the West through 1980s when they were fighting the USSR.
Legal case information is generally easy to come by if you poke around a bit.
The part of economics that is most like physics is called microeconomics.
Yes it is technically possible that a BUK system shot down the plane.
"Teabagging" is when a male dips his scrotum upon another person's face as an insult.
Some lobbying comes in the form of giving campaign contributions to politicians.
Being left or right were obvious when being right was being for monarchy and being left was being for republic.
tl;dr: If non-dictatorial communist societies existed, then not for long.
Simply, it was not well thought out, and the "unintended consequences" are now revealing themselves.
Let me share my opinion as Ukrainian citizen, from Kharkiv, eastern Ukraine.
Nowhere does it say that a naturalized citizen has the same privileges as a natural-born citizen.
Most people want not only to be WELL off, but to become BETTER off as time goes by.
When having discussions on Anarchist/Anarcho-capitalist forums, I've come across this issue a couple times.
First, They already have, that is part of the reason for the conflict in the first place.
The Vice President is elected because it is constitutionally required, as per the 12th amendment.
So do they basically stop paying their vendors such as the electric company or rent on buildings?
I'm not yet able to answer if the phenomenon has an official PoliSci name.
Let me make something incredibly clear up front: While I come across as rather angry, I'm not.
These are generically called nomination rules; the US calls them ballot access rules.
No, nothing in the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act grants the President transitional authority.
Federal DOMA does not test the full faith and credit clause so much as the 9th and 10th Amendments to the Constitution.
Both of your bullet points are correct, and both are wrong.
In German, the term "Nahost" or "Naher Osten" (near East) are in common use.
In Lebanon (and in some other places) 'Christian' is as much an ethnic and cultural as a religious designation.
While these criteria are normative, there are solidly defended norms out there for these meanings.
Wikipedia has a short list of articles about LGBT groups and individuals opposed to same-sex marriage.
Some of the gap could be attributed to social issues, but that may not account for the entire gap.
One has to separate out two elements of this - first is 'voter' and second is the difference between 'knowledge' and 'interest'.
The Jerusalem is a holy place for both Muslims and Jews.
Equality is widely accepted because it can mean so many different things to so many people.
After posting this question, I received the February 1st - 7th edition of the Economist.
I think the best way address your question(s) is by using a legal analysis.
The word "libertarianism" was essentially invented because classical liberals felt that the word had become expropriated.
I would rather have added this as comments to the question and to NL7 answer but do not have the reputation..
Probably the best measure of a candidates ideology is the DW NOMINATE score.
What troubles most people about same-sex and sibling marriages is their likely impact on childbearing.
One result, perhaps unintended of the split between the Senate and the House is that they have rather different constituencies.
The holocaust took place to some extent within Germany, and German Jews/gypsies/homosexuals were taken to extermination camps.
Well when it comes to a Developing Country there wouldn't be a huge impact.
Russian Federal Law is actually quite specific on this one and not as arbitrary as argued.
When having discussions on Anarchist/Anarcho-capitalist forums, I've come across this issue a couple times.
To make a tactical vote, you need an estimate how much votes each candidate is probably going to get.
This question has already been widely discussed and answered on Skeptics.
According to Shia Muslims specially Iran state and Hezbollah a country called Israel does not exist.
Whenever you hear about "politicians receiving money from corporations" It almost always refers to campaign contributions rather than personal gifts.
You are asking a fairly broad question, so I need to tackle a few points before answer it directly.
They do it for the same reason why some stadiums sell their good tickets by lottery.
I disagree that there's "no other choice" than to be funded by public organizations.
I am from Hungary and I looked for hungarian source of Poland, polish and other keywords on Jobbik website.
The Federal Reserve has been conducting Open Market Operations for many decades; the law was passed in 1913.
In the election of 1872, Grant easily beat Horace Greely, 286 to what would have been 66 votes for Greely.
Both of your bullet points are correct, and both are wrong.
In theory, that would be the case if all workers were equal.
Border Issue: There is certainly a border issue between India and Bangladesh.
As you see, the answers and comments here also contradict each other.
Most political ideologies are in favor of restricting the behavior and thoughts of just about everybody, young and old.
As Michael WS points out, a 'first past the post' system (which the US has) encourages a two party system.
"Teabagger" is yet another shining example of "civil discourse" by left wingers in America.
Many countries significantly reduced their debt by defaulting on it.
In short, you can't because the Supreme Court has recognized the Right to Lie.
The government can't force a business to act, but they can punish them for not acting.
The reason it changed is the term "liberal," suffered too much damage to it's brand, particularly during the years Pres.
The entire social contract tradition on which most modern forms of government are based depends on equality of certain rights.
At a very simple level, the answer is that not all rights are financial.
Crimea is a very fertile agricultural region, and is often seen as a vacation spot for Russians.
Your forgetting the most dangerous criminals, the trained professionals, the law enforcement officers.
Because there are more effective ways for Her Majesty to change or veto laws.
Absolute majority always defined by the institution, or the context.
Hospitals are legally bound to stabilize a patient, but that is all; so many life-saving operations still will not be performed.
The French constitution of 1946 (Fourth Republic) established proportional representation (at the level of each departement).
Inflation is caused by money supply growing faster than the rate of economic growth.
Professor Burkhauser has done extensive research on who is hurt by higher minimum wages.
The Nazi party was called Nationalsozialistische Deutsche Arbeiterpartei (National Socialist German Workers' Party).
Well, there is distinction between extremist party and an anti-democratic party.
In Massachusetts, you walk into the polling place and state a name and home address belonging to a registered voter.
In a roundabout way, there's some truth to that statement, though it's a bit more nuanced than that.
The democratic election of Communist Salvador Allende in Chile in 1970 represented an "experiment" in democratic Communism.
The University constituencies are modelled on the University constituencies in use in Britain in 1922 when Ireland became independent.
In the age of Empire, these were totally different things.
There are conflicting philosophies and approaches to this (and frankly, no good or clear answer).
The government can't force a business to act, but they can punish them for not acting.
This question can only be answered within a theoretical context.
One argument sometimes made against federally recognized civil unions by anti-gay-marriage side is actually purely political.
Before you want to start the study of a subject, figure out what you want to achieve.
Inbox Zero means what it says: nothing what so ever is left in your in box.
I would suggest starting from ActiveInbox (used to be GTDInbox) and see whether that fully covers your needs.
To me, the effectiveness of my system relates to my long, mid-range, and short term goals.
Eclipse Below are list of eclipse shortcuts which I use almost everyday.
As others have mentioned, the iRobot Roomba is an excellent example of a household robot which does meaningful work.
Thinking on your feet is an essential skill for combat soldiers.
The important thing I try to remember is just to pay attention.
I think just the typical kitchen timer is the best investment you can get (for a physical device).
There are several ways to tackle this and it partly depends on the system you're using.
Use a firm sturdy chair like a kitchen table chair instead of an office chair.
The Pomodoro Technique was developed by Francesco Cirillo and is aimed at establishing a standard to measure productivity.
After your meeting, try to find a picture of them on the internet.
I think the hesitation comes from the fear that you will not be productive during the session.
There is not really anything you can do besides being a witness; just try to get over it.
I've learned over the years that Association is the key!
I've found that usually when I'm being introverted or quiet it's because I'm thinking mostly about myself.
I think you need to apply a little statistical thinking to this.
You're right, someday/maybe vs actionable is an artificial distinction that induces mental resistance during the classification process.
What folders you need depends a bit on your email client's capabilities, and how you want to work.
What I do is wake up early (around 6) and run for a while.
A quick research (1, 2) showed me that the concentration of caffeine seems to peak about 30-60mins after ingestion.
So consider the idea that it might be your body trying to tell you something...
Here's a technique I've developed without being aware of it: Multiple Browsers.
Try Any.Do, apart from everything you want, it also has the ability to drag and drop tasks to organize them.
I have a standing/sitting desk at work and really like it.
I used to struggle with the same desires for adventure, novelty and risk-taking.
Even though the question has been answered I would like to add my answer .
The second option is more realistic unless the book doesn't have many pages.
I get started by telling myself that I do not intend to finish whatever I'm sitting down to work on.
I think this is a more sophisticated version of the questions we often get on gamification.
when I am pretty excited about learning the stuff) I sit down for studying I find myself browsing irrelevant websites!
Bento can handle relationships, but I don't think it can do what you're asking it to do.
The thing I like about Evernote is that this is all they do (for now).
Structured procrastination gives some amazing tipps to trick yourself into doing something.
The #1 skill as all of us "intermediate" and "advanced" users know, is how to web search properly.
The main app I use specifically for this is Daytum.
By definition productivity is measured by calculating the total output per unit of total input.
Let's Do This is the simplest, easiest, and best looking way to manage your daily to do list.
Your brain is already beginning to wind down as you see the end in sight.
Try Anki : http://ankisrs.net/ I hope it is the software you need.
Stephen Covey speaks about this topic in his book "Seven habits of highly effective people", in the chapter "Be proactive".
I think the answer from Brian almost says it all.
Wisdom says broken heart is cured by another heart -- a new love definitely gets you over break-ups.
I have been there too and I have managed to solve these issues by taking away the origin.
To stick with the traditional pomodoro technique this is considered an interruption.
Some years ago I read that one standard deviation in IQ (~15 IQ points) increased productivity by 1.6 times.
Try to apply what you learn by implementing a small project, don't just read.
I'm going to be very short: you should set a singular purpose (goal) for yourself.
I'm writing here a few tips that can help you with motivation.
I find that a good strong espresso will give me a buzz within a few minutes.
I tried listening to music also, but after some time your ears get hurt and that's disturbing.
Self-discipline is good to a certain degree, but overdoing it can be counter-productive.
I think 90 days is the absolute most you can plan out in a single time period.
I bought "Typequick" and set aside a practice time everyday for about a month.
Mendeley is a free alternative to Evernote (but they also have a Pro plan for more features).
What you really need is a long term goal, not a morning routine.
I recently read that a simple short-term change of the environment you work in actually helps to revive your energy.
This may not be the software that your looking for but this has the functionality that you need.
The user needs to evaluate for his/herself the cost/benefit of an "obvious" efficiency tool, such as macros.
I study in a university and live in its hostel.
So do you have a procrastination or an energy problem?
Slightly funny but the internet meme "Asian Father" could be a satirical example.
Prioritization and keeping distractions away are good but these are not the key abilities.
Our body's sleep patterns respond to light by production of serotonin and melatonin.
I like the previous answers regarding setting a schedule and fulfilling the rituals of going to a job.
I'd start by reading David Allen's book: Getting Things Done.
Your objective is to find someone who wants to buy your products.
The best way to clear your head after a study session is by taking on a vigorous physical exercise (min.
I disagree with Josh Bruce on some of his tips.
Currently I've got a fairly close to purely digital GTD setup, although this could do with some refinements and tweaks.
Part of the answer, at least, is that some people just can't do it.
First of all, if you are not familiar with GTD, I'd encourage you to read up on the literature.
Simplest way ... Our brain has to be use too with any thing around the world.
Feel the fear... And do it anyway The book recommends to feel the fear.
RTM is simply ninja for implementing a tickler file, so if you use Remember the Milk you're all set.
I use a trackball mouse controlled by thumb, so my experience may be different.
Every human being has an observation skill and they can improve it with time.
I can speak from my current situation that people are, without question, more productive when a window view is available.
Personally I use mindmapping technique in order to summarize/outline/remember every topic I deal with.
Earplugs will muffle a good portion of sound if it is around normal voice level.
I've been suffering the same problem for the last few years without realizing it.
For me, it also works to start with easy to achieve goals, like: focus on specific task for 10 minutes.
I've recently bought two sit/stand Galant tables from IKEA and I'm quite happy with them.
So, in another words, how can get into a state of concentration, faster.
Dou you really want these kind of people in your team?
So how do you improve your productivity as a programmer?
Needing multiple levels of tasks seem more like project management.
Co-founders are already given lots of incentives in the form of money and acknowledgement.
Something I have been taught while studying English and then preparing for tests/exams like IELTS which may be of help here.
Amazon allows any Kindle user to set up an email address (username@kindle.com) which you can email documents to.
I would say the best thing for me is to have a proper and consistent sleep schedule.
It's a subjective question but In my opinion, people should clean their inbox tasks before sleeping.
I think that your experiment shows exactly how important self confidence for productivity is.
Blogging about what you're learning about is so completely useful.
I would suggest doing a thorough and honest evaluation of your time.
As the development usually requires a "peaceful mind", I leave it to the end of the day.
Some studies suggest open-space environments lower working efficiency with 2-10% due to interruptions, stress and noise.
Experience: you must have noticed in you project/office that other colleagues who are more experience understand things quickly.
Check out these two resources on learning while sleeping http://blogs.smithsonianmag.com/science/2012/06/experiments-show-we-really-can-learn-while-we-sleep/ http://www.scientificamerican.com/podcast/episode.cfm?id=some-skill-sleep-learning-may-work-12-06-25 Apparently it is possible.
There is a relatively narrow set of people who are eligible to be wandering in the restricted areas.
I disagree that the moniker “most extensive” should be applied to Dorothy Jones Heydt’s language.
I had always thought she was the daughter of a Daniel the 7th cylon.
There are many races in the Star Trek universe that are so near-human there may be no discernible difference.
I think Voldemort's arrogance has to be included in the equation.
Storm Front is probably the worst of the Dresden books.
The best explanation comes from Picard in Star Trek: First Contact.
I would start with the Chronicles and move on to the Legends series.
We know that the Puppeteer homeworld achieved 3% of the speed of light in 8 years, according to Juggler of Worlds.
This comes from "The Gripping Hand", the sequel to "The Mote in God's Eye".
The same way they got the van, the guns, and their clothes into the dream.
It's similar to the wind-up tech used in olden toys and watches.
Various bits of them can be used for magical purposes.
The most obvious answer is that the energy shield does not extend all the way to the ground.
I still think it could be River in the suit.
I think it's a reference to Nathan's mother's boyfriend, Jeremy.
How would they be able to keep pace with the lesser, illogical races of the universe if they did?
I think that they do, at least they replicate the majority of the components and assemble them by hand.
No, Harry dropped the Stone before is encounter with Voldemort in the Forbidden Forest.
I had always thought she was the daughter of a Daniel the 7th cylon.
I think the whole point is something like "quality rather than quantity".
Surely the facehugger would have the same kind of blood as the aliens themselves?
In Wishful Drinking http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1705977/ Carrie Fisher brings up her changing accent.
The unofficial reason is that JKR found it difficult to do something new in the Quidditch matches every book .
I have two reasons that work not only within the Star Wars universe, but our own as well: Visibility.
I'd be more inclined to believe that it's some sort of ring world.
I've not seen Origins, but this has been inconsistently displayed through the comics.
On the one hand, there’s nothing in canon to suggest that the Time Turners could go forwards in time.
I was invited in to pitch story ideas to Ron Moore at ST:TNG.
Their jurisdiction (prior to the new 52 that started this month) was the entire known universe*.
First of all, let me say that there seems to be 3 main traits to casting a spell.
Well, first, I think it's because Harry is better than Hermione at Defence Against the Dark Arts in general.
I'd say yes, he was a Sith - just not a very good one.
Not an official reference as 2000AD online has not opened their wiki to the public.
I started watching the Stargate series by watching Atlantis first!
I'm going to put several answers together, and add in a bit of own bit.
I voted for the dyson sphere as being the biggest realistic.
So far there is no definitive answer in the books who the Prince That Was Promised is.
There are several drive types in various games and shows that avoid dilation by not actually generating velocity.
To answer your second question, they were definitely not named because of that capability, even if the capability existed.
As far as I have noticed, Elantris and Warbreaker are completely independent; there are no connections between their plots.
Real World Answer: The discrepancies are a series of continuity errors.
Answering your question of whether or not Voldemort knew Harry was a Horcrux: No, he did not.
It was before the season began because Amy saw the woman before the Silence took her.
Let's assume that the planet only orbits one of the stars.
We have two parallel worlds in collision or maybe more.
We became the world described in it over the last 10 years.
To add to what jwenting said, you can clearly see Vader hit by the emperor strikes.
What do you mean by "reincarnation as opposed to a ghola"?
This is an Alderson Disk and has been featured in Godwheel.
That logic is like assuming because of the HP Pavillion DV6000, there must have been 5999 previous models.
Storm Front is probably the worst of the Dresden books.
Yep, the book pretty clearly states that the boat was designed for two - 1 Wizard and one not.
TL;DR (for my answer, not the question): Depends on the author.
There's a mythical creature called a Namazu - a giant catfish.
Mark Roger's answer of Chronicles, Legends, and Tales is a good answer.
Surely the facehugger would have the same kind of blood as the aliens themselves?
In Anne Rice novels vampires wake up each night with the hair they had when they became vampires.
I suspect it was deliberately kept vague to make a good story.
After taking a random guess, I figured I'd do some more research and find out more details.
Aside from factual details in DavRob's answer, they are different applications.
First, it is explicitly stated that electronics don't work in areas with a lot of magic around.
I think that the British cultural aversion to guns would apply in this case.
While all of these are very good suggestions and they have some sort of evidence as backup.
Dick was an idea guy and a people guy, not a science guy.
From a purely technical standpoint, it was clearly a design flaw in that it went STRAIGHT DOWN.
First, we must consider that "Sphere" is less Hard SF and more soft SF, thriller, airport novel and such.
According to canon, Leia was an expert in combat, especially shooting (this is from EU books).
I’m going to make some suggestions that might help us make more sense of, Why the Cup?!
Anthony Burgess' "A Clockwork Orange" was written in 1962, and contained an entire lexicon of "Nadsat" slang.
I also read up on some stuff while playing the game and afterwards...
I don't think we have a solid theory of mammal speciation.
He was so old and the conditions where he lived last 40 years were bad.
One possibility is that his wife was right - he's still in a dreamworld.
Perhaps "in the future" means after time machines have been invented in their natural time stream.
Here is the 2006 cover release, choice B in your question is the 2006 version.
"Mayflies" by Kevin O'Donnell tells the story of a generation ship, built as an escape from a dying Earth.
I know they have to be careful with idiom at first in Stranger in a Strange Land.
From my understanding a big part of how long the gate stays open is based on power consumption.
This is a very often-debated subject… You'll want to tailor the choice to that person's taste.
Star Wars has its own magnificent historical timeline in addition to being a masterfully executed space-based science fantasy.
"Counterfeit Worlds: Philip K. Dick on Film" by Brian J. Robb has a fairly lengthy article in it about Total Recall.
The black dog is a portent of death in many English folk tales.
This type of warp drive is known as an Alcubierre drive, proposed by the Mexican physicist Miguel Alcubierre.
The WoT Wiki says that publication was pushed back from late 2011 to March 2012.
Martinho lists everything I considered, but the one thing I think he missed was Ringworld Hindmost's engineering skill.
The Doctor says in A Good Man Goes to War that it must've happened 'before America'.
Note: We had a very similar question on Writers.SE; I'm cross-posting my answer from there, adjusted to your specific question.
Sign language maybe, since there is no tone to convey meaning, emotion or intent.
Remember, from the Fleet's point of view, the rest of the galaxy is what's moving and experiencing time dilation.
I've always attributed this to the size of the debris that collided with the ship.
It was learned with 2001: A Space Odyssey, released in 1968, that 100% pure space realism doesn't make for good sound design.
Yes, here is a quote from Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace script.
There is one difference between this question and the invisible man question.
The alien was, iirc, huddled on its side in a small alcove.
In addition to the already given reasons, there are some additional very good reason for this.
This idea has been around since the beginning of myth and storytelling.
I suspect it was deliberately kept vague to make a good story.
Lightsabers have changed little in the thousands of years of their employ by the Jedi Knights.
At one point there was English but it has been phased out in subsequent versions of the films.
Is it possible for a match to get tie even after applying D/L method?
Yes a team can use the same player for both bowling and batting in a super over.
It is simply the number of balls bowled divided by the number of wickets taken.
As per BCCI.TV Brendon McCullum was declared man of the series.
I haven't seen a pro team use a sweeper in YEARS.
Yes, absolutely - the receiving player must allow the ball to bounce before returning the serve - or any shot, actually.
Barclays Premier League (henceforth BPL) starts in the month of August (after the FA Community Shield).
The rule is in place so that a manager can't keep coming out and slowing down the game.
You'll need to incorporate weight training and/or intervals in order to maintain (or increase) your muscle mass.
Albanian Ledio Pano has perfect record scoring over 50 penalties for various teams in Greece and Albania.
Of course it's legal and has happened many times other than the accepted answer's example.
The meaning of the dead ball is no further actions can be performed after the ball is declared as dead.
This has occurred in the match between Australia and South Africa.
Running downhill is more physically demanding, as your body is doing more to resist the force of gravity.
We only used Fartlek as a fitness measurement, and as a bit of fun.
If the number of fours hit by two teams are also equal then both teams will get 1 point each.
The "neighborhood play" at second base, where the fielder doesn't actually touch second base during a double play attempt.
There are two types of left arm spin bowlers, Chinaman and Orthodox.
In the said case, the batting side wins by 1 wicket.
No matter what, runners are never out until they are tagged in this situation.
Women first appeared in the modern Olympics in Croquet at the 1900 Olympics.
Searching the internet for a possible answers, made me realize that this question has been asked many times before.
That's why free hit is not implemented in the Test Cricket.
The stated rational behind the introduction of the play-off in the Turkish league was last year's corruption scandal.
To answer the question on places to read about football strategy, I would highly recommend Zonal Marking.
I've searched the internet and found some really good "How To's".
You are misinterpreting the rule; you can pass the ball to your goalie using your head, chest or whatever.
Unlike in cricket, its really hard to stop the game in between a football game.
There are quite a few actually; practically every game between Turkey and Germany have had some player "upsetting" one side.
The top of the ball will be going in the same direction of the wind.
It is hard to speak for a team, know what their strategy is going into a draft.
The Ranji Trophy is India's domestic cricket competition played between teams representing REGIONAL cricket associations.
To play golf, the first thing you need is a set of clubs.
Yes, dew (wetness in the environment) factor can change the direction of a match.
Boxing has a win in 10 seconds via knockout, or instantly if the referee calls it.
Here's an attempt to layout the history of the position, and the time periods in which it changed.
You would think they wouldn't include a blatant violation, but they did.
Having done 37 marathons I can say some are definitely nicer than others.
Domestically, you start at the club level and work your way through the ranks.
Reading your post, made me think of my younger years !!
Table tennis is to "real" tennis as "miniature" golf (putt-putt) is to "real golf.
There is NO good reason for the failure to implement video plays in professional soccer.
Putting a ball in it and tying it up will help create a pocket.
1934 was the year that the Portsmouth Spartans moved to Detroit and became the Detroit Lions.
If its a new disc you may want to try bending it down towards the concave side.
Basically, the rule is that you must play the ball, and not the man, until someone catches the ball.
It all really depends on what kind of running you are doing.
Don't stress about being the best or worst player on the course.
The replacement refs have, actually, made some atrocious calls throughout this preseason.
Any number of new metrics can be introduced to predict the winning percentages.
This was handled the same way small local swim meets are handled these days: stopwatches.
A center needs to have the firmest hands because he is the one "hiking" the ball to the quarterback.
I'm in a similar situation, albeit I only run half-marathons and bike up to 60km.
This might sound very unhelpful, but really the only solution is lots of practice.
I think it was the 4-4-2. it had slighter modification like 4-1-2-1-2 and 4-2-2-2.
The seedings are based on the rankings of the each of the participating nation at the cut off point.
Basically it is used for a delivery which is too good, almost unplayable and completely beats the batsman.
I am an assistant fencing coach for a collegiate club.
All my experience is in warm sub-tropics so NO WETSUIt swims.
Will Cole's point #3 is the closest to an accurate answer.
There are two variants of the fingers over the eye salute.
At the highest level, a pace setter helps ensure they meet their game plan for the race exactly.
I can think of three key factors that are quite logical conjectures.
First of all, I'm writing this on my phone, so I wont bring you any sources at the moment.
Trailrunnerx on osx can sync with nike+, including after Nike's recent changes to their API.
I haven't found any technical tool under "indepedent training management" rather mechanical innovations.
Willie O'Ree is the considered the first African American to play professionally in the NHL.
Grass fields can get torn up easily especially if the ground is wet.
To play golf, the first thing you need is a set of clubs.
The "neighborhood play" at second base, where the fielder doesn't actually touch second base during a double play attempt.
Wet suits will make you more buoyant which for a swimmer is not a good thing.
So far this delivery has been used for well over a hundred years.
I can't find anything in the rules to back this up, but I believe the call was correct.
The movement of the ball in the air is called swing bowling.
Actually, it's much more easier to count the one NOT on the same continent.
Red ball under yellow floodlight takes on a brownish color which is very similar to the color of the pitch.
You definitely can do it, and it is fine where you have clean, dry climbing surfaces.
Generally you want signs to be simple between a pitcher and a catcher.
Essentially it hasn't been introduced by UEFA because the top brass don't support it because of the financial cost.
Yes, it makes a difference whether it's the serve or in general play.
No, penalty runs will not be given if the ball hits the helmet of the wicket-keeper when wearing it.
No, there is no specific criteria for giving the man of the match award.
If your question is if this system is fair, then my response is that it is highly criticized.
I can't think of the specifics, but I seem to remember this scenario from many years ago.
To answer the question on places to read about football strategy, I would highly recommend Zonal Marking.
As per FIFA's "Equipment Regulations", Section 22, only the goalkeeper is permitted to wear a cap.
The first level of the pagoda: The primary key to jumping is balance.
The front row players can half-stretch their arms during the serve, without moving them.
Glad to hear you've started playing hockey, its a great sport!
As far as I am concerned substitutes are used late on for one thing i.e.
They are similar and different because they share a similar lineage.
A good bet is that this is probably caused by being nervous, and you might be hyperventilating.
I prefer to run the second half 1-2 minutes faster then the first.
What do players that are available but are not playing, because you have enough, do?
This tactic generally really only applies to teams with offenses that are directed by a good/excellent Quarterback.
Apart from batting out of order, the answer is no.
There's a reason that Sports Psychology has grown into a pretty large niche of psychology overall.
The above answer is a good one but it only addresses fuel efficiency.
It was random that she faced Li Na in the first round - not because she's seeded/ranked #127.
The bowler may be presented with the ball at the end of the innings, as a trophy for his achievement.
Colorado native chiming in: There's all manner of ski resorts within easy reach of Europe in Colorado.
For the most part you can apply at any US consulate.
And yes they do charge more for these types of rentals.
There is one airline, Spirit Airlines, which is trying to copy Ryanair with super cheap tickets and aggressively bad service.
It depends not on which country is your home but which country offers the best exchange rates.
In Poland camping in the wild is tolerated, especially in the mountains.
Chicago CTA for within the city limits - http://www.transitchicago.com/ - Trains are pretty decent in the city.
I'd suggest you find a bank in your local country, and consider opening a Euro denominated bank account with them.
I wouldn't stress about these emails, or the advanced notification at all.
I have also been in Cuba more than 5 years ago and I have never carried my passport.
Also it is more likely to get a jet bridge when traveling with the local airline.
As I remember, in Geneva at least, there are open air markets on a weekly basis.
Of the bigger countries, New Zealand is the first to celebrate New Year.
I'm almost always check the websites of the ministries of foreign affairs of my neighboring countries.
One way would be to go through an Adventure travel company that offers trips in the region.
You can actually find a list of Adult Only resorts on this page.
The first that comes to mind are the amazing ciders made in Sweden.
If you're only worried about them stealing the car and not the contents I would remove the distributor cap.
My experience is that a normal taxi is always cheaper.
Istanbul is far enough to the south to have decent daylight in January.
I got a Berlittz pocket sized French & Spanish books for when I was recently in France & Spain.
The license held restriction is normally required by the insurance companies the rental places use.
The answer is that it can be done, and without too much stress!
In order to avoid the tourist traps, someone in your party needs to speak the language.
I'm in Russia now - just got off the train in Volgograd.
I had a similar issue but in what seemed to be a simpler situation.
If you own an iPad something like MindNode or iMindMap might be worth looking at.
Further to earlier answers, the information given so far is bit vague and so might mislead.
A technical stop is for the benefit of the PLANE.
The hotspot you link to is a 3G to wifi device.
Non-airconditioned classes tend to have less strict ticket checks starting with the lowest class and gradually increasing till the highest class.
You mention 120 GB of data, and "long holidays" so I'll assume that's for something on the order of two months.
It's very hard to make a universal socket that's compliant with all the safety standards that would apply.
We stayed in a kibbutz at Ein Gedi which was nice.
In most cultures where toilet paper is NOT used, people still need to clean up, right?
Kyoto, at least does, as described here: JR Kyoto Station.
For me it works quite well to try to estimate a daily budget for a given country/region.
There's a geek answer to this, and a practical answer to this.
Well personally, I find a yawn is by far the easiest and least painful way of inducing the so-called 'pop'.
(That assumes that your local airport in the states is big enough to have middle eastern airlines serve it!).
The answer you get will depend entirely on who you ask...
The only website that I know is Farecast, that now seems to be called Bing Travel.
I visited Peru in August, starting from Lima and touring for three weeks.
I was in a situation where I had to mail in my passport for a visa - no problems for me.
You're a little off, but if you Google for ETOPS you'll find the details on what you're referring to.
Check with your bank to be sure, but I would say Yes.
The Pilar Festival is held every year around the second week of October in Zaragoza.
In most of the cases, you can do that (specially in western Europe).
You might be able to get a second passport from your Government.
True to the name, the LCCT terminal is pretty barebones and has little of interest.
Generally, almost wherever I go, I find it's easiest to get money out of the ATM.
For questions like this, I prefer the scientific and mathematical approach.
You don't need US driver's license, just your national one.
I've only been to a couple of different places, but Hobbiton was pretty cool and I'd definitely recommend it.
Work visas aren't going to be given on arrival anywhere (I'd be highly surprised if they did).
Answers to 1b: Depending where you go, you can use FON.
Australia has fruit picking, which is commonly done by seasonal labour (a.k.a packpackers).
The most obvious is the oldest long distance walk in Scotland: The West Highland Way.
As was mentioned already the major two carriers in Australia are Vodafone and Telstra.
As @Doc said, X-ray do not damage electronic devices, however, metal detectors may.
The answer will depend significantly on what country you're traveling to.
German event organizer Jochen Schweizer offers flying a MiG 29 in Nizhniy Novgorod for 14.5k EUR.
Open tickets Be aware that there is no such thing as a completely open ticket.
I've just been in Rovaniemi, Finland a couple of weeks ago.
I don't think Åre or Funäsfjällen are really so far away as to be impossible.
A city that is very near to Helsinki (maybe 1 hour by direct bus connection) is Porvoo.
I'm not certain this should be down to country or culture.
I'll just mention that you are not likely to experience any problems in crossing the US/Canada border by car.
Another option is the 3G Amazon Kindle, which lets you use an 'experimental' browser without any charges anywhere in the world.
Before we discuss ways to get in, you first need to remember that lounges aren't free.
I've been living in the LA area (in Long Beach, exactly) for 7 months, being there for studying abroad.
http://www.php.net/ Down the right hand side there are many user group.
Having done London to Singapore by train¹ I know a little bit about long train rides.
Another possibility is the FunTouristAttractions map of Europe - but again, not many natural attractions on it.
A backpacker friend of mine managed to get hired as crew member on a sail boat.
The final solution was two-fold: I ended up staying a few nights in Burnaby.
One additional factor to consider is if your suitcases have sufficient structural rigidity to survive the trip empty.
My method is to keep valuables in a piece of luggage that locks.
I'd suggest you give some consideration to visiting the Loire Valley.
Nothing, really, unless you mean to stay in the jungles for a while.
Most places will accept a photocopy along with a security deposit - same with cars.
Zurich is very nicely, centrally located, in Switzerland, both within the country itself, and in relation to neighboring countries.
I have recently done a lot of research in to guides for doing Mt.
This trip, I stayed in Sapporo, Zao Onsen, Sendai, and a few nights in Tokyo.
Megabus is hands down the cheapest buy for the value, granted you're on the Eastern side of the plains.
There are trains via Knin, which means a large detour inland (there just isn't a coastal line).
Plastic wrap, or some sort of net, is also a common technique for people traveling with backpacking packs.
Travel Books is the traditional option: Lonely Planet, Fodors, Rick Steves, Rough Guide, etc.
Burning Man Festival itself organises a ticket exchange programme for those interested in reselling their tickets.
In Israel hitchhiking (Tremping) is pretty common, though I would not recommend it for tourists.
Would going on a cargo ship count as a tour?
There are many but, and I think this list may not be all, but certainly most.
As I remember, in Geneva at least, there are open air markets on a weekly basis.
100% DEET is certainly very effective, but it's hard on your skin.
This ploy is known as "hidden-city ticketing", and you should find plenty written about it if you search for that term.
For France, a great site for renting farmhouses in coutryside or small villages is Gîtes de France.
My assumption is that TSA is concerned about what could be concealed within the liquid.
Personally I have a OV-chipkaart which is connected to my train reduction card.
Yes, have all the documentation of your travel prepared for each leg!
English works everywhere with people buying and selling things and in the hospitality and tourism busniness.
I think the dual goals have a lot to do with the purpose of the antagonist.
There is nothing wrong with the phrase "simple sample service".
I've started my own tool since I didn't like yWriter and Storybook.
Yes, this is OK, as it allows you to emphasise certain things, that you want the readers to notice.
Some writers will tell you that writing fan fiction is lazy, uncreative, a fruitless endeavor, and a waste of time.
First person has the unfortunate side-effect of being narrated in an extreme sort of way.
If your plot is no longer interesting to you, let it go.
It's (almost) grammatically correct, but it doesn't seem "natural" to me at all.
For fiction, I have little proof to show of blogs being published as print and/or ebooks.
There are many good copywriting software packages, books, and even courses available.
I'm inclined to say no, in that any answer will depend entirely on the genre that you're writing in.
Your writing career will only end if you stop writing.
I think this is completely a matter of personal preference.
What is your purpose in writing about a foreign country or place?
"In the" sounds like it's going on for a while — a chapter or two.
You might not get the publicity you're looking for from these kinds of sites.
David Weber's The War God's Own has some lengthy travel scenes in it which he does quite well.
You have to define the problem before attempting a solution.
I wrote a novel a couple years ago and I have two pieces of advice for the beginning steps.
In its broadest sense, I would define purple prose as excessive and imprecise description.
You just need to shut off the inner critic, and start writing.
If you want a Windows option, HP and Dell both have great tablets.
Your worry is a valid one; the reader could be frustrated by this.
I write in a similar vein, and sometimes face the same problem.
I personally love spiral notebooks when I'm out and about.
You have two items to consider: what makes a person likable, and why you would sympathize with someone.
Under US law, a direct parody is considered "fair use".
No, you don't need to have taken classes or earned a degree in your area.
One thing you seem to be forgetting regarding myths, is they are extremely prevalent stories.
I believe it depends on whether you are trying to be personable or professional.
What you are talking about isn't "voice", but a scene change.
We just addressed this recently, and the excellent answer suggested was guillemets.
Try an experiment: take one aspect of that person's faith and go into ridiculous emotional detail.
The opening words of an essay should immediately enmesh the reader in your wiles.
Set up your world as a version of The Matrix.
Contact the local users group of the technology you've written about.
My advice would be to write your second novel, and then maybe even a third, before doing anything else.
If you can find one, a Z88 might be a good choice.
Give him his own story so he's not stealing scenes in someone else's.
Why would you add extra anything if your plot doesn't need it?
Matter of opinion and all that, but I prefer plain text with no formatting.
You can jumble the characters of the existing species names.
I'm interested to note that the users who expressed a preference went with the first version.
I think it largely depends on what kind of "children's book" we're talking about.
The villains I absolutely hate are selfish and self-serving, but they are also cowards.
You need to have another good look at the structure of the novel.
You are evidently aware of plagiarism and seem to consider it something that isn't right.
I find the repetitive use of the same verb in a paragraph to be jarring.
I have tried to write in XML and latex but neither seems very stream lined for fiction.
You can write the book in any way you choose, as long as it works for you.
This is an exceptionally difficult question to answer, because no-one actually knows the answer.
It's a crutch if you don't make it solid enough to stand on it's own.
Sometimes, parentheses can be vital to your essay (except when they're not).
In the last several months since this question was posted, e-books have surpassed hardback books in total sales volume.
Yes, dull dialog should be removed completely (or transformed to interesting dialog).
a good story/novel/book shouldn't have to have a "suddenly" to get surprise from the reader.
Copyright laws tend to be similar everywhere, because most countries adhere to the Berne Convention.
I use OneNote and I think it's the best computer program ever happened.
I don't think 'actually' is particularly casual, and I agree with Dale Emery that the other words have different meanings.
I would say it's perfectly possible to have an ensemble cast.
I go brainstorming by mapping out different scenes on a page, and trying to connect them.
Aside from the grammar checker in MS Word, I can't really think of any.
Not a tablet, but a mini notebook sounds like it meets your size and battery life requirements.
Write it as if you're the one apologizing to them.
NaNoWriMo Tens of thousands of lunatics collectively deciding to write an entire novel apiece in 30 days.
Don't explain in detail how complicated it is, nor how to understand it.
Suggestion - stick to publically acessible facts, and express them as factual only in terms of the characters in your story.
The answer to your question is: It depends on how the writer works.
There's a good essay by Malinda Lo on the process.
A good opening line gets the reader hooked and eager to read the next line.
Fictionpress is a popular website that allows anyone to upload stories, read those stories, and comment.
I think your problem is procrastination, given that revising is no fun (imho).
Fastest and easiest to make the first couple bucks: Sell to your family and friends, get them to recommend them.
This is a bit like asking how long a piece of string should be.
I agree with Lauren's answer: You need highs and lows in any story.
If "100k" and "50k" are word-counts (and in this context, that's certainly what I'd expect), that's "novella" (for ~50k words) up to "novel-length" (at 100k words).
Webster's New World Rhyming Dictionary: Clement Wood's Updated This is the rhyming dictionary I turn to first.
Helping my 11 yr old son with a project last night, I noticed he was two-spacing it.
Art is obsession, and how well (or badly) it's dealt with seems to fascinate artists.
David Gerrold has always shied away from numbering chapters; he just puts in a section break and keeps writing.
Since this is deemed on topic, I'll give my recommendation as a proper answer.
I use Subversion and Git as sort of a front end to Subversion.
Sitting around a campfire discussing the highlights of the day's events is a good mechanism for character development during travel.
Why should your description of a scene occur at an instant in time, like a photo?
Keep in mind that you can easily swear without swearing.
I have been doing a lot of my outlining/pre-writing work in Workflowy.
I am not a lawyer, my post comes from my experience working in the publishing world.
I found thinking about Scene/Sequel helpful in learning to avoid pointless scenes, both while revising and during outlining.
What happens in your story seems, from your description, to be action/thriller.
This question is crying for a link to the Sacred Cows of Publishing Killing.
Applying structure to prose is no more than good writing practice, after all, and not limited to blogs.
In these days of googling, it's sloppy to not find the source of a quotation.
It does feel weird when you're writing, but you don't notice it when you're reading.
I have been doing a lot of my outlining/pre-writing work in Workflowy.
Problem #1: There is no such thing as good and evil.
You're asking a good question, and if I may restate it: How do I write an effective business e-mail?
I think what many archetype systems use as a base point (consciously or unconsciously) is the Enneagram of Personality.
Just be aware, why flashbacks are considered bad: Many people cannot follow them.
I would abbreviate your degrees; chances are your audience will understand them.
The main reason this doesn't grab my attention is that there is no sense of immediacy.
Small dog chews on a big stick.
A tennis player hitting the ball.
a lone snowboarder in the middle of a snowy gust
A pair of dogs playing with a purple ball.
a bird lands in the water.
a group of young men sing out together.
A group of men play rugby.
Three children stand on or near a fence.
A black dog emerges from the water with a white ball in its mouth.
Two dogs ankle-deep in water.
a boat floats in the water.
A girl in a purple shirt and pink headband posing
Brown and white dog with baseball in mouth, field and building.
A brown dog digging a hole in front of a plant
A brown and white dog is running through an uncut field that has mushrooms.
The brown and white dog swims in a swimming pool.
Two gray dogs run together over the green grass.
A boy in a red sled is riding down the hill.
A dog has run into the water to catch a ball in his mouth.
The dogs are running through the water
A white and brown dog rolls on it's back in the sand.
A dog runs through the grass.
Two dogs play in the grass.
A black and brown dog runs through the woods.
Brown and white dog playing in the grass.
The two dogs are running on the grass.
Two dogs are running in a grassy field
The couple is sitting near the water in lawn chairs.
An American footballer is wearing a red and white strip.
Three people sit at a picnic table outside of a building painted like a union jack.
A group of people standing on a balcony in a very modern setting.
A white dog sniffing sheep through a fence.
A young girl holds up a peace sign.
A man is hanging by a line off a cliff above water.
A man crouching and holding a camera.
Two dogs run through mud.
Man riding a bicycle down a narrow path.
A man wearing an orange coat speaks to another as they walk in the snow.
A dog swims through the water.
A brown and white dog running on grass.
German Shephard jumping through black hoop while people watch
A young girl wearing a blue leotard jumps in the air.
A dog is jumping up in the air to catch a toy.
A young laughing girl and a boy are playing on a big drum.
A young boy with a purple Mohawk playing the violin.
A brown dog laying on a blue cover.
The two boys play in the field.
The brown dog runs on the snow with a white ball in his mouth.
A black and white dog jumping over a red and white bar.
A woman in a green coat is standing near a pay phone.
A group of people standing in the street
A young girl in a helmet riding a skateboard down a sidewalk.
Two dogs are playing on a hardscape.
People and camels at a beach.
A dog runs on brown grass.
A man is rock climbing on a natural rock.
A group of men in suits are standing in front of a statue of a lion.
A brown dog is running in the snow with a smaller black dog running behind it.
A black and white dog running in a snowy park.
The two dogs are running through the grass.
Two dogs running through sand.
The man and two young boys jump on a trampoline.
A man eating an apple, sitting in public.
A boy with a broken arm is resting in a bed.
A black dog holds a tire and a ball in his mouth as another follows him.
A black dog bounds through a path in the snow.
boy doing tricks on a skateboard
Four boys sit in the mud.
two young girls hug each other in the grass.
Two white dogs are walking through deep white snow.
Four girls in swimsuits are playing volleyball at the beach.
A bird flies across the water.
Three dogs running in a field of grass.
A dog is running through a pond
Two dogs are playing in a fenced in yard.
The brown and black dog is over top of the white dog.
A boy jump kicks off a dock into a lake.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
A little girl with a ribbon in her hair is picking her nose.
A brown dog is running on a rock.
A boy wearing sunglasses looks straight ahead.
a group of people white water rafting in a blue raft.
A woman skiing down a snowy hill.
A man and a woman watch two dogs.
A man sits by a dock looking at the water.
A young girl going down a tube slide.
A large black dog runs along the green grass.
A boy hanging from a jungle gym
Girls dressed in red and black costumes hold a wrestling pose.
Many people are in the bicycle racing, including one man in a three-wheeled bike.
A dalmation is running along the beach.
A young girl wearing glasses and an orange t-shirt blows a large clear bubble.
Two men are standing in front of a snow-capped mountain.
A group of people are wearing bunny ears.
A man in a red shirt takes a picture of girls wearing dresses and feathers.
A man and a woman pose in the snow with four children.
A dog in a "superman" shirt sleeps on a blanket.
A brown and white dog is running through the snow.
man wearing a beret riding a bicycle
A tan dog is pulling a red sled in the snow.
A black dog running with a black and white toy in it's mouth.
The white and brown dog runs across the grass.
A baby reaching into a water fountain.
Two black dogs run through a field.
A man and a woman are standing in front of a building
A black dog is chasing after a red Frisbee.
A young girl, in an orange dress, holding a tennis racket.
A smiling baby is sitting in a large plastic tub of water.
A brown dog is resting its paws on a laptop keyboard.
A young girl with glasses sits and holds two American flags.
A small white and brown dog is jumping over a horizontal pole.
A young boy leaps from one couch to another.
Two little white dogs are playing in the snow.
A black dog and a brown dog run along a dirt path.
A child rides a wooden horse.
a black and white dog running through some red and white poles
A dog jumps on a lawn.
Two bull dogs playing on the floor.
Two dogs are running through a grassy area.
Kids playing ball in the park.
A man with an arm cast films something on video while another man is looking at the camera.
Baby with blonde pigtails in yellow room attempting to climb out of green playpen.
A white dog looks at a black puppy in the snow.
A man is swinging on a rope above the water.
A man in a dress suit is riding a bike down the paved road.
Two Asian men and Asian woman sit in black massage chairs.
A black and white dog is running in a grassy garden surrounded by a white fence.
An old man is sleeping at a table in front of a book shelf.
The group of hikers is resting in front of a mountain.
A girl playing is a pile of colorful balls.
A woman does a handstand on the beach.
A golden retriever is jumping off a wooden porch
Man stands next to woman dressed up as a fake police officer.
An older man is standing outside in front of a truck.
Two little girls are playing on a trampoline.
Smiling man with reflective classes.
five people standing on a sidewalk
A boy stands in the pool at the bottom of a blue water slide.
A man is backpacking up a grassy hill.
Two teenagers huddle in a doorway in the rain.
Two girls in blue and teal dresses and large hats are standing next to a large tree trunk.
The child has a necklace on and is in the water.
The white dog runs across the snow.
A group of football players running down the field.
A group of picnickers sit under an umbrella.
Two brown dogs playfully fight in the snow.
A young boy in a brown jacket playing with snow.
Two boys are running around a field.
A hiker carrying a backpack is walking past a waterfall.
A boy in a blue shirt and shorts jumping a bike with a ramp.
Three dolphins are jumping out of a pool in front of a crowd of people.
A man picking up a big rock.
A white and brown dog is running over grass.
Two people dressed as animals near a crowd.
The dog is running through a field.
A black and white dog is jumping into the water.
Two black dogs playing in the snow.
Man is carrying a tool box down the sidewalk.
A man wearing a t-shirt that says "Gigolo" stands at the counter talking to someone.
A tent and a campsite in a sunlit forest.
Two large dogs running in some grass.
A dog swimming with a stick in it's mouth.
A group of four hiking through a snowy forest.
Two black dogs playing in the snow.
A dog is running through tall grass.
A woman is sitting up asleep with her head resting on her hand.
A young boy jumping into a lake.
A little boy, in a camouflage jacket, looks at a display of many yellow rubber ducks.
Man on skateboard on top of rust colored barrel in darkened area.
a surfer rides up the wave.
Two guys are playing with two dogs on the beach.
Light brown dog running towards something at the beach.
A group of people near a fun house at a carnival.
A man playing fetch with two brown dogs.
A tan and white dog retrieving a ball on a gravel path.
Two people and a dog are in the snow.
a dog is running across the sand with a stick in it's mouth.
A man is standing in water near a waterfall.
A black dog is chasing two birds on the shore of the ocean.
A surfer is riding on a breaking wave.
A man and a woman on a bench.
Three dogs are playing in the white snow.
A little girl takes a picture while mom watches in boredom.
A greyhound jumps over a chain.
A tan dog jumps up to catch a tennis ball.
A child in blue shorts is standing ankle deep in the water.
The man is jumping into the water.
A black and white dog is running through the grass.
A woman in a black shirt stands in front of bananas at a fruit stand.
A child is jumping into a swimming pool.
two dogs are gnawing at a blue and yellow ball.
Man and child skiing.
Two black and brown dogs are running through a field.
A little boy jumping from one chair to another.
A girl swings her long, wet hair in a lake.
Two dogs playing by the shore.
A little girl walks on a boardwalk with blue domes in the background.
A brown and white dog is walking up snowy steps.
The brown dog is laying down on a blue sheet.
a young man wearing a green shirt in jumping in the air
A brown dog jumps over hurdle with flames on each end.
Two women sitting on a bench, their faces obscured, with one woman carrying an inflatable tiger and the other woman in a Disney snow white costume.
A guy and two girls are smiling at the camera.
A dog swimming with a stick in it's mouth.
A person snowboarding and jumping over a construction sign.
A black poodle plays in the snow.
Two officers with orange jackets stand outside a white tent with onlookers.
A black dog catches a tennis ball in his mouth while a white dog watches.
two girls holding up a scary movie flyer
Two small dogs run through the grass.
Three boys are running on the beach playing a game.
Two dogs in water as a man looks on from a dock.
The kids ride a boat in the water.
A girl is wearing a purple sash and matching skirt.
A large white bird swoops over water.
A man takes photos on the water's edge.
Two dogs fighting in the snow.
The man and two young boys jump on a trampoline.
A small child slides down a purple slide.
a man wearing a grey jacket standing on the side of a street.
A brown and black dog is jumping to catch a red ball.
A black dog walks through some water.
The tan dog runs through the leaves.
A white and black dog is jumping into a pool.
A black and white dog is carrying a stick in its mouth.
A deer jumps a fence.
the black dog carries an object in the snow.
a man dressed in a batman costume.
A little girl holds a wooden stick.
A black dog jumps through the water.
A group of people in front of a red fire truck.
A man wearing a red bicycle helmet talking on a cell phone with other people in the background.
a boy jumps into the blue pool water.
A blonde dog is catching a ball in its mouth in the snow.
Three children and playing and laughing on the floor.
A man sits with fishing poles near a body of water.
Someone fires a bullet from a handgun into the woods.
A woman and a dog standing in the grass.
Two dogs are playing in a grassy field.
A man in an orange shirt playing tennis.
A man in a blue shirt is running in a stadium field.
A brown a white dog runs down a yellow and blue ramp.
A woman in a black and orange jacket throws a stick for a brown and black dog to fetch.
A girl jumping on a sand dune at the ocean.
A black dog running through water.
Children jumping on a trampoline.
A large brown dog is crouching in a grassy field.
A child playing on a playground play set.
A man practicing boxing
two woman looking into a glass case.
A girl with a purple and white helmet is riding on a scooter.
A little boy in a helmet is doing tricks on a skateboard.
A dog runs through the grass.
The girl with the blue bucket splashes beneath the pier.
A skier speeds through the snow.
Two people are playing golf on a golf course.
A boy and a girl playing on the beach.
A dog running across the snow with a snowball in it's mouth.
A girl wearing a brown cap, red sneakers, and a dark green coat sits on a rock bench.
The child in the red coat laid in the red mat.
Two dogs play in the grass.
Two dogs running on grass.
A group of people stand in the sand looking out at the water.
A dog leaps over a barrier.
A child in a blue and white team uniform chasing a soccer ball.
A child soccer player runs for a ball near the goal.
A girl, in a black shirt and hot pink pants, is about to hit a tennis ball on the court.
A softball player swinging at a pitch.
A black dog is running after a white dog in the snow.
The BMX bike rider jumps a grassy dirt ramp.
The brown dog is about to bite a paw printed ball.
A man is kite surfing away from the camera.
Two young women sit by a fountain.
A boy standing and watching a group of people on a basketball court.
A race car moves down the road as two people watch from a distance.
The brown dog is running on the grass.
Man holding a stick while a dog jumps up to grab it
A small boy is building with some wooden blocks.
A black dog is running in the grass.
A little boy and a little girl playing together outside.
Two people sit on the end of a dock.
A child cavorts on the road.
A black dog runs through a muddy bank.
Two dogs in a yard.
Four people standing outside of an outdoor ticket booth.
Dog with a thick collar running through the grass
A man chases a dog trying to pass the barrier to enter a play area.
A man and his dog play tug of war with a rope.
The large brown and white dog is running through the snow.
A boy and a dog running on grass
a dog runs across the grass.
A small white dog running across a lawn.
The white dog is running in the shallow water.
A dog racing on a track.
The white and brown dog is running quickly through the grass.
a young baby girl wearing a white outfit swinging in a baby swing
Four hooded children huddle under a blanket outdoors.
Two children in the bathtub with an umbrella.
A person in a striped fleece clips a carabiner onto a metal line.
A bloody man and woman pose for a picture.
A black and white dog is running through a snowy field.
A man and a woman walk with a white dog on a leash.
A white dog with brown spots is chewing on a ropey black toy.
A small brown dog jumping up to catch a tennis ball.
Three boys playing soccer in a field
A young boy wearing a blue visor swings a bat.
A brown dog walks in the grass with it's tongue hanging out.
Five men dressed in tuxedos standing on a set of stairs
Two dogs running in a field.
A black dog and a tan dog fighting.
A little brown dog is running on the grass.
A yellow dog is playing in a grassy area near flowers.
a boy plays with a noodle by the pool.
A bike rider on a ramp.
two big brown dogs running through the snow.
A young boy jumps into a pool with outstretched arms.
An older dog and a younger one playing with a toy.
Two dogs swimming in a pool.
A skateboarder sliding on a rail.
A girl holds up a yellow balloon animal.
A child in a white shirt standing in a field of grass.
Two dogs share a toy in a field of vegetation.
Two white dogs run through a fiels with snow.
A black dog is running in the grass.
A blond haired lady in white poses for the camera.
A boy is rollerblading in a skate park.
A young girl on Rollerblades.
The large brown dog is running through shallow water.
A dog runs through a field chasing a ball.
Two dogs playing on the beach.
A dog jumps over a barrier in a field.
A hiker passes a white rock formation in the middle of an empty desert.
Two girls are sitting in front of a statue.
Two young children jumping off of a cement ledge onto the dirt ground.
A light-colored dog runs on the beach.
A young boy wearing a red winter coat is eating and holding up a candy bar.
A girl in orange lights a candle.
A white dog runs through a field of yellow flowers.
A brown and white dog runs through the green grass.
An infant sitting on a cot reaching over to touch the face of an older boy.
A red-haired girl is jumping by a swan.
The dog jumps in the air running after the Frisbee.
A dog shaking off water.
The dog is playing in the water.
Young boys running along the pavement.
A young child slides down an orange slide.
a black and white dog running through some red and white poles
A white dog is running through the water onto the shore.
A boy goes down an inflatable slide.
Three individuals are posing on skis behind a "no skiing" sign.
A man in a white suit walks down the street holding a newspaper.
A man with his bike amid a demolished building.
A black and white dog swimming in clear water.
Two racing dogs run in the mud.
A bird with it's wings spread
Two black and white dogs run across a green field.
A young boy jumping into a pool that says "no diving".
A black dog with a blue collar is running in the snow.
A dog catching a ball.
Black and white dog running through water.
a man in a grey t shirt is sitting on a rock in front of a waterfall.
brown and white dog with a baseball in its mouth.
A dog is running toward the camera.
Three dogs running in the dirt.
a boy swinging on a swing.
A cook steps back as flames leap from a pan in a kitchen.
A man and a woman are sitting on a dock together.
A group of youngsters swim in lake water
A blue and white soccer team playing against each other.
two dogs running in the snow
A golden dog is running through the snow.
A brown dog about to catch a green Frisbee.
A skateboarder on a city street.
Four children on stools in a diner.
Boy and white dog running in grassy field
Two large dogs are running together through the grass.
A brown dog is running in the grass.
A dog is jumping over a log with ears flying and tongue out.
A black and white dog is swimming in a large green lake.
Two large black dogs are playing in a grassy field.
Two boys playing a game of flag football.
The brown and black dog sprints across the snow.
A man in a black jacket is taking a photo of a man in a red jacket.
The man in the backpack looks to his left.
An elderly man in a blue shirt is holding up a piece of canvas art.
A dog is carrying something pink in its mouth while walking through the snow.
Two skinny young boys playing with sand in the water.
The black and white dog has its mouth wide open.
A small dog runs through an obstacle course.
A brown dog shakes off water after exiting a natural pond.
A girl bounces in a bounce house.
A brown dog swimming in murky water.
A brown dog running through the woods.
A group of people are standing by a window watching something.
A young man with a mullet smokes while sitting on a unique couch.
A dog is jumping over a barrier at a agility competition.
Three people racing on ice skates.
A large brown dog is walking along side a river.
One white boy and one black boy stand with arms around each other.
Two women contestants are walking their dogs in a dog show.
a boy falls off his red bike.
Two men on the side of a barge
A brown and white dog is catching a tennis ball while standing on its hind legs.
A brown dog in running on grass.
A man with a white headband playing drums.
Two dogs holding one Frisbee in their mouths.
Two dogs are running through a small pond
a wet black dog with a red collar is in the river
a black and white colored dog jumping around in a body of water.
Kids are riding horses in a ring.
A person is riding their bike on a trail next to the woods.
The two black dogs are running through the grass.
two cold people stand near a pole.
A woman in a black dress smiles in front of a silver truck.
two dogs are running across a grassy path.
Girl playing in a puddle with her bare feet.
Two people are walking by the ocean.
A man in red takes cell phone pictures at a football game.
A grey dog jumps to bite a green leash.
Two little girls in pink are dancing.
a black dog runs through the dry grass.
A white dog with black markings runs through the snow.
Two children splashing in the water.
A dog is on the beach near a ball.
The child is looking at Santa Claus.
a man is standing in front of a skyscraper
two woman climbing rocks around the ocean
A brown dog is running through the grass panting.
A dog bounds across the brown grass.
The dog runs through the water.
a woman playing with two young boys at a park
A dog emerges form the water with a stick in its mouth.
A brown dog playfully bites a white dog.
The large dog wading in the water and shaking.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
A woman in jeans plays a video game in front of a large screen.
Children jumping on a trampoline.
a boy in a grey hat is carrying a soccer ball by a reddish colored wall.
Two people walking along the shore at sunset.
A white dog running on the beach.
A man in a suit dances with a young girl in front of an audience.
A light brown dog is running in the water.
Three children playing on a floor with toys.
A dog comes out of a blue baby pool with a ball in his mouth.
A dog carries a leash in its mouth.
Two children playing in the snow.
A dog holding a ring in his mouth is standing in a small river.
A man in jeans is playing with a ball while a woman in jeans stands nearby looking away.
A black dog is running through the snow.
A woman in a pink bikini is laying on a deck lounge chair that is covered with a pink towel.
A skier is falling into the snow.
A dog with a red toy in it's mouth.
Two hockey players fighting on the ice.
Three people stand in an outdoor glass structure.
Two terriers play on the wood floor of their home.
The person is doing a handstand on the beach.
A group of people are at a convention waving American flags.
Two dogs running through a field.
A man in a gray suit locking up a bicycle
The two dogs are playing in the yard.
Two dogs groom each other.
A man in a black wetsuit is surfung in the waves.
Two dogs playing in the water.
A deer is jumping over a fence.
A bird with it's wings spread
A boy skateboards down the railing of some graffiti stairs
A white dog is running through the water at a beach
A man in a black leather jacket is sleeping in a subway car.
A black dog jumps in the snow.
A dog leaping over a hurdle.
Two men are setting up some electronic equpitment
A black dog is walking on the grass with a stick in it's mouth.
A man and woman blow bubbles.
A girl runs with dogs in a dry field.
Two dogs playing in the snow.
A dog running through mucky ground.
A brown and white dog standing in a yard.
a skateboard performs a trick off a quarter pipe.
two woman sit on a park bench.
A brown dog lunges for a yellow toy.
A tan dog jumps up to catch a tennis ball.
A dog leaps off a dock and into the water.
a group of old men walking down the street
Three dogs are up to their necks in water.
Three dogs standing in snow next to a blue fence.
A white dog snarls at a black dog in front of a set of steps.
Snow boarder on a pink board flying through the air.
A black and white dog is running through the field.
A boy in black waves his arms while other people are behind him on a field.
An elderly woman rides a bicycle along a city street.
A girl in a costume participates in a parade.
The black dog runs through the water.
A young boy is punching a yellow ball.
A little girl is shoveling snow.
A man with his arms raised at the top of a mountain.
A man sits on a wooden bench next a tree and some cacti.
A group of young ballerinas are in a dance studio.
A person is surfing a big wave.
A young boy in a white dress shirt is playing on a grassy plain.
A dog running through snow.
A woman and a man are amused by headphones.
Two girls walking in the ocean.
A young boy jumps off of a plank into a lake.
The # 2 greyhound dog is running around a track.
A man and a dog are playing tug of war.
A wet child shivers under a towel at a pool.
A brown and white dog swims in a backyard swimming pool.
A white dog runs on a beach.
Six dogs running on the sandy beach.
A man holds on to a handle in the water.
four children are playing on a trampoline.
A white dog walking in the snow.
Two older men in front of a bus.
The white and brown dog runs across the grass.
A black dog retrieves a bird.
Three dogs on grass running towards the camera.
A boy goes down an inflatable slide.
Two dogs playing with a ball in a puddle.
Three dogs are playing in the water.
Two dogs playing in the snow.
Two black dogs playing in the snow.
Many cars parked on a mountain.
A girl does a back bend on the beach.
A white dog in a jump,holding a plate in his mouth.
Boat sails in rough water.
A girl sits on a red play structure
The two dogs are playing fetch in the snow.
A black and tan dog standing in a field near trees
Two surfers on riding a small wave.
A gray bird is flying over the water.
Two people walking on the beach at sunset.
A dog jumps high in the snow.
Three dogs are playing in the white snow.
A child sprinkles confetti in a woman's hair.
a dog runs through the water.
The man in the red shirt is climbing the side of a mountain.
Three boys playing soccer in a field
two puppies playing around in the grass
A young girl is sitting on Santa's lap.
Two people raise their arms on a snowy hill in the mountains.
A dog is looking at something near the water.
A black and white dog runs with its mouth open.
A black dog running into the water.
A young boy jumping in the air at the beach.
A woman and a dog rowing down a wide river.
A group of young asian children pose for a picture at a table.
A white dog bounding through snow
Five men in tuxedos are walking down steps.
Two children hug one another.
Man in red shorts and white shirt kicking a soccer ball.
Two girls next to a mossy tree.
An old man sitting down watching something.
A man and dog on a rocky seashore.
Brown dog splashing into the water.
A boy wearing a blue jacket swings a bat at a white ball.
A woman with a knit cap on is smiling near a Domino's Pizza sign.
The smiling woman at the beach is buried in seaweed.
The man in the brown jacket is sitting on the ground by the jetty.
Many people are eating in a crowded restaurant.
A white dog with brown spots is running in a yard, chasing a ball.
Two dogs, the white one standing on a Frisbee, playing together on grass.
A dog with big ears is holding a small stick in it's mouth.
The large brown dog is jumping through the tall grass.
Two dogs fighting in the snow.
A snowboarder goes down a ramp.
A small dog jumping with a ball in its mouth.
A brown dog is in the middle of a line of dogs chasing a dirty tennis ball over dirt.
A swimmer doing the breaststroke in a pool.
A golden dog is running through the snow.
A grey hound is active in a grassy field.
Three dogs walking in the grass.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
Two people are racing a sidecar motorcycle in the mud.
A man in red swim trunks playing volleyball.
a man and woman walking past a record shop
The man is sitting at the top of a rocky mountain.
Two people in snowsuits laying in the snow making snow angels
A little blonde girl is standing in front of a water fountain.
A blond dog and a black and white dog run in a dirt field.
A man is tying a red arm band around another mans arm in the street.
A man standing on a boat is pulling another boat close by with a bamboo stick.
a man plays his white guitar.
A person is skijoring with a dog in the mountains.
A black and white dog is running in grass carring a big stick.
Two girls are fighting over a ball during a game.
Two shirtless young people playing in the water.
Two young children are on sand.
A black and white dog runs through the water.
Close-up of a hummingbird.
Two dogs play in the grass.
A young man is wearing a black jacket and has white earphones in his ears.
Woman in a black dress walking on the street.
Three children wrestle on a floral carpet.
A boy in red jumping into a sandbox.
Three dogs play by a lake.
The brown dog is playing in the snow.
The girl in a pink shirt jumps high over the grass.
A man and a woman looking at the camera.
a dog jumps into the water.
a brown dog running through the dirty muddy grass
The black and white dog jumps with a tennis ball in its mouth.
Three dogs pulling a man on a bicycle through the snow.
A boy riding on a swing.
A man in a batman suit running.
A brown dog is digging in the dirt.
A dog is running along the grass.
Two young girls with dyed hair talk to two boys in black.
A black dog running through the snow.
A young child blows on an orange wand to make a bubble.
A tan and white dog looks scared while splashing in the water.
A baby in a red hat sitting in a stroller is holding a doll.
Two white dogs running in grass.
A man is standing on top of a mountain gazing at the sunset.
Three children playing with hay outdoors, throwing some at camera lens.
A black dog walking beside a pool.
Two dogs standing in a lake.
Five black dogs run in a field.
Four dogs run in the grass.
A little black dog is running on the snow.
A wet white dog is splashing in the water with a stick in it's mouth.
The white puppies are playing on a couch with a baby bottle.
A dog running with a tennis ball in his mouth
A black, brown, and white dog is carrying a Frisbee.
A large black and tan dog is running across the snow in a wooded area.
A climber is standing on the rock face next to the pink rope.
A dog with a yellow toy in its mouth.
A man is standing in front of 4 dogs on the beach.
The man is wearing a black shirt and hat and smiling.
A black dog wearing an orange collar is entangled with fishing wire.
A wet, blond dog carries a stick on the shore.
A dog laying in the snow.
three dogs playing on a beach
A man and a woman are riding bikes on a street.
A skateboarder makes a jump off a ramp.
A man and a dog on rocks on a beach.
A black and white dog running between poles.
A girl with arms raised in sliding down a red and white slide.
Two dogs are playing around in the dirt.
A woman placing a baby on a skateboard on the beach.
Large group of people standing outside of a building.
A golden dog is running on the grass.
The boy in the green and yellow shirt has a glove on and is going towards the ball.
A dog runs through the grass.
A child in a graduation gown throws the cap in the air.
A black dog is running very fast on a light brown ground.
a man in red shorts is walking along rocks by a river carrying a stick.
Man rowing a boat.
Three dogs running on a racetrack.
A man and child in front of a billboard
A black and white dog running through an obstacle course
Two kids laying on a bed upside down
Three little boys standing next to and on a fence.
A dog is standing in the sand.
A black and brown dog walks through the snow near a building.
A person in a yellow shirt and jeans is running on a track.
Two dogs play with one another on the grass.
A dog is jumping into a swimming pool after a duck.
Two dogs are playing in a grassy field.
A black dog is running through the snow.
A small boy playing in the snow.
People standing outside at a carnival.
A dog running through a forest in the winter time
Three people stand in an outdoor glass structure.
Two young women walk along a dirt road.
A boy rides a skateboard with a bike to his right.
The girl is playing along with the images on the big screen.
Many people run in a race on a street.
Two dogs in the snow
A man in swimming trunks is standing against some rocks.
Two white dogs walking in the snow.
Two dogs are running in the water while a man watches from the dock.
A woman wearing a pink shirt jumps in the air with her arms and legs spread to her sides.
A dog runs through the grass.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
A dog running across the sand
A man in a green hat poses in the mountains
The boy in the orange shirt is throwing the ball.
A man wearing a white helmet is in the water.
Two dogs play in the snow
Japanese school girls walk down the street.
A woman is attempting to ride a small wave.
The black and white dog is swimming in the river.
A small boy playing in the snow.
Man standing on top of jagged rocks near the ocean.
A girl in a black and blue wet suit is surfing.
A lack dog and a brown and white dog run on a gravel surface with something red underfoot.
A wet black dog walks on the sand with a rock wall behind.
The woman is leading a dog through an obstacle course.
Several people are sitting around a fire at night.
A young child is holding onto the back of a wicker chair.
A woman in a park wearing a purple blouse
Two dogs are running in the field.
A little boy wearing boxers is holding a fist up and standing in front of a brick wall.
Two people are in bed.
Two dogs on the beach.
A young boy is standing on a gray tiled area.
a dog jumps into the water.
A dog looking at the camera in snow.
Two dogs fighting in the snow.
a person standing in the middle of a bunch of snowy rocks near a waterhole.
A group of people are in the water.
The dog is running with food in his mouth.
A brown and black dog walks in the white snow.
A boy wearing face paint walks along a red track.
Two dogs running down a beach.
A black and white dog swimming in the pool
Two dogs are sniffing something in the rocks.
A dog has it's head inside a red and green gift bag.
A yellow shirted man wearing a golden sun mask.
A little girl is sitting in the grass balancing a rock on her arm.
Two young children are walking across an open field.
People on an amusement park ride.
A young boy jumping into a pool that says "no diving".
A man is scalling a sheer rock face with a rope support.
A child with his hands on his head.
two dogs running in the snow
A man wearing a orange vest is canoeing in the blue water.
A woman and a man with a blue shirt are posing for a photograph.
A black dog lays in the sand.
There is a squirrel sitting up in the grass.
A light brown dog runs down a path happily.
The tan dog runs through the leaves.
An old man in a black trench coat standing in a marketplace.
A man performs a skateboard trick.
A child walking in the snow.
A man dressed in black wearing a hat and glasses in front of a red wall.
A bike jumps through the air.
A brown dog is sniffing a white dog that is lying on the floor.
A man helps a boy ride a bike.
A reddish brown dog runs across the snow with a snowball in its mouth.
A red haired women in black is posing for a man while resting on a tree.
A man climbing a cliff face.
A man is going between two red flag markers on a dirt bike.
The two dogs are playing fetch in the snow.
A black dog with a gemmed collar is sitting on white carpet.
A small black and white dog paddles in some clear blue water.
Two girls are in pajama pants and appear to be dancing.
A dog zips along the beach.
A white and brown dog playing with a black toy.
Two black dogs are jumping and playing with a yellow tennis ball in the snow.
Two dogs are playing on the beach together.
A boy plays baseball.
Puppy playing with a tennis ball on an orange rug.
A black and white dog is jumping over a hurdle.
A boy wearing a red shirt runs across the grass with a furry dog.
The Dalmation is running through the woods.
A woman waves as she rides a zip line.
A black dog retrieves in the snow.
A man rollerblading on a metal bar.
A smiling man and a baby girl posing for photo.
Two tan and white dogs and one tan dog racing down the beach near the water.
a brown dog sniffs a tree stump.
A dog jumping for a Frisbee in the snow.
Five men in blue and black uniforms pose for a picture.
A man is riding a bicycle on a dirt path.
A child jumps in the air at a bowling alley.
A brown and white dog with a pink collar is barking at a brown dog with a blue collar in the snow.
Two brown dogs runs through the water.
A seated young woman in a hat is reading at a coffee shop.
A black and white dog is running through the grass.
A man skis on a snowy mountain.
Two brown dogs are biting each other.
Two fluffy dogs run through the grass.
a dog sniffing the brushes while a bull looks on
A skateboarder attempts a trick on the side of a low wall.
The small boy is sliding down a pool slide and is about to hit the water.
A seated woman with short hair and a camera throws a Frisbee to a brown dog.
A young girl doing a back flip in the water.
A snowboarder rides a snowboard down a railing beside a flight of steps.
Three greyhounds racing on a track
A black dog is jumping out of water.
A dog is jumping in the air trying to catch a red Frisbee.
A brown dog is walking in the water.
A woman with two men in hats socializing outside.
A small boy in a bathrobe is sitting in a metal chair.
A dog shakes off water
People sitting on a couch laugh.
A black dog is running through the snow.
a group of teenagers are dancing on a wooden floor.
The man sits on a sofa under the bridge and litter is all around him.
a white dog is running through the snow.
A woman stands with her arms out at her sides while another takes a picture.
A young boy is riding a bike.
A black dog running in the snow.
Three dogs in the snow by a fence.
A brown dog playing play wrestling with a black dog on snow covered land.
A dog runs through the deep snow.
A girl runs along a river bank with two black dogs.
A person skateboarding at a skate park.
A brown and white dog is running across the grass.
A man climbing a rock-face.
A teenage girl running on a beach shouting, with an older man walking behind her.
Woman playing tennis and hitting the ball.
A black dog leaping over a hurdle.
Two dogs are running on the grass.
A young boy with his hair standing up, is sliding down a blue slide
Many people are on the beach, near a building with flags flying.
A dog standing in the water.
A man in a black jacket is holding a microphone toward a young girl with long brown hair.
A brown and white dog is walking next to a man on a skateboard.
Man riding a surfboard on a wave.
A surfer is riding on a breaking wave.
The man in the red shirt is climbing the side of a mountain.
Black and white dog running through water.
A little girl in a colorful dress is playing with a blue and red soccer ball.
A black and white dog jumping high to catch a ball.
A black and white dog is chasing a ping Frisbee.
A man riding a motorcycle while wearing a black uniform.
Three children playing on rocks near a lake
A brown dog is running through water with a stick in its mouth.
Brown dog with mouth open and ears in air running.
A women and a dog playing outside
Three clowns in bright, multi-colored costumes.
a black dog swimming through a river.
A brown dog jumps high on a field of grass.
Two beige dogs play in the grass.
Two dogs are running through the grass near a house and trees.
The brown and white dog is running across the sand with a red object in his mouth.
A man and a woman are smiling.
A man is standing on top of a rock or mountain watching the sun set.
A brown and white pitbull runs through the grass with a stick in it's mouth.
Two little girls are playing on a trampoline.
A black and white dog jumping into the air.
Two girls are jumping high in the air.
The woman holding a black purse is smoking a cigarette.
A small boy wearing a diaper stands near the door and is covered in marker.
A dog is running along the grass.
A man with long hair is looking through a camera.
A dog and a red ball in the air.
A tan dog runs through the snow.
A brown and white dog is running across a brown field.
Brown dog running on grass.
A dog jogs through the grass.
A woman stands on a wall to pet an elephant.
A white, fluffy dog is standing on its hind legs.
Two people wearing hats sit and look at the camera.
A dog lies at the front of a boat headed into the fog.
a skateboarder doing a trick on a ramp
A black dog standing in the grass near a volleyball.
A man water skis while attached to a parachute.
A brown puppy chewing on a stick.
A dog with its two front paws on a rock in a field.
Two girls playing with people and flowers behind them.
A woman plays a video boxing game on a big screen.
A man dressed in denim is walking along a snow covered street next to red brick buildings.
a dog jumps through a black hulahoop.
A surfer catching a big wave in the ocean.
A man in a white shirt is dancing with a woman in black.
A girl in a pink shirt is sprawling her limbs out in midair.
A little girl in a red shirt pulls a kite.
A dog runs with a yellow toy in its mouth.
Child sliding in the snow.
The black dog plays in the snow.
A white dog with brown ears is running on the sidewalk.
Three dogs are playing in the water.
A white dog running on sand.
A little girl with her hands in the air is sitting on a man's back while he is laying on a blanket.
A woman in costume is playing a bagpipe.
A group of people having their picture taken.
a red and white race car racing on a dirt racetrack.
A black and white dog is running through a cow field.
A white dog with light brown markings has a stick in his mouth and his paws in the snow.
A man in a straw hat shades his phone while others walk on a busy sidewalk.
A man with a messenger bag in front of a gray tile wall.
The dogs are walking in the desert.
A dog swims in the water.
Group of little girls and a dog standing on the road.
A little white curly haired dog runs across the pavement with a stick in its mouth.
A man in a wet suit is throwing a baby wearing a wet suit up into the air.
A man in a grey suit kneels in front of a woman in a white dress.
Two large brown dogs are both grabbing a black Frisbee.
The blonde woman is wearing a black, american flag, tartan cap.
A person holding a net is standing in the water.
A woman in an red tracksuit squeezing lemons in a press.
two dogs play in the grass.
A black and white dog is running through the grass.
A woman walks with a book while talking on a cell phone.
a man walks two dogs on leashes down the street
A brown and white dog with a pink Frisbee in it's mouth is humping over a man's back.
An adult male wearing a backpack walks and looks to the left.
A dog is running in the snow.
A small boy playing in the snow.
Two dogs play in the grass.
The dog is jumping in the air.
Two children jumping into a body of water.
A harnessed dog leaps over a log as another dog follows behind.
Several people sitting at small tables in a darkened room.
A dog and cat laying down together.
This is a boat on the water with mountains in the background.
A dog is playing in water.
A woman in a blue shirt and tan shorts sits at a table.
A family is playing on the beach with their dog.
A dog running through deep snow pack.
Three young girls dance on the beach in the sand.
Two dogs playing together in the snow.
A man in a blue shirt holding a camera.
People with numbers on their chests are running in a pack.
a white dog running in the snow
a dog runs through the long grass.
The black dog is running through the snow.
A dog wearing a green sweater and a backpack walking on snow.
A group of people sitting around a desk.
The brown dog is running through the grass with a yellow toy in it's mouth.
Three dogs are running in a field.
A man and woman with their hands on their chins are standing next to a Christmas tree.
The black and white dog has a stick in his paws.
A white dog running through the snow
a black and brown dog is running across a muddy field.
A man is riding a kayak through water.
A man on skis on a snow-covered hill with mountains in the background
A man in black shaving a ice sculpture.
Little boy with blue shirt crawls across vents near large glass windows.
A pale tan dog is carrying a stick in its mouth outside.
A group of people are camping out on some rocks.
A black and white dog jumping high to catch a ball.
A black dog is playing in water with a green toy.
Three brown dogs are playing in the sea.
Four small children sit on tall stools at a resturaunt bar.
A man on a bike nest to a river.
Three dogs on grass running towards the camera.
A brown dog playing outside with a pink ball.
Two young men are juggling multi-colored blocks with people watching.
a dog nipping at the feet of a cow.
A dog running on the grass
A brown dog runs near the water.
There is a black dog jumping into a swimming pool.
A boy receives a light saber for Christmas.
A skier going down the snowy hill.
Two dogs are running on the grass.
Two black dogs are playing tug-of-war with an orange toy.
A man is spraying a fluid from a long hose at the beach.
Three dogs playing in the snow while one dog wears a jacket.
Many football players sitting on the ground.
A group of people in boats racing towards the shore.
A little boy and a little girl playing together outside.
A person in a red vest is touching the blue ice skates on another person.
A golden dog plays in the snow
A man wearing glasses stands in front of a snowy mountain.
A girl bounces upside down on her head on a trampoline.
The surfer does a flip off of a wave.
A man is holding a very long leash attached to a very large dog who is smelling the grass.
People travel up the elevator together.
a brown dog standing in the middle of ahuge field.
Two children are playing in a green boat on the grass.
A female DJ holds up a Michael Jackson album.
Two males, one in red and one in white playing a basketball game.
A woman standing in front of trees and smiling.
Two dogs are playing in the snow.
A man wearing a blue shirt crouches on a rocky cliff.
A white dog with an orange spot jumping through dried grass.
a black and white dog jumps to get the Frisbee.
A black dog jumps in the snow.
A boy doing a back flip into a swimming pool.
three little boys cover themselves with bubbles.
The boy is looking up at the girl as another girl ignores them.
two white standard poodles play with a toy in the snow
A crowd of people stand on a rural road, a field behind them, a forest in front.
Boy lies on stomach in grass.
A man is jumping over a low wall holding a bicycle.
A black dog is swimming with a ball in it's mouth.
A black dog with a blue collar is running in the snow.
A Japanese swordsman jumps into the air.
A boy wearing a yellow shirt and blue pants is climbing a tree in a hilly area.
Two dogs play by a tree.
A bird sits in a tree.
A brown dog chews on an orange ball.
A hiker with a backpack is up on a misty mountain top.
A man and woman sit on a car and watch the road.
A man with a dark brown shirt is climbing up a rocky elevation.
Two boys wearing matching blue swim caps swim in a lake.
A white dog runs along a rocky shoreline.
Three boys leaping in to a swimming pool.
A brown dog jumping into the air to catch a ball.
boy doing tricks on a skateboard
A brown and white horse runs quickly.
The brown and white dog is in the water.
A child is walking from one picnic table to another.
A man wearing US flag boxer shorts is standing on a stairway.
A group of seven people are rafting in the rapids in a green boat.
A dog in the snow.
A man with long hair is looking through a camera.
Dalmation running along the beach.
A man climbs a snowy mountain.
a black and white dog jumping in the air to catch a Frisbee
The woman is holding the harness that the brown and white dog is wearing.
A brown and white dog runs with a tennis ball in its mouth.
A dog running through snow.
A person wearing jeans sits on top of a horse saddle.
A soccer player in a red uniform just kicked a ball.
Four black dogs run across the grass.
A man in red and black is hitting a soccer ball with his head.
A brown dog is walking on the grass.
A yellow dog in the snow.
A girl is jumping.
A dog carries a stick through the woods.
A dog runs through the grass.
A boy wearing a yellow shirt and blue pants is climbing on a tree branch in a grassy field.
Two men are racing in the water.
Brown dog chases after yellow ball in park
A woman placing a baby on a skateboard on the beach.
Two black and white dogs running in a field.
A black dog is biting a light brown dogs ear in a playful manner.
The beagle is walking on the beach at the waterline.
A young pitcher is throwing the baseball.
A person in mid air on a yellow motorcycle.
A young girl slides down a green plastic slide on a playground.
A kid turns around with an object in hand while someone passes behind him.
The black and white dog runs through the grass.
Small black dog running in grass
A girl is doing a trick on her trampoline.
Two dogs run through the snow, one with a tennis ball.
Two dogs run towards shore through shallow water.
A black dog is walking on the grass with a stick in it's mouth.
Kids playing tag football.
Three children playing in snow.
A man walks toward a policeman standing in a crosswalk on a city street.
A young boy is spinning around a baseball bat on the grass.
Two people ride their bikes down a dirt road.
The black and brown dog is playing in the yard.
A black dog in the grass is holding a bird in his mouth.
A black dog and a white dog playing in the street.
A man in a black shirt swims next to a girl on a pink surf board.
A young boy in a blue jacket swings a bat at a ball.
A large black and white dog is swimming in the water.
A little boy clowns with a colander on his head.
A brown dog is running through the field.
A skier skiing down a large mountain
A dog jogs through the grass.
A boy is blowing bubbles
A man is holding a bus pole in front of a building.
A boy is jumping into the water with a ball in his hand.
Two boys show off their stained, blue tongues.
A person wearing scuba gear is swimming underwater water.
A white and black dog runs on the grass.
two men stand on a cliff top overlooking a sandy beach.
This dog is jumping through the water.
A male baby makes a funny face for the camera.
Two constructions workers sit on a beam taking a break.
A man and a woman laughing.
A little boy is in a tire
A black, brown and white dog running through a field.
Two dogs run on the grass.
Children are playing in a swimming pool while two adult men watch them.
The football players are working on stretching their legs.
A dog is standing in the sand.
Four girls in swimsuits are playing volleyball at the beach.
Two children are on a fairground ride.
Two kids splashing in the water.
brown and white dog with a baseball in its mouth.
A tan dog runs through the snow.
A blonde haired toddler swinging on a tire swing.
The brown and white dog is walking in shallow waters.
A woman reads while on public transportation.
Two dogs are fighting on brick pavement.
A bulldog is running through a grassy park while people stand in the background.
A young boy riding a bike on a brick road
A brown dog and a tan dog are playing in tall grass.
A man asleep on a yellow striped bench with his feet on a baggage cart.
The black and white dog is running on the grass.
Two boxers with white gloves are fighting.
A skateboarder high in the air above an indoor ramp.
The black dog is running through the water.
The black and white dog is running on the grass.
The young man is skateboarding at a skate park.
A woman having her picture taken in front of a large carving.
A brown and white dog is walking next to a man on a skateboard.
A brown dog jumps high in the grass.
A brown dog running over grass.
A girl jumping rope on a sidewalk near a parking garage.
Two dogs run on the beach.
A person is out in the water at the beach while the sun sets.
A skateboarder in the city.
A dog jumps in midair to catch a Frisbee.
A child wearing blue and white shorts is jumping in the surf.
Three dogs running through a puddle.
The dog returns the play toy to its master.
Two older people sit at an outdoor cafe table.
A woman wearing a plaid skirt stands holding a cigarette.
Two females jump off of swings.
A woman with a young girl pose with bear statues in front of a store.
A person wearing pink pants and a white parka at a snow park.
Two dogs running on the shore.
Two dogs run on a dirt area near a forest.
The white dog has a ball in its mouth.
A man in a red shirt rappelling down a waterfall with a red rope.
A brown dog runs through the water in the ocean.
A girl wearing a green jacket is standing at a stop light.
A shirtless man playing football on a lawn.
A girl wearing green twists something in her hands.
a young girl smiling with her head upside down
Two women holding checkered flags near an orange car.
A young man with a beard at an event.
A man in a red jacket holds his bike for the picture.
A boy jumps into a not-so-crowded public pool.
a boy plays in the fountains.
Two boys play swords in the grass with rods.
The clowns are striking a pose for the camera.
A black dog walking along a rocky terrain.
Four kids holding hands jump into a swimming pool.
Two brown dogs barking at each other.
A black dog jumping into a lake.
A child playing in water.
A yellow car speeds along a snowy field.
The black dog is running on the grass.
A boy pushes a wagon with two pumpkins.
Two soccer players battle for the ball during an intense match.
A person swimming in water nearby rocks and a small waterfall.
Two boys in a field kicking a soccer ball.
Two people run in the sand at the beach.
A white dog runs by pine trees in the snow.
A white dog runs through a field of yellow flowers.
The black dog is walking through the tall grass.
Two dogs playing in snow.
One boy is pushing another boy on a swing.
A pitcher on a mound throws a baseball.
Two little girls playing on the parallel bars.
Two black dogs playing in the snow.
A white and tan dog runs through the tall green grass.
A brown & white greyhound dog sniffs the snow.
Two dogs play in shallow water.
A girl wearing a pink coat splashes in rain puddles.
A dog jumps over a chain.
A man stands in front of snow covered mountains.
Little girl and older male, holding hands and walking on train tracks.
A black and grey dog runs in a field with it's tongue hanging out.
A girl with a black purse sitting on a wooden bench.
The dog is running in the grass.
a boy in a red shirt, in front of a long blue wall, raises his eyebrow at the camera
The kid is sliding down a tan plastic slide.
A black and a yellow dog
Three children in a ball pit.
A large white and grey dog runs through a yellow tunnel in an obstacle course.
A black and white dog is swimming in a large green lake.
A swimmer is doing the backstroke in the swimming pool.
The white and brown dog is running through the grass.
A man stands astride a bike on a rocky trail by a lake.
A brown dog is running through green grass.
A motorcyclist "pops a wheelie" in a grassy field framed by rolling hills.
A little boy is kicking up his feet in the water.
A small white dog and large brown dog play on the grass.
Young boy wearing a denim shirt sticks out his tongue.
A woman holds a dog while another dog stands nearby in a field.
A light brown dog is running in the water.
A little girl is riding a toy tricycle on springs.
A young boy is running a race.
The girl in a pink coat and pink boods is wading through a puddle.
A black dog walking through water.
A dog leaps out of the water towards shore.
A black dog is running in snow.
A woman dressed in green is playing with her tan dog.
Two homeless men stand outside with a cardboard sign.
A woman is sitting in the water.
A brown dog wades in the water.
A tan girl in a floral bikini is swimming in dark blue waters.
One man in an orange shirt wearing a white helmet is riding a bike.
A hockey player looks intently downward.
A boy in a red jacket and balck hat sliding on his knees down a snowy hill
A black and brown dog plays with a long stick.
A black and white dog leaps to catch an orange Frisbee.
A little boy is standing in front of a wedding party laughing.
Two brown dogs chase each other in the snow.
A tan and white dog walks in the sand on a nice day.
A surfer is riding on a breaking wave.
A person on a snowmobile.
A small dog runs through a field.
Children are playing on a trampoline in the snow.
The man is standing on the shore hitting a ball with a paddle.
A black dog is playing in the snow.
This over the top photo shows two men taking a break.
The woman walking is wearing a skirt and boots.
A boy holding a large foam wand waves it near a swimming pool.
Two brown dogs running together on sand
A young blonde child holding an airplane.
Two gray dogs run together over the green grass.
A white dog with black markings runs through the snow.
A black dog is chasing after a red Frisbee.
A girl blows on a dandelion.
Two girls with ponytails ride an amusement park ride.
A dog digging in the sand.
Person on a Polaris ski mobile in the snow.
a grey dog swimming through a river with a stick in his mouth
The dog is running through deep snow.
A dog is jumping in the air to catch an orange Frisbee.
A woman in a blue bathing suit is jumping off a dock into a lake.
A brown dog leaping from a dock into the water.
Two men sit on the sidewalk in front of stores.
A black and white spotted dog jumps over a stream.
A woman in a green costume is standing in front of a topless woman with painted breasts.
A basketball player holding a basketball.
Two children are walking on a sidewalk wearing yellow and red backpacks.
A person on a bmx bike.
Two dogs running through tall grass.
Little white dog wearing a leash jumping after a red ball.
A black and white dog jumping into the air.
A group of women wearing bikinis are playing beach volley ball.
A group of people standing outside of a building.
A dog with a stick follows another dog through the water.
A group of four children dancing in a backyard.
Two black dogs are playing on the grass.
a group of teenagers are jumping in the air on the beach.
A black and brown dog is chewing on a large stick.
Two dogs are playing in the snow.
A boy waves around a sparkler.
A young girl is diving into a pile of brown leaves in the yard.
A woman wearing a pink Tinker Bell jacket leans against a railing.
Two black dogs playing in the grass.
Two white dogs running in the grass together.
Several people are sitting around a fire at night.
Two boys are jumping into a pool.
Two different breeds of brown and white dogs play on the beach.
A man plays a guitar for a sick child in a hospital
One man and two women dressed in vampire costumes
Two dogs are bearing their teeth at each other.
A brown dog is running across the snowy ground.
Two boys, one wearing a hat, in a playground.
A woman jogs beside a tall concrete wall.
some football players in red jerseys taking another in a white jersey to the ground
A dog is running through the snow.
Two dogs playing in snow.
Bicyclists are standing at an intersection.
A woman holds a baby while a man looks at it as another man holding a child watches.
A white fluffy dog is running in pure white snow.
A woman holding a newspaper.
A group of men playing brass instruments.
Two girls on the shore watch people in a boat fish.
a snowboarder jumps into the air.
A white dog with red ears is running in the snow.
A little girl and a little boy hold hands on a shiny slide.
Kids play soccer on a field.
A group of men walk and hang onto ropes.
A boy runs past a group of people with balloons in a race.
A dog is leaping through the grass.
A man jumps off of one rooftop onto another.
A black person in black and red is sleeping on a bench with an open black umbrella.
One child pulls another, sitting in a red wagon, along the sand.
A black dog lays on a grassy lawn covered in leaves.
A dog laying down on a green cushion.
The black and white dog runs through the grass.
A brown dog plays in the snow.
A brown dog sniffing at the fence of a brown bull.
Two black dogs are playing on the grass.
The skateboarder does a trick on a ramp.
Someone is splashing through ankle-high sun-lit water.
A boy is running towards a seagull on a beach.
Two puppies playing with a plastic bag.
An owl has its wings up and widespread during the day.
A man in a blue cap is sitting on a stool under a tree.
A girl in a tie dye hat has a butterfly on her hand.
A woman sings into a microphone by a guy playing a guitar.
Three sheep graze on the grassy field with a dog walking behind them.
a cyclist is making his bike jump between two rocks.
A man with a grey beard rides his bike on the beach of the ocean.
A man in a black suit is surfing along a crashing wave.
A young girl with a pink hat on with a yellow building in the background.
A girl in a pink dress rides her bike along a white picket fence.
A brown furry animal stands behind some plants.
A boy wearing a red shirt runs along a beach.
Several people in a crowd, some with their arms raised.
a brown and white dog is running on the grass.
A child in a red shirt is using a black wake board to splash over a beach wave.
A dog jumps over a chain.
The tan and white dog is running in the field.
Three little girls are sitting on the grass.
Two mountain climbers stand on the top of a mountain looking around.
a dog jumps into the pond.
A brown dog runs towards the camera on a dirt trail with mountains in the background.
A Golden Retriever jumping off a wood porch.
A girl sliding down a pole
Dog is jumping down a ramp.
Three dogs are playing in the white snow.
The dog plays in the park.
A woman pointing at a geyser.
A dog is running through some water.
Two teenage girls, one is smiling.
Two girls arm wrestling, while another looks on.
A young girl in a pink jacket walking down a gravel path in a wooded area.
A dog runs through a very wooded area.
a skateboarder grinds a rail.
Two birds interacting in the grass
A woman holds a fat baby with sunglasses and a denim hat.
Four dogs stand in the snow.
A black dog asleep in a car.
A white dog and a black and white dog are running through the grass.
Brown and black dogs on snow, showing teeth and barking at each other.
Two hikers stand at the top of a snowy mountain.
A man in plaid shirt hits a tree with an Axe.
Two dogs run through grass.
Two young soccer players race to the goal.
A man running on a track.
A yellow dog catches a Frisbee in mid air.
Two children in a field of red flowers.
A young men jumps off rocks into a lake.
A small black dog is in the grass.
A lady dressed in a kimono is looking at the camera.
the black and white dog is running through the ocean.
A group of people are firing up a hot air balloon.
A black dog is running along the beach.
A black dog walking through splashing water in a rocky creek.
Two girls taking a picture of themselves
A dog runs through the water while holding a stick in its mouth.
Children play fight with swords.
A man is wind sailing in the ocean.
A man is skating down a set of stairs.
Three dogs racing on a dirt track
A man and a small girl floating on an innertube.
A group of dogs run through the snowy field.
Two women walking down the street
Two blond women sit in grass with a small dog.
Two people holding hands and walking in a field.
The skier is doing a flip through some trees
The black dog is running through the grass.
A brown dog chases a Frisbee
A dog plays in the water.
A lady with a yellow outfit is in the air above the bed in a yellow room.
A person is climbing a snowy mountain.
A little girl in a colorful dress is playing with a blue and red soccer ball.
Woman in red overalls standing on the sidewalk.
A dog is running through a backyard full of leaves.
A man in a checked shirt stands next to a large wooden bowl.
two puppies playing around in the grass
A football player kicks the ball.
A light-colored dog runs through the grass.
Two black and white dogs are playing together outside.
Three dogs running through water.
Brown dog jumping over a bar on a grassy field.
A woman sits alone against a brick wall
The black and white race car is going fast around the track while fans watch nearby.
A boy wearing red shoes is climbing in a tree.
A skier is jumping in the air over a snowfield near a mountain range.
Sports team poses on field with crowd in the background.
These children are playing on a trampoline outdoors.
A brown dog carrying a stick in its mouth.
A young woman leans over her plate at a meal.
The dogs are playing in the snow.
A young boy in red swim trunks is jumping into a pool.
A person climbs up a snowy hill while their dog follows.
A brown dog sits on the beach.
A man who is resting his head on his hand.
A dog in a car.
A black and white dog is running on the beach.
Scuba diver submerged in water.
The man is riding a bike down a dirt hill.
A large gray dog is playing in the deep snow.
A man riding his bike on the beach by the ocean.
Two dogs are running on the grass in front of the trees.
A dog in in a car.
A brown dog is running across the grass with a stick in it's mouth.
Child holding an object that is on fire.
A dog with floppy ears walking towards the camera in the woods.
two tan dogs play in the grass
A brown dog is splashing water everywhere by shaking the water off of itself.
a young boy climbing on a rock wall
A police officer directs traffic on a city street.
A black and white dog runs through grass.
Little girl jumping in water puddle
The black and white dog is running on the grass.
A black and white dog is running on the beach.
White dog outside with two people in background.
A man in a red coat and hat talks to another man in red.
Many middle eastern people are sitting in the back of a blue truck.
Person with two ski poles skiing down a snowy hill.
A woman is eating fish at a restaurant.
A child and two dogs play in the water.
A skateboarder doing a trick on a stone wall.
A toddler in a beige suit is smiling whilst playing in the snow.
People are standing on an escalator moving up.
A woman in a dress raises her arm over her head.
Three little girls are sitting on the grass.
The white and brown-spotted dog is walking through shallow water.
A lady is running her dog through an agility course.
The white and brown dog is shaking its ears.
A crowd of men wearing paper numbers on their shirts run in a race.
A skateboarder jumps off the stairs.
Two people wearing black are standing in front of a lit up statue.
A group of people stands in front of a yellow building.
Two dogs are playing in the snow.
Some children are raising their hands and clapping.
A skateboarder sliding down a stair rail.
Two dogs play in the snow.
a little girl is just reaching the bottom of a playground slide
A man blowing a large bubble.
A brown dog shaking its head.
Two people sit on a dock near the water.
Two girls sit at a table outdoors and give their order to the waiter.
Two dogs running together and one has a duck toy in its mouth.
The black and white dog is running on the grass.
Hockey goal-keeper laying on the ice in front of net.
Black and white dog outdoors in muddy water, with stick in mouth.
A skier wearing blue snow pants is flying through the air near a jump.
A black and white dog is running on the beach.
The brown dog is running along a grassy pathway.
The girl is wearing a blue striped shirt and Rollerblades.
A tattooed man in black playing a white guitar and singing.
A dog running along the beach.
A black dog with a red collar sitting in the sand.
child hanging upside down from a tree swing
A young man and woman sitting on a bench outside are kissing.
A brown dog is jumping up to catch a green strap in it's mouth.
Two black-robed young men stand on the steps in front of a building.
A black dog is running in the grass.
Two gray dogs run through a field of pink heather.
A group of adults sit in wood lawn chairs talking, surrounded by wilderness.
A curly coated dog looking at another dog in the water.
A boy playing hockey lies on the ice, injured.
Two black dogs are playing with an orange stuffed dog toy.
Two brown dogs wearing collars fighting.
A woman is sitting on a sidewalk with a cell phone at her ear.
Three dogs play in a grassy field.
A small white dog climbs over a log.
A young boy plays in a red ball pit.
A lean dog runs through green grass.
Two boys playing in water.
A surfer on a wave.
Two dogs running through tall grass.
a black dog runs across the snow.
The dogs play in the snow on hind legs.
A little girl and her stuffed monkey seated on a ride above the fairgrounds.
Two dogs are fighting over a red Frisbee outside.
Three dogs are playing on grassy hill with a blue sky.
Two boys play with two dogs at the shore.
A brown and white dog is jumping over a yellow and red pole.
Three little boys take a bath in a rubber bin on the grass.
The skateboarder gets to the top of the ramp.
A group of children playing with props
A brown dog running after a a red ball.
Three women dressed up in green and shamrocks.
A girl in a pink jacket is walking through a large puddle.
Two men in a running contest.
A dog swimming in a lake has sunshine shining on him.
A boy skateboards down the railing of some graffiti stairs
A mountain climber follows the edge of the mountain.
two dogs are running towards each other across the sand.
A skateboarder mid air with his skateboard.
A black and white dog runs through the water.
Two kids are walking on a path in the woods.
A man sits on a horse with mountains in the background.
A biker jumps an obstacles.
a brown and white dog is running on the grass.
A woman runs on the beach.
A girl dances on a stage.
Two dogs run side-by-side on the grass.
One child pushes another on a swing in a playground.
Two dogs are peeing at a red fire hydrant.
A woman is flying through the air and landing on a bed.
Two children ride saucers down a snowy hill.
Person holding stop sign to direct traffic.
A brown dog biting a horse's leg.
A shirtless man rock climbs.
a group of dogs playing
A rugby player in dark gear is carrying a light colored rugby ball with arm outstretched.
Dog running on shore beside two geese in water
A small dog runs through a grassy field.
A golden colored dog jumps around in the grass while holding a stick in its mouth.
A child catcher reaching out his MIT to catch a ball.
There is a boy wearing jeans and a baseball cap jumping in the air.
Two beige dogs are playing in the snow.
Two people are walking through some water.
A girl jumps rope in a parking lot.
A girl is running on a desert path.
Two brown and black dogs run through the dry grass.
a group of skiers going up a mountain
A brown dog laying on a blue sheet.
A white dog is playing with a ball on the beach.
A dog standing near snow looking at water.
A dog splashing in the water.
a black, brown and white dog running along with a white Frisbee in his mouth.
A young girl rides on a horse through a trail.
A man steers a blue boat past brightly colored houses.
A group of people are walking down the sidewalk of a big city.
A dog walks through the leaves with a large stick in his mouth.
A white and brown dog is laying down on a red jacket with a rodent standing on it.
The dog is in the air above the grass.
Woman in black dress with red accessories is walking down the street.
Young boy plays ball on the beach.
A black dog is running through some water.
Girl stands in subway waiting on something.
Two dogs approach each other in the grass.
The man is sitting with a little girl in the park.
A large tan dog is running with a green item in its mouth
White and brown dog with mouth open running on grass.
A man juggles at the beach.
A group of people in boats racing towards the shore.
A person is riding a skateboard in the air above a ramp.
A child pushes another child on a swing.
A boy skateboards down the metal handrail at night.
Crowd gathered in streets waving brightly colored flags.
A person is squeezing through an opening in the rock face.
Man on green bicycle performing a trick on one wheel.
Dog running towards camera with a ball in its mouth.
A young girl running on the beach.
A baseball player throws the ball.
A white dog runs into a lake.
Two dogs are playing catch in a field.
A man is swinging on a rope over water.
A woman wearing large sunglasses holds newspapers in both hands.
A man doing a trick on a skateboard.
A young girl in swim goggles does the backstroke in a pool.
A deer jumps a fence.
A young girl dressed in a Minnie mouse outfit and an older woman walking down the sidewalk.
a dog sprints across the water.
"The electrical state at the terminal matches the battery""s electrical state"
there is a gap between the postive terminal 6
it was copntained ina closed circuit
When one bulb goes out it creates a gap on the path.
Burnt bulbs have no voltage at one of there terminals.
the closed path is connected to the light bulb
because bulb a is contained within the same closed path as the battery
because there is a gap in bulb b
there is a damaged bulb
the path must be closed in order for the bulb to be lit
Bulbs a and c are in separate paths.
the battery is a chemical reaction that does not rely on the circuit being complete or not.
You have reached a point where the terminals are not connected to each other.
bulbs a and c are not in a closed path with bulb b
when switch z was closed bulb a was in a complete curcuit
had a closed path to the battery
switch y is not in the path to the battery
There was no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal.
Not contained in a closed path
The battery terminals have different electrical states.
because bulb a is damaged
an open switch causes a gap.
Bulb A and bulb C affect each other.
the terminal is separated from the battery terminal
if it disrupts the path of the bulb and the battery
if the switch it is in the closed path, then it affects the bulb
the battery is connected to itself in a closed path
switch y is not in the same path of bulb a.
where the switch is in path determines whether it affects the bulb
When a switch is open the circuit is no longer complete
a bulb causes a difference in electrical state
The battery must be connected to the bulb
the voltage between terminal 1 and the positive terminal is 1.5 V
Because the positive circuit has a voltage of 1.5 volts.
the circuit is no longer complete when the switches are open
the bulb is only connected at the negative connection.
"Energy flows through the path so if there""s a gap, there""s no energy"
there is not a terminal connected to the positive path of the battery
the terminal is not connected to the battery terminal
If the path contains is closed with a battery, the bulb will light up.
there is no gap between the positive battery terminal and terminal 5
It cuts the current from the battery
gap between terminal 3 and positive battery terminal
both bulbs a and c are contained in a closed path
bulb a and bulb c were still contained in a closed path with the battery.
because the gap creates a difference in electrical states
the battery is contained in a closed path without any devices
there is still a closed path
the switch is in the same path as the bulb
the are on the same wire
bulb B does not effect the other bulbs
there is a closed path
Because the meter was hooked up to two sides of the battery.
there is no gap in the path
removing or damaging one bulb will not affect the other.
if there is a gap between the terminals, the voltage will be different.
Because the chemical reaction is not effected by a gap.
There is not a connection between a bulb terminal and a battery terminal.
that it is connected to the negative terminal
terminal 1 is connected to the 1.5 volt battery.
makes it an open path rather then closed
because A and C still have a connection to the battery
the battery is on a closed path
it was enclosed in a complete circuit
If it is in the same path as the bulb.
because of the chemical reaction in the battery
becaquse there was a gap in the connection
there was a negavtive gap
if the bulb is contained in a closed path with a switch
positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 6
"because switch z is in bulb c""s closed path"
Bulb A and B are still contained within closed paths
a battery always has voltage unless it is damaged
terminal 6 is connected to postive terminal of battery
Because terminal 1 is not connected to terminal 6.
There is no difference in electrical states.
because bulbs are connected to the negative terminal of the battery
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 1
bulb B and C both still are on a closed path with the battery
bulb a and b are still contained in closed paths with the battery
the bulb causes a gap
there is a gap between the battery terminal and the bulb terminal.
When a switch, a battery, and a bulb are in a closed circuit.
The terminals are not connected
circuit 2 is a short circuit
It is not in the same path as bulb A.
the path must contain a battery
the blub is not contained in the same closed path as the battery
because it was connected to the positive terminal
terminal 1 and terminal 4 are connected
the battery always has voltage
the negative battery terminal and terminals 1, 2, and 3 are located closest to each other
Terminal 4 is connected to bulb B
since a a gap does not affect the voltage of a battery
the positive terminal is connected to the bulb
because 1.5 v minus 0 v equals 1.5 v
the switch has to be contained in the same path as the bulb and the battery
the bulbs are conained in different paths with the battery
A battery and a closed circuit.
because bulb C was not still contained in a closed path with the battery
there is a closed path that contains bulb and a battery
"Both ends of the battery aren""t connected to each other."
There is a gap in the path
because there was a closed circuit
if the bulb is contained within the path
a and c both create circuts with the battery
The positive battery is separated by a gap with terminal 1.
The positive terminal and terminal 1 read 1.5 V because the difference across the terminals is 1.5 V
Terminal 4 is connected to the positive battery terminal.
because it is connected to a bulb that is a closed path
because there is a gap between terminal 1 and terminal 6.
Terminal 1 was connected to a negative terminal 4.
because x and z could be closed and it will work.
the switch is in a path with the bulb
bulbs A and C are not on the same closed path.
if bulb b is damaged it does not make a complete circut
Bulb A and B are still contained within a closed path and connected to a battery
the value of measurement indicates if the bulb is burned out
bulb b and c are on a closed path with the battery
Bulb A is contained in a closed path and not affected by switch Y.
The electrical states of two terminals when connected will determine the gaps and help to locate a burned out bulb.
There was a closed path between the battery and bulb a.
path 5 is a short circuit.
the electrical state can locate the gap
because bulb a is in a closed circuit with the battery and switch x
the bulbs are on the same path with the battery
the negative battery terminal is seperated by a gap from terminal 6 making the voltage 0
the negative battery terminal is connected to bulb terminal 1,2 and 3 only.
That there is a gap
bulb a is contained in a closed path with the battery
a component to the battery
terminal 4 is connected to the positive batterty terminal
because bulb A and B are within the same path
because it changes the path from closed to open
Because it was in the same circuit
a closed component to the battery
Bulbs A and C are in separate paths.
terminal 2 was connected to the negative terminal
bulb A and B will stil be in a closed path with the battery
bulbs a and b are still contained in closed paths with the battery.
There was a closed circuit
if it is in the closed path with the battery
Registering a voltage at a location tells you there is a gap somewhere in between the measured terminals
contained in the same circuit not connected to the opposite terminal
it creates a gap in the closed path
closed path, connected to a battery
becasue it can be in another closed pathway
because B and C were still on a closed path with the battery
It creates a gap, so no electricity from the battery can flow to the other bulbs.
Because there is a gap in the circuit.
it was not a closed path
Because the battery is connected to the bulb
there is a gap between the terminals
the battery alone is in a closed path
the bulbs are contained in diffrent closed pathes.
Bulbs B and C are contained on the same path with the battery.
there was closed paths between the battery
because it had a complete circuit with no gaps to the battery
Because the first 3 terminals are connected to the negative side of the battery.
bulbs b and c are on the ame path as the battery
There is a gap in the connection
Terminal has the same electrical state
if the switch is in the path is can affect the light bulb
"the electricity can""t pass through"
Because bulb A is on a different path than bulbs B and C
Bulbs B and C will be on open paths with the battery
bulb a was on a closed path
Bulb A and Bulb C are contained in a closed path with the battery.
because the gap will not effect the voltage.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative terminal and terminal 6 is connected to the positive terminal
the attery is not in a closed path
because it creates a gap which in turn created an open path
the negative battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 6 and bulb c is damaged
when it disrupts a complete path
There was a connection between terminal 1 and the positive terminal
terminal 1 is connetced to terminal 4
There is no gap in the circuit.
there is a closed path that contains bulb a and does not contain switch y
Bulb A and bulb C are in a closed path with the battery.
bulbs a and b are still contained on a closed path with the battery
Because it was not connect to the negative end of the terminal
because there was no gap from the positive terminal of the battery
There is a bad connection between a bulb terminal and a battery terminal.
Because it still caught the current from both terminals
bulbs b and c are not in a closed path with bulb a
Damaged bulb A creates a gap in the circuit
The current has shorted out the battery.
the terminals go from not being connected to being connected to each other.
Because terminal 1 is connected to the positive battery terminal
The battery is contaied in a closed path without another component.
The battery and light bulb are not contained in a close path
Because one of the bulb terminals is bad, and the other ones are good.
because it is not in the path to the battery
Bulb A, bulb B and bulb C are not contained in the same closed path.
It has its own path that is connected to the battery
there is a gap between terminal 6 and a positive battery terminal
If the path is unbroken by the switch then the switch will not have an affect
bulbs a and c are wired within a closed path
Because it was still connected to the battery terminal.
There is no gap so there is no difference in voltage
there is not a closed path that contains the batteyr and bulb b and bulb c
the voltage stays the same within the battery
Because there is a bulb in one of the paths.
when a switch and bulb are whithin a closed path
There is a gap in the circut.
Terminal 1 is connected to terminl 4.
the positive battery terminal is separarted by a gap from terminal 3.
terminal 1 is connected to the positive terminal
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
If a switch is connected to a bulb it will still work.
Because Bulb C is not contained on the path of the other bulbs
terminal is connected to postive terminal of the battery
The voltage does not change.
The two terminals of a battery will always have different electrical states due to a chemical reaction inside the battery
there are other closed paths
The bulb does not effect the others
THE ARE ON THE SAME PATH
the posiive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 2
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal had different electrical states.
switch z is contained in a closed path
The battery will have a different electrical state than the circuit
If one bulb is removed, the others stop working
Terminals 4, 5, and 6 are only connected to the positive battery terminal.
positive battery is seperated by a gap from terminal 2
because bulb c burning out would not damage the complete circuit
because bulb a and b are still contained within a closed path with the battery
because there was two negative connections
ARE ALL ON SEPARATE PATHS
because switch y is not conatined in the closed path of bulb a and the battery.
Bulb A and Bulb B and the battery are in a closed path.
i said bulbs a and c are linked to the battery!
bulb a is contained in their closed paths
if the switch and the bulb are in the same path
The damaged bulb creates a gap in the path.
the bulb is not fully in the path of the circuit
the positive battery terminal is connected to terminal 4.
Bulb A is not in the same path as Bulb B and Bulb C.
because the circuits will be closed
There is a gap in the closed path.
There is not a closed path with the battery and bulb C
The electrical state will be non-zero
the positive terminal and terminal 2 are seperated by a gap
Both components need to be in closed paths.
Switch X can still form a closed path
Because bulb B is damaged and does not allow the positive battery current to reach the other side.
terminal 6 is connected to postive end of battery and the voltage meter
A terminal is not connected to the positive battery terminal.
positive terminal is serperated from terminal 2
The battery is in an open path to the bulb.
There will be a gap where the bulb holder is supposed to be
Bulbs B and C will still be on closed paths with the battery
there is no difference in electrical states
all have the same voltage reading
the path a bulb is on determines whether or not a switch affects a bulb
Bulb A is on its own closed path and bulbs B and C are on the same closed path
bulb A is connected to switch Z
Terminal 6 is connected to the posititve battery terminal.
bulb had a short circuit
Battery will always have voltage.
It turns off all the bulbs.
The voltage is 1.5 because thebulb terminal is connected to the battery terminal.
because a and c are still in a closed circuit
there is still a closed path
the positive battery terminal is not connected to the negative battery terminal.
bulb c is not on the same path as bulb a or bulb b
the terminals are connedted to the negative terminal of the battery.
because those terminals are connected to the positive terminal of the battery.
A light bulb is attached to the battery.
switch z could be closed
The positive battery terminal is a closed path from terminal 4.
A damaged bulb disrupts the flow of the current.
because there is no gap between the positive and negative terminal
terminal 1 is connected to a battery
Bulb A was still in a closed path
there is a gap in the connection.
there is a closed path, with no lightbulb in the path
damaging bulb a creates a gap.
bulb a is in the same path of bulbs b and c
bulbs a and c are still contained in a closed path with the battery.
bulb b did not create a gap in the path for bulb b or c
terminal 1 is not connected to the positive battery terminal
because there is a gap
the battery is contained in the circuit and the light bulb is not
because a chemical reaction inside the battery keeps the positive and negative terminals at different electrical states at all times.
the battery is in a closed circuit
Because it stops the flow of one side of a battery from reaching the other light bulbs.
The battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain the voltage,
because it was contained in same path as the battery
Terminal 4, terminal 5, and terminal 6 are connected to the positive terminal
terminal 4 is separated by a gap from the negative terminal
bulb b and c are contained in the same path with the battery.
it was in a closed path with a battery
the negative batter terminal is seperated by a gap from terminal 4
Because the path between the battery and the light bulb is not closed
There is a gap between the bulb and the battery terminal.
bulb a and bulb b are containe4d in different paths with the battery.
That the terminals are not connected to each other.
because a difference in voltage is due to a gap.
It was connected to the positive terminal.
the batteries terminals are not connected
because the path was closed
the positive battery terminal is separated by a gap
if a bulb is in a closed circuit with a battery and a switch the switch will affect the bulb.
bulb c is not in the same path of the battery.
+ releases current - recieves it?
because there is not a closed circuit anymore for bulb c
Terminal 5 is connected to teh positive battery terminal
electrical state is not connected to volts
it will cut off the circuit
Bulbs are on different closed paths
the path will be closed
because the path is short
both terminals were connected to the negative terminal of the battery
Bulb A was in a closed circuit.
The path it was on
because terminal 1 had both a positive and negative charge.
terminal 1 is not connected to the positive battery terminal
bulb b and bulb c were still contained in a closed path with the battery
that the bulb terminal is only connected to one of the battery terminals
Bulbs A and C were still contained on closed paths with the batery
Terminal five is connected to the positive battery terminal.
The gap prevents the terminals from being closed
because there is no closed path to the battery
it can be either closed or open
terminal 6 has gap
terminal one is connected to the negative battery terminal
there is a difference of 1.5 volts between terminal 1 and the positive terminal
"The battery""s voltage comes from a chemical reaction that takes place within the battery itself."
when the switch is on a closed path with the bulb
removing one bulb shuts off the other.
bulb a is in a closed path with a battery
if the bulb and the switch are contained by a closed path then the switch affects the bulb.
both of the terminals are connected to the negative battery terminal
the bulb is not connected on both ends
The battery is not contained in the closed path
the bulb will not light
If bulb B is damaged, then the circut is no longer closed.
A battery and a bulb must be in a closed path together
a damaged bulb creates a gap in the path.
bulb c and switch z are in the same closed path
A switch creates a break in the closed path.
because the battery has electricity and the gap does not
It must be in a closed path.
Circuit 2 is not a short circuit because the battery is not connected to itself.
Because if the gap is open the bulb will not go on
The path has to be closed in order for a switch to affect a bulb
bulbs A and B are still connected to the closed circuit containing the battery
Bulb A and C will still be contained in a closed path with the battery
removing of damaging any of the bulbs will shut off the other bulbs.
It still has a connect path between bulb a and c and the battery.
terminal is connected to the battery
I think the red X means that this is dangerous and should never happen unless something is seriously wrong.
terminal 1is connected to terminal 4
terminal one is not connected to terminal six
"if the switch is included in the bulb""s closed path, then the switch being open will affect the bulb"
the terminals were connected to the positive terminals of the battery
if it is closed and contained in the same closed path with the battery
its not effecting the current to switch A
the path has to be closed for the bulb to light up
The positive battery was not connected to terminal one.
The circuit is not closed around the battery.
Because it can go through switch Z
the negative battery terminal is not reaching terminal 6
Terminal 6 was only connected to the positive terminal.
if the path is closed with the battery, the switch doesnt affect it
it does not damage the battery
terminal 3 and the positie terminal are not connected.
because bulb c is not included in the closed path
positive battery terminal is separated by a gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal had different electrical states.
circuit was complete until gap
the gap in terminal 2 is postive
Bulbs a and c are in separate closed paths with the battery.
because terminal one is connected to the positive battery terminal
bulb, battery, and switch are in closed path
terminals 4, 5, and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
the open switch will open the path
Terminal 5 and the positive battery terminal are in the same state.
bulbs a and c are contained in different paths with the battery
Because the battery is not in a closed path.
bulb a creates a gap
Terminal 6 is connected to the positive battery terminal
we can find the burnt out bulb by finding voltage between different terminals
the gap between the damaged wires of bulb b creates a gap in the path.
The terminal is not connected to the positive battery terminal.
the terminals are on the same side as the negative side of the battery.
switch y does not affect bulb A
because it was in a closed path
the positive battery terminal s separated by a gap from terminal 4
when switch z was closed bulb a was in a complete curcuit connected to the battery
the terminal is connected to a bad bulb terminal.
those terminals are on the same side as the negative battery terminal
it creates a gap in the current.
a terminal is connected to the positive terminal of the battery
there is not a complete path involving both battery terminals
Both the light bulb and battery must be in a closed path.
the two terminals are connected
bulb is contained in a closed path.
because bulb a was still in a closed path with the battery
the battery is not connected correctly
because it has another closed path it can use
Damaging Bulb A would disrupt the closed path with the battery.
The chemical reation still exists
Bulb C was off when switch Z was open because bulb C was directly in an open path.
because the voltage is the difference in electrical states between two terminals
because the broken bulb created a gap not allowing the current to flow through both.
because a and b are in series and a and c are in parallel
It receives current from switche Z.
the positive batter terminal does not have a gap from terminal 4
there is a gap caused by bulb A
bulbs a and c are not contained ina closed path
bulb a come before switch y
bulbs b and c are contained on the same path with the battery
The voltage size is 0
same path with the battery
if x and z are closed then it will create a closed path
because the voltage was 0 and there is a gap between 3 and 4
The terminal is connected to a negative terminal.
B and C are not in the same circuit as A.
bulb b created a gap
the battery is not connected to the bulb
damaged bulb a creates a gap
bulbs b and c creat a gap in the path
there is a gap between terminals
because there is a gap in the bulb
it is not in the same path with the bulb and battery
b and c will be in their own closed paths with the battery.
it is connected to the positive terminal
it the switch is blocking the battery it effects it if not then it doesnt matter.
If the switch is on and makes a gap between the bulb and the battery.
Y is not needed for bulb a to light
terminal 1 is connected to negative
bulbs are in different closed paths
"because switch y isn""t included in bulb A""s closed path"
When the switch is in the path of the bulb.
the positive battery terminak is separated ba a gap from terminal 4
can complete the path by having z be closed
There will be a gap a bulb A
elictrical state of batter and terminal
the terminal is connected to the battery terminal
It creates a gap in the circut.
Bulb B and C were contained in a closed path with the battery
the value of the measurement indicates if there is a gap
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 2.
if the damaged bulb and the other bulb are contained within the same path
because bulb b is damaged so the path has a gap
circuit 2 is connected to a terminal on the battery
Because it has a gap.
it runs on a different current
the posotive battery and terminal 1 created a circut
the bulbs are on separate paths
a closed circuit containing a bulb and a battery
Bulb A, bulb B and bulb C are contained in differnt paths.
It had its own path
Because the bulb is connected correctly.
the battery is contained in a closed path
there is a gap in the path
Because there is a difference between the electrical states of the two terminals.
there is a gap in the circuit that causes a gap between terminals 1,2,and 3 and 4,5,and 6
Bulb B and C are still contained in a path with the battery
switch z is contained in a closed path to the battery
Bulbs A and B will still be contained in a closed path with the battery.
there are two components in the path
A and B are still in a closed pathway with the battery
Bulb a will not create a gap for bulb b and c
"bulb A""s path only contained switch Z"
An incomplete circuit does not affect voltage.
the gap separates the positive battery terminal from terminal 2
terminal 2 has a gap
because of the gap that bulb B created
B nor C will have a contained closed paths to the battery
Because the battery runs in a closed circuit.
Each circuit must have a connection.
terminal connected to positive charge
because it was not contained in the closed path.
Bulbs A and B are on a different closed path
Because it is not in the same path
bulbs b and c have separate paths within the closed circuit
If the path is not closed, the switch will not affect the bbulb
there is a gap between teh positive battery terminal and terminal 4.
a battery is in a constant state of electricity
because voltage is the difference between two terminals and those terminals were not connected in a closed path
Because it is in an incomplete path
There is a bulb connected to the battery terminal.
Voltage is the difference between a positive and negative terminal on the battery.
terminal 6 is connected to a positive battery terminal
there is a gap between terminal 3 and the positive terminal
bulb c was not connected to the battery.
because terminal 4 is connected to the positive terminal but not the negative terminal
because it still was on a closed path
the gap separates the positive battery terminal from terminal 1
bulbs a and c are connected to the battery on the same path
Circuit 2 is not a short circuit because the battery is not in a closed path with itself.
terminal 1 was connected to the positive terminal
removing one bulb shuts off the other
damaging one turns off the other
bulbs a ,b, and c are on parallel paths
"Without A, there""s no closed path"
because a battery has a chemical reaction that causes a voltage
if it leaves a gap in the path with the battery
there is a gap between the battery terminal and the bubl terminal
"it creates a gap that doesn""t allow the electrical current flow to to the other bulbs."
because the battery is not in a closed circuit
bulb a is contained in a complete circuit when switch x is closed.
A closed path with a battery and bulb
the bulb terminal and the negative battery terminal are separated by a gap
bulb c does not create a gap
Bulb A will create a gap in the path
the bulbs are on the same path
All components are in a closed circuit.
A damaged bulb creates a gap in the path
the gap in the circuit causes the circuit to be an open circuit
the paths of the circuit are no longer complete
The battery and bulb need to be in a closed path together.
because it is still connected to a batery
the bulb is not contained in a closed path
an open switch contained in the path will leave a gap
the bulb only has one terminal connected
There is a difference in electrical states.
Because the two terminals will always have different electrical states.
the battery is in a closed path with itself.
the positive battery terminal is connected to terminal 4.
It creates a short circuit.
there is no path between the bulb-holders
there will be a gap
Bulb A is within its own closed path and independent of B and C
Bulb B and bulb C are still in closed paths.
Bulb A is not in the same path as bulbs B and C.
Terminal one is connected to terminal 4
terminal 1, terminal 2, and terminal 3 are connected o the negative battery
"the battery isn""t working and is dead."
The bulbs will not be powered if the circuit path is incomplete.
the battery is containing a negative charge only
A terminal is connected to a bulb.
a is in a closed circuit when x is closed
bulb a and bulb c were still in a closed path with the battery
if bulb A burns out then bulbs B and C will no longer be in a closed path.
Terminal 5 is only connected to the positive battery terminal.
The gap seperates the positive and negative charges
bulb a is contained on a path separated from the closed paths of bulbs b and c.
not connected to positive battery
"because the battery doesn""t get damaged sense it is coming in full contact a one end with the bulb."
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
bulb a and c are contained in different paths with the battery
Because there is a light bulb
bulbs b and c are contiained in the the same path with the battery.
each bulb contains its own closed path
the positive terminal and terminal 1 are seperated by a gap
b and c are both parts of complete circuts to the battery
if the damaged bulb is on the same closed path with the battery
As long as X and Z are closed A will light
If it is a part of a circut that contains a bulb and a battery.
because bulb c is not in the same ppath
switch is closed to make a closed path
bulb a and b are still contained in a closed path with the battery
Because bulb A will still be contained on a closed path to the battery.
Because the voltage does not reach the bulbs.
there is a gap between the bul and battery terminal.
the circuit path A was on was still closed
The difference in electrical state
a damaged bulb does not make a connecton so the circut is not complete
If bulb B is damaged, there is no path
because bulbs B and C were still in a closed path with the battery.
bulbs b and c remain in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs B and C are contained in the same closed path with the battery
A burned out bulb indicates a gap in the connection between opposite ends of the battery terminals
Bulb A, Bulb C, and the battery are in a closed path.
C would not create a gap for A or B
if the electrical state is non-zero you can find the gap in the circuit
a terminal is connected to the positive battery terminal
the terminal it is connected to is not working
There is a closed path with the battery and bulb A
If bulb B is damaged there is a gap in the circuit
Because there is a gap.
the terminals are connected to each other.
We switched the terminals around.
Bulb a created a gap
bulbs must contain battery in the path without a gap
bulb a is in a complete circuit with the battery when switch z is closed.
Switch Y was not on the path of bulb A.
Because neither of the components are connected to themselves.
the positive battery is connected to the terminal 4.
if it is open and the bulb is no longer and a closed path because it is open
because it was on a closed path
a damaged bulb does not complete the circut.
The battery is not closed in a closed path.
It is in the same closed path.
because the voltage meter was connected to a positive and negative side
because bulb a is not in the path of switch y
Bulbs A and B are not within the same path as bulb C.
There must be a closed path.
In circuit 5, the battery IS in a closed path.
It breaks the circuit flow between the battery and the bulbs
the path must be closed with the battery and the bulb
Bulbs B and C are not on the same line as bulb A.
because there is a gap because bulb b is damaged
the negative battery terminal is seperated by a gap from terminal 6
the battery is not connected to the terminal
Because the battery is not damaged when lighting the bulb
the battery still holds the electrical charge if there is an incomplete circuit.
there is no short circuit to the battery.
Because Bulb A was still receiving positive and negative currents.
there is a gap between terminals 1 and 2 from the positive battery terminal
because bulb b and c were still in a closed path with the battery
because bulb a is not in the same path as bulb b and c
the bulb is in the path of the circuit
bulb A and switch Z are in a closed path
bulb a still has a path to the battery
The circuit will become incomplete.
there is still a path for the other 2
bulb a is in a closed path with the battery
There is a gap in the path.
If the switch is open, the path is not closed
Closed connection between the bulb and the battery.
both are on same closed paths
when it creates an open path
there will be a gap between the bulbs
it helps because you find the gap where the terminals are disconnected
because bulb a was in a closed path
becuase the negative end of the votlage meter was connected to a positive circuit
bulbs a and c are on a closed path with the battery
connected to the negative terminal
because the battery is in the closed path but the bulb is not
it was not in a complete circuit
there is a gap between terminal one and two and the positive battery terminal
bulb a was on because it was contined in a closed path.
bulb c is not in the same path of bulb a and b.
Bulb B is on a different path
terminal 6 is connected to the positive battery terminal
The negative battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 6.
if C is damaged, the bulb A and B ae contained in a closed path
bulbs b and c are in the same closed path with the battery
A GAP WIL BE CREATED
the bulb must be in a closed circuit with the battery.
bulbs a, b, and c are on a path with the battery
the positive battery terminal and terminal 6 are connected
Bulb A, bulb B and bulb C are in different closed paths.
There is a light bulb and a battery present
the positive battery terminal has no gaps from terminal 4
The circuit is complete with the battery and bulb a
bulbs B and C still are contained in closed circuits
since there is a gap
positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 3
Circuit 2 is not a short circuit because is shows connection to the bulb.
There must be a closed path and a battery.
because an open switch creates a gap.
There is a bulb in the circuit.
a and c are on the same closed path with the battery
bulbs A and B are still connected to the closed path containing the battery
bulb C and A are contained in the same path with the battery
the switch opens the closed circuit
because each bulb has its own pathway
switch y and bulb a are not in the same closed path
Becuase the damaged bulb damages the path in which is was connecte to
because it can have complete circuit if Zis closed and Y is open
terminals 1,2,and 3 are connected to the negative terminal of the battery
because that created a gep in the circuit
when the switch is the in a closed path with the bulb
the positive battery terminal is seperated by a gap from terminal 4
C does not effect the others, their paths are still closed
Bulb A, bulb B, and bulb C are contained in different closed paths.
becasue the terminals 4,5, and 6 are connected to the positive terminal of the battery
a and b are still contained in a closed path with the battery.
bulbs b and c were in a closed paty with the battery.
the battery is in the closed path.
When one bulb goes out the rest go out.
An open switch means the circuit is not a closed path.
bulb a is in the closed path
for the same reason as 3
because switch Y did not affect bulb and and the battery closed path
switch z is closed so it still creates a complete path to the battery
there terminals are separated by a gap when the voltage jumps from 0 to 1.5.
The light bulb is not in a closed path
it breaks the closed circuit
The negative battery terminal is seperated by a gap from terminal 1 and 2
Bulb A and Bulb C are contained in different paths with the battery.
the switch has to be within a closed path with the bulb and battery
the battery is not in a closed bath alone
battter is contained in a closed path
Blub A and bulb C are contained in different paths with the same battery.
terminal 1 and 4 connected
Switch Z can be closed instead
the conditions are a battery and a closed path
Terminal 1 and terminal 2 are on the same side.
Because there is a gap.
Each bulb affects the other bulbs
because switch x can be closed and y can be open and A will light
Terminal 4 has a gap.
Bulb C is not contained in a closed path with the battery.
that there is no difference between the electrical states of the bulb terminal and the battery terminal
because it damages the complete circuit
a short circuit has occured
Tells you that there is a gap
the bulb is not contained in the path
because bulb a is on a closed path with the battery
Stops the path from being closed.
a terminal is connected to the positive terminal of the battery
Maybe because there is still one path that connects A and C through B
Because the positive battery terminal and terminal 6 were connected.
the positive battery terminal is connected to terminal 6.
the bulb is not connected to the positive connection of the battery.
The open switch was in the path.
The battery is in a circuit with a bulb.
Because bulb c created a gap so then it had both a positive and negative charge.
The positive terminal is connected to terminal 4.
Bulbs A and C were still on closed paths with the battery
Switch Y was in a dfferent path
if the damaged bulb is on the same closed path as the other bulb
It was in the same path as switch X.
bulbs A and C are in different paths that do not contain bulb B
Bulb A, bulb B, and bulb C each have their own closed path with the battery.
if the path is open or closed
the battery is not contained in a closed path
Because switch Y and Z are also connected to bulb A.
the switch has to be located within a closed path for the bulb to go on
if both bulbs are contained within a closed path
bulb a will burn out with bulb C
terminal 1 and 2 have the same voltage because there is a working bulb connected to the negative battery terminal.
The positive battery terminal is not separated by a gap from terminal 4
Bulb A is in two different paths with the battery
Because terminal 1 is connected to terminal 4.
Because there is a gap.
There is no gap between the positive terminal and terminal 4
It is not a closed path.
that there is no difference in electrical states of the two terminals
There is still a closed path containing bulb B and C with the battery.
because it has a positive terminal
The battery terminal is connected to terminal 6.
terminal one is connected to a positive battery terminal
if the switch is contained in the path with the bulb, the switch affects the bulb.
Both terminals of the battery is not connected.
Terminal one is not connected to the positive battery terminal
a voltage reading of 0 volts indicates a gap in the circuit.
bulb a and c are contained on the same path with the battery
Bulb c is on a seperate pathway from A and b which are still connected to the battery.
that there is no electrical connection
the battery is in a closed path but connects with nothing else
the terminals must have a difference in electrical states to have voltage
the two components are seperated.
Bulb A is conected to the battery.
because positive charge is before gap
switch y is on a different path than bulb a.
Switch Y is not on the path of bulb A.
bulb b and bulb c are in a closed path and bulb a is in a separate closed path
there is a complete circuit, with a battery and a bulb
the bulb is contained in a cloed path with the battery
There is a gap between the two bulb terminals
the positive terminal and terminal 6 are connected
terminal 1 is connected to the negative terminal.
the bulb is contained in an closed circuit
terminals 1 and 2 are seperated by a gap
there is a gap at terminal 1
Terminal 1 is connected to the positive terminal.
battery is contained on a closed path
bulb A creates a gap in the closed circuit
it always has the same voltage due to a chemical reaction inside of it
terminals are separated by a gay between the positive and negative terminals of the battery
Terminal 1 and terminal 2 are connected to the negative terminal of the battery
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 2.
Because it has one regardless of the circuit
because of the gap in bulb B
there is still a closed path that contains the battery, bulb a, and bulb b
There is a gap in the path.
the electrical states between the terminals is the same, resulting in 0
the positive terminal is connected to terminal 6
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 1.
Because terminal 1 is connected to the positive terminal with no gaps
because it would cause a gap
the battery is not contained in a circut
closed paths from the battery
Switch Y did not effect bulb A
Bulbs A and B will still be contained in a closed path to the battery.
The component is not enclosed within the path and the battery is
there is a separation between the bulbs and the negative battery terminal
Battery is not contained i a closed path.
the battery is not contained in a closed path.
When bulb B is damaged there is a disruption in the current.
Voltage is the difference between a positive and negative end on the battery.
The terminal is still connected to an electrical state of the battery
bulbs a, b, and c are not contained in the same closed path.
There is another component besides the battery in the circut.
switch Y does not effect bulb A
bulb b and c are in a closed path
battery is contained in bulb
the bulbs are contained in a closed path
battery is contained in path
the terminal has an electrical state between terminals
because there was a gap in the pathway.
Bulb B and bulb C are contained in different paths with the battery
because each bulb has its own path
The positive terminal is not seperated from the gap
The battery is in a closed bath.
"becuase bulb C is on it""s own pathway."
a connection to the battery
You needed both a battery and a blub with the same path, and the path must be closed
there is a gap between terminal one and two
If the path is not closed then a bulb will not be on
Terminal 1 was connected to the positive terminal.
there is not a gap in the connection
bulb C is not in the same closed path as the battery
because there is a gap
not contained insa me path
The switch determines whether the path is open or closed.
A switch will affect a bulb it the bulb and the switch are in the path as the battery
circuit 5 only has 1 terminal
there is a gap in the circuit
The bulb is in a closed circuit and the battery exists in that circuit
There is a gap between the postive terminal and terminal 1
When a bulb is damaged it creates a gap in the circuit
positive battery terminal is not separated by a gap from terminal 4
the other bulb will not light.
The positive battery is separated by a gap from terminal 3.
a closed circuit between a battery and bulb
because bulbs b and c are on a closed path with the battery
there is not gap between the terminals
because there is a positive and negative connections
because it had no gap between the terminals
bulb b and bulb c are still contained in closed paths with the battery
bulb b is a gap
the battery is not closed the bulb is.
becuase it is in a closed circuit with itself and the bulb is not i the closed circuit
The path has to be closed in order for the bulb to be on.
Terminal 1 is not connected to the positive terminal.
a terminal is connected to the negative battery terminal
the positive battery terminal and terminal 1 are not connected
removing bulb a will affect bulb c
there is a difference in electrical states
because it is still in a closed circuit
there would be a gap in the circuit
The battery uses the chemical reation to create voltage
The switch is contained in the path
bulb is contained in closed path
a terminal has an electrical state where theres a chemical reaction
makes a short circuit
terminal 6 is connected to the difference
the positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 4
A switch contained in a closed path with a bulb and a battery will affect the bulb.
because the positive terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 3
it is not in the same path.
damaged bulb creates a gap.
the voltage is nearest the burnt out bulb
If Z is closed, A is still part of a complete circut.
it is not in a closed path
it allows you to measure electrical states between terminals
there is no path through the connection of bulb b.
the positive terminal is connected to terminal 6
"If the terminals at both ends of the bulb are the same, then it""s damaged."
circuit 5 is in a closed path.
B and C were still contained in a closed circuit with the battery
It will help find where the gap in the circuit is.
if bulb a burns out if affects bulbs b and c.
the bulb is not contained within the path
there is no relationship between path bulb a and c
when the switch is opened
"the battery terminals don""t connect without any devices"
terminal is connected to postive end of battery
A battery will always have a voltage because the electrical states of the positive and negative terminals are always different.
bulb b and bulb c are contain in the same closed path.
because it opens the circuit, therefore the circuit is not closed
because the battery is in a closed path.
The battery is connected to only one side of the bulb and is only running electricity back to the battery.
Because neither components are in closed paths.
switch X does not effect bulbs B and C
If there is an open switch in the path, the bulb will not be on.
Bulb A will no longer be completing the circuts.
Switch Y is in a different path than Bulb A
there is no path through bulb b.
close the path and match the terminals
still have connection to battery
terminal 6 is connected to the positive terminal of the battery
it was a closed path
Because bulb a was contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is a difference between terminal 2
bulb c creates a gap
terminal 4, terminal 5, and terminal 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
"There are closed paths that don""t include bulb A"
because there is a closed circuit after bulb b
Bulb C and the battery are not contained in a closed pathway
circuit 4 is contained in an open path
That the circuit is bad.
the path was closed and connected to the battery
"the terminal""s electrical state is not effected by the incomplete circuit."
positive battery seperated by gap from terminal 1
because the path has to be open
A and B are still contained in a closed path with the battery.
because there was a gap in the terminals
The positive battery terminal is seperated by a gap from termnial one.
bulb c does not create a gap in the path for bulb b and a
If the other bulb is no longer contained in a closed path with the battery
There is a gap after bulb b
both are on the same side of the circuit
the terminal are seperated by a gap when the bulb goes out
the voltage of a battery does not depend on the components in a curcuit.
there is no gap between the positive battery terminal and terminal 6
The battery is contained in a closed path.
the battery has its own chemical reaction
Because terminal 1 had no gap.
bulb a and c are on a different path with the battery
It stops the flow of electricity.
because it blocks the charge of the circuit.
it is a open circuit
it was in a closed path
because terminal 1 and the neavtive terminal are seperated.
the positve battery terminal is separated by a gap at terminal 1
Terminal 1 is connected to the negative terminal.
The battery is in a closed path, not connected to the light bulb.
switch z is contained on a closed path
The voltage has the same electrical state between any two terminals.
you can locate the gap in a connection
the battery in circuit 5 is contained in a closed path.
It makes the circuit incomplete.
Because there is no gap at terminal 1
because voltage is the difference in electrical states between two terminals.
Bulb A and B will still be in a contained path.
terminal 1 and terminal 6 are seperated by a gap
if the switch and bulb are contained in the same path, the switch will affect the bulb.
because bulbs A and C are contained in different paths with the battery
the batter is in a closed path without any other components.
switch z is contained in a closed path
yes bulb A was on
switch z contains a closed path with the battery
bulb a and bulb c are contained in different paths with the bttery.
Because the batter termnal was not separted by a gap from terminal .
if the path is open the bulb will be off
It will locate the gap.
Bulb terminals 3 and 4
the terminals are not connected to each other
beacuse it was in a closed path with the battery
a gap causes a chemical reaction
switch y is not in the same path as bulb a.
Bulb A is contain in a closed path
"there isn""t a closed path of the battery"
switch z is contained in a closed path with bulb a and the battery
because bulb a is in a closed path, and bulb c is in a closed path.
Bulb A and C are contained in different paths with the battery.
switch y is not on the same path to battery
A and B are off
if switches X and Z are closed it will complete the closed circuit for bulb A
because bulb a can go through the other path
allows you to identify any gaps
Bulb a was in a closed path with a battery.
An open switch stops the energy flow
when it creates a gap in a certain path
bulbs b and c were contained in a closed path with the battery.
bulbs a and c affect each other.
there is a closed path to the battery
because there is a gap in the connection between terminal 1 and terminal 6
it checks the electrical state between two terminals.
Because the electricity will not flow through the wires if the circuit path is incomplete.
Because it was connected to the positive side.
the battery is not in a closed circuit
A is in the same path as C
Find where there are different electrical states
the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there was a closed path not effected by the switch
Bulbs a and b will still be contained in a closed path with the battery
there is a gap in the path
the switch being open or closed determines if the path is closed or not
the positive battery terminal and terminal 4 are on the same side of the damaged bulb
because the electrical states between the two battery terminals will be different no matter what
the the bulb terminal disconnected from the battery terminal
Because it opens the connection
Terminal 1 is seperated from the positive terminal
because the paths were still in a closed circuit with the battery terminal
because bulb a is in a closed path with the battery.
"because it isn""t contained in a closed path."
because the damaged bulb a creates a gap in the path
there is a gap in terminal 1
a terminal is cnnected to the positive terminal
because of the gap in bulb b
connected to the negative terminal
the positive battery terminal is connected to terminal 6
because of the gap in bulb b.
when the switch is closed
Because bulbs A and C were in a separate closed path
bulb a, bulb b, and bulb c are contained in differentclosed paths.
The path contains the light bulb and the path is not closed.
bulb b and bulb c are contained within a closed path
Because the battery and the bulb are not in a closed path.
if the damaged lightbulb is contained in the closed circuit
terminal is connected to terminal 6
the battery is not contained in a closed path
It must be connected to the battery.
bulbs A and C are not contained in the same closed path.
measuring voltage between the positive battery terminal and the bulb terminal determines the gap in the connection.
Burned out bulb B will cause a gap in the closed path.
Because terminal 4 is connected to the negative terminal
The other terminals are only connected to the positive battery terminal.
switch x is contained in the same path as bulb a.
The bulb and the battery are connected
an incomplete circuit would not effect the the electrical state between the terminals.
becuase bulb C will be taken off the closed path when switch opens
Because it broke the circuit
terminal is connected to the negative battery
Bulb A and bulb C are in the same path.
because x and z could be closed and bulb a will work.
there is a path way connecting to a bulb and battery
Because the switch was connected to the closed circuit
Bulb A and Bulb C are not contained in the same closed path
The positive battery terminal is seperated from the negative battery terminal
a terminal is connected to differenet states
it creates a gap in the circuit
because terminal one and the positive battery terminal are on a closed path
it was contained within a closed path
There is still a voltage is the different terminals
the voltage is the difference between the electrical state of the terminals.
Terminal 1 was connected to a positive terminal 6.
you can find which bulb is burned out
there is not difference in eletcrical states
Because there is no gap between terminal 4 and the positive terminal
there is a closed path, with switch z, that contains bulb a and the battery
Circuit 4 is not a short circuit because the battery is not contained in a closed path.
Bulb a was in a complete circuit
there was no closed path with the battery
for the same reason as 1
The positive battery terminal was not separted by a gap from terminal 6
if bulb B is damaged, the path will have a gap
there is a gap between the negative battery terminal and terminal 4.
the only component in the closed path is the battery.
bulbs a and c are contained in closed paths
circuit 4 does not have a closed path
gap in circuit at bulb B causes the voltage reading to be 0
a is in the same path
Because terminal 1 and 6 are connceted to the battery.
"Because the electricity can""t pass through"
a gap in the circuit does not affect the voltage of the battery.
because a battery will always have a voltage even if it is 0
the positive terminal and negative terminal are not connected
terminal 6 is connected to the positive terminal of the battery
the battery was contained in a circut
because that created a closed circuit
a battery and a closed path
bulbs will be affected by switches that are in the path
it will turn it off
Because the bulb is not longer in a closed circuit
the battery is not connected in the closesd path
and the circut is closed
if a path is connected to an oen switch, the bulb will be off.
It must be in a closed circuit.
Bulbs B and A are still contained on a closed path with the battery
bulbs A,B, and C are all on the same path
there is no closed path that contains the battery, bulb b, and bulb c
all the bulbs are on parralel paths
terminal 6 is conncted to the positive terminal
if switch x is open
The terminals are connected to the opposite side of the battery
because if there is a voltage that means there is a gap
the bulb is not conatined in a closed path
because there is a gap between the positive battery terminal and terminal 1.
bulb a is in the same path of switch x.
Terminal 4 is connected to the positve battery terminal and terminal 4 is not seperated by a gap
1 2 and 3 are connected t neative
Because there was closed paths from the battery to the bulb
there is a gap in the circuit
Bulb A and B are still contained in a closed path with the battery.
terminal one is connected to the negative
Terminal 5 is connected to the postitive battery terminal
because bulb c doesnt effect the other closed paths
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 1.
because bulb a was in a closed circuit with the battery
The path must be closed and contain the battery
circuit 2 is connected to the battery
Seperate paths connected to the battery
The path does not close
Bulbs A and C will still be on their own completed circuts.
bulb b and bulb c were in a closed circuit with the battery
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulb B and bulb C are still on closed paths with the battery.
A terminal is not connected to the positive battery terminal.
"because by measuring voltage, you find the gap where there""s a difference in electrical states."
the positive terminal is not seperated by a gap from terminal 4
The gap causes a difference in electrical states.
bulb b is not in the same path with bulbs a and c.
the switch is contained in a closed path
the bulb is not contained in a closed path.
there is still a closed path that contains the battery and bulb a and bulb c
the path only determines if a bulb is off when the switch is open
because you can find the difference in the voltage by measuring the gap
When it creates a gap.
Terminal 6 is connected to the positive battery terminal
a battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states between two terminals
If the path is directly connected to the battery, then the switch affects a bulb.
because switch z can be closed
terminal 1 and terminal 2 possess no difference
There are other closed path without bulb B
Because the positive batter terminal and terminal 6 were connected.
bulb c was not contained in a closed path with the battery
bulbs must be in a closed path with the battery in order to work
bulb a and switch x are in the same closed path
b and c are in a closed path with the battery
there was no gap in the circut
because if bulb b is damaged, then there is no path through the bulb, creating an incomplete circuit
bulbs B and C are on the same path as the battery
The terminal is connected to a positive circuit.
The positive battery terminal is connected to terminal 6
bulb b and c are contained in the same closed path.
"Well, it will have a voltage of zero, if that""s what you are asking."
it only has 1 connection.
Bulbs are contained in an open path.
The battery is in the closed path
The electrical state difference tells you where the gap is.
terminal 1 is connected to terminal 6
the bulb could be lit by having switch X and switch Z closed.
because the terminals are not connected
becuase the other terminals are connected to the positive battery terminal
because terminal 1 is not seperated by any gaps
terminal 1 is not connected to terminal 6
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same state.
Bulb C will create a gap in the path
There will be a gap in the circuit.
because it creates a gap bewtween the battery and the other paths
"If the switch causes a gap in a closed path, the bulb won""t turn on"
switch x is in the closed path with bulb a
There is another path through Switch Z
contained within the same closed path
There will be a gap at one point in time and there will be a voltage decrease so you know.
Bulbs A and B are contained in closed paths with the battery
An open switch impacts a circuit because it causes the path to be closed, therefore the connection cannot be made.
If buld B is damaged that will create a gap.
bulb b and bulb c are contained in the same path with the battery
Because there is a gap due to a damaged bulb.
A chemical reaction inside the battery makes the electrical states of the positive and negative terminals different at all times.
The positive terminal is not seperated by a gap.
1 2 and 3 are on thnegative side
because there was no separation in the positive battery terminal and terminal 1.
It has its own closed path
different paths with the battery
C is not within the same path as B
the is an open path
terminal 6 is directly connected to the positive terminal.
Bulbs A, B and C are on different paths
if bulb c burns out a and b will both create circuts with the battery
when the switch is connected between the bulb and the battery
battery is in a holder
Its connected to the positive terminal
the voltage of a battery is the result of chemical reactions within the battery
Electrical states between connected terminals will differ than those that are separated by a gap.
because it creates a gap, so the circuit becomes incomplete
Bulb B is in a independent path
becuase it can follow that path that switch Z is on
the closed path contains bulb A, bulb B, bulb C, and a battery.
The ppositive battery terminal is connected in terminal 6.
there will be a gap between the positive battery terminal and the bulb terminal
there was a gap between the positive battery terminal and terminal 1.
Because a bulb creates electricity.
there will be a gap at bulb b, thus affecting the rest of the circuit
there is always voltage even if there is a gap
The A bulb is dead.
Bulb C was in an incomplete path
Because switch y does not affect the circuit that bulb a is on
Terminal 1 is connected to terminal 2
because bulb a is connected to switch x and the battery is in a closed path
A terminal is connected to a bulb.
Because bulb A is connected to another path.
"the electrical state difference between the battery""s two terminals"
Only one terminal is involved in the circuit.
has to do something with a gap
because of the chemical in the battery
bulb A is not in the same pathway as bulbs B and C.
Because the path connecting the bulbs will be damaged
because the battery has its own electrical state within given by the lead
again, bulbs a and b will be contained on a closed path
A gap chause different electrical states with different voltages
because it was contained in a closed bath with the battery.
the path has a gap, so the circuit is incomplete
complete path including a battery and a bulb
Because it buld A was in a closed path with a battery.
the path has to be closed
it contains a bulb and does not complete a full circuit to the battery
the terminal is connected to the negative terminal of the battery
Because it is not on the same path
A battery should connect to a bulb in a closed path.
A terminal is not connected to the positive battery terminal.
bulb a has its own closed path with the battery, bulbs b and c do not
terminal 1 and the positive terminal are connected.
because there is no gap between the terminals
terminal 1 and 2 are connected to the negtive terminal of the battery
There is always a difference in voltage between two battery terminals.
Because the current can not reach the bulb if the circuit is open.
a batter uses a chemical reaction to create voltage
there was a gap in the circuit that C was on
Terminal 5 is connected to the postive battery terminal
When the switch is in the same papth as the bulb.
that the bulb terminal and battery terminal are on the same side of a disconnected circut
It tells you that it is connected to a positive battery terminal.
incorrect, or not a correct way to wire
There are 2 paths in this diagram
circuit has nothing to do with the batteries voltage
bulb a was still contained in a closed path with the battery.
it created a circut with the battery
There has to be a closed circuit battery.
Bulb C is not contained in a closed path
Because the bulb does not have a closed path.
becuase breaking one bulb then affects the ability of the others to light up.
because terminal 1 is directly connected to terminal 4
the battery will always have a voltage.
both bulbs a and c still have a closed path
because terminal 1 is connected to the negative terminal which has a 1.5 volt difference with the positive terminal
A and B are on a closed path with the battery
the battery connects to the bulb
Voltage is the difference between a positive and negative end on a battery.
the terminals are seperated from the positive terminal
bulb a and bulb c are not on the same path as bulb B
the terminals are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
bulb a affects bulb c
bulb a was in a closed path with the battery.
the positive battery terminal and terminal 5 are connected
its not recieving from either the negative or positive terminal
by measuring you can find the gap which will show you which bulb is burned out
a damaged bulb causes a gap at the blub
Terminal 4 is connected to the positive battery terminal.
if a bulb and a switch are contained in the same closed path, the switch affects the bulb.
the bulb is contained in the bath
bulb c is in its own pathway
Bulb B, and C are still ina contained path.
Bulb A and C still had a closed path with the battery.
the battery always has a voltage because there is a positive terminal and there is a negative terminal.
The positive terminal has 1.5 V
because switch x is open.
you can see where the gap is
the bulb is in a closed circuit
not seperated by a gap
A terminal is not connected to the negative battery terminal.
1 is connected to terminal 2.
bulbs a, b, and c are all in the same path.
the terminals are connected to each other
If the path contains the switch, the bulb is affected.
If B burns out there will still be closed paths for the other 2
because voltage measures the difference between two points
Because there is a gap.
bulb a is on a closed path with the battery
The battery and the bulb must be in a closed path together.
there is a closed path
The difference between the electrical states is 1.5 volts
The bulb takes away the path.
when it is in the same path as the battery
there is no gap between the posittive terminal and terminal 1
there is no gap between the positive battery terminal and terminal 4
bulb b and bulb c are still contained in a closed path with the battery
It determines whether or not the light bulbs will turn on.
Bulb C was in an open path,
both bulbs B and C are in the same path as bulb A
There is no difference between the two terminals.
Bulb a and switch Y are not in the same path.
Bulb A is not on the same path that Bulb B and bulb C are.
It is being attatched to the wrong side.
because 1.5 v is the difference between the positive terminal and terminal 1
A red X means the battery is in a short circuit.
if the switch is open in a path with the battery and bulb.
bulbs b and are not in a closed path with bulb a
bulb a and bulb b are still in a closed path with the battery.
bulbs a and c are not in the same closed path as bulb b
If any bulb is out, it affects the whole system and everything is blocked from the battery.
because the terminals are in the same state
Because it was contained in the battery that has a closed path
because bulbs a and b are still contained in a closed path with the battery.
4, 5, and 6 are connected to the positive side
If bulb B is damaged a gap is created.
It is an open path.
because the the circuit is complete.
for the same reason as 3
because it was connected to the positive terminal.
because bulbs a and b have their own closed paths
the path will have a gap
Because their is a gap between A and C now.
terminal 1 and terminal 4 are the same
the red x means that the circuit is not safe.
the battery connects with bulb a and b
Circuit 2 is not a short circuit because it is not a closed circuit.
When switch is open it creates a gap in the path.
There is still a closed path that contains the battery, Bulb B, and Bulb C.
damaged bulb b creates a gap
because it can travel by bulb c
there is still a closed path to the battery for bulbs b and c
4 5 and 6 are not connected to negative battery terminal
It breaks the closed path.
if it is on a series with other bulbs
bulbs are on the same closed path
B and C will no longer be contained in a closed path to the battery.
bulbs b anc c are on the same closed path with the battery but seperate from bulb a
"Because it didn""t cause a gap."
the terminal is connected to the battery
turning off one bulb will not turn off another bulb
terminal 5 is connected to postive terminal of the battery
If the switch is contained in the same path with the Bulb
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 4.
bulb a is contained in a closed path with the battery.
the other terminals are connected to the positive terminal.
because there is no closed path
The open switch makes the circuit incomplete.
because it creates a gap in the circuit.
Because bulbs A and C are on different closed paths with the battery
A is on a cloosed battery
The light bulb must be connected to both sides of the battery and there must be a closed circuit.
terminal 5 is connected to the positive battery terminal.
Because it decides whether the bulb will be lit or not
If a switch is open, the circut is no longer closed.
bulb b and c are still in a closed path with the battery.
the terminal is not connected to the positive battery terminal
bulb b did not create a gap in the path for bulb a and c
the battery is connected to a bulb
the positive battery terminal and terminal 4 are connected
Because there was no difference
Bulb B and bulb C are contained in different path with the battery
there was a gap between the positive battery terminal and terminal 2.
the closed path still existed for bulb A even though switch Y was open
positive is seperated from negative!
Because it is not in the same path.
there is no electrical states
Bulb A was still in a closed path with the battery
because it opens the circuit
Because it was still in a closed circuit
terminal 1 was connected to the positive terminal of the battery
terminal 1 is conected to terminal 6
terminal 1 was connected to the positive battery terminal
The path may not connect a bulb to the switch.
you can determine is broken bulb is before a gap or after
Terminal 1 is connected to the negative terminal.
A terminal is not connected to the positive battery terminal.
if the switch is contained in a closed path.
because there is a gap between terminal 3 and 4
Bulbs A and B are not on the same path as Bulb C.
the path passes the energy through the switch
It was contained in a closed path
The open switch makes the path open
the positive battery terminal is connected to terminal 6.
bulbs a b and c are on a closed path
because all the terminals are connected to other terminals, an open switch disrupts that.
there was a gap in bulb B
terminal 1 is connected to terminal 4
the positive terminal is not seperated by a gap from terminal 5
the batter is contained in switch y
the difference electrical state will show the burnt bulb
There is no connection between the bulb terminal and the battery terminal.
The battery is not in a closed path.
depends on whether it is before or after the bulb
there is a gap in the circuit
the negative battery terminal is connected to terminal 4
There will be a gap in the path
Because the terminals are not in a closed path, so you are giving the voltage of the battery itself
Because it is measuring the difference in electrical states between two terminals.
because of the gap at bulb b
switch Y does not affect the closed circuit of bulb A
electrical states will determine whether there is a gap or connection in the circuit
Because a closed circuit was formed.
if the path is closed, the bulbs will remain on.
Because the voltage is the same.
seperate paths connected to the battery
bulb B becomes a gap in the circuit
If the switch and the bulb are in the same path.
terminal 5 is connected ot the positive battert terminal
because bulb A was still contained in a closed path
because the outcome of the bulb will not affect each other
The battery is in a short circuit.
You can find where there is a gap
Becuase there are still 2 closed paths for the battery to send volts through.
Because these terminals all had a reading of 0.0 volts
there is a gap in the connection
it is in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs A and B are contained in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A and bulb C are still on a closed path that contains the battery.
the swithch affects the bulb if it is on the same path
circuit 5 only has one terminal to the battery
"because the battery always has a voltage unless it""s dead"
The battery is contained in a closed circuit and there is nothing in its pathway
Because it has two electrial states within itself.
Bulbs b and c were in a closed path with a battery.
Bulb A and bulb b are still contained in closed paths with the battery
I guess because it is in the center.
because the two ends of the battery do not connect to one another
The battery keeps a chemical reaction reaction.
a switch will effect a bulb if it in the closed path to the battery
there is a gap between the positive battery terminal and the bulb terminal.
Circuit 2 is not a closed circuit because the battery and the bulb are connected.
terminals 4,5, and 6 are connected to the positive terminal
the positive battery terminal is not connected
because bulb c was contained in an open path with the battery
a large one, if it is closed it will light up but if it is open it will not
Bulb A is on a closed circut path
The bulb is only connected to that side of the battery terminal.
If the bulb is on the same closed path
One side is closed the other side is open.
there is no closed path
bulb a was contained on a closed path with the battery
positive and negative is seperate
It is a closed path.
It makes the circuit incomplete.
bulb a and b will be on.
there is a gap, so the terminals are connected to the negative side of the battery.
the bulb in burned out
Terminal 4 is only connected to the positive battery terminal.
the battery and a created a complete circut
The path determines if the bulb will turn on or not
it was connected to both terminals of the battery
there is a path from bulb to battery
Through bulb A, bulb B is still contained in a closed path to the battery.
the battery is contained in a closed path
if switch and bulb are contained in the same closed path
bulb c does not affect the path of a and b.
Bulbs B and C werer still contained in a closed path with the battery.
because the positive battery terminal is not separated by a gap from terminal 6.
gap between 3 and positive battery
there is no closed path in circuit 4.
because the voltage doesnt change in the battery
because bulb A was still on a closed circuit
there is a gap at bulb b
it is on a closed path
A IS ON ITS ON PATH B AND C SHARE A PATH
There is a chemical reaction.
bulb B and C will no be in a closed path with the battery
still connected to the battery
bulb a and c are contained in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs have to be contained in closed paths with the battery
bulb a is in a closed circuit with the battery without the y switch.
bulbs b and c are contained in the same path
bulbs a and c are contained in different paths with the battery.
Switch Z is in the same path as bulb A
not contained inthe same path
bulb b and c are on a closed path to the battery
there are still complete paths to the battery for B and C
Because the two terminals are connected
there was a gap in the terminal
bulb a creates a gap
there was a gap from terminal 2 to terminal 6
There is a light bulb in the circuit
it was still on a closed path
There is a gap in the circuit.
There is no path through bulb B
Bulb C is in an indepedent path
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 4.
If the switch is in front of the path of a light bulb or not.
The bulb must be in a closed pathway containing the battery
there is a gap between the positive battery connection and the bulb terminal.
a gap causes a lost connection
The bulb is dead pr not connected to the battery terminal
The electrical state is interferred with.
because bulb c was in an open path
bulb a is on a closed path with the battery
because the battery has its own chemical reacion between the positive and negative tterminals it contains
a terminal is connected to the positive terminal of the battery
bulb a will light when it is in a closed path with the battery.
a switch is contained in the path
The positive battery terminal is separated by a gap from terminal 3
because bulbs a and c have their own closed paths
the bulb creates a gap in the closed path
open switch and broken bulb are the same
a terminal is connected to another terminal
Bulb A and C are still in a closed path with the battery.
When the switch is in the same path as the bulb.
because each bulb has its own complete path
the battery is not conatined in a closed path
there is still a closed path that contains the battery, bulb b, and bulb c
the battery contains bulb a and b on a closed path
The positive battery terminal was not seperated by a gap from terminal 4.
terminal 6 is connected to terminal 1
bulb c creates a gap in the closed path.
bulb a and bulb c are wired in parallel
that the battery connection does not work
Short circuit or bad battery.
if there is a gap in the circuit there the bulb will not light up.
terminal 1 and 2 have the same difference in electrical states
there is no gap between terminal 1 and the positive terminal.
The path must be closed
it was connected to the positive terminal
It has its own path connected to the battery
if it is in the same path as the bulb
circuit do not effect electrical state between terminals
The battery is connected to the bulb
there was a gap from terminal
the battery is in a closed path.
Bulb A has a closed pathway
it depends on whether its an open or closed path
because the bulb is in a closed path
There is a difference in electrical states between two terminals.
Because terminal 1 is seperated from the positive battery terminal.
When it is on the same pathway as the batter and the bulb.
because there is a difference in electrial states between the two terminals
because the gap provides separation to the terminals
Because their was a connected circuit.
The are both connected the negative battery terminal.
there is a difference in electrical states
bulbs b and c are contained in the same closed path.
There is still a closed path
the two terminals will both be 0
those terminals are connected to the negative side of the circut
The damaged bulb B has left a gap in the path so the charge can not reach it
because it was in a closed circuit
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal and terminal 6 is connected to the positive battery terminal
A closed path with a battery enables the bulb to be on.
the circuit needs to be closed
the bulb will be burned out because the terminals
The battery is in a closed path that does not contain any other components.
the bulb terminal and the battery terminal are separated by a gap
not in the same path
the terminals are not connected
The bulb and battery must be contained in closed paths.
because bulbs b and c are in a closed path with the battery.
because there was a positive and negative connection
it was seperated by a gap from terminal 3
No electricity is being produced.
Obama to name Susan Rice as national security adviser
The foundations of South Africa are built on Nelson Mandela's memory
Turkish riot police tear gas Taksim Square protest
Chicago Shooting Shows Gap in Stepped-up Policing
Feds move to require car-to-car safety communication
Carter stars for Crusaders
Ukraine protest leaders name ministers, Russian troops on alert
North Korea shuns offer of talks
04:47 Renzi sworn in as Italian premier
Prince Charles 'compares Putin to Hitler'
NATO chief urges restraint in Egypt
Malala, Snowden, Belarusians Short-Listed For Sakharov Prize
40 still missing in Canadian train wreck
Iran warns against military intervention in Iraq
Israeli army resumes Gaza offensive
Nigeria: Militants kill students in college attack
Israel PM accuses Iran president of hypocrisy
2nd New Zealand-West Indies ODI abandoned
One dead in Philadelphia building collapse, others pulled from rubble
EU offers to help destroy Syria weapons
Police clash with youth in Cairo after anti-Morsi protest
Top Diplomats Meet in Munich at Critical Time
Algerian President Bouteflika in Paris hospital
US pursues al-Qaida leaders in dual Libya, Somalia raids
Why ElBaradei should step aside 
Ronaldo's hat trick sends Portugal to World Cup
Snowden 'given refugee document by Ecuador'
NA President‚Äôs message on the World Press Freedom Day
US drone strike kills 11 in Pakistan
Israel moves forces near border with Gaza
EU foreign ministers to discuss Syria arms embargo
Strong Taiwan quake kills two, injures 21
Israel frees Palestinians as talks gesture
Death toll from Philippine earthquake rises to 185
Stocks to watch at close on Monday
Army jets kill 38 militants in NW Pakistan air raids
New Italy government to be sworn in
Ukraine 'on verge of civil war'
Israel agrees to 24-hour Gaza truce
Egypt turmoil deepens; militants kill 25 policemen
Egyptian police fire tear gas at protesters in Cairo
ElBaradei to Become Egyptian PM
EDL leaders arrested during march to Woolwich
Andhra Pradesh high court asks Telugu actors Mohan Babu, Brahmanandam to return Padma Shri
Man Who Set Himself on Fire on National Mall Has Died
Philippines holds second senator over corruption
'Fast &amp; Furious' star Paul Walker dies in car crash at 40
Flooding in southern China kills 37
German envoy optimistic about Iran-G5+1 talks
Renowned Spanish flamenco guitarist Paco De Lucia dies
Syrian opposition awaits invitation to Geneva peace talks
Chinese icebreaker changes course towards suspicious objects
Pakistan releases American identified as FBI agent
Snowden Hits Hurdles in Search for Asylum
Trending news across China on Oct 20
Today in History, Jan. 24
Boston Marathon bombing suspect caught after manhunt
Death toll in building collapse in south India mounts to 47
Pakistan imposes temporary ban on 2 TV channels
Chris Froome Set For Tour De France Win
Palestinian prisoners arrive at Muqata in Ramallah
10 dead, five injured in SW China road accident
Signals detected in MH370 search in 'same broad area'
Ceremonial funeral for Margaret Thatcher
Angelina Jolie "very grateful" for support after double mastectomy
Matt Smith quits BBC‚Äôs Doctor Who
Thai junta amasses security force to smother Bangkok protests
Rowhani declared winner of Iran presidential election
Aso refuses to resign over Nazi comments
PPP's Shehla Raza elected Deputy Speaker of SA
Explosions kill 29 outside two mosques in Lebanon's Tripoli
US drone strike kills six in Pakistan officials
Pakistan fighter jets bomb 'Taliban hideouts'
British tourist killed in Malaysia diving accident
Sisi sworn in as Egypt's president, cool reception from West
Taiwan's economy grows 2.27% in April-June quarter
Bananas thrown at Italy's first black minister
Gunmen Kill Eight In Second Kenya Attack
US writer Homes blocks Mantel‚Äôs treble win
Pro football player Aaron Hernandez charged with murder in friend's shooting death
Four arrested as Bangladesh building toll rises to 352
U.S. resumes search for missing British sailors after public
Rescuers scour debris after India buildings collapse
Iraqi Bomb Attacks Kill At Least 13
The Note's Must-Reads for Monday, November 25, 2013
Tamerlan Tsarnaev buried in Virginia
Egypt forces set to block access to Morsi protest camps
Eurozone unemployment at record 12 percent
Nobel author Doris Lessing dies at 94
Japan's opposition party chief criticizes Abe's economic policies
Noise is No. 1 quality of life complaint in NYC
3 Suspects Taken Into Custody in Boston Bombing Case
Malaysia Airlines plane 'shot down' in Ukraine
UN chief: 'Fragile but real hope' at Syria peace talks
Turkish court orders lifting of Twitter ban
Ukraine's opposition chief wants more protests
Queen pays tribute to Nelson Mandela
Defence in South Korea ferry trial warns of scapegoating
Declines in US stock market moderate
11:42 Churchill's last child dies aged 91
Israeli calls to execute Palestinian captives instead of releasing them
Afghanistan gears up for run-off presidential vote
Latest Anti-Muslim Violence in Burma Kills 1, Injures 10
Suspected U.S. drone strike kills 5 in Pakistan
The Note's Must-Reads for Friday May 24, 2013
Swiss TV: Police say 44 injured in train collision
22 killed in mine accident in southwestern China
NYPD Twitter Outreach Backfires Badly
19 hurt in New Orleans shooting
Another migrant ship capsizes off Italy
Wawrinka defeats injured Nadal to win Australian Open
Pranab to lead team at Mandela‚Äôs memorial service
Turkish search ends as last missing miners found
Margaret Thatcher will receive Ceremonial funeral
UN invites Iran to Syria peace talks
Iran predicts failure of Israeli-Palestinian peace talks
Pakistan survivor of honour killing attempt fears for her life
Olivia Colman wins second BAFTA Award
Titanic Violin Nabs Record $1.4 Million
Latest storm brings more snow to US East Coast
Ankeet Chavan granted conditional bail for marriage
Hosni Mubarak retrial adjourned until 8 June
JAL's first order from Airbus is blow to Boeing
Twin blasts rock Boston Marathon
EU, Britain argue over Juncker appointment
Sienna Miller testifies at UK phone hacking trial
Israelis attack 2 Palestinians in Jerusalem area
India Ink: Image of the Day: February 25
Bangladesh braces for violent protests after hanging of opposition leader
Daughter and son-in-law of elderly couple found buried in their back garden are charged with murder
EU extends sanctions against Russia
Cuba sees "major role" for foreign investment
‚ÄėGlee‚Äô star Cory Monteith found dead in hotel room
Al-Qaida suspects bomb oil export pipeline in Yemen
Comedy actor Felix Dextor dies aged 52
Lebanon's PM forms 'unity cabinet' Lebanon's prime minister has formed a cabinet more than 10 months after taking office, taking in a wide range of political groups after bridging serious divisions am
Iran has 18,000 centrifuges, 10,000 operating
Iranian president makes debut on world stage
London Marathon runners honour Boston victims
2 killed, multiple wounded in Miami shooting
Scores Killed In Egyptian Protests
US, China Set the Stage for Obama-Xi Summit
State Dept. issues wide travel alert, says terror attack possible
Cameron 'has no concerns' over halal meat
Iran gets first presidential TV debate
Muslim Brotherhood formed 'military wing': Egypt
Michelle Obama To Star In Parks And Recreation
Israel to release Palestinian prisoners
Kenyan troops storm Westgate Mall to end siege
EU condemns terrorist attacks in China
US says DPRK has no nuclear missile capability
Singapore stocks end up 0.11 pct
World's oldest man dies at 116
GM slow on recalls, Congress record shows
10 killed in Sri Lankan bus accident
Joint Statement by the United States and Ukraine
Death toll in Lebanon bombings rises to 47
Greek far-right leader imprisoned pending trial
Bangladesh factory owners arrested as death toll nears 350
3 bombs explode in southern Thailand, injuring 27
Israel eases ban on building material imports to Gaza
Ariel Castro Pleads Not Guilty
Afghans downplay Taliban threats, continue voting to elect president
4 Egyptian soldiers killed in Sinai ambush
BlackBerry open to sale
Beijing's Aircraft Carrier Returns from South China Sea
Egypt courts hear cases against Mubarak, Islamists
Bartoli wins Wimbledon title, beats Lisicki in 2
Moscow's Crimea success could lead to it redrawing Ukraine's eastern border
Nelson Mandela dies aged 95
One dead, 77 hurt in riot at PNG immigration centre
Belgian King Albert II to step down in favor of son
Nazi Gestapo chief 'buried in Jewish cemetery'
Roadside Bomb Kills 7 Afghan Soldiers
Twelve killed in bomb blast on Pakistani train
Egypt's military cracks down on Muslim Brotherhood
Swiss vote on highest minimum wage
Kevin Rudd sworn in as Australian prime minister
Donetsk Region Protesters Detain Trucks Carrying Government Rocket Ammo
Couples tie the knot as same-sex marriage becomes law
Star pupil stabbed to death by gang
Israel finds bodies of three missing teens in West Bank
National Conference on Economy set for end of May 2014
Easy Rider star Karen Black dies aged 74
What the Papers Say, June 25, 2013
Coronation Street's Bill Roache Arrested
Tokyo to host 2020 Olympic Games
Russia warns Ukraine against EU deal
Oscar Pistorius 'accidentally fired bullet in crowded restaurant - then asked friend to take blame'
Mandela 'responding to treatment'
Two arrested in India after lost tourist raped
Singapore stocks end up 0.37 pct
Red Sox beat Tigers to reach World Series
Israeli war jet strikes on northern Gaza
At Least 22 Dead After China Earthquake
Gunmen kill nine foreign tourists, guide in Pakistan
French president meets bidders for industrial jewel Alstom
China yuan weakens to 6.1559 against USD
Six US soldiers killed in aircraft crash in Afghanistan
Suicide truck bomber kills 11 in northern Iraq
News is my Business
Hernandez double gives Mexico victory
Rights lawyers harassed as China hails rule of law
Activists: Syrian airstrike kills 21 in Aleppo
Rosberg emulates father with Monaco win
Glasgow helicopter death toll rises to nine
Another hole in GPO as PM's bureau chief steps down
Huge explosion after oil train derails in Canada
David Beckham to retire at end of season
Afghanistan: suicide bomber kills eight in military bus blast
China sacks top economic official
Deaths in bombings and shootings across Iraq
N. Korea's Kim hails execution of powerful uncle
George Zimmerman not guilty of boy‚Äôs murder
EU, Myanmar work toward investment protection agreement
Tehelka editor embroiled in sex assault scam
Iron Lady Margaret Thatcher dies at 87
Four Morsi supporters killed in Egypt clashes
U.N. condemns ethnic killings in South Sudan oil town
Israel colonel killed in Jordan Valley
Feds drop 'morning-after pill' appeal
Police fire tear gas at protesters in Bangkok
Shooting, protests mar Thai voting
China stock index futures close lower -- April 23
North Korea urges foreigners in South to evacuate
Canada approves oil pipeline to the Pacific Coast
Hollande stands firm to fight terrorism after Niger explosions
Seven Filipinos slain in Yemen attack
Storm buries Northeast; 16 inches of snow in NJ
Israel ends airstrike case; Palestinians critical
Diana Nyad completes record swim on fifth try
Bernie's Sports Focus July 1 2013
Protesters topple Lenin statue in Kiev
Deadly explosions hit Boston Marathon in US
South Sudan president declares state of emergency in two states
Putin, Merkel Meet on Ukraine Crisis
Brooks pleads not guilty to hacking charges
Oil falls below $102 on US shutdown notice
41 killed, 22 wounded in violent attacks in Iraq
Respected British interviewer David Frost dies of a heart attack
Iran 'thwarts nuclear sabotage attempts'
Stocks Little Changed in Early Trading
Court to hear Bo Xilai appeal
Jamaican connection in Liverpool's win
Turkish police fire tear gas on protesters
China yuan strengthens to 6.1184 against USD Tuesday
Three dead after NYC building collapse
Netanyahu talks tough on Iran before Vatican talks
Man charged with teacher's murder new A 22-year-old man will be charged with the murder of a nursery teacher who was gunned down while celebrating her birthday.
International weapons experts leave Syria, Obama to make statement
Protesters gather in Brazil despite concessions
Construction site collapse kills 7 in C. China
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 3.00pm
France to shut far-right group ...
Tornado kills five in Oklahoma
Queen visits London soldier attack scene
19 hurt in New Orleans shooting
India and China troops retreat to de facto border in face-off deal
Relief in Boston as second suspect captured
Syrian army retakes Crusader castle from rebels
Chinese court agrees to hear Bo Xilai appeal
N. Korea test-fires 30 short-range missiles into sea: Yonhap
Saudi to give Lebanese army $3 billion
Ovadia Yosef, rabbi and Israeli kingmaker, dies
US Home Sales Plunged 5.1 Percent in January
Red Cross workers released in Ukraine
Mandela's condition is now critical
Syria envoy says no peace talks without opposition
Queen to name biggest ever carrier
Bangla militants escape from prison van in bomb ambush
Wreckage of Air Algerie plane carrying 116 people found in Mali
Hamas agrees to 24-hour truce in Gaza
UN stalemate over Syria
Influential Palestinians Seek One Democratic State
Dozens killed in Russian plane crash
Southwest jet hit nose first
U.S. retailers agree to Bangladesh plant safety pact
US government shutdown begins - live updates
Woman loses arm in Maui shark attack
occupied Palestinian territory: Stop Shooting at Gaza Civilians
French President Hollande condemns Ukraine referendums as 'null and void'
Obama names outspoken Rice as his security adviser
Indian stocks close lower
Former Israeli Prime Minister Sharon dies at 85
India Ink: Image of the Day: February 25
Suicide bomber kills 14 in Afghanistan
China launches probe and rover to moon
All eyes on Khurshid‚Äôs trip ...
Australia cuts rates to record low
Chinese News Agency Slams Delays in Search for Jet
Injury puts Brazil's Neymar out of World Cup
Classic crossword - Saturday 1st June
N Korea test-fires 30 short-range missiles
Syrian opposition sets Assad's departure precondition for Geneva talks
15 dead as Egypt police disperse pro-Mursi camps
Palestinian diplomat dies in Prague blast
Protesters clash with police in Caracas
U.S. closes embassy in Libya, evacuates staffers
Novice 'steered South Korea ferry'
N Korea postpones family reunions with South
Chinese president meets Indian vice president
Taiwan stocks close 0.56 pct higher
Twelve killed in bomb blast on Pakistani train
Teenage girl killed in east London Shereka Marsh was shot in the neck, police say
Death toll in Nairobi attack rises to 59
Singapore stocks close 0.5 pct higher
Russia responds to Ukraine ceasefire
Tropical Storm Fernand forms off Mexico's coast
China's Peace Ark departs for the Philippines Thursday
Turkish police fight protesters, clear square
France cleared to impose controversial 'millionaire tax'
Iran dissidents 'killed in Iraq'
James Gandolfini dies aged 51
China questions Japan's revision of pacifist constitution
Nearly nine million people in 'severe debt'
Egypt arrests Muslim Brotherhood leader Badie
Updated - Two explosions near finish line of Boston Marathon
Twelve killed in bomb blast on Pakistani train
Actor Mickey Rooney dies aged 93
The new Cold War
Eleven die in clashes in Lebanon's Tripoli
Brazil in talks to hire 6,000 Cuban doctors
Kenyan forces caused mall collapse
Powerful quake strikes off eastern Indonesia
Driver of crashed Spanish train held on suspicion of negligent homicide
Is Fed ready to begin taper? Markets say yes
N.Korea cancels family reunions
Scientists grow "mini human brains" from stem cells
Virginia's ex-Gov. Bob McDonnell, wife charged with corruption
Cuba's 'Ladies' to pick up EU prize 8 years late
Boeing 787 Dreamliner fire shuts Heathrow
Fourteen killed in Brazil bus accident
Afghan official says some 2,000 people missing after landslide buries a northeast village
Snowden Offered Asylum In Three Countries
Israel cabinet approves Palestinian prisoner release
US: Assad used chemical weapons on Syria rebels
Death Toll in Bangladesh Collapse at 194
Assault on Iraq Funeral, Other Attacks Kill 92
Syrian warplanes reportedly strike in Iraq, killing 57
Nine Dead In Oklahoma City After Tornadoes Hit
Israeli teens missing in West Bank
President mourns death of Mandela
Israel agrees to release Palestinian prisoners
Palestinian diplomat dies in Prague blast
Rogers hires Vodafone UK chief Guy Laurence as CEO
EU adds Hezbollah's military wing on its terrorist list
Death toll in Lebanon bombings rises to 47
Two blasts near Iranian embassy in Beirut, 7 killed
Israel expands subsidies to settlements
Suicide bomber kills nine police in north Iraq
North, South Korea agree to first reunions
Singapore shares open 0.31% higher on Monday
SA duo killed in terror attack
Suicide bomber kills 23 Iraqi army recruits
Muslim Brotherhood supporter killed in clash in Egypt: security sources
Syrian forces hit mosque with barrel bomb, kill 5
Mandela in ‚Äėserious but stable‚Äô condition
Obama, Hollande discuss response to alleged chemical weapons use in Syria
What the Papers Say, Nov. 19, 2013
Wall Street dips as impasse in budget talks puzzles investors
Deaf customers sue Starbucks, say they're mocked
Thousands evacuated in Moscow metro fire
NSA whistleblower Edward Snowden leaves Hong Kong on flight to Moscow
Air strikes kill 20 civilians in Syria's Damascus
38 killed in rains, flash floods in Pakistan
7 killed by Shiite al-Houthi fighters in northern Yemen
Lebanon pins hope in Geneva II conference on Syria
Nadal, Djokovic to meet in French Open semifinals
Iran excluded from Syria peace talks: UN
New uncertainty about missing Malaysian plane
Flight of Boston Marathon bombing suspects ended in mayhem
Libya asks UN Security Council for help
German police foil neo-Nazi model airplane bomb plan
California Wildfire Forces Evacuation Of Homes
Kerry call on Congress to end shutdown
China stocks close lower on Wednesday
Berlusconi said to pay off 'bunga bunga' witnesses
US condemns Lebanon blasts
Super typhoon hits Philippines
The Note's Must-Reads for Monday, December 2, 2013
Arrest over French soldier's stabbing
Canada train plot suspects reject charges
Nearly 1,900 killed in Syria during peace talks
East Ukraine Separatists Ask to Join Russia
Rudd sworn in as new Australian PM
North Korea blocks South workers from Kaesong industrial zone
Moon rocks indicate earth's orb born of collision
Obama lashes North Korea as pariah state
Abbas accepts resignation of Palestinian PM
BlackBerry loses US$965m in Q2
Colombia strike three times
Pakistan Air Strikes Kill 32 Militants
Tornadoes level homes in Oklahoma, 1 dead
Egypt strongly opposes military action against Syria
Tony Abbott sworn in as new Australian PM
11 killed in Chinese police station attack
Pro-Russia rebels downed Malaysian plane: Ukraine
No argument with Jakarta on boats: Abbott
Nigerian police ban protests over kidnapped girls
GM recalls about 60,000 Saturns to fix gear shifts
2 Children Die on Long Island After Being Pulled From Neighbor‚Äôs Pool
US believes Syria has probably used chemical weapons
Sanford gets his chance to debate Colbert Busch in S.C.
McCain in surprise visit to Afghanistan
Japan PM Abe escapes injury in five-car collision
Egypt's opposition criticizes president's speech
Syrian war seen dragging on for years
Russia says ballistic missiles fired in Mediterranean
Barack Obama cancels meeting with Vladimir Putin over Edward Snowden
Volcano erupts in Indonesia -100,000 evacuated and airports closed
Egypt threatens Brotherhood ban
49 killed, 148 wounded in violent attacks in Iraq
Ukraine's Yanukovych says he does not plan to resign
Flash floods kill 58 in eastern Afghanistan
Investigators probe motives of LAX airport shooter
Margaret Thatcher, former U.K. PM, dead at 87
Outrage after reports emerge about 6-year-old Indian girl raped at school
Egypt's Brotherhood to hold "march of anger"
Building collapse kills 15 in India
Janet Yellen to become first woman to lead the Federal Reserve
Nine killed more than 40 injured in multiple bus crash in Germany
2 killed as more storms batter Britain
World powers, Iran under Rouhani revive nuclear talks
Tymoshenko urges EU to take strong action on Crimea
Germany Summons US Envoy Over Alleged NSA Spying
Muslim Brotherhood banned in Egypt
Uneasy calm descends on Turkey square
More Deaths Expected in Canada Oil Train Explosion
Aimee Copeland Gets Bionic Hands
Mainland's Taiwan affairs chief completes
Philippines defers comment on Taiwan fisher attack
Sailors dead in India submarine blast
Crowds, Dignitaries Gather for Mandela Memorial Service
Death toll from Baghdad bombs rises to 19
3 Palestinians released from Israeli prisons
Two dead as Egyptians clash ahead of opposition rallies
Children and adults injured in 'very serious' car crash outside primary school new A number of children were injured after a car overturned near a primary school today.
Obama Urges Restraint from Israelis, Palestinians
Leading Egyptian activist turns himself in
Russia releases Greenpeace doctor
Russian aircraft wreckage found after a year
17 killed in US drone attack on Yemen wedding party
China manufacturing index at 11-month low: HSBC
Series of bombings kills 15 in Iraq
Syrian PM Survives Bomb Attack
France to ban child beauty pageants
Today in History, Dec. 2
Lord Palumbo offers hope for a relationship with his son James
Three women missing for a decade found alive in Cleveland home
New Zealand botulism scare triggers global recall
In second attack, Pak Taliban attack Karachi airport academy
Ships Train for Syrian Chemical Weapons Transport
Death toll rises to 29 in India's Mumbai building collapse
Israel responds coolly to outcome of Iranian presidential election
Air strikes kill 20 civilians in Syria's Damascus
Extremists claim responsibility for Niger attacks
U.S. court: Utah gay marriages can continue
Eurozone's unemployment climbs to 12.1%, a fresh record high
Fromer Pakistani army chief Musharraf charged in 2007 Bhutto assassination
World Briefing | The Americas: Brazil: Dispute in Bolivia Spills Over
Pro-Russians forces enter Ukrainian naval base in Crimea
Body of missing South Korean shipping tycoon found in field
New Boko Haram video claims to show missing Nigerian schoolgirls
Actor Philip Seymour Hoffman found dead
Egypt court sentences 10 Brotherhood supporters to death - sources
No update on Nelson Mandela's condition
One dead in US building collapse
Ukraine: Nine people die in Kyiv clashes
Mall attackers used 'less is more' strategy
Islamists protest US drone strikes in Pakistan
US Flying Surveillance Missions to Help Find Kidnapped Nigerian Girls
6.4-magnitude quake strikes off Indonesia
Deputy speaker faces new sex claims
Three Killed In Crash At Tiananmen Square
Button Hits Back at McLaren Boss
2 dead, 2 injured in Nevada middle school shooting
Death toll in India building collapse hits 42
CIA chief visits Israel for Syria talks
Prince George is christened at St James's Palace
Monty Python to reunite for new show
Italian Foreign Minister confers with Ghana VP
EU foreign ministers to discuss how to press Egypt over bloodshed
Gunman who held suburban Atlanta firefighters hostage now dead, police say
Bradley Manning-WikiLeaks case turns to sentencing
Police helicopter crashes into pub in Glasgow - several casualties
Egypt poll: 98 per cent vote 'yes' for new constitution
Iran, six global powers sign landmark nuclear deal
Quotes from leaders, family at Mandela memorial
China says bird flu death toll rises to 14
China, Israel vow to further deepen cooperation
Bangladesh opposition set for mass march against polls
In surprise visit to Afghanistan, Obama tells troops 'you inspire me'
Israeli forces arrest 6 Palestinians in overnight West Bank raids
Hague 'concerns over conduct' of Zimbabwe election
Hong Kong stocks end higher
Dignitaries pay tribute to Paul Desmarais
5 things you need to know Tuesday
Southwest grounds flights due to computer glitch
Vatican Embassy in Syria hit by mortar fire
Egypt Brotherhood Guide Faces New Murders Case
China shares close higher Friday
North Korea blocks access to joint industrial zone
Gunmen 'kill 10 tourists' in Kashmir
Islamic militants kill 9 foreign tourists, 1 Pakistani
Blaze That Killed 19 Firefighters Now Contained
Iran president Rouhani ready for nuclear talks
'Western' forces attack Islamic militant base in Somalia
Philippines detains 11 Chinese on fishing charges
Hong Kong set for huge democracy rally on handover anniversary
Israeli general says Syria government forces used chemical weapons
Suicide bomber kills 20 in Iraq
Major fire breaks out in JK secretariat in Srinagar
Five killed in Belgian coach crash
Pakistan's Musharraf lashes out after arrest
Five children buried alive in Bohol landslide
6 Killed by Hot Lava as Indonesia Volcano Erupts
At least 11 killed in India building collapse
Prince George christening, meet the godparents
Egypt's presidential election begins
Son of US evangelist kills himself The son of popular US evangelist Rick Warren has killed himself.
At least 45 killed in Spain train crash
French soldier stabbed near Paris
Nicaragua, Venezuela offer asylum to Snowden
China-EU 2020 Strategic Agenda for Cooperation released at 16th China-EU Summit
Italian parliament backs new PM
Russian lawmakers pass new bill restricting Internet
Suicide bomb kills 4, injures 13 in Pakistan
Ukraine rebels 'flee eastern stronghold'
Russian military moves in Crimea are declaration of war, says Ukrainian PM
Super Typhoon Haiyan, Strongest of Season, Slams the Philippines
Nato condemns Ukraine crackdown
Blast near Iran embassy in Beirut
China to investigate EU wine exports
Chinese shares close higher on Tuesday
Bangladesh Building Collapse Death Toll Hits 362
Nelson Mandela hospitalized in serious condition with lung infection
Ariel Sharon in critical condition
Berlusconi party ministers' announcement of resignation throws Italy into political crisis
Conan O'Brien at the White House Correspondents' Dinner
Next Iran nuclear talks due on June 16-20-IRNA
One killed as more than a million protest in Brazil
Boston bomb suspect charged; religious motive seen
EU condemns violence in Iraq
Asian markets mixed on China trade data
World's oldest person dies in Japan at 116
Foreign exchange rates in India
Colorado wildfire destroys more than 90 homes as winds worsen
Cypriot Finance Minister Michalis Sarris resigns
Heartbreaking transcript reveals indecision as South Korea ferry sank
Death toll in India temple stampede rises to 109
Man sets himself on fire at Washington's National Mall
Two killed in Karachi blast
Putin submits federal constitutional law on Crimea‚Äôs integration into Russia to State Duma
Global progress seen in ending death penalty
Earthquake of 6.3 magnitude strikes off Indonesia island
President Xi mourns Mandela
US, Afghan govt to hold peace talks with Taliban
Suspect arrested in attack on French soldier
Mainland's Taiwan affairs chief meets Taipei mayor
US 'deeply disturbed' by Chinese activist death
News of Terrorism and the Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (January 22 ‚Äď 28, 2014)
Most victims of fiery bus crash identified
Tokyo stocks close 0.75pc down
US awaits high court judgment on gay marriage
'It's either too late or too early to intervene in Syria'
Greek police arrest German on suspicion of spying
Chinese stocks open higher - Apr 2
05:26 Bo Xilai convicted of corruption
Iran's nuclear negotiating team leaves for Kazakhstan
U.S factory orders down 0.7 pct in January
4 foreigners among 9 killed in Kabul hotel attack
Kerry in Indonesia to Talk Climate Change
Iran 'will never build nuclear arms'
Russia warns of catastrophe if Syria reactor hit by U.S. strike
Gunmen Surround Libya's Foreign Ministry To Push Demands
Deaths confirmed after helicopter crashes into Scottish pub
Typhoon death toll rises to 3633
Uganda's president signs anti-gay bill
Russian parliament allows Putin to use military in Ukraine
Bradley Manning acquitted of aiding the enemy
Death toll from west Chinas violence rises to 35
US, Russia to push for new Syria peace talks
G7 'to intensify Russia sanctions'
Drone Strikes a Seminary in Pakistan
Rock bands' plane makes emergency landing in Ill.
Malaysia sets date for landmark elections
Egypt's Brotherhood loses grip as anger boils
Russian Prime Minister On Second Day Of Crimea Visit
Ship hunting for more pings in missing Malaysian plane search
All gunmen in attack on Afghan presidential palace killed
Judge OKs force-feeding California inmates
Gang violence kills 16 in Venezuelan prison
6.7-magnitude earthquake jolts Taiwan: CENC
Scores dead in fresh Egypt clashes
UN Chemical Weapons Experts to Visit Syria
Firefighters battle forest fire in SW China
Palestinians Remember Mandela as an Inspiration
US Military Deaths in Afghanistan at 2,153
Israel, Palestinians seek another meeting Monday: U.S. official
Syria agrees to surrender chemical weapons
Tropical Storm Karen targets US Gulf Coast
Explosions kill 29 outside two mosques in Lebanon's Tripoli
Pit Bull Dog Kills Baby Girl In Blackburn
Roma couple in court over ‚Äėblonde girl‚Äô
China vows to step up fight against Dalai Lama
Pakistan air strikes in North Waziristan 'kill 80 militants'
Seamus Heaney, Irish Poet of Soil and Strife, Dies at 74
Egypt backs away from plan to dissolve Muslim Brotherhood
KL shares easier mid-afternoon
Bangladesh Islamists rally against atheist bloggers
Crash of Malaysia Airlines Flight MH17 in Eastern Ukraine
Suicide bomber kills 13 at restaurant in central Somalia
Anthony Weiner slips to fourth place in new poll
Japanese prime minister angers neighbours with offering to WW2 shrine
Iraqi Forces, Militants Battle for Oil Refinery
Thousands protest against austerity budget in Portugal new
World Cup live blog: Brazil vs. Germany
Israeli airstrikes shake Gaza while Hamas persists with rocket attacks - video
America's first marijuana stores open in Colorado
Channel tragedy as fundraising swimmer dies a mile from French coast A woman who died while attempting to swim the English Channel for charity collapsed just one mile from the French coast.
4 Dead After Cambodian Police Fire on Protesters
India accuses China of crossing de facto border
Pregnant Sudan woman who married a Christian man sentenced to death for 'apostasy'
US top diplomat Kerry's wife rushed to hospital
Conservatives sweep to Australia election victory
Hassan Rouhani wins Iran's presidential election
India govt rejects proposal to shut petrol pumps at night
Kerry pursuing 'quiet strategy' in Mideast peace process
Twin blasts rock Boston Marathon
Woman remanded over child's death A woman has been remanded in custody charged with murder after an eight-year-old girl was found dead in a block of flats.
North Korea says to restart nuclear reactor
Stocks close higher as service sector improves
Egyptian court considers Mubarak‚Äôs release
Suicide bomber kills eight, wounds 13 in Afghan capital - police
Israel not to release Palestinian prisoners
Highlights of US-Russia deal on Syria weapons
Israel approves release of first group of Palestinian prisoners ahead of peace talks
Boston bombing suspect charged in hospital bed
More rain hampers Indian flood rescue
Strong winter storm hits U.S. Northeast
A look at major terror attacks in East Africa
Survivor Could See Runway Through Hole in Tail
Russia responds to Ukraine ceasefire
European Central Bank keeps rates unchanged
Red-shirt leader calls not to oppose army
Kim Jong-un Executed His 'Worse Than a Dog' Uncle
Colourful support at World Cup in Brazil
Russia praises idea to render rights assistance to Ukraine
Fatah endorses refusal to recognise Israel
Attack kills 12 in Afghanistan
Chinese shares close lower Monday
Mandela remains in hospital
South Korea Ferry Crew Members Stand Trial
Georgian PM's ally to become president - exit poll
Egypt votes on new constitution
World news briefs ‚ÄĒ June 14
US drone strike kills six in Pakistan officials
Vietnam detects signals from missing plane
66 missing after boat sinks off Malaysia
Seven bomb blasts kill 27 people in Iraqi capital Baghdad
Syria opposition pressed to attend talks
Cricket-England v Australia fourth test scoreboard
Birthday of DPRK to Be Celebrated in Peru
Powerful 7.6 quake strikes off Solomons
India Ink: Image of the Day: May 21
Storm chasers die in Oklahoma tornado
Viewpoints: Arming the Syrian rebels
IMF cuts world growth forecast for 2013, 2014
Australia leader ousted in snap leadership vote
Obama condemns Egypt violence, cancels military exercises
5 Dead in India Building Collapse
Russia says detects missiles fired from Mediterranean Sea
Mickey Arthur fired as Australia coach
MH17 black boxes arrive in Britain for analysis
Islamist students clash with police at Cairo's Al-Azhar University
Argentina declares mourning for flood victims
Food poisoning kills at least 20 children in India
Prince's christening a blend of old and new
What the Papers Say, May 20, 2013
China yuan weakens to 6.1651 against USD Tuesday
Australia rejects Qantas' request for $2.7 bn loan
Malaysian investigators conclude flight hijacked
Google releases Nexus 5 phone with Kit Kat
Egypt convicts 26 over Suez Canal terror plot
Bombing Aimed at Hezbollah Hits Southern Beirut
Kerry: Saudi King backs Israeli-Palestinian push
Putin foe Navalny defiant as trial opens in Russia
Egypt: Muslim Brotherhood calls for 'uprising'
The Note's Must-Reads for Friday, December 6, 2013
U.S., allies to add sanctions against Russia over Ukraine
Car bombs kill at least 16 in Iraqi capital
US Issues Travel Alert Over Al Qaeda Threat
Factories that ran on Korean cooperation go silent
Taliban attack presidential palace in Afghanistan
Chinese premier meets Indian vice president
Saudi Arabia gets a seat at the UN Security Council
Southern Italy Coach Crash Kills 38
Algerian president in France for medical tests
3 killed, 10 inured in attack on Kenyan church
Islamists still holding some 30 hostages as Kenya mall standoff continues
Manchester City wins second Premier League title in three years
US drone strike kills 11 in Pakistan
Bodies of MH17 crash victims flown to Netherlands
Egypt policeman killed in Sinai attack
Extension likely for Iran nuclear talks
Fire kills 38 in Russian psychiatric institution
5 snowboarders killed in Colo. avalanche identified
Egypt orders arrest of Brotherhood chief Badie
Russia Warns It May Not Sign Landmark UN Arms Treaty
Didier Reynders on Syria
Google begins launching Internet-beaming balloons
North Korea: experts call for dialogue ‚Äď and say China must play a part
China stocks open higher Monday
Obama postpones Malaysian visit to address government shutdown
Sony Xperia Z2 and Nokia‚Äôs X series unveiled
Cannes hotel raid nets ‚ā¨40 million gems
Ukraine opposition urges continued truce
Pro-Russian protesters storm new police station in east Ukraine
New coronavirus can probably can be passed person to person- WHO
Chinese stocks open higher Monday
Mandela back in hospital in ‚Äėserious but stable‚Äô condition
24 killed 77 wounded in Iraq mosque bombing
East Harlem explosion death toll rises
Search resumes for Malaysia jet
Ukrainian Prime Minister resigns amid protests
Royal Hoax DJ Takes Action Against Station
UK Sky News cameraman killed in Egypt
Arsenal v Stoke City ‚Äď live!
Indonesians burn Australian flags over spying reports
Business news and markets: as it happened, April 17, 2013
Zoo worker dies after tiger attack
Ariel Sharon, former Israeli prime minister, dies following eight-year coma
China preparing for Diaoyutai conflict: expert
Israel cabinet votes on Palestinian prisoner release
San Diego Mayor Bob Filner's accusers
Germany to sign G20 statement on Syria
Iran, world powers begin new round of nuclear talks
36 militants killed in Afghan raids
10 Things to Know-Today
Oscar Pistorius trial: Adjourns until Tuesday
Ukraine talks continue amid growing unrest
Israel Could Free Palestinian Prisoners Next Week
Roadside bombs kill 5 in Afghanistan
Tropical Storm Karen targets US Gulf Coast
Protesters clash with police in Turkey
Coronation Street actor Michael Le Vell cleared of child rape claims
Workers killed in India building collapse
Six killed in drone strike in N Waziristan
Nine children die in attack in Afghanistan attack
20 killed in bomb attack at Pakistani base
North Korea fires three short-range missiles
Bursa Malaysia update: 11.30am
17 govt employees killed in Pakistan bus bombing
Car Bomb Kills 37 in Northwest Pakistan
Malaysia Airlines loses contact with plane carrying 239 to Beijing
Microsoft says to cut up to 18,000 jobs
Libyan prime minister seized by armed men
Malaysians vote in polls for stability or change
China yuan weakens to 6.1705 against USD
Google launches Internet-beaming balloons
Fire destroys ancient Tibetan town in China
Yahoo agrees to buy Tumblr for $1.1 billion cash
India starts voting in world's largest election
Car bomb in northern Syria kills at least 12
Philippine quake death toll climbs to 73
Bangladesh police arrest prominent atheist blogger
Shenzhen stock indices close higher Monday
Philippines, rebels reach wealth-sharing deal
Texas senator still filibustering abortion bill
UK's Ex-Premier Margaret Thatcher Dies At 87
Turkish leaders call for int'l intervention in Egypt
Search ends for missing asylum-seekers
Pro-Russian protesters storm new police station in east Ukraine
Ukrainian President orders 7-day ceasefire in the east
At least 12 dead in Washington ...
ICC Champions Trophy: India vs South Africa
Pope Francis to make first visit to Holy Land
Supreme Court takes on affirmative action in Michigan ban case
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Sept 30
Suicide bomber kills 15 in central Somalia
Cyclone leaves trail of destruction in India
Taliban kill 15 police in west Afghanistan
Thousands rally to support embattled Tunisia government
Prince Harry pays tribute to US war dead
Afghan District Governor Defects To Taliban
South Africa's Mandela taken to hospital
Updated - Two explosions near finish line of Boston Marathon
Stuntman prepares to cross Grand Canyon on tightrope
At least two killed in southern Egypt clash
Three killed, 21 injured in two road mishaps
UK's Cameron seriously concerned by Gibraltar/Spain row
Winter Storm Ion: State-By-State...
Main candidates in Afghanistan's presidential election
Car bombs kill nine in Baghdad province
China yuan strengthens to new high against USD
Corpses Of 53 Men Found South Of Baghdad
Syrian soldiers killed in bomb attack
Rebels likely downed Malaysian jet 'by mistake' - U.S. officials
Pacquiao leaves for Samar to help typhoon victims
Bomb attacks kill 20 in Baghdad's Christian areas
China sets Bo Xilai trial date
UN launches US$300 mil. appeal for Philippines
Muslims prepare for start of Ramadan
Violent Tornadoes Hit Oklahoma City, St. Louis...
Japan scrambles jets against Russian military planes
Thousands of Britons claim dole in Germany
Obama's Tarnished Health Care Law at a Crossroads
Egypt military ousts President Morsi
Suspected U.S. drone strike kills 5 in Pakistan
Obama to sign up for Obamacare
15 dead in Iraq attacks, bomb at football pitch
Obama warns of new Russia sanctions
Syria conference to open in Montreux, continue in Geneva
General Electric posts 9% profit drop for third quarter
Nigerian leader orders push to free abducted schoolgirls
10 Things to Know: This Week's Takeaways
China yuan weakens to 6.1535 against USD
Israeli authorities hand out demolition orders in East Jerusalem
12 migrants drown off Greek island, gov't calls for EU action
Putin opens Paralympics as protest staged
Israel 'bombs' Syria as envoy presses peace talks bid
Russia finds dead lawyer Magnitsky guilty in posthumous trial
US soldier released by Taliban in prisoner swap
'Trayvon could have been me'
Myanmar arrests 44 over sectarian violence
Louis Zamperini, 'Unbroken' World War II hero, Olympian, dies at 97
China sends largest fleet yet to disputed islands
Bank of England keeps interest rates on hold
US, Russia enter third day of Syria talks
North Korea claims ‚Äėbreakthrough‚Äô guided missile
Kerry's plan for restarting talks calls for release of 103 Palestinian inmates
Police: Explosion in Belfast Cathedral Quarter
Microsoft finally unveils Office for Apple's iPad
Turkish police fire tear gas on protesters
Police fire tear gas at protesters in Bangkok
Syrians Protest against Erdogan in Paris, Venezuelans Stress Support to Syria
Egypt Mubarak ordered under house arrest if freed
Prime Minister to seek nuclear deal, investments during Japan visit
US postpones missile test over N Korea tensions
Obama to meet privately with family of Nelson Mandela
At least six dead in US shooting rampage
Margaret Thatcher: Kinnock To Miss Funeral
Prince William addresses Australian parliament video
Two hurt in Bangkok shooting
Gunmen kill 10 in Philippine political violence
At Least 14 Killed in Baghdad Bombings
Israel downs drone from Lebanon
'One unaccounted for' in San Francisco plane crash
European stocks slide on tension over Syria
Iran official: US visa denial to Iranian envoy will not affect nuke talks
Everest avalanche kills six sherpas
Israel approves release of first group of Palestinian prisoners ahead of peace talks
Deadly clashes as Egypt marks anniversary
Rupert Murdoch divorces third wife
Australia cuts rates to record low
NATO: 5 Americans killed in southern Afghanistan
Interim Libyan prime minister to step down
MEP candidate killed in Kabul blast
Conmen dressed as women steal cash
Sisi sworn in as Egypt's president, cool reception from West
Cleveland Kidnapper Ariel Castro Found Hanged in Prison Cell
Russia drops charges against Greenpeace activists
Syria opposition unity take face specter of collapse
Google Unveils Prototype Self-Driving Car
Bangladesh garment factory fire 'kills 8'
Fierce clashes in east Syria as US pushes peace talks
Syria opposition votes to join peace talks
US seeks to reassure wary Gulf allies over Iran deal
Video shows Kenya jihadis casually killing in mall
Ukraine hosts ‚Äėunity talks‚Äô
Death toll rises in Dhaka building collapse
Gov'ts, groups pledge millions for typhoon relief
Senior official investigated over suspected disciplinary violations
Pakistan power crisis looms large over polls
China HSBC manufacturing PMI hits seven-month low in February
Lebanon Clashes Rage Overnight; 12 Soldiers Dead
Mother-of-two, 25, found dead in her home by ex-boyfriend as police launch murder inquiry
Greece suspends state broadcaster
Pakistan's Musharraf Under Arrest in Bhutto Assassination
10 Things to Know for Today
Trial Date Set for Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood Chief
Developing nations: Qatar insists on World Cup promise
Guatemalan court finds former dictator guilty of genocide
Red panda‚Äôs short-lived zoo escape
Israeli doctors could be tried abroad for force-feeding Palestinian prisoners
Chinese shares close higher Tuesday
Syrian mortars land in Golan, Israel retaliates
Toyota, Honda, Nissan and Mazda recall 3 million Japanese cars after airbag fault
Many dead in India hotel building collapse
Washington Pot Shops Prepare for Historic Sales
Somalia gang rape victim speaks out
Rio airport workers strike on eve of FIFA World Cup
International forensic teams join Kenyan mall carnage probe
Son of top Muslim Brotherhood leader killed
6.3-magnitude quake hits Kepulauan Barat Daya, Indonesia -- USGS
US believes Syrian government used chemical weapons
Iran, six global powers sign landmark nuclear deal
Fatalities after Texas fertiliser plant blast
Hot-Air Balloon Catches Fire in Virginia
Mourinho blames Moyes for Rooney saga
Quotes from leaders, family at Mandela memorial
Mumbai Indians puts T&T in its place
China stock index futures close higher Wednesday
KL shares remain higher mid-afternoon
China quake: Death toll rises
What the Papers Say, Nov. 20, 2013
3 killed, 6 injured in Afghan blasts
2 Turkish pilots abducted in Lebanon
Amazon launches new device for streaming video
Palestinian President Receives Jordanian Foreign Minister
Strong earthquake hits Papau New Guinea
Israel's ex-PM Ariel Sharon dies
China urges Japan to respect regional security concerns
Obama nominates new transportation secretary
China yuan weakens to 6.1059 against USD
Huge tornado kills at least 51 in Oklahoma City
Rock-throwers cause damage to Israeli cars near Bethlehem
French raid wine cellar for austerity auction
Obama signs law aimed at barring Iran UN envoy
US, Russia agree on seizure of Syria chemical weapons
Beaten Florida teen released in Israel
Lebanese rivals groups edge closer to deal over premiership
Five people jailed over Costa Concordia disaster
S Korea MPs to visit Kaesong complex
Deal on Iran nuclear drive from Jan 20
Algerian priest to lecture about Christian heritage in N. Africa
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on April 5
Implications of Palestinian reconciliation
Fire in Russian psychiatric hospital kills 38
Hijacker arrested after plane lands at Geneva Airport
PCB appoints Waqar Younis as head coach
US makes case for action against Syria
France provides image of possible debris
Four killed in Baghdad car bomb
Ankara protesters clash with police
Alibaba files for IPO in US
DPRK leader calls for better ties with S.Korea
49 killed, 148 wounded in violent attacks in Iraq
Iraq Holds First Election Since US Pullout
Iran, sextet to resume expert talks
Puerto Rican arrested for production of child pornography
Ukraine signs EU trade pact as Russia finalizes Crimea annexation
U.S. steps up support for Syrian opposition
Bangladesh collapse search over; death toll 1,127
Gunmen abduct Iran embassy employee in Yemen
Chinese, Russian FMs exchange opinions on Ukraine crisis
Bernanke comments keep markets on steady rise
Bomb in southern Afghan city kills at least 5
Assad warns Turkey of 'heavy price' for backing Syrian rebels
Afghan president to soon visit Pakistan
Indian stocks close lower
Iran nuclear impasse to dominate IAEA board meeting
19 killed, 42 wounded in violent attacks in Iraq
Indian rape accused face verdicts
Syrian Opposition Mulls Participation in Peace Talks
Poll: Cory Booker takes early lead for N.J. Senate
Car bomb kills at least 30 north of Syrian capital
Iran nuclear deal agreed at talks
Egyptian military spokesman denounces incitement against army
Snowden sees 'no chance' for US fair trial
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Dec 30
Dozens injured in Connecticut train collision
New Orleans police arrest second suspect in Mother's Day parade shooting
Blast on Indian train kills one
Hong Kong stocks open higher
Queen visits Britain's new prince
Egypt‚Äôs Sisi poised to announce presidency bid
Microsoft earnings hurt by Nokia acquisition
Biden warns 'it's time for Russia to stop talking and start acting' in Ukraine
US to deploy Patriots, F-16s to Jordan
Ukraine: Three Killed In Parliament Protests
Chinese president meets UN chief
Ride operator charged in N.C. fair accident
EU foreign ministers to discuss Egypt violence
Saudi pushes UN resolution on Syria abuse
Tunisia suspended from Davis Cup for shunning Israeli tennis player
Egypt says Brotherhood leader in good health in jail
Transcript reveals confusion over evacuation of South Korean ferry
Fallen US firefighters brought home
Egypt court acquits 169 Brotherhood supporters
Syria Regime Agrees to Attend Peace Conference
Aung San Suu Kyi makes presidential push
UK vote rejects military action
New Zealand set to legalise gay marriage
Desmond Tutu pays final respects to Mandela
Singapore stocks end up 0.37 pct
South Korea proposes talks with North
Venezuelan president to visit China
Five jailed over Costa Concordia shipwreck disaster
Cairo protesters defy crackdown threat
Missing plane search turns to Vietnamese islands
NATO soldier killed in Taliban attack
Iran threatens to trigger oil price war
Official of Malaysia Airlines briefs relatives of missing flight passengers about search progress
Stars pay tribute to Cory Monteith
Senior official investigated over suspected disciplinary violations
Manchester United Ticket Sales And Profit Down
Los Angeles airport worker charged with making 9/11 threats
Army, government at loggerheads over Taliban talks
Egypt arrests Muslim Brotherhood's top leader
The Note's Must-Reads for Friday May 24, 2013
Solar plane lands in Washington on US tour
Pro-Russian rebels shoot down Ukrainian plane, 49 killed
Spain's new king Felipe VI sworn in in muted ceremony
Cristiano Ronaldo hat-trick fires Portugal to 2014 World Cup finals
Israel to free Palestinian prisoners over Kerry talks
U.S. soldier free after almost five years captivity in Afghanistan
Malaysia Airlines loses contact with plane carrying 239 to Beijing
Neymar powers Brazil into last 16
Ukraine to implement unilateral ceasefire
Britain's Prince Philip set for 'exploratory' surgery
Japan starts hearing on sales tax, ex-bank deputy urges gradual rise
Malaysia sets date for landmark elections
Three bomb attacks kill six soldiers, one civilian
Two NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Stones add second Hyde Park concert
Italian pilgrims die in bus plunge
North Korea urges US to take 'real actions'
New Australian PM Tony Abbott on his bike awaiting final vote count
What the Papers Say, Aug. 19, 2013
Malaysia Airlines loses contact with plane bound for Beijing‚Äď live
US consumers boost spending 0.2 pct. last month
Scorpions drummer in Dubai jail for 'insulting Islam'
5 nations meet on haze
Strong new quake hits shattered Pak region
Syrian opposition offers Assad truce in Homs for duration of Ramadan
U.S. to release info about Syria‚Äôs chemical weapons use
Pakistan troops move against Taliban
At least 20 dead in Somalia attacks
Westgate mall attackers spent four months planning in Nairobi
U.N. Security Council calls for humanitarian ceasefire in Gaza
Toronto mayor Rob Ford in extraordinary crack cocaine confession
6.3-magnitude quake hits Honshu, Japan: CENC
Chinese shares close higher Tuesday
Car Bombs Kill 58 in Iraqi Capital
Foreign companies eye new 'opening-up'
Ukrainian protesters back in streets for anti-government rally
Senior Taliban leader arrested in S. Afghan operation
Canadian freight train blast death toll hits three, to rise
Diana Nyad making progress on Cuba to Florida swim
US sends military advisers to Iraq
U.S. fast-food workers plan nationwide strikes over minimum wage
North Korea fires 18 rockets into Sea of Japan
Nigel Farage calls on Government to let Syrian refugees into UK
Syrian opposition to meet over peace talks
Israel's Peres urges return to peace talks
Australia to lead southern search for MH370
British leader loses vote on Syria response
China yuan weakens to 6.1651 against USD Tuesday
All eyes on new Pak army chief Raheel Sharif
China yuan strengthens to 6.1184 against USD Tuesday
Nineteen wounded in shootings at Mother‚Äôs Day parade in New Orleans
Thai protesters disrupt early voting for disputed election
Israeli forces detain 18, injure Bethlehem teen
Radio: Israel set to increase Palestinian prisoner release
Morsi's supporters reject plan
Austrians Vote in General Election
Egypt court sentences 10 Brotherhood supporters to death - sources
Obama condemns killing of 3 Israeli teens
Demonstrator's death stirs protests in Turkey
Explosion in a Muslim Brotherhood leader's farm in Egypt kills 4
Syrian rebels target military airports
Men tried to behead soldier on London street, court hears
Toronto mayor Rob Ford in extraordinary crack cocaine confession
China quake leaves dozens dead
Woman arrested in connection with damage of sculpture at Changi Airport
Ukraine protesters rebuild barricades
Kerry Returns to Vietnam's Mekong Delta as Top U.S. Diplomat
Mel Smith dead at 60 and UK mourns a comedy favourite
Three dead, 63 hurt as New York buildings collapse
Chinese shares close higher Tuesday
Syrian opposition to meet over peace talks
Gunmen kill nine foreigners in Pakistan
India Ink: Image of the Day: July 2
Boeing 777 plane crash-lands at San Francisco airport
NSA whistleblower Edward Snowden offered asylum in Venezuela
Nigerian military claims killing of top extremist
UN passes global arms trade treaty
Israeli army kills Palestinian in Ramallah
Asian Muslims celebrate Eid as 14 killed in Afghanistan
Suicide bomber kills 12 in Iraq cafe
Pakistan condemns US drone strikes
SC's ex-Gov. Sanford wins runoff, will face Colbert Busch
Car bomb at Swedish consulate in Libya's Benghazi, no casualties
Nelson Mandela remains in critical condition
Eight Killed in Iraq Violence
Court overturns murder conviction of former FBI agent linked to mobster
51 killed, 191 wounded in violent attacks in Iraq
Russian coal mines seek new outlets in China
Aust shares edge higher
White House on offensive to thwart Iran sanctions
Ukraine‚Äôs pro-Russia protesters demand greater autonomy
Iraq army fights to retake Tikrit
Iran condemns alleged Israeli airstrike on Syria
Israel agrees to extend Gaza truce by four hours
Death toll rises to 51 in Latvian supermarket collapse
Bearded Drag Queen Wins Eurovision Song Contest
Fire at South Korean bus terminal kills 5
Israel to free Palestinian prisoners as deal to resume peace talks emerges
Obama calls for calm after Zimmerman acquittal in Martin case
North Korea says to restart nuclear reactor
Firefighters battle raging California wildfire
Bomber strikes near Pakistan army HQ
Brazilians throng streets to greet pope
Four civilians, three NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Pressure rises on White House over Benghazi
One killed, 40 injured in Mexico candy factory blast
UN voices alarm over Israeli strikes on Syria
China eases one-child policy
Early vote count in Iran gives reformer wide lead
Protesters swamp streets to reclaim revolution
Tokyo stocks open down 0.24%
Australia returns asylum seekers to Sri Lanka in sea transfer
Classic crossword - Saturday 20th April
Shankill blast victims to be remembered
Afghan landslide toll 2,000, site may become massive grave
Typhoon Haiyan kills 1,774 in Philippines
118 people killed in twin blasts in Nigeria
Iranian, Afghan ministers confer
North Korea fires missiles as U.S., Japan, South Korea leaders meet
Glee star Cory Monteith found dead in hotel room in Canada
Egypt announces end to state of emergency
Nigerian gunmen kill groom, 30 others in wedding convoy
Croatia begins countdown to historic EU entry
Yolanda death toll climbs to 3,621
Tokyo stocks close up 0.13pc
Pyongyang proposes weekend talks with Seoul
Five People Charged With Terror Offences
Palestinian diplomat hurt in blast
Five dead, 40 missing in Canada train disaster
Iran says ready for fresh round of nuclear talks
Clashes continue between police and protesters in Turkey
Those refused medical cards urged to contact HSE
World‚Äôs largest building opened in west China
Fire At Immigration Detention Centre
Hassoun to Mauritanian delegation: conspiracy imposed on Syria targets its stances, particularly over Palestine
Singapore stocks close 0.7 pct higher
Israeli lightly hurt by stones in West Bank
Death toll from Egypt protests rises to 49
Hong Kong set for democracy march
Senate confirms Janet Yellen as chair of US Federal Reserve
Tehran-London ties to improve, Afkham
Syrian opposition agree to landmark peace talks
Suicide attack kills eight in Baghdad
Up to 19 firefighters missing in Arizona
Poverty stats doubt Modi's development claims
Pro-Russia rebels to hold vote in Ukraine
Georgians vote for new president
Facts about North Korea's Musudan missile
MERS respiratory illness found in U.S., officials confirm
On War Criminals and Heroes: The Whitewashing of Ariel Sharon ŔÄ
Obama to meet with China‚Äôs Xi in California June 7-8
EU declares Hezbollah's military wing terror group
Rogers, Videotron extend reach with network-sharing deal
US drone strike 'kills 4 militants in Pakistan'
Protests for kidnapped girls banned in Nigerian capital
Germany welcomes Iran nuclear agreement
Prominent AIDS researchers killed in Malaysian plane crash
What the Papers Say, June 25, 2013
Wing walker, pilot die in biplane crash at Ohio air show
Gunmen kill nine foreigners in Pakistan
Ukraine protest leaders name ministers, Russian troops on alert
Two French journalists killed in Mali
2 Indian traders stranded in China sent back home
Asian shares higher on Fed signs
Letter with ricin sent to senator
California governor declares drought emergency
Peace talks with Palestinians would take months: Israel official
17:02 23 killed in Iraq car bombings
China yuan weakens to 6.1559 against USD
Two dead, more trapped in latest Mumbai building collapse
Air strikes kills dozens in northern Syria
Israelis and Palestinians aim to negotiate a 'final' peace deal after positive talks
Man United Says Moyes Leaves as Manager
Chinese tourist abducted from Malaysia
Tropical Storm Barry forms off Mexico's coast, bringing heavy rain as it heads toward Veracruz
Japanese politician apologizes for sex comment
4 killed, 6 injured in attacks in Iraq
UN inspectors hail progress over Syria chemical weapons
US diplomat killed in Afghanistan wanted to help
Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood Refuses to Back Down
Iran‚Äôs Rouhani admits chemical weapons killed people in Syria
Two arrests made after protest against Nigel Farage
Blast near Iranian consulate in Peshawar kills one
Gunmen kill 15 Libyan soldiers
Pictures show completed Costa Concordia operation
Iran Nuclear Talks Enter Third Day
Texas Won't Switch Execution Drug
Twitter shares rocket at opening
Pakistan‚Äôs Musharraf granted bail
Protesters gather in Brazil despite concessions
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 11.30am
Super typhoon hits Taiwan, Philippines
Scores dead, 1,000 injured in China earthquake
China reports 5 new H7N9 cases, 33 total
Australian PM Kevin Rudd calls election for 7 September
Suicide Bomber Kills 15 in Northern Iraq
Rudd sworn in as Australian PM
Iran nuclear talks expected to resume this week
Yemen officials: US drone kills 2 militants
Indian sub sinks with 18 on board
Susan Boyle reveals she has Asperger‚Äôs
Bangkok tense on Thai election eve
Israel calls Iran nuclear deal 'historic mistake'
Chinese stocks open lower Thursday
Israel Forces Kill 2 Palestinian Militants
China ‚Äėwill protect interests‚Äô of foreign business
Death toll 'rises to 17' after typhoon strikes Japan
Ukraine offers unilateral ceasefire
Silvio Berlusconi's tax fraud conviction upheld
D.C. Votes to Decriminalize Marijuana
Many dead as asylum boat sinks off Australia
Obama says Korean War veterans ‚Äėdeserved better‚Äô
6 policemen killed in gunmen attack in northern Iraq
North Korea's Kim hails execution of powerful uncle
Russia offers assurances on Syrian chemical weapons removal
Margaret Thatcher dies after stroke
Chinese president arrives in Netherlands for state visit, nuclear summit
NATO soldier killed in Taliban attack
Israel sanctions Palestinians in new blow to peace talks
UK Sky News cameraman killed in Egypt
Gunmen kill nine foreign tourists, guide in Pakistan
Rudd sworn in as Australia's new prime minister
Protests continue in tense Ukraine capital
Stocks rise in early trading
FBI audio expert testifies in Zimmerman trial
Brazil Buzzing With Anticipation for Pope Francis
Iranian nuclear talks to be extended to November
Egypt police fail to start operation to disperse pro-Mursi camps
Two French journalists killed after Mali kidnapping
Bangladesh building collapse death toll passes 600: army
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Dec 14
Boston bombing suspect to appear in court
Iran warns of spillover of possible war on Syria
Death toll in India building collapse hits 42
Liquid ammonia leak kills 15 in Shanghai
Ukraine's Tymoshenko urges protesters to carry on
At least 20 dead in Somalia attacks
Obama announces creation of twin manufacturing hubs
Five charged with terrorism offences
President Obama reveals plans to withdraw troops from Afghanistan by 2016
US, NATO Raise Doubts Russia Pulled Back from Ukraine Border
Former Pakistan President Pervez Musharraf arrested again
Teen survives flight across Pacific in plane wheel well
Rahul compares Modi with Hitler
Arsenal stars poised to wear T-shirts in support Pat Rice's fight against cancer
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 11.30am
27 dead, 22 injured in Afghanistan coal mine collapse
India's election campaign enters final day
46 nurses from India freed in Iraq return home
Sisi to run for Egyptian president
Abdullah Abdullah widens lead in Afghan presidential vote
US drone strike kills six in Pakistan officials
Glasgow Helicopter Crash Search Ends
Iran backs proposal for meeting on Syria conflict
Flight of Boston Marathon bombing suspects ended in mayhem
Taiwan stocks close 1.11 pct lower
Three Israeli teens missing in West Bank
6 dead, 26 hurt in Philippines bomb blast
Police helicopter crashes into pub in Glasgow - several casualties
Gunmen assassinate Libyan deputy industry minister
Quotations in the News
Foreign exchange rates in Singapore
US drone strike 'kills 4 militants in Pakistan'
Philip leaves hospital after 11 days
Bone fragment 'could be King Alfred'
Israel frees second group of Palestinian prisoners
Thai government says elections Feb. 2
Ukraine revokes anti-protest law, PM resigns
Two skydivers dead after colliding during US jump
Quake shakes northeastern Japan, no tsunami risk
UK's Ex-Premier Margaret Thatcher Dies At 87
German Parliament approves Cyprus aid package
'Iron Man' jetpacks spark concerns in Hawaii
Israel frees Palestinian prisoners
France Says Won't 'Shirk Responsibilities' in Syria
Boston bombing suspect identified on surveillance video, no arrest
'Hundreds missing' as landslide hits Afghan villages
Abdullah ahead in Afghanistan election race
China's anger at N. Korea overcomes worry over US
Ukraine acting president calls emergency meeting of...
China stocks open lower Friday
London Marathon observes silence for Boston bomb victims ‚Äď video
China yuan strengthens to new high against USD
Gunmen Surround Libya's Foreign Ministry To Push Demands
Man held after teen shot in Belfast
Flight 370 search area shifts as satellite sightings raise hope
China's Q2 GDP growth slows to 7.5 pct
Police stop Maldives presidential election
Kerry to Join Iran Nuclear Talks amid Hopes of Deal
Indian army kill 3 militants in Indian-controlled Kashmir
N Korea postpones family reunions
Quick crossword - Friday 31st May
Neymar sends Brazil into Confed Cup semis
Car bomb kills 20 in northwest Syria
WTO reaches first trade reform deal
Colorado Governor Visits School Shooting Victim
Iran ups oil swap with eastern neighbors
Turkey president appeals for calm
North Korea test fires 30 missiles into the sea
U.S. Senate drafts resolution for military strike against Syria
Man dies in Co Donegal house fire
Doha gas blast kills 12, injures dozens
Polar bear DNA 'may help fight obesity'
42 killed, 63 wounded in violence in Iraq
Junta expects next Thai elections in Oct 2015
At least 350 dead as landslide hits Afghan villages
Polling stations open at Ukrainian presidential election
India Ink: Image of the Day: April 21
Bachelet Seen Winning Chile Presidential Runoff
Up to 21, mostly foreigners, killed in Kabul suicide attack
'Fast &amp; Furious' star Paul Walker dies in car crash
US drone strike kills three in northwest Pakistan
Chemical weapons team kidnapped in Syria, reports claim
Hushen 300 Index closes higher Wednesday
Two French journalists killed in Mali
Air strike kills one man in Syria's Hama
Morsi, army ready for showdown in 'final hours'
Iran needs more nuclear power plants
Pakistani Taliban chief Hakimullah Mehsud killed in drone strike
Chinese shares close higher Friday
Turkish PM, president clash over reply to protests
Gunmen kill nine tourists in Pakistan
Israel and Hamas to observe brief Gaza truce
South Africa unites in prayer and song for Mandela
China rushes relief after Sichuan quake kills 180
Chemical Arms Team to Begin Talks With Syria
Russia says Syria to ship chemical arms as civilians flee bombs
Wave of bombings, shootings kill 38 in Iraq
China's troubled Xinjiang hit by more violence
Five Killed in Muslim-Christian Clashes in Egypt
Tony Blair rejects 'bizarre' claims that invasion of Iraq caused the crisis
Four killed in oil industry helicopter crash off Scotland
Relatives scuffle with police after China fire kills 120
Iran rejects claim on chlorine bombs
India Minister's wife died 'unnatural death' after affair rumours
China surpasses US as world's largest trading nation
Erdogan criticizes court ruling after lifting Twitter ban
3 dead, 1 hurt in shooting at S Carolina oceanfront motel
Egypt postpones dispersing pro-Morsi camps
Burial of Boston bombing suspect appears legal
5 killed in S China road cave-in
South Africa president: Mandela is improving
World News Update, what you need to know
Syrian civil war in photos
Iranian nuclear talks to be extended to November
Iran warns against military intervention in Iraq
Myanmar orders Doctors without Borders to suspend all activities in the country
US Military Plane Crashes in Kyrgyzstan
Asiana jet crash lands at San Francisco airport
Israel approves release of 104 Palestinian prisoners
Strong new quake hits shattered Pak region
China launches longest-ever manned space mission
House blaze kills 7 in northern Pakistan
Arias jury deadlocked on death penalty
Today in History, Jan. 24
Desmond Tutu says he will attend Mandela funeral
Abdullah Widens Lead in Afghan Presidential Poll
Imran blames rival for colleague murder
Venezuelan opposition leader sought
California Chrome wins Preakness; one victory from Triple Crown
Bangladesh Honors Factory Victims
Man Who Set Himself on Fire on National Mall Has Died
Police use water cannon as India gang-rape protest turns violent
Egypt changes venue for trial of ousted president
Police say one suspect in Boston Marathon bombing dead, one at large
Japan defends dolphin hunt after US criticism
Bomb blast rocks shopping mall in Nigeria, 12 killed
Philippines typhoon death toll at 4,460: UN
Syrian army retakes historic Crusader castle
Third victim of Santa Barbara shooting identified
Police fire teargas on Venezuelan vote protesters
Shanghai stock indices close mixed -- Nov. 11
Wave of attacks kills at least 95 in Iraq
Strong quake strikes off central Java, Indonesia
World's oldest person, and oldest man ever, dies at 116
Saudi Arabia refuses UN security council seat
Twin suicide bombings hit Iraq camp
Top Chinese political advisor meets Greek PM
Palestinian diplomat injured in explosion in Prague
Ukraine leader pledges crisis talks
New major earthquake rocks southwest Pakistan
7 killed in attacks in Iraq
Floods in central Europe continue to create havoc
US military presence in East Asia
Deaths rise in Israeli air strikes on Gaza
Police fire tear gas at pro-Morsy protesters
Group: 7 Palestinians killed in Syria
US believes Syrian government used chemical weapons
World powers and Iran to resume expert nuclear talks on Dec. 30
Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood Refuses to Back Down
At least 6 dead in Canada bus, train crash
Del Bosque includes injured Diego Costa in Spain‚Äôs World Cup squad
Chinese president meets Greek PM, calling for stronger partnership
AstraZeneca pays $4.1bn to buy Bristol-Myers Squibb out of diabetes alliance
Italian fugitive arrested in Dominican Republic
Boston bombing suspect remains in hospital
Indian stocks open lower
India, US to hold talks on China next week
6.6-magnitude quake hits South Atlantic Ocean -- USGS
FAA lifts ban on U.S. flights to Tel Aviv
Foreign exchange rates in Singapore
Israel Carrying Out Ground Offensive In Gaza
Luxembourg PM quits amid spying scandal
Ehud Olmert, former Israeli prime minister, sentenced to six years in jail for corruption
Amazon's Bezos rescued by Ecuadorian Navy
Brahimi apologises to Syria over lack of peace progress
occupied Palestinian territory: The EU, the Netherlands and Sweden contribute ‚ā¨18.9 million to the Palestinian Authority's payment of June salaries and pensions
Egyptian protesters issue Morsi resignation ultimatum
Syria peace talks in jeopardy
5 Things to Know About the Sochi Olympics
China yuan advances to 6.2035 against USD Tuesday
China stocks open lower on Wednesday
US delays missile test as tensions rise
Fire in Beijing kills 10
Nigeria Offers $300,000 Reward for Information on Abducted Girls
Maldives vice president resigns as polls get mired
World's oldest man dies at 116
Classic crossword - Friday 31st May
Israel launches airstrikes in Gaza after rocket attacks
Vybz Kartel found guilty of murder
India, China ink border pact; 8 other agreements
Drone strike in Hangu kills 8, injures 5
Global chemical watchdog wins Nobel Peace Prize
Syrian regime 'using chemical weapons on a small scale'
3 dead, 4 missing in central China construction accident
Pakistanis vote in landmark election
Venezuela expels three U.S. diplomats
Boeing 777 crashes while landing at San Francisco airport; 2 dead; scores injured
Microsoft launches Office for iPad
Heavy smog hits north China city, flights cancelled
William More Popular Than The Queen - Poll
India braces itself as 'super cyclone' heads for east coast
Russia claims to have foiled possible terror act
Egypt's bruised Islamists protest after bloody week
Syrian chemical arms destruction begins
3 Chinese tourists killed in Pakistan
Sevens World Cup within Kenya‚Äôs reach
US, China fail to paper over cracks in ties
Gunmen kill 10 foreign tourists in northern Pakistan
Austrian found hoarding 56 stolen skulls in home museum
Winter weather hits Thanksgiving travellers
Did Zeppelin rip off Stairway to Heaven?
Egypt Launches Offensive Against Sinai Militants
Record-setting Southwest heat wave turns fatal
George W. Bush Undergoes Heart Procedure
Detroit eligible for bankruptcy protection: U.S. judge
Algeria president gets therapy after stroke: state media
British Nobel-Winning Author Doris Lessing Dies
Abe's shrine visit draws wide condemnation, criticism
01:12 Fan dies after Scotland rugby match
Gap joins Bangladesh safety accord
Israeli government authorises new settlements ahead of talks
Shenzhen stock indices close higher Monday
World Cup live: France 0-0 Germany
Egyptian security forces kill 30 protesters: Brotherhood
Tokyo to host 2020 Games
Firefighters unaccounted for battling Ariz. blaze
Pakistani Taliban chief killed in US drone strike
Putin signs Crimea annexe treaty
FAA continues ban on US flights to Tel Aviv
Modi condoles the people who died in Mumbai stampede
Mandela remains in critical but stable condition: Zuma
France warns of extremists benefiting from Egypt violence
Brazil Leader Breaks Silence About Protests
Death toll rises in Dhaka building collapse
China demands answers from US over spying claims
Chinese envoy rebuts Vietnamese, Philippine accusations over South China Sea
Thai opposition party to boycott general election
Four more people arrested over Australia's largest illegal tobacco importation syndicate
9 Killed in Attack on Indian Consulate in Afghanistan
Yemen: Fighting in north kills over 120
Obama moves to fill Fed board, taps Fischer to be No. 2
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria
Pakistan's Musharraf charged over Bhutto murder
Iran's president condemns use of chemical weapons in Syria
A society fraying at the edges
UN Invites Iran to Syrian Peace Conference
Italy bus crash death toll rises
UN retracts Iran invitation to Syria talks
Soccer Ref Punched by Player Dies
Angela Merkel headed for narrow win in German elections
British teenager killed in fall from Magaluf hotel
Iran FM confers with Iraqi acting president
Israel detains 37 Palestinians as arrest operation continues
Rebels kill 21 civilians in Syria Alawite village
World sends emergency relief to battered Philippines
Newspapers Review: Abbas‚Äô Speech focus of Dailies
Israel: Syria must be stripped of chemical weapons
Palestinian hunger striker, Israel reach deal
Malaysian cop killed, another kidnapped in Sabah
Final death toll in Mumbai building collapse is 60
Crimea parliament votes to join Russia
Assad says Syria will comply with UN arms resolution
Crimean parliament formally applies to join Russia
Morsi Supporters Urged to Abandon Sit-ins
South Korean President Sorry For Ferry Response
'Rapid inspection' of flood defences
Food price hikes raise concerns in Iran
Obama made last-minute decision on Syria approval
what i said was that he was working for someone else when his father died.
but that's ok with me.
hollywood will be required occasionally to cast english actors as good guys.
so sueing companies like boeing because they want to build in a state his "friends" don't control is not hurting job growth?
the denver post reports that swat team members encountered berlin in a stair well of an apartment building after the theft.
insignificant to you maybe.
sorry, agw has been proven.
and this unemployment bill?
911skeptics.blogspot.com,
for the last 66 days the entire american skimming effort has resulted in 600,000 gallons of oil skimmed.
yeah, we love the troops the way michael vick loves dogs.
don't cook for him - he's a grown up.
it was unclear why mauffray decided to send bell to jail on the prior charges.
god, what does she know?
newt gingrich’s second wife dishes hard to esquire: his money woes, his philandering, his meltdown | tpmmuckraker newt gingrich’s second wife dishes hard to esquire: his money woes, his philandering, his meltdown | tpmmuckraker newt gingrich - marital affairs his campaign staff has stated that newt carried out multiple affairs during this time.
this "plot" smells a rat.
it has just start building up again, and is planning to go to the provinces.
i don't know who you refer to, walter.
yeah, we love the troops the way michael vick loves dogs.
but what i said to myself was "do i deserve this for the rest of my life or do i deserve better?"
you're so wired, you pick up am radio and people test their batteries in your ears.
also, she is getting quite demanding.
and for people who have gone through that experience life is cheap and with a shell-shocked mind can be extremely dangerous to themselves and to others hotwater society trains our soldiers to kill in time of war and yet expects them to respect life in time of peace.
the irony of wistful recollections of past protest adventures clothed as they were in a style and form so like their own caricatures of the "reactionary" forces they opposed" and yet i fought on the ground in viet nam.
you lie through your teeth and still get votes.
do you know who benefits from profits?
2) when i said this-- "i think making excuses for racism is a dangerous form of racism.
that doesn't make any sense.
i do think the safety net for the poor is currently fairly effective.
the last time tax receipts as a percentage of gdp were below 17% was in 1959 when they dropped to 16.2%.
ishallriseagain fucked around with this message at jan 04, 2012 around 06:06 every single person who is assuming zimmerman should be in jail just because the kid he shot was black.
that's why i can no longer support them.
i said no you have to prove you can stop first.
claim: powell claimed that iraq was building long-range remote drones specifically designed to carry biological weapons.
and the idea was to help people connect with volunteer opportunities.
what point are you trying to relay?
stick the cretins in with the people who have a high capacity for learning!
2. im not sure if i can include my own thoughts surrounding decisions.
yeah, we love the troops the way michael vick loves dogs.
that's why i can no longer support them.
for the pro-life camp, they don't get off so easy from me, either.
ok, thanks for the explanation.
that is why it sucks.
for your advice guys!!
both daughtes had to go to cafcass for inteviews.
but 11 rig workers have already died.
would't be shocked if they used nukes either tbh that is a big claim, it would quite an amazing escalation if israel used nuclear bombs on iran.
i had a dream i was surronded by bamboo, on my belly and scared.
here's a link to an interview he gave about the spill.
i just don't get this.
"[o]ne thing that i do know is his having grown up in kenya, his view of the brits, for example, very different than the average american," huckabee told host steve malzberg, the washington post reported.
i am sorry for this news to you but this has been the case since...well,
guess what, there is no concise belief system of ows.
libertarian lunkhead parroting the neocon/teabagger rhetoric...and
that's a substantial drop that you are choosing to ignore.
the jooz mushy has to be the odds on favorite.
persecution has always existed, so you would have to implement something utterly new and radical to change human society for the first time.
you're not talking about current events.
you left out oil companies, braniac.
this "plot" smells a rat.
quebec terrorism has happened in the past, remember the flq?
obama's approval ratings are hovering below 50%, yet he has made the list for the 4th year in a row.
eventually we'll all be good with "a full time job with the feds."
the worst economic recovery since the great depression - forbes if reid and pelosi had actually investigated gwb as you claim and i wished then he and many of his administration and other war criminals would now be in prison.
i know when one side tries to shut down the debate saying there is a consensus, they're lying.
needs thinking about.
presi*dent obama would double it.
the gop is fighting for freedom of choice.
cost-push inflation - when companies' costs go up, they need to increase prices to maintain their profit margins.
so now it is a fight for freedom of choice.
because gays are yucky and lobster tastes good peach must be busy.
and i think you have a huge stake in believing that none of your actions have caused her any harm.
japan surrendered unconditionally.
many times i can see the faces of the people i helped.
the malaise and entitlement of generational poverty has to be overcome first.
"why didn't we hear about the deficit during the bush administration?"
what is limbaugh's or beck's "intent" when they take some innocuous comment uttered by someone in the obama administration, or the president himself, and create an entire show about it?
when madeline albright was appointed the first woman secretary of state, the media was euphoric.
i'm serious about this.
given the israeli mentality i would say we will see them strike iran.
this usually occurs in growing economies.
i'm not talking about this year, maggie.
the gop is fighting for freedom of religion.
well they already are taught about homosexuality in schools.
mr brown said he had asked the cabinet secretary, britain's most senior civil servant, to arrange support for all parties that might be involved in talks over a possible future coalition government.
and you have a problem with this?
you want me to involve my lawyers if you don't pay me my bonus?
for the last 66 days the entire american skimming effort has resulted in 600,000 gallons of oil skimmed.
- video shows usda official saying she didn't give 'full force' of help to white farmer date says 7/20.
read a little deeper in the wikipedia article.
does anyone know anyplace else?
that is why it sucks.
they should be in washington because that's where all the real problems are.
i have to say im bad and have called in sick before when i wasnt really sick.
the entire caribbean ocean has been poisoned.
* reverse "citizen's united" and put elections back in the hands of the people.
only six percent of posters will read that entire article.
presi*dent obama would double it.
you soak your dentures in coffee overnight.
the obama administration?
the pie is getting larger, but your piece of it is shrinking too fast.
the jury instruction given on this clearly put the question of first amendment protection in their laps.
by the way, the truth of the super committee negotiations is that the democrats didn't off one single plan.
why do you hate america so much?
the politics of congress).
the official spoke on condition of anonymity because the crash is still being investigated.
the problem is, that i don't really have a life plan but i am the sort of person who likes to have things fairly planned out.
does not have the vision or the courage to sustain a program like apollo.
the result is that there is no practical incentive for 75 percent of the senators to work across party lines.
people forgave clinton for the lying because the question never should have been asked in the first place.
big government needs to be booted out of these personal social issues.
i'm not just talking about accumulated wealth.
dyslexia, thanks for your honest appraisal.
you've worn out the handle on your favorite mug.
they "have" fox because fox news reports on newsworthy events.
a bubble is a market that is artificially propped up for any reason.
it's because the right, that party of "morals", don't have "low" standards.
i'm right there with you.
no one forced you to go to the peace rally.
so you agree that if only 10% of what hacks like you say were true then our wonderful country would have folded in 1777?
this is not uncommon.
then, they hear the prosecution case - vote again - less harsh sentence.
i know when the only solution is to spend trillions for minimal, unproven benefit, i know the liar is a leftist.
you will cease playing american football.
most of the crap is made off.
however, i have included my objections and concerns i raised at the time and why i objected.
if they have a problem with performing or providing certain services that are part of that business model, then maybe they shouldnt be in that business to begin with.
thank you for pointing me foster.
i'm not wrong," the outspoken comedian went on a vulgarity-laden two-minute rant against republicans and the troops.
so, he is a 'self made man', if you want to quibble over that, fine.
he might be killed and that would be even harder on israeli pr.
after the first bomb was dropped they made an offer with 4 demands.
this year's assessment is $147k, just 13 years later.
i agree with there goes trouble.
just because she had a small problem related to drinking and driving is no reason to throw the book at her.
recession is when a neighbor loses his job.
always knew newt could tear it up in a debate.
you don't tan, you roast.
also, sas uses a very soft, lined leather for the uppers.
wtf are you babbling about?
even police have to take time off work, not zimmerman, he's suddenly the victim.
the ows are just a bunch of spoiled kids that want great pay w/o the education or effort it takes to get it.
it is irrelevant that race is not a valid biological phenomenon as long as it is an observable phenomenon.
besides, what i do is worse.
when are the pigs going to realize that the shit they are handing out will be shoved straight back in their faces?
president obama would continue that trend.
it's a very good idea to have a former ecb man in the job.
did i say i excused it?
people still care about what happened, i do.
i know that bothers you socialists/progressives, but that's the way it is.
perhaps you would care to offer an alternate theory.
ok, thanks for the explanation.
i might not like the answer, but i know i do have to find out.
did anybody else find this disturbing?
this is not rocket science.
would't be shocked if they used nukes either tbh given the israeli mentality i would say we will see them strike iran.
sadly, by then we had already lost the political war on the streets and campuses of the united states.
libertarian lunkhead parroting the neocon/teabagger rhetoric...and
so, i got an e-mail back from jack layton (leader of the ndp) today.
where were the "tea partiers" in late '08!!!!?????
ah well, at least it proves that we don't agree with corporal punishment.
the anti-semites and nazis, we're already familiar with.
i think there are a number of high-profile crimes where criminals are held long long after the point where they are a danger to anyone.
romney: well, he didnt have as much as i think some people anticipated.
the bomber detonated his explosives, killing naeemi and two others, police said.
he now wants to go to court for a contact order.
answer - you didn't read the nyt or wapo or the internet?
do you even pay attention to current events?
i still hurt the poor guy.
there is no voice of the people.
they just regulate the pasteurization process.
maybe they don't want to whip up hatred for the sake of ratings?
six months is the minimum recommended by financial planners.
rslw: because they are horrible, fascist skin head brutes.
in this instance, i chose the wrong words in my analogy of the situation.
i was really surprised by this.
i don't like seeing people suffer and something needs to change but how can we go about forcing it?
where were the "tea partiers" in late '08!!!!?????
in that speech he claimed the murder rate in flint michigan had more than doubled already.
government - historical debt outstanding - annual 2000 - 2009 and now your ossiah is going to double that.
my dad voted bnp cause immigrants keep taking his jobs...
you need to talk to your gp again.
7 comments weigh in corrections?
obama's approval ratings are hovering below 50%, yet he has made the list for the 4th year in a row.
if that’s the case, apparently regulators disagreed.
i mean, being a history student..
"watching the first fight i saw that manny pacquiao was getting tired, and i wasn't.
in syria, 90% of the people are levantine arabs; the rest are kurds, armenians, turkmens, etc. since the kurds are concentrated in the northeastern sliver of the country, if the state falls i could see them making a bid for independence, or autonomy, or union with iraqi kurdistan.
like 99.99% of your idiotic questions, it doesn't deserve an answer for its fatally flawed premise.
what are you trying to say?
"if everyone was the same it would be boring" why exactly would it be boring?
our country is supposed to be a nation of laws and not men, right?
is a bank going to help you when you don't even have a job anymore?
where were the "tea partiers" in late '08!!!!?????
i notice it just as much on these forums as i do anywhere else on the internet.
driving on an icy road and wrecking isn't a federal problem until it affects thousands of people.
you grind your coffee beans in your mouth.
obama's approval ratings are hovering below 50%, yet he has made the list for the 4th year in a row.
augh, why do people have no respect for anyone anymore.
the teacher was a bit surprised.
we explain that to our tempos when they apply with us so they understand the importance of always being reachable..to
my understanding of a "bubble" is a sector that is artificially propped up..despite
the proper course was taken about nagasaki and hiroshima.
i can't carry on as i am, so i do need to know what his long term intentions are.
about james okeefe and acorn?
it worked in the snyder case.
and even tho sunni man and i often disagree, i like him personally.
if your problem is with the banks,then sue the banks and try to get some money out of them.
the trotskyist's obsession with evil big business exploiting the poor worker is way off the mark!
just remember he loves you.
i'm talking exxon, shell, bp...
omnicarus fucked around with this message at jan 04, 2012 around 05:58 the bigger question is, why do people continue to do business via paypal?
you can feel two contradictory things at once unfortunately.
i rang him at 5.30am to see where he was, no reply.
have you noticed how there are bugger all books about the conservative party?
good luck social security has nothing to do with marriage.
chad dunn, the lawyer for the texas democratic party, said now the county must get preclearance from the justice department before using the machines.
it's like being against hammers.
summer of 1967 becomes the national director of operation breadbasket.
government - historical debt outstanding - annual 2000 - 2009 and now your ossiah is going to double that.
i mean 40% of the world is living under $2 a day.
the entitlement gravy train is off the tracks and out of gravy.
and in the end, bush's poll numbers were circling the drain because of his spending...
just can't stop feeling this way.
and yes the two bombs ended the pacific war, with out them we would have been forced to invade them.
his partner said, "i can't shoot up there.
perhaps they are starting to realize that the president isn't a cure-all for a damaged economy.
interestingly, both sides rejected an offer to order the remaining "sleeping" protesters out of building.
we never considered any of those bulk mail ones we get in the mail---they all seem to shady to me and often have incorrect info in them.
driving on an icy road and wrecking isn't a federal problem until it affects thousands of people.
other parts of the study's methodology is flawed.
time to get the government out of the bedroom.
that’s normally the case.
my understanding of a "bubble" is a sector that is artificially propped up..despite
it was left up to them to decide whether the first amendment applied.
• gordon brown has said that it is his "duty" to try to form a stable government.
they lined up to insist that the government had to change direction if the party was to win a fourth term.
has there even been any criminal investigation?
and that really hurts and i've had enough.
wtf are you babbling about?
'poof' disappears: just because they don't show it to you.
i know that bothers you socialists/progressives, but that's the way it is.
is the director still there when you pick up your dd?
the entitlement gravy train is off the tracks and out of gravy.
i'm not going back to work until after she leaves so we can actually do things.
how'd ya like that rant?
they will be tarred, feathered and run out of town on a rail.
dumbshit- who is threatening whom here?
i have had several pothole incidents with my 19" shod bmw.
i think it's a case of giving my dad the account number so he can start transferring money to it, then telling the credit card companies the account details so they can take it out - i really don't know how it works.
and your level of expertise in this field is?
great move having government take over loans and reduce the payment.
in the end bernard fall may have been right.
and i was invited to step on the board and work with the points of light foundation.
insurance with one that offers it or take insurance with one thayt doesnt.
how well are the chinese managing their economy?
you're prabably expecting an emotional plea.
was the motivating factor jealousy, or perhaps anger at the woman who replaced his mother, or was there abuse of the boy on the part of the father or girlfriend?
we should abolish medicare and the va.
dh leaves tonight for work travel.
because then he would come to the conclusion that you would be the only one able to do that for him and possibly not accept anyone else to help.
does anyone know if this is possible??
he seemed ok when talking about islam...but
none of it would exist if it wasn't used to reduce weight on our spacecraft.
i checked with my doctor first, because i didn't want to compound the injury.
which is why something like 80% of anti-choice activists are men.
i have something to say to these heteros.
it is a democracy with regular changes in government many of them due to coup.
people are just standing in lines waitin' to become teachers.
i'll be interested to read the particulars of the study when they become available.
i find him entertaining as all hell (in two minute bursts).
"global warming doesn't mean every year will be warmer than the last.
sorry, you just don't.
my brother went balisitic at the person he thought told me she was visting as 'it was none of my business'.
although i can remmeber walking through a neighbors house and it was filled with exotic birds.
for these women, the pill serves no preventative medical purpose whatsoever.
kid gloves for a guy who just shot someone else to death.
sorry for such a long waffly post - any ideas would be much appreciated!
when they found the bomb, they first thing to do was to track it back to who sent it.
they gave wall street all that taxpayer cash.
what a tremendous leader he is in this time of great fear.
am wondering weather to sleep in the spare bedroom tonight!
(the reference includes a photo of the event.)
i remember in the fifties conservatives did not want flouride added to the water because flouride turned people into communists.
here's an novel idea:if you don't like the idea of being shot at, don't become a cop.
i believe this to be a case of apples and oranges.
he could not work for 10 years due to how bad his body suffered.
ask yourself what you look for in a friend too.
you are not aware of the legal obligations of a lease and who would be responsible for the adherence to local ordanances?
are they not a media company interesting in keeping the populate updated on the latest and greatest and hottest news?
i've never been happy with that, and a name brand physical therapist confirmed my impression.
their news coverage has covered it...
it's people who make the precision parts the robots are made from.
i had tried that, and it just says restore, close, minimize.
if you ask a lib i'm sure they will be happy to lamblast coulter..
i've read so many 9/11 conspiracy theorist threads i'm practically an expert.
the verses above from leviticus are in a section of the bible that lists immoral acts and the penalties for them.
when i first crate trained her, i slept/stayed within sight of her until she got comfortable with me being away.
governments exist for a reason.
in fact, it has not even been elevated to the level of a theory.
i saved more than 50% of my disposable income for law school.
that is what we're up against and must compete on a global scale.
for instance if we made cars without robots it would take 10x the manpower to produce what we now produce.
and in the center of all this, leader of the seperatist group bloc quebecois, gilles duceppe.
officials at the senate press office said that in the vast majority of cases the full chamber follows the recommendations of the commission of laws.
that only leads to hate and violence.
for the last 2-3 months he has been spending time with a "lady friend".
to them it was good enough.
am i obliged to inform them regardless?
just another bit of that graph thats false.
then i would probably calm down and listen.
oil is washing up north of miamui beach on the east side of florida.
i don't think most british people are too lazy to work but i think they have unrealistic expectations of work.
being gay does not equal reproductive dysfunction.
and yet cops and firefighters, as emplyees of government, are under attack because of their pay and benefits.
but, the nations we are fighting in now are islamic and that is a whole other scenario entirely.
i'm all good now i got a full time job with the feds.
it's not your fellow citizens' responsibility to do that.
consistency is not exactly revere's hallmark here.
another is that when the government orders a military member through permanent change of station orders (pcs) to relocate from one place to another the military sponsors the spouse to travel and relocate to the new base with their spouse.
so medical wise there is nothing that would make the dr think that there will be problems.
they hate the people that is going to be their future i go when there is a job for me.
the nba is a classic example of a government enforced monopoly.
it is two strange counter-productive activites.
then, that the warming was natural and that greenhouse gases weren't causing the change, and also that "warmth is better."*
i just needed the courage to ask for his help as he is very 'old sch'.
i wonder how this will pan out.
he is unique in that he wasn't elected to office.
the teaser on national public radio mentioning that tomorrow (wed) during morning edition there will be a story on the minimum wage.
actually, it's people who build the robots since not enough are being made tocreate an assembly line.
why do you hate america so much?
neocons have been mistaking the elephant's shit for the elephant.
obviously all parents are going to be incredibly concerned.
i think cutting the nonessentials would be fine...but
you have to watch videos in fast-forward.
because most of them are like john gotti - only in the sense they should have the moniker teflon in front of their names - because nothing is ever their fault and nothing ever sticks.
the true heroes will be ones that bear the burden of 40 years of political discourse.
that's how i would feel supported.
you have made a claim, that japan offered to surrender in 1945 numerous times before either bomb was dropped.
but i can also see the faces of the people i horrified..
you're better off without him in your life, and you'll have a life.
it's not because he is stupid, it's because there is so much faith and so little critical thinking in his rantings.
government - historical debt outstanding - annual 2000 - 2009 the 2009 debt number is from the bush administration's fiscal year.
in one instance your side states that businesses are not hiring.
do adults have their pay halved for 1 mistake at work and then get no pay at all if they make 2 mistakes?
no one really concerned about it, until now.
they can negotiate their own contract without having to carry the fat, lazy, uneducated, low skilled and dependent union worker.
what are government officals going to do to make sure that everyone does their part in this.
vor: how many foreign people have the bnp murdered in the name of the bnp?
why am i being like this!!!
the dont identify me as a real preson,..
generally, i don't rely on google as a solid sole source for 'research'.
or keep risking the enviornment?
those events may have expedited smiling buddha, but the test was going to take place anyways, sooner or later.
now its 95% certainty.
all that takes "education".
i recommend a good polysci/history course.
we always went to the back seat.
i guess this is a last plea for help and guidance, before i do something silly.
i just tried to breath deeply through all of my fears to help.
some of the most expensive violins in the world have disputed labels, but they are works of art nonetheless.
rslw: look, you are trying to put words into my mouth, you are obviously a racist who...
but then it became all about the entitlement attitude.
presidential philandering is not new.
debt slavery here's what class warfare looks like!
now to address your question on what we plan to do is simple; we as individuals cannot do much.
he was arrested after agreeing to meet with her jan. 12.
you right wingers are something else.
i have lost many gay friends in the 80's and 90's.
no need to tell them at all.
i know exactly how you feel.
but to my knowledge they haven't used it, at least since i have lived here.
waiting for an attack sounds like israel's mo.
it would be posted on the internet for a few days, and into the past it will go.
hear a different perspective each time.
it really is everything.
boy you dummies are dumb..
by the time he'd seen them, he agreed with me that they were across the line.
the team has since changed their name.
does anyone even take this garbage seriously these days?
the idlest of the idle rich invest money and help other hard working people get ahead.
obviously wichita police are not smart enough to catch him.
they're faced with facts.
again, we appreciate your desire for a sovereign canada.
just sounds like you're blaming everyone else for your own mistakes.
this thing has gone just exactly as the democrats hoped.
i also had to buy a new tv for the house as our old one we had for 17 years and broke.
i think he's probably dead, but i do also think that there is a possibility that the americans have captured him and are keeping it quiet.
i think i have a thing for blonde women...anyhow,
- obama has made good on most of his campaign promises (as reported by politifact).
for all the hype it has really led nowhere in particular, so "m-theory" has evolved from it.
as for the forensics, do you think the world works like csi?
and i like his plan for his first executive order as president to be abolishing all "czars" in the federal government.
to me its fine, if the suspect has to make a choice, ie leave his home and go to a location, then i don't really care if he is encouraged.
millions of deads always followed the empires...
warning - some info might be tmi.
your life's goal is to amount to a hill of beans.
so much for decision day.
i'm not suggesting any conspiracy.
and when that happens, it hurts the feelings of our troops.
yeah but you cannot just throw around nuclear bombs without huge geopolitical consequences.
warming's missing heat".
and when poor shirley was forced to resign, fox comes out with a report, just tonight, that obama threw an "innocent" woman under the bus.
buy some exxon stock and you will soon learn to love profitting.
billions will starve and die.
your being very disengenuous with your post, sonny.
it's a great argument.
but the american police have basically created this whole scenario and lead him into it, feeding him along?
if this was any weaker, it would look like swiss cheese with all the holes in it.
robert reich in the last three decades or so, income inequality has been growing.
numb head and extreme pain were weird.
i mean look at the french.
well then-what is your opinion on us getting involved in libya?
my mum was disabled for the last 10 years of her life and i visited her every day to cook and clean and see to the garden.
wattenberg has been an nuke power plant advocate for years, and has tried and tried to fight the panic, and b.s.
been missing in action through this whole thing.
the vast amount was done in person or over the phone although i did put my concerns on paper a few times.
quite frankly, i don't know if it'll make much difference who wins the wh or who wins the senate majority this november.
then i found others that countered what she said.
"smart" anything is a bit of a reach for him.
so i paid them off for her.
(yes heteros sometimes abuse their children) after a while he finds out that his new wife is a lesbian and does not love him.
don't tell me you didn't know that this was coming up.
there are certainly huge holes in what has been told the public.
much better than humans for many jobs actually.
if you can't see that, you need to repeat the 2nd grade.
you just have to get on with life sometimes and hope for the best and it usually turns out ok...
yes, yes, the love of our troops, the ultimate in fake patriotism.
you can't judge any issue using one example.
you think they're bluffing about that?
i am very stuck, and as a minimum wage worker i dont have the funds to sit down with a lawyer and discuss this.
most libs accept this, but the uber left continues in denial a rebate is a rebate.
for all the shortcomings of the euro, i can't see how the ecb has done a bad job.
i agree with you, its a ironic story also.
i remember slugs on the porch and a batman birthday party.
i don't even know kevsta 's race; how could i use it against him?
anyone thinking our government is not run by money, is a fool.
what about actors children?
two atomic bombs and the soviet invasion ended the war with very little casualties to americans.
i think my favorite question for president obama was, "who is you favorite white sox player?"
you can't arrest someone for something they haven't done...
but its a different matter all together to say that these people are not afforded the right to even live in the uk - the country of their nationality.
the protest may pressure prime minister abhisit vejjajiva to hasten plans to amend the constitution as a reconciliation panel gets ready to propose changes next month.
rslw: no, why would i hate them?
often but i have done it.
well, us sellers should see some improvement with regard to the hassles involved with non-payers once the shopping cart goes into effect site wide.
hopefully we find out more as more light is shed on all of this.
next to that you have all those people coming back or staying there with terrible emotional impressions and memories.
i called back, and the lady said sorry since you didn't answer we offered the job to the next person on the list who answered the phone, that didn't make any damn sense to me.
contrary to the persistent vomiting of 24hr news networks, the news doesn't really change as often as their advertisers would have you believe.
i had to buy carpets because we had bare concrete floors.
and the county where detroit is located also voted for him?
like many english, they preferred fewer crowds and more ethnicity.
compared to any historical standard of living that has ever existed in the history of the human race?
quote: my husband had a three and a half year affair.
wow, you have totally drank the kool-aid.
the shops run by women were altogether less hassly, more friendly.
if it was so desperate, so stultifying, so lacking in affection, he would have told her and taken steps to end the marriage...
what a novel concept!
it is sad but that's where it stands currently.
make a formal complaint.
it does take the professionalism out of his work, imho.
actually i think the thing that gets most farmers through another year of misery is the oil leases the two famers i talk to the most also work for the post office in order to keep the damn things going my cat litter farm is the prizewinner!
so, i am having trouble understanding how you come up with demolishing the church in mississippi.
"the only reason i'm not as confident that there's something about the birth certificate...
we do have a disparity of "justice" in this nation, a severe one.
they really only want to say they want to close the loop holes.
or is this a ratings booster for the good doctor.
with everything going on in the world.
firstly, i was in a pub, which is in itself unusual.
it is not selfish of me to think that is it?
just watched shepard smith.
she wasn't an easy person to get on with, she'd suffered with depression off and on for her whole life.
40 years from now they will be talking about the assholes that could not recognize reality and prevented even preperation for consequences.
soaring food prices/ fuel...
except, you have zero evidence that fox even played the clip until after the administration forced her to resign over it.
i felt similar to you at the outset.
their thoughtmasters have told them not to...
but if you sell an ounce of marijuana you could be put away for a long time."
yet, you call what you learn "fiction" and feel it's "stupid".
i don't know how old i was, but i do remember i couldn't talk yet.
there's only one early memory i can absolutely date.
and an opinion based on very little meaningful analysis it is.
i dont see where providing free abortions is part of this discussion what?
hi, since bout a year after i started secondary school i've been getting this shoulder pain.
most of the middle east's east coast has a very high number of iranian origin citizens.
spring 1959 graduates from sterling high school in greenville, south carolina.
i think at the minute you're so exasperated by her that you're making the situation worse.
grand theft auto anyone?
i remember when i left school and went to college, all my friends stayed at school sixth form.
i had cervadil inserted at 4pm, they removed it and started the pitocin at 4am the following morning.
obama has allowed the russians not only to catch up military-wise but he is also making us dependent on them to be able to fix our satellites.
dealers for the most part aren't union employees hence he didn't care.
even the traffic is back to its usual near-gridlock.
if the people back home were clamoring to get me out of this pointless errands.
raven so where does the gingerness come from?
@eoe, i didn't believe it before, but i believe now because i've seen it: some people do really die of a broken heart.
just goes to show you what good press can do for a poor leader.
i also used to catch daddy longlegged spiders and torture my brother with them because he was afraid of them lol.
when i am up there i can not see my family at all.
they would not tell me if there was any pension left here, and would only tell me if there was (and how much there was) if they saw i was entitled to it.
beyond the immediate security threat, however, lies a more complex challenge: restoring faith in thailands fragile democracy to solve its grinding political conflict.
because it's fun, and there are no consequences.
what got that young man killed was racist views and a demented man with a chip on his shoulder.
glad you started this one.
if your dick falls off because you catch something because you put is some place you should not have, i give you my permission to blame me.
are you saying that if a government doesn't break up a monopoly (cable), it is enforcing the monopoly?
i don't guess $16,000 annual raises harm the economy.
as unions usually do, they chose keeping their benefits at the level they are, over keeping cops on the job, and the lay offs happened.
he can tell you anything he thinks will keep you pacified.
"im not playing these bullshit games...
i rang this evening and there were no records or her call on my account.
ladbrokes have cut the odds on john prescott becoming the next prime minister from 100/1 to 25/1 following a rush of bets.
so was this upholding the law, or just armed robbery?
he said the problem is the uk does not have a plan for renewing road surfaces.
apples are one of the most heavily sprayed crops (even in the us), so it's better all around.
if the government provides health care, whether spelled out in this bill or not, it will ration the care.
the police squad rode bicycles alongside the car.
these new restrictions fall most heavily on young, minority, and low-income voters, as well as on voters with disabilities.
jemmott may have made a contribution to that.
there were no representatives from the 'no party'.
it just caused california criminals to go to other states less stringent.
someone needs to go to jail for that one.
but how can you reply to "batshit crazy"?
i think they went over the top in what they did to her.”
no more government healthcare.
when it gets over $5 a gallon, i hafta opt out...
^^ i had the same problem when i first got my puppy.
i just went on a little ride with some bad people.
she nearly had a heart attack and grounded me for a week.
i wouldn't pay for extra lessons unless he wants them and is prepared to practise!
for bigger stuff eg mortgages etc, if you are going to have problems paying you need to let them know asap.
order to prevent self incrimination.
tlhe doctor told me that a painful muscle is a weak muscle and apparently she was right.
very humbling indeed - happens to everyone.
but then again, there are the john edwards of the world that simply think the "war on terror" is nothing more than a slogan, or an excuse to do anything we desire to do.
she would pee/poop in her crate without a second thought (she was paper trained before we got her).
i'm shocked he was even elected...
i just want to sort out before it becomes trouble.
i hope you will read the more updated contract awards that i posted from nasawatch.
also, i used to do like my grandma and wash everybody's clothes.
that is a big claim, it would quite an amazing escalation if israel used nuclear bombs on iran.
websites such as thewebfairy.com,
i learnt the hard way what the human shoulder is capable of and what it is not.
it must be nice to not have a conscious..
feeding a few people now is not going to fix any of this reality.
sometimes i like to think that if the current generation had fought in that war, we would have lost.
all the eveidence shows this to be a new movement that is unprecedented.
we have the river and washington dc in our backyard now.
but, doesn't the whole affair seem a bit odd?
communism in it's pure form is communal ownership of all property.
it is an awful situation, not just for the children in our class but for the parents too.
bridey, did you see the pm i sent you on friday?
phil specter walked the first time.
wtf are you babbling about?
(i have been in full time employment for 25 years).
waste of time on that asshat.
that is the theory in a nutshell.
saying that people in the us aren't concerned with global warming and are selfish is just dumb.
don't really have any advice to offer, just trying to help.
however, there is no drama that he was involved with anna chapman or any other honey pot involved with russian or us mafias.
kid gloves for a guy who just shot someone else to death.
by the way i live in central london...i
latest from the trial...
how demeaning,, how not to be dignified..
it was difficult in the beginning.
deal with it at the ballot box.
the process is run by the prosecutor.
i also had to use my savings to buy a wshing machine when it broke down.
the low person bit pissed me off, but the prose that followed was so good!
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
get used to the idea of 4 more years of the oh-boy.
and that doesn’t include all the workers who have fled the workforce under obama’s economic oppression.
on violin) not that he is a great player/ singer/ whatever at present.
british ideas and industry to places of no hope.
but look at the other side.
at the time of those words, neither pakistan nor the prc existed.
they don't know the inner workings of the iraqi government, i expect the u.s. had no choice but get the hell out.
when i was pregnant, someone tried to run me over too.
it is a fluctuation that cannot be attributed to any one specific tax change...and
(i screwed around with my settings.)
joint mortgage (with mrs g) on family home.
(if so pass it around!)
the stockings are expensive and the government does not pay at all for them, no cost share or anything, not tricare and not medicare.
as we stand there is no will that we know of anywhere.
the closest black woman to most of the liberals accusing rice of being incompetent is the maid they periodically accuse of stealing from the liquor cabinet.
we only have temperature changes going back a century or so, and you well know the planet is a lot older.
we were living together, with my 11 yr old son.
i stammerred and spoke about my opposition to the war and my support for the cause of civil rights and they went about their business, satisfied.
what health conditions does condoms treat or prevent?
if you made over a certain amount, you didn't get the bush rebate.
my side did this; your side did that.
underachievingt lazy americans need unions.
that's why their country is booming and ours is going down the toilet.
designations at the precise moment that we are about to get our first black female secretary of state.
all you did is demonstrate your complete ignorance.
i found a chocolate bar at work in fridge, told one of the lads it was mine and said he could have it.
it is time to sweep newt into the dustbin.
that said, i think he is dead.
bill o'reilly did this story on monday.
cable monopolies are all government enforced.
if it is not already too late to avoid most all of it regardless of what we do?
you will learn to make real chips.
unless you can prove me wrong, it would seem that you are obsessed with just being contrary to anything i post.
not the people that want them to pay their share of the tax burden which they very much are responsible for.
there is no "one" reason behind nuclearization of india.
i would support spending twice as much if it were needed.
clinton left us with a budget surplus.
maybe before complaining about immigrants not speaking english, you should learn to spell.
is there any property involved?
or is fox news your only source of information?
first, uscitizen, there are smart cuts, and there are not so smart cuts, so quit acting stupidly.
hp x wouldn't you expect them to build mosques in their own territories?
the reason being that, should iran get a nuke in their hands, they would be able to bring the israelies to the negotiating table by hook or crook.
the best oif their ability.
i would happily have explained what i was actually saying, but you never asked - you simply launched into accusations.
it is a cancerous poison which is just as deadly as radiactive poisonous toxic waste.
the space program has advanced far beyond apollo because it has been sustained.
and none of these people ever suspected that the girl was being abused?
what they shouldn't get, is access to my checkbook by government force.
it's not the concept of subsidies per se, but the nature of the subsidies themselves.
this is a lot of people playing cya when something goes wrong.
so far we're doing a lot better.
do you know if a prediction is true or not.
it said wreckage of the craft was strewn at the scene.
like the "housing" bubble at the beginning of the bush administration.
that is not a "substantial drop"!
nah, he just doesn't allow himself (or herself?) to be intimidated by the noisy right.
vouchers don't improve schools they just provide another alternative for a limited number of students.
>>>> not looking for support.
nor should the jury be interpreting the nature and scope of the tort - again, that is a question of law.
no group can be so deliberately dishonest and win over the american voter.
all other contact i have made has been ignored (even replies to the emails she has sent me/my sister).
if i met that guy on the street and he tried to kill me then i would just beat him with his own cane.
the founding fathers understood that there would be inequality.
but you said your clients were loosening up and starting to hire again.
i hold my opinions in or let them out its very negative for me.
but the police have to do something, don't they?
his vice president was charles fairbanks.
whereas the continentals trade primarily among themselves, england has global trading partners.
using that range, you would see we are currently way outside the norm.
they need to be funded and organised on a state-wide basis, these tiny school districts make no sense.
they're faced with bloody horrific in your face proof that they're wrong and they ask silly childish questions about millisecond anomolies.
the cat has your collective tongues.
but i do hope that the news of his death brings some closure to the 9/11 victims..it's
his ratings don't match that claim.
we both earn an ok wage, in that we live comfortably, pay our bills and can afford to buy clothes, food etc, but have little at the end of the month to put into savings.
i didn't quite understand why my cousin wasn't like me and he didn't understand it either.
new democrats share the concerns voiced by the council of canadians over any trade deal that is negotiated in secrete.
if you had a real job, you see it happens every day in the business world, who ends up holding the bag of dog poop.
what about his tax cuts for the middle class and poor?
he also advised that as there had been evidence they should have logged it as a crime.
ann coulter didn't laugh.
*shrugs* they have a chance at getting elected just as much as the next party.
pol pot just took the process a bit far.
the kids had the nerve to pop up and answer jesus birthday.
he is the least pc of them all, thus far, and in my opinion.
he's swimming with the fishes beat me.
because mahmoud ahmadinejad is a maniac.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
inductions don't sound fun...good
president obama would continue that trend.
which i said more power to them.
then you birds got nuttin to worry about..
we send out 500 billion in wealth every year to other countries, that's not a good thing.
though i think a fresh apple is a better choice, given it is washed well.
i don't think the school is doing itself any favours by not communicating with parents straight away.
if you do take him back though, you send the signal that you're prepared to accept things continuing as they are.
william hill have cut the odds on the prime minister leaving this year from 5/1 to 9/4.
assholes such as you are utterly unable to admit how bad he is, however, in light of all he has done so terribly.
yeh right, they're so on board with that!
i would be more concerned with his short term intentions to be honest,you could spend years listening to excuses and waiting for him to leave.
can someone talk me out of this?
i somewhat remember hearing on the news on the first (or second) day after his death that the compound was completed in the summer of 2010.
unfortunately, all it seemed to do is set a precedent for future pardons.
and tell them if they cannot wait how to protect themselves.
not sure what specifically you're asking for, so i'll do a total dump of information.
forty years later, i find in hindsight, that my memory is clear, but inaccurate.
if "crimes begin and end with the criminal who committed them", then why hold an entire religion accountable for the actions of 19 people.
cheers for that - i might buy the book.
i heard about this two weeks ago.
so they insisted on free trade with countries like china that chop up their own citizens for transplant organs.
and the dixie chicks insulted president bush on foreign soil.
it took the parent of martin 3 days before they got the word from the local police dept.
she continues to get death threats.
it's just a false graph.
this makes me question what the point of the programs is at all.
someone you aspire to (not want to be them but someone who your admire and have respect for) e.g.
other than you, of course.
oh, i bet he can i truly hope not.
all things considered, it couldn't have happened more perfectly.
see how far that gets you.
reassured us that, it is very normal for first time moms go over due dates and need inductions.
yes, america does not do all that it can to relieve global warming, but then who does?
i'm shocked he was even elected...
he still makes a good point...one
are there no lessons learned!
he marries another woman.
as to the mosque genius?
me and my 2 sisters looked through her house but couldnt find one anywhere.
please do everything you can, even though it feels as if it's not appreciated.
and at the hospital, it seemed tomtake forever for them tomfind her on the fetal monitor; l was so scared!
all obamalamadingdong has done is spend like a madman.
talk about ebony & ivory.
now he has collaborated with thomas peterson and jr the liar you are.ohn
"smart" anything is a bit of a reach for him.
imagine if rdean knew how to build an intelligent op only six percent of posters will read that entire article.
why was it changed later?
thanks i think it can be very easy to focus on what he doesn't do.
flint laid off police officers because the union refused to accept any cuts and chose their benefits over avoiding layoffs.
the era that the book covers is the worst era in tory party history so there is bound to be a lot of criticism in there but he is not slagging off the conservative party.
i hear those skills translate real well into a career in government.
the arab league did not understand that a no fly zone can have different meanings if worded appropriately.
the proliferation of guns, many put in the poorly trained hands of parties with scores to settle, makes the situation extremely volatile.
and they definitely shouldn't be forcing anyone to pay for someone else's contraception & abortions.
let's not go conspiracy here..but
i can understand why many clinics are afraid of lawsuits.
pleasant, unless you are male, and alone.
therefore it can only apply to a species/population.
violins are an evil instrument to learn, and you have my sympathy...
however, as i said, they rejected it out of hand.
where do we draw the line?
except he's not wrong about the rightwingnuts setting her up...
is this to be sop for the democrat party for now on?
@hawkeye10, we are free from government oppression.
the british did have evidence the iraqis were trying to buy uranium.
her police detail is reduced.
the "effect" people are talking about isn't simple political rhetoric designed to sway votes.
if someone isnt interested in making the max amt of money he can, fine.
i put the words they probably said...
as he does correctly point out, the space program does provide us with technology, some of which deters war or even prevents the threat of war.
adhere to stereotypes perpetrate a negative/unform view of the lgbt community.
the jury verdict must stand.
the father is not a public figure and is a private citizen.
she also was very respectful in her final days of dissent in the previous coallition, and didn't even call for him to resign.
yes, price is affected by increased costs, indirectly.
i did, however, keep in contact with his mistress, as much to get answers to my myriad of questions as to keep an eye on her.
your only source of nutrition comes from "sweet & low."
the people have a right to know!"
there will be a regional summit in jone.
there doesn't seem to be any novel con law question presented on these facts and it's a puzzler why the scotus took the cert.
that is one investment that will most certainly pay off.
indeed the british struggle was our initial model for the 'salvation' of vietnam.
curve, the rest of america is not out of step, you are.
sure, i like gingrich.
pirates of the seas know they can't 'eff around with americans or any of their properties.
i remember being absolutely terrified on the flight, but kept deathly still.
we know about civil rights.
the only problem may be that they used new york times in their tort analysis after saying public v. private didn't matter.
that is the real purpose behind so-called "free trade."
i have a history of giving due credit to president obama for the few things he has done right.
to the bitter end, the official position of the clinton administration was that it couldn't say for sure who was responsible for the cole attack.
quote: i wish you all the luck in the world hun, i just hope your thread doesn't get nasty like so many others i've read on here xx.
one would think they would run with the story, but they haven't.
a republican president would have said no.
somewhere in there, we start hearing there is no possibility of abrupt climate change.
that is, they legally exclude any other company from providing services in the area.
so, my statements were as general as i could muster, in hopes of eliciting a clarification.
"she's not sitting here" he said.
can you minimise the impact by the way you arrange your working hours, i.e.
we look forward to what he would do for the united states that gorbachev in russia.
with pictures and video.
wonderful man ain't he?
can anyone explain further or recommend some reading?
don't get me wrong i dont give to receive but if this happened the other way round i would be mortified, she was just like aww thanks i must have forgot to put the money in your card, and that was that.
and i think most americans are now seeing them that way too.
i could be wrong but i think california may have more prisons than any other state.
or are you truly just another libertarian lunkhead parroting your neocon/teabagger cousin's stupidity?
and they insisted on "right to work" laws that busted up the unions.
barrett has 3 radio shows, he has a lot of free time now that he is no longer a part-time college professor.
but how can you reply to "batshit crazy"?
there's your class warfare.
the tax cuts were not for the middle class, on earned income.
i found christians against poverty were amazing and so so supportive so i would recommend them.
i believe in multiple sources of energy.
and we all know why the faux news zombies are searching for brains!
and now it appears that there was a second one, that is now being uncovered.
or we could poke sharp sticks in our eyes.
'generation gimme' stepped in and hijacked the movement.
my ancestors were no where near this land when it as "taken over by white people".
move to where the food is..
you know how i would feel supported if i was a troop overseas?
it's real interesting how everything just unfolded like it did.
starbucks owns the mortgage on your house.
that, of course, is just my opinion.
the distortional inclinations of the next president, george h.w.
possibly more dangerous than the lunkheads that come out and say the crap"-- i meant it.
anyway, the matter has come to attention in milwaukee lately in light of two seperate cases.
quit while you're behind.
fairbanks 60 in the summer and -60 in the winter) yeah, i had a few choice words for her.
and stop worrying about it...
the peace movement has not died, nor is it resting.
thank you for your past email concerning a trade deal between the eu and canada.
eventually loses to massachusetts governor michael dukakis.
but again totally different argument.
i am not among the six percent.
i was raised with my male cousin by grandma.
the point is, my dad will write all the letters and i will sign them, is that ok?
president bush began a string of expensive finan*cial bailouts.
there has never been a monopoly in this country that wasn't government enforced.
i don't know if this goes for people generally, but that was how g went.
i still miss her terribly, even though there were times when i felt i never wanted to see her again.
to begin with, there is no such world police which would itself refrain from killing whom they want.
i can't even put it into words.
so they can cut taxes for overpaid rich folks?
in theory, one could argue that the computer models are accurate, and that the real measurements have some problem.
you are right billw lol that's funny, i love karma, it's fun sometimes.
dh has not been asked to give a statement, and we assume nor has the cabby.
the old obama did it.
i say, let's just spread the love.
he sounds so statesmanlike.
the radio show host also said that ford was a good post-president.
but again totally different argument.
and it was so vociferously, emphatically trumpeted that iraq was flush with wsmd.
i seen piles of dead human beings.
you stepped on my feelings a bit there, girl.
dumbshit- who is threatening whom here?
it might not be even his fault.
matt millen broke down talking about it on espn.
you don't believe fox news?
you "honored" the dead by pestering a group of people who were interested in not creating any more dead?
and i care enough about each of you to share with you god's truth.
moral of the story: the media will always present news in a way which forwards their views, it's that simple.
tell that to rick santorum i thought it was obama that started the contraception thing.
as for the dixie chicks, they'll have to wait for the next president.
the people have a right to know!"
i think, too, that as 4 young men travelling together, they were looked upon as a challenge by local youth.
as a christian, i pity all these hateful critics and i will pray for them."
its a gruesome dictatorship - of the kind that was formerly sponsored by the soviets.
fact: the warheads were empty, and showed no signs of ever having contained chemical weapons.
we don't have sugar cane climate here in the u.s..
i'll help, it's because right of center people were angry about bush's spending.
since there would be no "spouse", employees would become liable for employer portions of health insurance because there would be no waiving of the tax penalty for employer provided health insurance for a spouse.
mankind got 'organized'.
if he was renting he could have relocated and avoided the whole thing.
it wasn't always like that.
but i'm sorry to say i don't really take the ndp seriously.
opec has never been able to enforce any of its quotas on production or prices.
now i know we all face equivalent limits.
see, it's a tax break to companies and corporations that hire vets.
two coalition crew members were injured in that attack.
that's not just from the ex-wife.
she started out with shit pay..long
a false allegation, allie.
i had about 20 minutes with a doctor.
apparently, the two folks that died paid nearly 10,000 dollars to attend the new age sweat led by two time oprah guest.
but i had to make that move and remind them i was still there, even though i was at a different college.
to me, this says that americans are willing to give obama the benefit of the doubt in 2012.
and of course the poppy propaganda.
i don't think there are too many people, just too many people to live in the way that we are living.
now get to work and provide those links.
first, you do not get "extra" redundancy money for having children.
there's also a side issue of amicus waivers.
the bushbots were 25%-ers.
you know what teenagers are like, they pick up on anything.
no,the predecent was set when bill clinton pardoned henry cisneros,after he was convicted of lying to the fbi.
george0b1 nobody on this thread has said a good word about north vietnam.
so, it's something else, isn't it?
who in the media's been going "half-cocked" and how did they do it?
republican senator charles percy's secretary took an interest in me.
survival of the fittest.
covert cia role in yemen proposed - wsj.com
but, believe it or not, there are people who really like what they do even though you consider it to be menial.
i sold an old french violin to a buyer in canada, and the buyer disputed the label.
they are run down garbage everywhere with people just sitting about doing nothing.
it was bemusing to many here how deeply ingrained the open racism still is in some communities of the usa.
the conservatives are currently on 37% of the vote, labour on 28% and the lib dems on 23%.
i think the expulsion of arafat may bring that on.
no way they would allow those industries to be re-regulated.
this has never been a secular nation, ever.
there's not a link or a quote in the entire pile of shit post.
i have a pair of their level 1 comfort step trekker sandals ($235) and they are not comfortable at all.
why did they lose their entire life?
i did that type of work for a few years.
you've posted on these forums before.
i most certainly did not treat the disaster as if it doesn't exist.
and that they havent got..
they spent more time touring london than seeing us and the twins.
they were reserved for adults.
too bad you didn't have that back in 2004, you could have told your fellow righties not to vote for the debt doubler.
i'm not wrong," the outspoken comedian went on a vulgarity-laden two-minute rant against republicans and the troops.
obama's approval ratings are hovering below 50%, yet he has made the list for the 4th year in a row.
lol youve studied the talking points well grasshopper.
in other words americans weren't happy having one of their howegrown oil companies owned by commie china.
i would i struggle to meet my iva monthly payments and my mortgage payments when i don't have a tenant paying me.
actually, it's people who build the robots since not enough are being made to create an assembly line.
going up on weds eve.
health insurance should be treated with various cover options with everyone that seeks to have health care coverage paying for basic services.
they've stolen her childhood from her.
could it be that the ocean is cooling?
remember that corporate oil deal where the chinese wanted to buy out unocal?
(1) was to remove the actual tumor.
i mean not even everyone in hk is a british national - only a proportion of the population are.
he was in the navy during wwii and served in the pacific theatre.
i can relate to that.
unemployment was never 12%, and was lower than it has been under obama, under bush.
when does your dh get back?
so if the kids don't kill themselves they end up in jail and it's every ones fault other than their own.
how much air time did that get?
they find very few papers (7 in total) predict global cooling.
or, what, then, was the lie?
i need to set these things correct so that the record will be clear testimonyat rex's sanity hearing.
it could of been better but i admit i was lazy and didn't really work at it.
so i think it's just best to pardon dick and hope that he'll leave me alone."
don't hate your fellow americans.
the only mistake the republicans made was in voting to raise the debt ceiling in exchange for anything short of repealing obamacare and passing the ryan budget that actually would have cut 4 trillion out of the budget.
don't think i could handle it though..i
he did not start out in the copy room of some local city paper and work his way up to mogul.
if there is no civil marriage, there is no recognition, and so those things all disappear.
that's why the us has the largest prison population in the world, in both numbers, and as a percentage of the population.
more like a muppet with bush's arm stuck up his arse.
the fact that you need so many lawyers and therapists shows that you're not quite ready to be independent.
they claim to be self sufficient in a way they are they make a living off of their own land but their products and what they can sell them for is so controlled.
the only problem with trusting the jury on this one is that they were given a question of law to determine.
you don't remember this post?
people who are the technicians to maintain the robots.
ok, that's a good point.
if your clients are starting to hire again, that means recovery has been happening for a number of months now.
however despite the layoffs murder and rape are still down 11% in flint.
how could i be expected to resist a title like that.
i rather think if he'd been all good with truman's decisions, daddy would not have been such a radical after the war.
even if they did win the wh and both houses of congress, they're not going to have a filibuster proof senate, and that means working together with the dems.
a mexican shooting a black kid is the "biggest, most powerful" news story?
don't let the facts get in the way, though.
i suppose this type of callousness towards the slaughter of civilians should be expected from an avowed zionist.
in the 1904 presidential election, roosevelt won the presidency in his own right in a landslide victory.
eventually got him about 6am and he said he was in his mates house.
why are 1,500 available us oil skimmers not on the scene?
what kind of outlets did this veteran have?
here's what class warfare looks like!
we will tell you what to think.
those are truths republicans can't bear to face.
what the police have to find out now is if zimmerman instigated the confrontation.
the oldest child is at university, the youngest will be starting a levels this year you have no evidence whatsoever that his home life is barren and unhappy.
what happened to personal responsibility and accountability?
the prosecturor didn't even indict clinton let alone get a conviction.
in august 1902, roosevelt was the first president to be seen riding in an automobile in public.[52]
if a bj was the biggest concern of the nation with the president right now-the whole country would be a lot better.
thankfully the silent majority are overwhelmingly in favour of this plan and the opposition are a minute fringe pressure group way out of touch with most of the population.
if i asked the rest of my family had heard from her they would say no.
in the "binary" world of the right wing, it's either all lies or all gospel truth.
the tea party people are working stiffs with day jobs and families.
but foremost he is not a career politician as his profession is actually an academic one, partly in the us where he also studied.
yesterday was the day that the lib dems killed higher education in this country.
both roundabouts and metrication will help you understand the british sense of humour.
you can bitch all you want about tax rates.
some think flight 93 never crashed.
he served eleven years total behind bars for his antiwar activities.
we havent spoken since before dinner.
all that remained left was to add gravity and a "theory of everything" could be contemplated.
i'm open minded and i just don't take things as personally as others do.
it seems that if you help denigrate anti-intellectualism it flags up that you are an intellectual.
get your head out of ron paul's ass, will ya please.
don't even get me started on how badly labour wrecked the economy, or how they totally destroyed the police force.
i've narrowed it down to god, gays and guns.
these sanctions in place will not harm the iranians intention to build nuclear weapons..
getting back to sanctions.
the context is to simply point out that palin says one thing, but does another.
i don't buy into the marxist talk...
they are fighting the idea that goivernment has the right to mandate that an insuirance company must sell a service...even
but who decides and how is that enforced?!
but my main goal in writing to you is to prevent paypal from ordering the destruction of violins and other antiquities that they know nothing about.
how do these trotskyists think we generated our wealth in the first place?
did i say i excused it?
you may also lose your single person council tax status.
nukes in the hand of the shiite sect are quite dangerous as all shittes are anti-west and anti-israel.
2. changing the subject do only the rich deserve the best healthcare?
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
that, of course, is a different tune than four years ago, when he placed all of his bets on florida.
it was during my tenure at comphibpac that i learned the most about what i know about viet nam.
it was all the more startling because it was not perceived by people who'd always lived here.
and when that happens, it hurts the feelings of our troops.
i'm pretty sure tim bale is a true blue tory!
don't ask for help from internet forums on such important issues.
i can see than hundreds of thousands of people having to breathe oil fumes is just a joke to you.
people who design the parts the robots make.
any other derailments other than potential grandchildren?
otherwise, no other information would be given.
i don't ever try to pass anything off as being other than it is.
that said, i would caution against the attempted use of proof by anecdote here to prove the effectiveness and validity of the concealed carry laws.
why is no one sanctioning the us??
that is exactly what happened: no, it isn't, unless you believe that the instant vaporization of hundreds of thousands of people can be written off because of their nationality.
if gwb continues his course he will never be forgiven.
they used to treat it as a real safety net, but it becoming a bit of a fishing net in malmo at the moment.
an incredible amount of work has been done to make sure that the satellite data are the best quality possible.
after the vietnamese concentrated political strength to the north and drove out the french it was to our own interest and, as it turned out, the south's interest to let the process take its course.
it's not the catastrophe that was reported and fishing boats are heading back out.
we are currently expecting roads to go for 60-80 years without resurfacing.
it just encourages the loons.
well, sofia, it's exactly what c.i.
well said but i trust the jury verdict.
firstly, there's no need to panic or rush.
mostly poor you though!!!
they did for my parents when one passed a number of years before the other.
<shrug> what's a person to do?
george on of the most important things a person can learn in life is not to make assumptions and secondly not to read to much into one's own perceptions of what happened in certain circumstances based on their personal experiences.
william hill have cut the odds on the prime minister leaving this year from 5/1 to 9/4.
i never put words in your mouth.
but does this include genocide or democide?
are you so desperate to appear clever that you have to make this sh*t up?
i dont have any dog in the fight.
i am afraid of something happening to me or baby during labor.
but the death penalty bill was passed after the fact and so manson and his gang will have the luxury of living in prison till they die.
fact: the un had already confirmed that it was destroyed.
it's far easier (and cheaper) to get them all at the earliest opportunity.
also she had gone home.
oh i'm sorry, i must have missed it, what exactly about this quote is incorrect???
and you don't know about acorn and james o'keefe?
this did not go over very well with the seller, who has already had the violin authenticated.
but conserv won't address these issues.
get used to the idea of 4 more years of the oh-boy.
if you can't see that, you need to repeat the 2nd grade.
the b-52s were 6 miles away.
lamb: did he have a philosophy that he didnt want to pass on a lot of money to his kids?
did that answer your question?
this is beyond disgusting, many people should be in prison over this.
i can remember the oddest things but major events totally slip my mind.
it doesn't work this way.
chosen by the president.
(i thought conservatives wanted private enterprise to do all the heavy lifting?)
they've got stupid down to an art form.
but why go to court and send lawyers to defend against having to show it?"
what makes us 'opposite of evil'?
render unto ceasar what is ceasar's.
territorial disputes have been a major irritant in bilateral relations between the two nations and led to brief but bitter war in 1962.
'cause it seems that because they create "all these jobs", they are somehow entitled to a free pass.
this is why the right is destined to lose its ass.
the twenty-seven-year-old man died of four gunshot wounds.
lol that must really piss off the repubs who kept harping on how the unions destroyed the auto industry.
i got the sas bravo, and it's totally comfortable right from the git-go.
the entitlement gravy train is off the tracks and out of gravy.
i took out the loan about a year ago.
and even worse, to display the racism, we hate in others.
at the moment you're catastrophising everything, and it doesn't have to be like that.
it's real simple: get the hell out of everybody's bedroom and start worrying about the economy.
and the points of light foundation continues to help the nation find opportunities for people to serve one another.
when i have more time (tomorrow), i will provide the sources for all of this information.
we saved close to $300 a month.
it's not your money anymore when you die.
i sympathise completely, i have 4 kids and we both work.
tomorrow is the state of the union and obama will be talking about the huge deficit we have.
kill off the weak, and shit won't cost so much for the rest of us.
my god, you're an asshole.
no real harm was done so i don't think they should be punished.
the thing that helps me out is exercise with light (5 lb) free weights.
obama wined and dined.
no "spouse" means no family relationship under social security whereby the surviving spouse can receive benefits at the working spouses rate if higher then their own.
it's people who make the precision parts the robots are made from.
come to think of it, that would include you, which might explain why you don't see it.
@hawkeye10, where is theodore "teddy" roosevelt when we need him---again?
if what you said made sense, i could have a reply.
i am sure it was our very normal sized baby sitter, miss martyn, from a 2 year old perspective.
too much lunatic fringe screaming.
i hate bloated spending.
not so many - and most try to look as if they have - but some do.
islamic fundamentalists, of course; they never blow up anything.
it is none of their business.
it seems like every time i make any decision with money he has a friend telling him to not be a little "bitch".
computers can only be as smart as whomever is programming them.
the day's final witness, laurie gennari, had a starkly different take on the events of the week.
the fact is, the tax cut/rebate he gave both times put money into mostly the lower to middle class folks.
had that been on the 5.30pm from victoria it would have been a goner.
i'll answer for the car that i've got on order rather than my current company car (which is a passat).
you have triggered some areas that i need to have a long hard think about, that are maybe a bit less comfortable than the viewpoint i've taken so far.
as soon as you say anything in his defense they morph into "jesse and al sharpton".
i've been asked why i'm so opposed to a second investigation.
as cruel as it sound, i would argue freedom of choice wins out on this fact and this alone.
april/may/june 1963 becomes a leader of civil rights demonstrations in greensboro, north carolina.
you have it backwards.
cause everybody is a racist!
you say a post is wrong then throw in ad homs and don't even attempt to support your claims.
911sharethetruth.com,
i really am fascinated by all these whimsical nicknames thrown out by individuals such as this.
mr. chalabi sit directly behind mrs bush during the last state of the union address.
and what's happening today is because of what happened, uh, "backward".
what annoyed me the most about these campaigners was the extremely aggressive approach they were taking.
not much) but a lot of debts, so i don't think there will be a probate.
have any of you used a va loan to buy a house, then received a lot of streamline refinancing letters saying you'll save a bunch by refinancing?
and this was of particular interest.
great catch anyone who would compare sharpton to hitler is just well a moron and a major pile of shit.
plus, in ca they have to give you notice before your schedule.
now everyone knows that nsa stands for no such agency.
i emailed kevin barrett about some errors he made in a presentation.
i stand by everything i have said on this thread.
and it's not like he's even going to jail, he just got fired.
i didn't read the article.
that's how brainwashed they are.
while i wouldn't endorse the idea of going to thailand now, your friend will be fine, so long as he/she doesn't stray off the tourist/mainstream path.
it used to just say 2:30pm as the last time it was changed and someone else's initials.
obamabots believe obama doesn't lie.
i've said what i've said, and if you have comprehension problems i cannot help you..
no country is perfect, but this country is far and away better than any other on earth.
as you know, recently my mother died, and she named me and my sister as the executors of her will.
"that oil is already contaminating our shoreline.
any more and it's suddenly "jesse and al sharpton and farakhan".
we tried to implement a government insurance option and insurance companies spent billions to block it.
there are rumors that mario monti could become the next prime minister of italy.
it is when the temperature moves up to 2c above the pre-industrial level, expected in the middle of this century - within the lifetime of many people alive today - that serious effects start to come thick and fast, studies suggest.
to continue insurance.
i didn't want to worry you.
if we had not gone to afghanistan or iraq, everyone has a different opinion as to whether this country would be safer now.
god has a plan for us all.
it may be that chirac wants to prevent religious violence before it starts.
but you know kids, a huge majority of them just aren't going to do it.
the slight trend that is in the data actually appears to be downward.
he didn't leave me, had no intentions of doing so.
the only questions remaning are "when" and "how bad".
you can jump to the moon.
no one i phoned had any record of a will for him, so the solicitors are happy to proceed along this line.
without students, this country would lose all its technically gifted people, would lose all its main surgeons and researchers and all its very well educated employees.
just say you would like help in working out access for your son.
people who design the parts the robots make.
in australia you know straight away the difference as soon as you arrive in an aboriginal community.
but could you elaborate on why you think this isn't an expression of patriarchy?
furthermore detroit is not the only part of michigan ok i just want to respond to a couple things said within this thread.
does this concern you?
only a racist would think otherwise.
contraception is about family planning, not about wild sex.
less than 6 months apart.
"i support your religious freedom to coerce your unwilling members to do things they don't want to do."
obama is coat tailing the operations set up by the previous admin.
there's more to life than a couple of men.
well, she's not the most attractive woman in the world but for a politician there aren't many hotter out there...she
if you run after him you are saying "your behaviour is ok" is it?
which is fairly damning, since it's one of the longest running programs in the country.
she has since (afaik) tried to gather his assets/estate and has also been in touch with the hsbc pension scheme over here (i know this because i got in touch with them too).
this is precsisely, is it not?,
agreed- no need to flog this deceased equine.
i was in shock for about a week!
and definitely didn't want to go into a nursing home.
and it gets worse - hundreds of skimmers sit idle...
this isn't just an american problem, this is the worlds problem.
you get a speeding ticket even when you're parked.
im up to my eyes in debt with virtually no income.
those idiots at the memorial last week...hmmm,
you never did respond to that.
but they are extremely accurate and consistant.
does anyone else find this to be a little much to believe?
so i was just wondering why the media is so stupid?
he told them it's the responsibility of the owner to clean up after his dog.
history is pretty clear on this one.
he's just one more republican who doesn't get laid and doesn't want anyone else to either.
no atomic bombs, no surrender.
president obama saved all of us from the threat of those fake toner cartridge bombs.
you shouldn't - if you would have the same wages and benefits without the union.
however, i believe i've found the disconnect and bolded it above.
but i still oppose the gz mosque for the exact reason revere put forward.
sometime rights come into conflict and they need to be resolved.
i have no remembrance of the speeches made before jfk's grave that day.
continued pt three times a week.
these are ridiculous iranian people are jeopardized by this., not its government.
this seems to be an election without a result.
he did not start out in the copy room of some local city paper and work his way up to mogul.
in a roundabout way he was prophetic as we have the mess we have 32+ years later.
we're in deep trouble folks.
with marshall - 8 weeks (but my first was a preemie and she wanted to see me earlier than normal) my current pregnancircumstances was our 1st appt.
instead, sea level has risen about half an inch in the past four years.
why would they not be sympathetic to people whom are essentially their own colleagues?
the only people that can afford it are the super rich...
i think it was paul krugman who said that, and i like it.
obama agreed and compromised.
he did not start out in the copy room of some local city paper and work his way up to mogul.
it's a pretty far-fetched argument, just like those that argue that god or satan made me do it.
you really are clueless.
don't be such a debbie downer, hip.
something republicans "mock".
the effect, to use your caps, is the same anywhere people are, or feel, oppressed.
good luck whatever you decide to do.
however, i'm sure we disagree on how to go about it.
bit of backstory: my dad lived in america (indiana) for the past 7 years.
my memories i think i may have a terrible memory because the earliest i can remember is around the time i was in kindergarten.
thanks again, for proving my other point while you're struggling to argue with me and insult me.
you don't get someone to feel better by telling them that they feel better, you get them to feel better by helping them figure out what's wrong.
don't people ever learn?
if you can't sort things out without suing someone or speaking to a therapist, then you're not ready to shoot grouse.
tillman may not have been liked by some of his peers.
if that is what he did, he totally ignored the severity of the accusation, if not legally, but absolutely in terms of the impact it could have on his football program.
the forfeiture program is just a way for federal employees to enrich themselves at the expense of victims of crimes.
perhaps they are starting to realize that the president isn't a cure-all for a damaged economy.
so, i guess that's it.
so says an anamous message board poster.
i swear you protestants think everyone in some type of leadership role is the antichrist.
it's real simple: get the hell out of everybody's bedroom and start worrying about the economy.
"we cannot write history with laws.
and what has jesse jackson contributed to american life?
i recommend looking at mircea eliade's book on initiation.
of course, it'll appease his dittoloonies.
also asked about getting an injunction against him they gave me the number for womans aid to get help with obtaining one.
one other thing, the reason why most like me think private enterprise is the only way to go now is because our govt.
hear a different perspective each time.
i understand his scope is very limited.
i think of you, nowadays, as a brother, marc!
this was an accident...
they had it right in the beginning when it was about being angry at wall street.
1984 founds the national rainbow coalition.
jubilantly, he announced to the retinue of sailors around him..
uk hoped that new countries help to break france-german hegemony in eu, but they are scared from them and never will vote against them.
health insurance should be treated with various cover options with everyone that seeks to have health care coverage paying for basic services.
he took two small papers with declining circulation in a small city in south australia and built a media empire and made himself on of the wealthiest men in the world.
well our money hungry goverment has found another pretext to sieze money from well meaning capitalists.
armed soldiers still patrol the capital, but discretely.
in that speech he claimed the murder rate in flint michigan had more than doubled already.
for instance if we made cars without robots it would take 10x the manpower to produce what we now produce.
lastly, i am amazed by your spin on the fact that half of americans don't pay federal income tax.
i've already asked and you've clarified it.
which is why i'm not thrilled with the idea of my daughter marrying a human bean...
he still hasn't to this day.
fact: no such weapons were ever used by the iraqis to defend against the invasion and, of course, none were ever found in iraq.
i agree on the miscarriage of justice.
-usps will lose your package and not scan it.
it was what he did after he inherited them that make him a self made man, not the fact that he inherited them.
he married you, chose to have a child with you and loves you unconditionally.
yet we allow our society to treat them like adults.
they gave wall street all that taxpayer cash.
i was always fascinated by history and people's past experiences...
these people need a dictator who's willing to use mass murder when they step out of line.
i chose this, my favorite thread, to make my 20,000th post.
come on use some common sense.
all that takes "education".
the smell of gun powder smoke dont bother me to much, but it take me there.
amd loose both of us.
president obama would continue that trend.
they have no death penalty, no life sentence, and maximum sentence for a crime is 21 years.
i was terrified all the way to the hospital after my water broke.
they dont have the same social and economic problems as we in the uk have which is a big factor..
and it's not just skilled jobs but also unskilled jobs.
if people need help, just assume charity and local gov'ts aren't enough and just tax everyone else to pay for it, what's the difference?
i was in sever debt which through hard work i am getting out of.
then i just had a lady complain about shipping being 13.49 to california for 8 cups/8 saucers.
i'm not suggesting any conspiracy.
killing in the us is just part of day-to-day life in the us.
you are still a pile.
men outnumber women in the camp somewhere between 5 to 1 and 10 to 1.
all the sanctions is affecting ordinary iranians!
the more it looks like zimmerman acted in self defense, the less you will hear of this case.
newt has been neither forthright or accurate.
i wish paul was a little bit more articulate and less frenetic in his responses.
the answer is absolutely.
as you've said, once they're focussin on other bits in dimmed light then who cares!
as for the personal tales on this thread, none of us has said all that much.
so, whom does the king stand for?
we must be vigilant against enemies both domestic and foreign.
and that is the debate being had.
i just read about this story.
i say the time to tackle the iran issue is now.
until i know the facts i won't make a decision.
ows and wall street are just in competition with each other for their handouts.
in that sense this is just the latest in a very long string of poor public relation and customer service incidents but this one is one of the stupider ones i've seen.
chances are it will move more to the middle over time.
but when they are of a moral or religious nature it's not government's business.
it was never meant to be taken seriously.
in short, i would call in sick if there was a good reason to do so, such as the one you stated!
they found the bomb before they found the woman.
you know how i would feel supported if i was a troop overseas?
they are not made up of the usual zombietime bums, college students or acorn bussed in hacks and seiu union thugs or commie funded answer geeks.
but my mommy and daddy were pinkos.
the bush administration smeared his name when he could not defend himself.
unfortunatly, florists really rack up the prices for funerals.
i like the fact that i have good friends i can trust of many races, and if someone treats me decently, the color of her skin doesn't matter at all.
3. basically, everything is abundant, without the need for anyone to work.
they have "no" standards.
it's just who we are as a society.
they live in england and should speek english!
why did one of them attack another with a drill in my school?
no college in their right mind would accept these kids in the past, and not one bank would give them a loan prior to the government guaranteeing the loan.
teachers and principles would not shield me from other kids and my family doesn't even know i exist.
obama has been a massive and utter failure.
we call that space "batshit crazy".
lol @ uk border agency.
she then said she could not give me their number.
this is actually quite amazing.
that means that his money is our money and same goes for mine.
and of course, it wasn't my grandmother who drove home with my sister, it was my mother.
most apple juice is too sweet to drink, to me anyway.
why does it matter that he's black?
and you are excusing it cause shes "not the president".
if he did, he should face charges.
bring back the kitten.
the fight is today and it is continuing.
if this is accepted as the norm, what will follow?
also something about getting ripped off by people you don't know on the internet.
that is what the founders of the movement intended.
so go ahead and process that for a while.
i see, we've change the direction of debate because the other was fruitless?
any advice would be more than welcome.
on the local news today, they had a caller trying to defend this racist bitch saying "she was taken out of context"...
in addition to streamlining the launching of strikes, it would provide deniability to the yemeni government because the cia operations would be covert.
i wish paul was a little bit more articulate and less frenetic in his responses.
i have lost many gay friends in the 80's and 90's.
i first had thoughts it could be him about 10 months ago but it was just 90% speculation.
you might consider beck to be a lot of people, but not really that many people pay any attention to that psycho.
if you want to file a joint return, have your ira passed on to your spouse without the tax burden, have legal recognition as family, and lots of other stuff you need a document accepted by the government as proof of marriage.
for example if she phoned i would say very sorry but i am in the middle of cooking/football/anything.
unfortunately, when you are raising a family that is not so easy to do.
but in my case, i figured we had enough of our own.
quit listening to him because he's such a damned negative nancy.
however my cash flow is better with them then without since the rental income more than covers the mortgages on them plus...
does this sound like the sensible option.
people who are the technicians to maintain the robots.
this has never been a secular nation, ever.
they offered up private solutions, good ones, ones that don't increase taxes on anyone.
i have heard really good things about them.
no charges filed against 26 year old.
there are far more important political and economical reasons for military intervention or political sanctions.
some seniors also work beyond "retirement" age.
and why should cops have to accept less benefits?
ows has already launched the class war into the consciousness of millions of americans.
more often than not ows protestors are targeting their peers on the street rather than anyone who has committed any actual wrong doing.
we live in a society where everyone gets a voice, and this is the current policy.
if you really want to dive into these ideas, in a much more in depth manner i suggest you watch this video.
as a parent and grandma can i give you some advice hun?
it has just been announced that gerald ford, 38th president of the united states has died.
but, you know, don't hold your breath on that one fellas because, you know, when america invades a country, we love you long time.
ows has captured the attention and participation of the entire world.
other states have cut back on early voting, a hugely popular innovation used by millions of americans.
unless you happen to think that freedom of religion = supporting terrorists.
but i agree lets hear about some other news as well.
i won't let you put words in my mouth..
quartermass has not given opinion in that last post, namvet.
my understanding (imperfect, i'm sure) is that there is no active persecution of jews in the country.
in the future farming will become an endeavor of the highly educated (not necessarily degrees, but real education).
friends often say i'm lazy, and i can't disagree a lot of the time.
"the protest is going well so far.
do they deserve have the family business?
the people has less taken out of their pockets but the government still got its revenue.
the "bud" was just a stolen name and address.
look at our manufacturing industry.
how original of you tm.
let them argue that evil midgets from outerspace forced him to do it, the end result will be the same, a guilty verdict.
and while you're at it, find out why rupert is investing in the prince's middle eastern network.
i wonder if he believes them now?
tomorrow is the state of the union and obama will be talking about the huge deficit we have.
wouldn't that be the same for anyone?
i keep telling you not to read those prophecy sites rdean, you are getting confused.
it displaces more water than an aircraft carrier.
however, by that same rationale, it is unfair to criticize the movement itself for a few of the trouble-makers.
i have not heard about any kind of will relating to my dad.
that theory arose in the 1930s as the answer to the great depression, which, of course, never worked.
if you can't see that, you need to repeat the 2nd grade.
now they are set in their ways.
there has always been relative poverty.
“that’s the real danger of obamacare,” giuliani says.
less cops - more murder and rapes.
and we got some significant things that need doing.
i usually blurt out that the truth movements goal is not a second investigation, their goal is to absolve al qaeda of the murder of thousands of innocent people and that makes me mad.
we explain that to our tempos when they apply with us so they understand the importance of always being reachable..to
i don't even know if he had a will, and if so, was it over here?
no spousal privilege in the case of a criminal prosecution.
what's the chance of the protests spreading?
bad decisions and greed is what got a whole lot of citizens in trouble too.
we now know that tillman was planning to come out publicly in opposition to the iraq invasion.
she acts like she had no idea who she was praising.
it's obvious that you love your daughter and want what's best.
i read through the entire label on one bottle (motts) and could not find anything to indicate where the apple juice was from.
for the larger issue, if you are going to take that route, then is islam an inherently evil/violent religion?
i'm pretty sure that apples grown in china, and juiced in, say, washington state could be labeled "made in usa".
must get lost in my posts, what with the other women and all.
now, to address your "point".
that surgery was relatively fast (3 hrs?) and no physical side effects, aside from the 70 staples.
2. changing the subject do only the rich deserve the best healthcare?
cons: you have to pay the 0.5% funding fee.
here is what you should have asked layton...
his ratings don't match that claim.
in the great debate over newt and his love life, people keep bringing up the case of clinton.
let's not go conspiracy here..but
there are even putin youth leagues harassing opponents above the law.
opec has never been able to enforce any of its quotas on production or prices.
i agree that there has to be a reasonable amount of secrecy in a case like this.
he was so passed out that he didn't even flinch.
the my physio said 'stop taking the ibuprofen, that won't help.'
once they remembered that i needed inviting to things because i was no longer in a position to hear about things in discussion i never got left out again.
i don't mind paying taxes, but i hate to see so many of my neighbors having to move because of these huge increases.
you do realize in the united states we can vote for anyone of any party or of no party at all, right?
don't even get me started on how badly labour wrecked the economy, or how they totally destroyed the police force.
i lost him when i was quite young, and like most ww ii vets, he would never discuss what he'd been through.
they are just doing another day at work.
based on the highly regarded novel by väinö linna.
it is now undergoing political turmoil with tens of thousands out on the street.
- ronald reagan thank you all for your input.
why does it matter that he's black?
i'm sure the house came with a child sized hole kicked in already.
the location of a person's birth doesn't make his life any more or less valuable than his neighbor's.
she's on line here but hasn't answered as to whether or not she follows all of leviticus, and whether or not she want's our nation's laws to follow all of leviticus.
just this shoulder pain.
you can have wild sex without contraception.
they cant bring back my bother.
at the same time, you will go metric with immediate effect and without the benefit of conversion tables.
so why wasn't she able to report this factually, and based on that why should we believe her reporting?
democrats should be ashamed of this administration and their hyper partisan, dishonest, fear mongering.
am i confusing my numbers, or is that about ten percent of the population?
no one has yet written the equivalent tale from china, and the russian story has only partly emerged.
people who design the robots.
they have craft things, bingo, speakers, dances etc. she really enjoys it and wouldn't get out much otherwise.
ask yourself this question!
when would you prefer him to announce his resignation and start the process of electing a new leader?
mean, i know that a car is a material posession, but i like to keep my stuff looking nice if i can help it.
a well stated answer, willow.
so it's an economic not a military invasion.
they understand that that there are many other factors to be considered (i.e.
ask for the crime number and see.
if so i'd try and get the same sort of flowers hi, so sorry for your loss.
it was an eye-opener.
i became aware of a strong, beautiful woman, heard her speak, "i want to ask a question.
so, why beat around the bush?
if they have made peace with their pay, then there is no reason you should not be at peace with their pay as well.
everyone in our society gets a voice.
lemme change her real quick for you."
currently none of the procedures i have been recommended for are on the no go list, but it exists.
some who went to war didn't want to go, but felt they could not disobey.
vor: have you read george orwell's 1984?
but even if you have a sound business plan...and
new countries joined in fear from economical revenge for refuse.
and just wait till you see what they have to say about the business of global warming orthodoxy 40 years from now.
carter signed an executive order on july 3, 1979 authorizing funding for cia covert activities.
there are lovely blokes out there who dont give a toss about physical appearance in that way.
i have not read what she said beyond this site nor do i care what she said.
when i was done i would either flush or drag them around the house.
this seems to come up a lot as well, as a matter fo fact countries were better off under british rule..bring
i don't need you to state whether you've excused it or not, by your actions its clear that you have.
it seems like if a candidate went to a state, and said, "i hate all of you.
he doesnt seem to realise or maybe he just doesnt care how it makes me feel.
meets dr. king; asks him for a job.
early in our friendship she confessed her marriage was in trouble...i
that is, they legally exclude any other company from providing services in the area.
it seems this morning that it's the conservative party."...<cont>
he can run with palin.
godspeed mr. president...
cartels always fall apart.
it would take decades for iran to develop enough arms to really threaten israel and they never will anyways.
wars can speed the process up but as soon as the war is over it goes back to the same old slow approval process.
so what does this have to do with newt?
it's extremely difficult for china to be certified organic because of their practices.
however you phrase it, we have not seen tax receipts this low as a percentage of gdp since the end of wwii.
not one speech he's given tells me he loves this country.
(or seem to by not just saying it doesn't.)
at least we assume so.
robert, next to that easy emotional comment which seems to ventilate frustration...
he added that nato sent a delegation to meet with local leaders and investigate the incident.
george bush chose a black woman to be his top adviser on national security.
stop getting your info from fox.
they are sitting on over a trillion dollars in cash.
how about all of new york state?
it was only meant to be temporary but my partner then realised he quite liked the idea of a regular income also, and also found work.
i think you need to stop obsessing about what your friends are doing without you, and start inviting them to do things with you.
it's not healthy for our nation.
that is because, speaking for myself, i recognize the oppressive nature of that government.
the politics of congress).
what if they do try very hard at their homework and blow it at the test.
they are not made up of the usual zombietime bums, college students or acorn bussed in hacks and seiu union thugs or commie funded answer geeks.
is there really monies in this ue ext.
you're offended when people use the word "brew" to mean beer.
because they're not shameful liberal media race-baiters.
and that was certainly a motivator for me to work my way up the career ladder of my profession.
there is no possible way the cbo's or any of the various blogs cited numbers here can work.
sue your high school english teacher.
i am not sure if what i have written is what the coroner actually wants or what he can use.
all life and death medical decision do, in my opinion.
al sharpton grew up doing the preacher circuit for his particular brand of religion.
think it's going to stay that way with less police?
ah, but then bush is bush!
it has gone something like this: first, there was an effort to say that no warming existed at all.
honestly when you think about it it really does look just..
and where he sticks his wand can be a matter of national importance.
the government didn't have any thing to do with it.
he's a very smart man.
i didnt do as well at stanford, by the way.
bill clinton got a blowjob in the oval office.
silly me i didnt total how much but it was about 4 debts in total and i am sure it must have been about 5k in total.
some just want america to fail.
determining the law and instructing the jury in that law is what the judge is for.
but, if you are alluding to the idea that some people may die, i agree.
easy enough to google to discover the flaws but here is one commentary on it.
and i think i had the highest grade point in my college of humanities.
great britain: the countries of england, scotland and wales.
you must spread some reputation around before giving it to katzndogz again.
he got taken to a&e and is still in hospital now.
the school know he has this obviously and told the cdc he 'was fine' at school so the doc was really rude and said that i needed to do what the school was doing.
it could be worth a cheap ish course in assertivness (or a book).
i wouldn't be asking for anything in return but the chance to improve life for others.
the problem with these 'resolutions' targeting iran is that everyone can see the hypocrisy, its a case of our allies can have nukes but others can't.
i fully and totally agree.
it's whether or not political rhetoric can cause people to do violence.
how the hell was this allowed to happen for over 10 years?
relate is not just about keeping a couple together.
we seem to have lost sight of the meaning of the whole thing...is
our nation as (they?)
believe that their country is under threat?
for me, natural labor was quick and easy.
there is no such thing as u.s. english.
@patiodog, (i've shared this story before so please forgive the rerun...)
i am now overpaying a bit and have 8.5 years left and can visibly see it reducing every time i log on to my online account.
the next problem is that this world police has issued arms ownership licenses so liberally that the world police does not control the world territory.
they live in england and should speek english!
they screwed the pooch on this story.
it was bloody hard work and working for free to gain experience is a good thing.
and of all that only the maintenance and perhaps the engineering is generally us provided.
lots of luck, she will get through this phase!
didn't figure in the interest that'll be due on it, did you?
i'd love to tear apart his lies, but i don't know how good i'd be on a radio show.
the crate i keep my puppy in is tiny...about
but it said it was still investigating the cause and conducting a recovery operation at the site.
*drool* she may be a socialist, but at least she's a hot one!
all those things you mention are the twisted twine ball of the government.
you speed walk in your sleep.
it's a tough call even for states, because of what i said in the first paragraph.
so if he were to leave his lesbian wife for a man he might lose his children.
so i was living at a homeless tent city called camp take notice in ann arbor and i was living in a tent with the man i was in a relationship with.
wtf is that all about?
by the way, the truth of the super committee negotiations is that the democrats didn't off one single plan.
england remains a world power, the rest degenerating under the yoke of socialism.
if your problem is with the banks,then sue the banks and try to get some money out of them.
my sister is getting ready to go to uni and i really am starting to resent him for how my life is now.
i have no problem with that.
reality, of course, disagrees.
in short, she doesn't have a clue what she's talking about.
plus, i'm kind of scared of him.
continue living off the backs of those who pay for their benefits without any obligation to offer anything in return?!
contrary to the persistent vomiting of 24hr news networks, the news doesn't really change as often as their advertisers would have you believe.
you cannot continue to 'be her friend' out of pity, and tbh you are not being true to yourself if you feel like this and then invite her places.
the fact that nixon and carter were uxorious did not make them good presidents.
even in light of this recent information, repubs still say it was a waste.
spent many hours with her talking and listening, trying to make sense of her troubles and provide a shoulder to cry on.
to suggest that blacks are not poor due to external factors leaves black disproportionate poverty to be the result of internal factors, which could only mean that blacks are inferior.
i would certainly label him a narcissist or a psychopath.
for the most part, i think the market should be allowed to set it's own price, but would agree that there does have to be a minimum wage of some kind.
at least he didn't choose to carry a great big gun that killed his target, who was not committing any capital crime.
he still has a job becuase the city was unaffected...but he lost his home.
this person is only going to get worse - not better.
wow that vor person is a idiot!
oh spare us all this nonsense you keep pulling out of your ass.
there are times, especially when we are pregnant, that we have to prioritize.
and tell them if they cannot wait how to protect themselves.
they are merely retaliating to whatever our politicians throw at them!
is no consideration to be given to the crim?
but they have new truck every year, a huge custom and all their kids dive nice cars and go to state collages.
or maybe just a commutation of sentence like for scooter libby.
wanted to know if a bracelet i had listed at $14.50 was sterling silver.
police are convinced that there are people who know something, but no one has come forward with any information.
i'm sure that idea will win great support amongst the populous.
it was my stepdad that had said "so and so died of a broken heart" and i would laugh.
i clicked on everything and couldn't find a link.
my bother, aunt, uncle and mysteriously this old women that was also involved in my court case.
new zealand beer is also acceptable, as new zealand is pound for pound the greatest sporting nation on earth and it can only be due to the beer.
some refused to go because they didn't want to be killed.
i agree with you about 'shouting about being different', what do you count as proclaiming difference?
the international development secretary, hilary benn, the former health secretary alan milburn, and the leader of the commons, jack straw, are all at 25/1.
* stop giving money belonging to we the people, away to the corrupt politicians of foreign governments.
the way the system is designed, not much more than this is practically possible.
i don't know what to make of the whole thing to be honest..
but when it came to what i questioned?
so i have been looking around for somewhere else.
don't you follow, and want our laws to follow all of leviticus?
in fact, watching fox will tell you the exact opposite of what you are claiming.
it is looking bad for ray right now.
i never had any luck with the temp agencies, one time i got a voice mail from one of them saying they had a job for me.
always easy to blame others for your ineptitude.
thus the need for health care insurance reform...the
does this sound fair?would the kids be happier with two fathers who love them than a man and woman where only one parent really loves them?
into actually rebuilding the country.
crony capitalism has been on the fore front of political debate for at least a few years now.
and of course it not ever their fault, as it's now fox news, the righties, blaa blaa blaa.
now the space-shuttle program is going tits up thanks to him so we're pretty much out of the space business.
false it is down 11%.
she is so sensitive that even if i don;t eat dinner she gets in a mood and takes it personally!
we didn't really get anywhere so he dropped me home and told me to go and that it would be a 50 50 decision to split.
i was in and out of the wards, civilian and va 2 or 3 times a year from 96 to 2000.
after college i, like many others at the time, felt a compulsion to change what we saw as inequalities in the world and became a social worker.
i asked if they had showed him the time as he needs visual prompts and she said 'i told him he had 10 minutes' i asked if she showed him 10 minutes and she said no.
usually, there is only 1 us at 20 weeks with my midwife unless there are other circumstances.
it's the biggest, hottest news story in media.
you can claim it's false all you want, but facts are facts.
most christians do not hate gay's, they hate the sin.
all politics aside, it was the most important issue on the ballot as far as i was concerned.
you think this whole thread is conspiracy theory bs?
or like oil companies, who have a cartel.
that is exactly what happened: no, it isn't, unless you believe that the instant vaporization of hundreds of thousands of people can be written off because of their nationality.
again, you daft cunt, i'm not rich and i get great health coverage.
i wrote in my journal that it felt like i had a leather mask on my head.
"for over 20 years, i have illustrated the absurd with absurdity, three hours a day, five days a week.
should we be talking to someone about this?
common sense tells us that bankers that have to sell their third vacation home are the one's with entitlement issues.
i don't actually give two figs what minimum wage does for or against the economy.
thank god for the 99%ers' they seem to understand the system is rigged.
so it is a big deal that they are coming.
the tea party didn't promote ending the intereference of religion in politics.
there, now, isn't that more literate than 'lying racist'...
you must have seen zona's post on the other thread.
most christians do not hate gay's, they hate the sin.
i believe this man gets it.
he is an ex-ecb vice president.
the detective in charge hasn't answered phone calls and his bag hasn't been returned to him, which contained business papers and clothes.
pakistani military, isi or the nwo order?
the lawmakers choice to bail out the banks is an entirely separate issue of accountability.
bloodletting is not a valid medical treatment, either.
i think the lakotas never expected to win in court..ray
seems to me you would want them to make money in order to have money in order to clean up this mess..
i curse worse than a sailor so i felt it was best to think about those choice words for her.
who said zimmerman is a victim?
the rich don't need cobra, they can buy their own individual policy at any price...so
this development is interesting because it raises a lot of fascinating questions about economic management.
how will conservatives respond to the issues?
exactly how awesome are you, anyway?
do we want iran to become the next north korea?
it's a human endeavor.
ground/home deliver tues thru sat...
a recent example is how a federal court rejected a lawsuit based on "national security."
my mum married the other man and stayed with him until he died.
it make sense to at least release one proper picture of bin laden too to silence all the critics?
i agreed to marry him.
its hard to understand why the brits would desire to be assimilated into the eu.
people who design the robots.
they leave that pathetic shite to cnn & nbc.
:/ after reading through the posts in this thread, isn't the main issue one where british nationals are being denied the right to come here.
"all i want is a chevrolet."
i wasnt trying to make him feel bad.
you wouldn't have an original thought if it hit you in the face.
i have a brother and sister that do not speak to me and they think this was a brilliant way to get back at me (believe it or not!!).
the politics of congress).
who said anything about the csi program, genius.
why do you think that commandment is there?
i think this is a political not current event thread.
president bush became the first president to spend 3 percent of gdp on federal antipoverty programs.
it seems like every time something goes on between my husband and i that his friends have to get involved or make rude comments.
it may destabilize the gulf for a while, but in the long run it will prove to be fruitful.
our justice system is rotten to the core, so what are we going to do about it?
if you want to learn absolutely nothing, whilst watching the poor old teacher trying to play a role that largely consists of being a jail warden, then go to a comprehensive.
i don't need you to state whether you've excused it or not, by your actions its clear that you have.
they are the voice and interpreters of this tort and did their duty.
only caught this thread tonight, but yay for you and the date!
does it automatically get split between me and my sisters or do we have to try and track down this other will?
she actually asked me if i had a can of pumpkin for back up.
this has been so usual for us that i can bring her home and not change her again til 6:30 or 7 and her diaper is still peed in but not full at all.
(this is in primary by the way).
in your own mind, maybe, outside of it, the word may take on a different meaning.
in actual practise, the clinics tend to keep the embryos on ice because they fear law suits.
i told him not to come back, but i know yet again i will take him back.
conventional weapons may not even be able to hit some of the fortified facilities either.
no one appears to have posted about this yet.
in any case, the basis of the thread is still shot to hell.
no atomic bombs, no surrender.
it does exist, and it's a fucking crime.
newt's relations with women are at best reprehensible.
it simply covers the things we have been talking about.
this is england, we are a 3rd world dumping ground for some reason..
i know when the only solution is to spend trillions for minimal, unproven benefit, i know the liar is a leftist.
so if the jury was in fact instructed incorrectly, chances are they will not come to the correct conclusion.
the problem i have here is that the wbc's site isn't a memorial site for matthew snyder, it is their own property to disseminate their point of view.
the former home secretary charles clarke is the outsider at 66/1.
but our parents said "oh no, it was an accident".
michigan is also considered mitt's home state.
the world police can send troops to surround the criminals, but there are no easy and clean options to go in without either of the armed forces massacring a lot of the hostages too.
there are no groups of right wingers dancing in the streets waving signs that say "death to liberals!"
president bush presided over a $2.5 trillion increase in the public debt through 2008.
i along with other christians will bow to allah (who is the same god i worship anyway) and watch the fireworks.
the constant stream of pinocchios he has gotten from the washington post, on easily checked facts, demonstrates this.
i want to thank all of you who participated and also craven for giving us the opportunity.
wait, see and hoard cash.
you sit in front of one of mankind's greatest inventions.
the kid is a monster with no respect for human life.
the international alliance did not release further details.
ann coulter didn't laugh.
in their view, there is a difference between an embryo and a brain dead person.
yes, there are many variables that affect prices, and trying to explain it through one company is not realistic.
do not pay attention to the evidence!
that was also about a blow job, of course.
and all to few understand, therefore nothing will be done to avoid the slide.
and besides they do update their platform.
so nursing care isn't wonderful.
hardly fills me with confidence that they should be allowed to have nuclear weapons.
perhaps its time for budget and personel cuts in the justice dept if all you have to do is bust for weed.
we called the campgrounds and the owners said they had cleaned our campsite and did not find anything.
bullies "attempted" to beat me up while the other kids looked on and helped the bullies.
or does anyone know any way i could help it?
laws should be for everyone.
since being made redundant i have worked really hard at both getting the house together and finding another job.
as for his pension, would that not have been sorted when he divorced your mum?
the left is fighting for freedom of choice.
the president's biological father was kenyan, and obama barely knew him.
china has been very successful economically, and plans to continue.
we have shed thousands of lives in iraq and afghanistan and what have we accomplished?
anyone that has a nickel in their pocket has a part in controlling commerce.
practically, nobody cared.
it appears that, though you claim to value education - we must have very different understandings of what the word 'education' means also.
i just wondered if anyone else had been in the same situation and could offer me some advice so i can move forward from this.
in america we have a thing called due process.
i already showed you that there has been no decrease in outgoing lw radiation since 1970 according to the satellite record in spite of a marked increase in atmospheric co2.
they are a pissed off and unaffiliated new breed of political monster that no one knows what to make of yet.
got in and out with relative ease the last time i went.
this won't be the last rise in tuition fees.
what are scientists who are educated in how to treat and prevent the problem going to do?
i think there is a broader view of holding people accountable that your conveniently ignore with your argument.
three of the seals being rescued were also killed and the fourth wounded.
it gives me just as good a reason never to use ebay.
as unions usually do, they chose keeping their benefits at the level they are, over keeping cops on the job, and the lay offs happened.
i really dont know what to do...
it's kind of scary but the thing is he wants to be caught, he's just making people work to catch him.
are they not a media company interesting in keeping the populate updated on the latest and greatest and hottest news?
the bush administration put them back in.
i chose to allow him to do so.
i wonder whether khadaffi's move heralds a new direction in the realtionship between the west and the formerly anti-us arab nations.
the conversation turned to politics, which led eventually to a rather silly looking woman (rslw) saying that she hated the bnp.
wher the women even those pregnant were not allowed any breaks except a 30 minute lunch perid.
it was so secret that james bamford was able to write a book about in 1982, the puzzle palace.
oh my god, you really are a racist aren't you?
until two days ago, i didn't know they actually made guns for kids (and i'm not talking about toy guns).
i do appreciate the fact this shooter was not charged or detained, since he was acting within his understanding of the laws we have now.
even though i do work, but he is the one that pays the majority of our bills.
i will say that i have never found an article on the milwaukee voucher program that proves it's working.
the high court declared the case against the machines moot since the justice department has now cleared the machines, and ordered another part back to court to decide a fight over attorney fees.
problem i see is not the color of people that live in here and not from where they come.
that's why i no longer laugh at them.
we created 11 million jobs.
i still like you, but i am beginning to wonder why.
the vote for gay marriage is about to happen in maine.
sorry to rant about gypsies so much, but there is so few that listen, i take my chances whenever i can.
this september i left home, and started at university.
i am also reading about that recently (e.g.
they never get presidential attendence do they?
this contraception thing is nothing but a new shiny object to distract the easily distracted and unfocused republicans.
actually, it's people who build the robots since not enough are being made to create an assembly line.
police say that's a standard practice whenever a taser is used.
totally free of course.
but at least i'll have peace of mind that he's ok.
i know they are not saving and i just cant understand!
lefties are either constantly outraged or the poor victum.
seems there isn't a whole lot of disagreement with this decision after all.
something needs to change before we aren't a so called democracy anymore.
sorry to moan but i really feel down now and dont know what to do or say.
and since they are not taxing my parents, and this is new money to me, then it has the right to be taxed.
we should start a sequence of these threads ;-).
it exists on the other end of the spectrum.
if she cant communicate then her familywould be free to do what they wanted with her without getting found out.
you can take a picture of yourself from ten feet away without using the timer.
but man are a lot of middle class and even poor americans brainwashed.
i don't spend my days surfing for news bytes to find something to bitch about.
care i think sinatra unsubscribed from his own thread.
for example, it's okay for you to impose your value, because you are special?
and when that happens, it hurts the feelings of our troops.
i lost my mum and i felt the same way, for quite a long time, so i think i understand how it is for you.
mike mcqueary is an interesting case in that he was practically raised to be a part of the penn state family.
tens of thousands of americans!
they offered up private solutions, good ones, ones that don't increase taxes on anyone.
i think it's a real shame on the part of our government for treating them like this.
aig gets bailed out, then gives multi-million dollar bonuses in the very same year.
in russia, 56% positively evaluate the work of obama.
this, had we be wiling to talk about it seriously at the time, would have been legitimate cause for concern.
they might be hiding him or something, in which case what is the problem?
at least that is my hope.
why didn't we ever hear about it during the bush admin when during his admin the national debt was more than doubled?
it's one thing if you are just lazy and forget, but its another thing to lie about diaper changes all together.
none of them conformed to the conditions set out and agreed to by the allies.
i try not to assume i fully understand those i encounter, but i do react to things i see and i do have opinions.
nothing i could do will change the face of the past.
come out of your plane and hump in my boots!
"childhood," as just an aspect of being human, is a rather recent concept.
a veritable achievement indeed.
folks will be lined up outside the polling places, just waiting to color in the dot next to any democrat that goes up against these baboons!
i know i'm just a mere human, i have no right to question a corporation.
some of the autobiographies are good though, i've got major's, thatchers, hestletine's, lawson's and howe's.
i know i'm just a mere human, i have no right to question a corporation.
the fact that you indicated they are not open monday tells me this is a ground/home delivery shipment - express delivers seven days a week, altho there are surcharges for weekend deliveries.
so, i answered her question patiently and honestly.
something d-man doesn't want to touch on.
however, they did strive to make everyone equal under the law.
the millionaires got one.
the solution will not or should not be requesting a schedule change for ms.i.
the majority of this nation believes in god and believes that he will turn on us.
hopefully you have been declaring this income to the taxman?
what kind of history do the us have then?
in fact, watching fox will tell you the exact opposite of what you are claiming.
girls who play bisexual for male attention are just infuriating though, and absolutely demean the efforts and image of lgbt people.
this has been talked about for some time though.
it's the biggest, hottest news story in media.
i never got a birthday or xmas card, let alone anything else.
removing the staples was horrible and weird.
she has said that the club has helped her with the grieving as she has so many friends there.
utter fucking nonsense.
you are so good for not letting rip at her in front of her friends.
some of the autobiographies are good though, i've got major's, thatchers, hestletine's, lawson's and howe's.
how long ago was this?
the truth is the current socio-economic system is out of date.
he does not have the balls to put his own numbers on the table, and suggest how they pay for it.
i would look up the yellow pages for advice places and give them a phone.
hiya all -long posting alert!!!!
while i'm sure mr schlesinger enjoyed taking a swipe at the departed mr bush, he adds nothing to the debate.
so say those that ruined it.
best wishes, yes he had an affair.
i suppose this type of callousness towards the slaughter of civilians should be expected from an avowed zionist.
it is possible that powell sold his soul to the devil like the rest of them.
don't even want to imagine pitocin-induced contrax.
i had to pay for curtains because our flat is old, on a corner and freezing.
did the report actually reflect what they wanted?
it should be evey man for himself.
did you ever think about wearing a little slip in bed?
i'm not rich and they saved me $2400 last year.
woman at the nursery also said that they're appalling in answering calls, i was on for over half an hour waiting for an answer in the morning.
yes, yes you have buried your head in the sand, sail away.
the appellate court ordered the case back to juvenile court.
mass media are a good mirror to show how much a life is worth or worthless for them in different parts of the world.
i suppose it's against the rules for democrats to question these things...i
2. speak to a solicitor.
how is that possible?
i'll stick my neck out here but my 11 yo often stays at home on her own for short periods of time (about an hour or so) is this an option for part of the time?
so i offered to make whatever she didn't want to, and at first she didn't want me to have to make anything.
they gave up the comforts of home and being surrounded by friends and family let alone there status as wanted criminals.
clearly those who travel on buses have a greater level of decency.
skip, that's also very true.
my experience with black people (or negroes as we said then) started as a boy in detroit.
there does not exist such a thing as chinas attempt to attack india or suppress indias development.
i dont understand where my parents money goes!
it also proves that i'm dead on about breitbart being a lying hack...
there are some things you don't need to be told since they are so bleeding obvious?
i was extremely green and not at all effective for the most part.
rex, i am a conservative,and you are an idiot.
he just doesnt get it.
the federal government's own unemployment figures and the current condition of the housing and other consumer markets belie any published numbers handed out by the left, the white house or cbo.
noddy, you always say the very thing that evokes strong reactions in me.
correlation is not causation.
do you have his mum's backing on what you're doing?
mention cannabis and they roll their fucking eyes.
let's hope the frogs do the right thing.
abhisit is adamant the government will not crack down, but security forces will take action if the protests turn violent.
greatly lower your expectations, etc. and just enjoy the visit with the woman that revels in your supposed fat-ness.
since we have started doing it he has come home with a certificate from school each week saying he has got all his spellings right.
your nervous twitch registers on the richter scale.
in the 60-70s timeframe it was resurrected in a different way to describe strong force interactions.
the wbc people were never suspected to be all that bright though.
then i have had instances where 2 people have not received their items but that is because they had p.o.
in addition to this they belong to the shiite sect of islam which automatically links them to iran.
if you doubt it, just look at the ideologues they put on the thing.
there is so much wrong and you don't seem to understand what's wrong.
so i was just wondering why the media is so stupid?
this country has lost sight of itself.
christy is a fat sack of shit.
he creates k'nex models out of his head (not what's on the box) that can move and wind things up.
its like that whole little legal business didnt even exist.
but it's also possible that something more mysterious is going on.
it helps that the media hasn't given him the same anal-probing the gop field has gotten.
i saw this as just another fox flunkie pushing the "class warfare" line that's heard from the neocon/teabagger pundits in the media.
debt slavery here's a hint.
also, assuming the whole thing is a sham..
therefore it's a false graph.
when i asked him why he likes the violin he said it's because he likes classical music.
not really, most of the lost sdp votes went to the greens.
and i do believe we have that power to make it happen, or to extend ourselves longer if we want.
they can do both ;-)!
that would be like a devout muslim opening a liquor store but refusing to sell booze.
people who are the technicians to maintain the robots.
every single person who is assuming zimmerman should be in jail just because the kid he shot was black.
that is the entire case.
there are usually women's groups at the different churches, and often volunteers will come to provide transport.
bridey-there is a mm poster who left the law and went to education policy.
the nature was so amazing...
yes i have seen that documentary - very good.
wtites, that's what i wanted to say.
your first-aid kit contains two pints of coffee with an i.v.
networks without assistance.
@edgarblythe, that is very sad.
it's really good, and quite innovative in places.
rest inured, i will not persecute them to the full extent of the law.
the taster's choice couple wants to adopt you.
robert reich in the last three decades or so, income inequality has been growing.
people who design the parts the robots make.
anyway, i brought this up to the manager and she talked to mrs. i. this was about 1 month ago.
and these feelings are beating away at me.
this 2011 article from the journal sentinel cites data finding that students who participate in the voucher program did not perform better than their public school peers.
and the crowd would not be knowing that she would be adding more at the end, was sure applauding her story of what she did...
i'm saying we use technology to its fullest potential and alleviate humans of physical labor.
they paid him over $30 million.
you seriously think the left doesn't have equally distasteful bumper stickers?
first time i got arrested i didn't get my mcchicken or 3 quarters back.
i just don't feel comfortable with expanding iied that far, wbc assholes or no.
stripped of everything that would help the economy.
killed by violent partners who had pursued and threatened them for years - who had made numerous threats to kill them.
or in a wheelchair forever.
whenever he acted out with someone new i would say, congratulations, he trusts you.
she tried to push me to commit to going to the smithsonian to try for a job - why, i was not sure.
most americans are just to dumb to realize that their way of life is going to be changing for the worse and we are barely seeing the results of their apathy.
they all have their issues.
it doesnt allow us to forecast properly..
nor have i seen any proof that those who are associated with the so-called ground zero mosque were in anyway associated with the murderers of 9/11.
most christians do not hate gay's, they hate the sin.
was it as gruelling for them as i'm imagining?
i think it may be called the family.
i've called ebay, they promise to do something, nothing is done, she is still burning sellers.
looks like the guy that would deliver your mail, mow your lawn for you if you were sick...very
didnt want to read and run..
and stop worrying about it...
but that info is from 2007, best i can tell.
but i would really recommend that you get an appointment with your uni counselling services.
it is not reasonable to host an event called the world series for a game which is not played outside of america.
most people would go to school and indugle in the arts and music.
| decisions based on evidence ...the
i think you've come down with ctd, conspiracy theory disease.
as the only white in the hall, i understood why the question was being asked.
ya think he wanted to hire new people?
mr. chalabi sit directly behind mrs bush during the last state of the union address.
and then people could come in and say, look, i have got so many hours and afternoons, what do you have for me?
now of course its everyones fault but their own.
that would explain all your common sense postings,lol.
mi-6 stood by that statement.
i would not even raise my voice to her or her boyfriend.
(funny - we all looked forward to the occasional divert to da nang with its hooches and booze.)
i went to see another male friend last night who i know has a thing for me, and he started hitting on me and i let him have sex with me, until i realised i couldn't do it and stopped and made him take me home.
there's no such thing as arguing for peace rather than a the continuation of a morbid death cult.
less cops - more murder and rapes.
know we would love our own house but i can't save anything until the end of my dmp.
in this case i think that is beyond ceasar's bounds.
nothing that i have read in this interaction leads me to believe anyone is exaggerating except maybe you.
he's recently changed policy to go after the iranian agents that are supplying the militias.
i have had two periods of counselling in my life, over roughly 15 months from december 2009 until around march this year.
really stinks at it was just our anniversary right before.
as a general question, i would like to ask others to see what you think?
you've worn out your third pair of tennis shoes this week.
are you going for effort or result?
last night, defence confirmed it was aware of the report and was seeking more information.
the fact is, the tax cut/rebate he gave both times put money into mostly the lower to middle class folks.
how does that change the fact i'm breathing oil fumes right now?
but what is this anger going to get you.
unfortunately they're going to end up at the same address six feet under - they be pals or israelis.
waiting in an outer hall, i stood to the side as my boss conversed with someone.
it was many other portions of your thesis that were in question.
why does it matter that he's black?
also, finding out what it was all about the hard way.
we should abolish medicare and the va.
i'll pay back the loans for the education i received, i have no issues with that.
who in the media's been going "half-cocked" and how did they do it?
you say youre living at home with your parents.
i don't really know what is up but i'm super mad about it.
so the big fish stays big and little guppies cant have shit.
i felt so terrible that i went insane on my thighs and cut them to bits because i can't bear for anyone else to see them ever again.
it is all about demanding those taxpayer freebies.
thai thaksin supporters plan largest rally since april riots june 27 (bloomberg) -- thai anti-government protesters who support former prime minister thaksin shinawatra plan to meet in bangkok today in what organizers say will be the largest rally since the army quelled riots by the group in april.
when you open your dish cabinet, and there is only mugs.
why hasn't the us government done that (if the affair is fake, taht is..)
the word threat or threaten was never once spoken by obama.
you think a trillion dollars is puny?
as a weak country with no big weapons to defend its people..
if the idea of 9/11 complicity is ever to be taken seriously by the masses, people must stop buying into obvious hoaxes and disinformation and focus solely on the true facts.
it wasn't always easy but it has enriched my son's life no end.
the separation of the roles of priest and healer of the body started in recent times and in relatively small geocultural areas.
they have not implemented the social stories as advised by the speech therapist so this could have helped him understand.
rupert murdoch inherited his father's ownership of two newspapers in the u.k. (australia).
moveon, dailykos, msnbc & the dems have a lot more, thanks to a friendly hungarian.
edgar, you may be right - at least in part.
they havent raised any moral issues or issues of any kind with having to provide contraception at no additional cost.
about the unemployment bill?
i had planned none of this, so i had little to share.
i used to watch these guys when i ran the texas rangers ball club.
how about some of your own medicine.
wednesday’s decision is likely to please turkey, which has warned that the bill, if enacted, would seriously affect turkish-french ties.
does not have the vision or the courage to sustain a program like apollo.
suicide rates are sky high indicting desperation and sadness.
people who believe that it is a cover up also think the movie "independence day" is a documentary.
i have tough skin and a suspicious heart.
the link would have provided you with another aid too...
they think that the stop snitchin' campaign has something to do with it.
seeing a pattern here yet?
guess, what the lower middle to middle class already cannot afford it.
also i dont see thre being white majority groups in those countries, if anything they are getting smaller.
pedorathist that trained me are from texas and trained at the austin, texas location.
"it is getting hotter, and the icecaps are melting and there is a buildup of carbon dioxide in the air."
historically there has been hundreds of millions murdered in the name of islam across the world, every year there are hundreds of thousands murdered in the name of islam.
so - if they are at little risk of re-offending - what do we do?
you have a crystal ball?
is your health care rationed?
thousands were literally bawling at his funeral.
a fair enough question, since i was the only white one on board.
it was really weird to see such a thing on fox.
we are the home of tesla motors that only the "sean penns" of the world can afford.
the era that the book covers is the worst era in tory party history so there is bound to be a lot of criticism in there but he is not slagging off the conservative party.
that darn liberal media never goes after liberals!!!
and there will not be any stain on that money abetting abortions.
allowing them to set up camp, much like they did in afghanistan to launch attacks accross the world?
i know that bothers you socialists/progressives, but that's the way it is.
we will be a third world country before you know it.
sure as hell doesn't sound safer to me.
i can't wait for delivery day!
i suggest you spread yourself out.
because he isn't a leader, he is a perpetual campaigner and chief.
other than that, i'm afraid there's not much else you can do.
the obama administration?
the prime minister is also 14/1 to stay on long enough to beat margaret thatcher's 11-year spell.
still trying to believe that the world is a zero sum game?
but it hurt 100x worse.
so far great shoe even though they cost so much.
this was an accident...
i am heart sorry for you.
a lot of this revolves around money (or lack of), weddings = money, children = money and houses = money.
why would they go to war over an ideology?
your exclusionary club of bigotry is about to be infiltrated.
he knew that even though it wasn't his fault he was in trouble.
wtf are you babbling about?
returned with great quality and a great representation of our firm.
government or the guys that actually own the business?
and they would try and put people together with volunteer opportunities.
it was our day, how we wanted and it was wonderful.
he insisted one of the workers at the dmv give him one and she turned him down and got fired because of that.
i don't care if my 10-year old boy plays hours and hours of gta (ok, maybe not too much).
everything's fair game on a public board.
Not only PAMPLEMOUSSE - according to experts, even orange juice and apple contain substances that inhibit medicines.
The fact that the OSCE, during the evaluation of the campaign, has highlighted the positive changes rather than the shortcomings, such as the ban to run for a third of the candidates for the opposition, referred to a prior appeasement.
In the Czech Republic, no chance, say the mobile operators
I already knew the word thanks to my mangas.
Before off for the US, Nicolas Sarkozy will take a detour by the Kingdom.
And even if we could prove that for Man: How could anyone show the same for rats?
But there are also many politicians who resist pressure from the ndrangheta, heroes who are honest "
Analysts of the bank reduced their expectations for next year, given the fall in consumption of oil due to the slowdown in economic growth, were therefore obliged to reduce of 20pour cent, forecasts of oil and gas prices for 2009.
Soccer - The Impact in the semi-finals
Such geo-strategic thoughts, however, reveals only one of the sides.
"It would be a mistake to underestimate her.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
Jeremiah Moss, who writes a blog called Jeremiah's Vanishing New York (subtitled "The Book of Disputes: A look bitterly nostalgic on A City in the process of extinction") describes the history of the City and Extra Place, in a piece published in 1952 in The New Yorker.
The choice of operators is unfortunately miserable and is limited, in most cases, to radio tubes.
He believes that this will lead to a reduction in the rate of accidents and the number of deaths on the roads the Czech Republic.
Bastian Reinhard would also have wanted be more relaxed.
"We report extremely well, despite what do the people."
The benefits and those net from financial transactions were, compared to the same period last year, fell to zero, the profits from the allocation of debt securities and determined and the termination of provisions in the operations of credit had fallen by more than 70 percent to 5 million.
Mango has just presented the second edition of the Botón-Mango Fashion Awards, in order to strengthen international image of the new talent of the way.
Therefore seek games calm and avoid the programmes or television series that are more or less violent.
"We believe that, in general, it is not enough to block the phenomenon of accidents and the contrast can be done through numerous actions."
The fact that Google is a base for genetic data can give a good raw material for the next generation of science-fiction. The famous novel by Cory Doctorow, writes with half orwellien tones , describing the future in which a man could be approached only through data from Google.
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
Eric Smith made another pass and intercepted him.
He is bound to inform the authorities if it wants to go abroad for more than three days.
There are not only 1,000 but 1001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of daily life.
In addition, the mayor of Rome is keen to stress that "the Commission is not an unnecessary bureaucratic body or a whole: It is absolutely free, and will not cost a euro the Roman city dwellers, and will serve to study and get the best minds that express the Capital.
And perhaps we will cease to call ourselves more expensive than the rest of Europe.
But 1001, and not one more or less.
Be writing to the left is Festival of beer, in Gothic, and alongside the Internet of the travel agency Marco conoscersiviaggiando.it '".
Passengers who do not take the suburban bus and do not recall the date when the validity of their coupon expires, can once more visit the new machines, originally used to record the voucher on their cards.
We asked 1500 people: What were the mistakes made by Bush during his mandate? 89% replied: Iraq.
The price of sectors of supply of electricity, gas, water and steam have exceeded of 18,7 percent the previous year.
The Congress agreed that the government of the United States could inject $700 billion into banks
For nearly 18 years, the space borehole "Ulysses" steals in the area.
Great admirer of literature of Galdós, José Luis Garci assures having made this film to resemble "the dream of child" through Esperanza Aguirre, who was in charge, three years ago to make a commemorative film for the two hundred years of 2 May of Madrid, something he has always accepted when the narrative stuck to the historical facts.
When times are tough and without reason to live, there are human beings that admiration and there is no need to be Luis Cernuda to love Paul Newman.
The Committee said that, in the past, the participation of MSkyB had prevented competition and had allowed it to unfairly influence ITV.
The foundation Esély Budapestért Alapítvány, at the request of the grouping of Fiatal Baloldal - Ifjú Szocialisták, has established a bill on the order of the Foundation has Harmadik Együtt Évezredért, for a total of four million HUF.
They as the anomaly of the support gravitationnel.
I find that the woman is more mature, has more experience and are relishing life with fewer problems.
With the collapse of the investment bank Lehman Brothers two weeks ago, the allocation of appropriations between banks has again expressed constant significantly, the banks that have accumulated their liquidity.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
And it adds: "It is almost impossible for a virtual operator appears in the network T-Mobile by the end of the year.
And taking into account the Smartphones and communicators, you have in your pocket a small computer.
Demand will acquire ground in many market segment of travel by air.
The subsequent part of the vehicle was charged with ballots of hashish, and then they have made his transfer to a police station for a thorough inspection and to weigh drugs.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the Silva case
It is true, I look forward to leave.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
In Florence, a bed costs on average, 350 / 400 euros, a room around EUR 700.
The Committee met on the request of the Minister for Sport Miroslaw Drzewiecki.
And casting aspersions on this woman who has been in a constant struggle for justice and deserves our admiration, says as much about the entourage of the Prime Minister as of Stephen Harper on himself.
That is how the world over, virtual operators are emerging as low cost alternatives - they offer cheap calls and text messages, at the cost of a limited supply of services.
An emotional campaign will drivers
The universal nature of the mobile is not without problems.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
When Favre and Coles to play catch, the defence was at the back of the Cardinals quarter, Kurt Warner.
"If this were not so, the mini self robot would not respond quickly enough to avoid the obstacle," explains Toshiyuki Andoh, the director of the mobility laboratory and of the project with robotized car.
The private bank Sal Oppenheim, has signed up to 23 million new shares.
State money and municipalities, approximately 65 million HUF in total, went in part into the coffers of the Fiatal Baloldal movement and on the other, into the pockets of some people.
But it seems pretty sure whether there will be a virtual operator in the Czech Republic, it will not be Mobilking.
Two aspects of the structure of our brain make the transposition of our subjective experience to that of animals difficult.
But there are some who try, and Paul Newman is an example.
Trerise wrote in a confession letter: "I feel responsible for her death".
The girl next to me was a big smile ironic, it found that it was an honour that the corresponding should sit next to it.
All this without blue screen.
Behind them, near a barrel of five litres of beer of the Kaiser brand, is a well built bearded man who shows to approximately 200 visitors to the beer festival what deep sounds his throat can produce.
Most of my developments refer to the content of the experienced aware, but there are also another aspect of the awareness that should be more easily accessible scientifically.
Accidents in the workplace, Napolitano: "Crucial" prevention
Gebrselassie based, goes beyond his world record.
I must play another match to feel comfortable. "
Renièrent legislators and supports the call to the project of President George Bush.
For the Sunia, exceptional measures through the revision of taxation, are necessary to lower prices.
Don't ever tell the child that you can listen to him at night to know his secret.
At auctions, buyers tend to spend more, and to overestimate the commodity.
The Scientific commity of the EU pointed out that users of mobile music devices, who are listening to music at full volume (more than 89 decibels) for five hours per week, are currently crossing the limits on the level of noise allowed at the workplace.
Italy "as the immigrant has recently become a destination for immigrants' met with resistance.
There was not much activity in the changing room, half-time was over, and most were sitting in their places.
"It is up to us, it is our future," he added, having made a dramatic break to look at the immense map behind him.
According to the study published in the journal Science, humans do not want to be dependent on this type of competition, such as an auction on eBay, and that is why they prefer even pay too high a price.
English Paula Radcliffe holds the world record of 2: 15: 25.
And taking into account Smartphones and communicators, you have in your pocket a veritable small computer.
He did not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain as outdated.
In short, such a relationship could be the decisive impetus to other concentrations in the Länder banks sector.
At the foot of the stairs, the Spanish Ambassador and other authorities were present.
That is something that savers and households are now that the time they are uncertain. "
The index lost during the vote, but when it became apparent that the proposal was not adopted, it was in free fall.
We could examine the animal process of consciousness without taking into account its content, and that is exactly what happened during the studies on short-term memory of primates, particularly with the example of sight.
Kostitsyn, the first star of the meeting, scored a goal, Plekanec amassed two more, and Kovalev reaped a pass in the win, the fourth of the Tricolore in six preparatory matches.
And even the youngest like Alondra and Alexia Kenon of 11ans, twins of Winter Park, seem to have learned properly the description Eatonville.
In India, the main Sensex index has lost 506,43 points, or 3.9 percent, and closed at 12.595,75 points.
Ludwik Sobolewski, the chairman of the stock market values of Warsaw, confirmed this proposal that the Polish have made despite that, before, the Czechs have ruled out the stock exchange of Warsaw the circle of potential new owners of the stock market in Prague.
Another significant feature may lie in the linguistic nature of Man: A large part of its existence is related to the language, this means that his conscience often depends on it.
Moreover, if right side of Naomi fascinates me.
The rates are slightly lower (550 euro for a simple room) for areas close to the other universities (Ostiense and Cinecittà).
With regard to journalists, we are going to 30%.
And noisy, explains Marco Guarda, it is not for the Italian.
The interview - blood become sure again
Nights of sleep for shareholders of Hypo Real Estate
The first time this has happened that may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
The danger of the collapse of the US financial system are also on every day, and subsequently, the world will pay a high price.
More than four hundred people made use of the service during the morning.
It must also inform the police, 7 days before his starting date scheduled.
That is true.
Contrary to what is being done in several countries where Barrick Gold works, the debates in Canada are normally by the exchange of ideas and not with clubs.
Debate: Bilingue left in the English language
The fares and hotels are falling
Also, as it emerged during the investigation, they also added VAT on these documents, while the benefits on the activities of travel, which is outside the European Union, are paid for without VAT.
The US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
. Glitter returned to the UK last month, having served 27 months in a Vietnamese prison for having abused two girls of 10 and 11 years respectively.
The law is ignoring them; walking on a long-distance journey car is prohibited.
We must be constantly vigilant ", continued Dre Décary before stressing that on top of security of supply, Héma-Quebec must also provide an adequate supply.
I always responded:
But there is anyone who tries, and Paul Newman is an example.
Dancer, actress and painter, you are a very versatile woman: is it not?
The image provided by the director, Giuseppe Tornatore illustrates what is happening in major cities Italian, but also in the cities of province,
This isn't necessarily bad, but if they do move you it would be better if they gave you everything (including the electronic chips for the race)
That being said, the operation of a kind of virtual pseudo operators in several mobile networks in the Czech Republic, remains unnoticed.
The office is synonymous with tension and the computer with pain in the back.
Sarkozy at the meeting of fishermen angry
"Everything depends on whether the coach has in its approval, permission to propose standing places.
Obama and McCain are each as capable as the other, to lead the country out of the economic crisis.
Linebacker, David Bowens let the ball go because of Warner.
The psychologist Miguel Farias, who has taken part in the experience, believe that we can achieve the same effects with any other strong image, atheists, provided to find the appropriate photo.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for children with difficult childhoods.
These improvements have significantly reduced the risk of contracting HIV by a blood transfusion.
Italian Foreign Minister Franco Frattini confirmed the release after the votes of the Italian television channel Sky TG 24: "Our citizens and the other hostages were released.
The Marcel differs from others by his excellent cotton, by his unisex look, with his distinctive logo and by the Belgian flag (barely recognisable) that the most well-known jerseys have on the neck.
The sum, however, must not be paid at once, but in installments.
Reaffirming that he would manage to cut taxes for 95% of Americans despite the unpredictability of Wall Street, the Senator from Illinois has also pointed out that the achievement of a possible energy independence of the country by the promotion of renewable energy was his first priority, along with the establishment of a system of health insurance.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
And he adds that it is essential to make it more efficient, the public administration.
Coming to cinema, you expect the various movies you shot last year to be released.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
In the background, it is the daughter society Depfa bears the losses.
Of Bologna, they came up in Verona.
To this tragedy and resentment of the public, the government of Canada has established in February 1994 a public inquiry, chaired by the judge giant Krever, inquiry to shed light on the circumstances that led to such a tragedy and to make recommendations for such a disaster again.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) plunged of 777,68 points to 1O.365,45 points.
Could one walk on walls like Spiderman? Maybe so, but researchers are thinking of a much less compelling use, such as the connection between electronic devices, given that the nano tubes of carbon drivers are conductors of heat and electricity.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
Sylvana and the secrets of Bento's box
Recall, for the record, UNICEF, amnesty and the International Bar Association, the Canadian advocate the repatriation of Omar Khadr so that it has a fair trial in Canada.
While the judge Krever delayed in submitting his report, some provinces set up a committee with the objective of planning a new system of management of blood in Canada.
All depends on it, "he says.
AIG is willing to study the sale of most of its activities beyond his life assurance to the international retirement and its activity in the US, the newspaper says that cited sources close to the matter.
Choose the best
Mobile phones which are able to play music for ten to twelve hours are rare. In most cases, this figure is much lower.
If a rat or a cockroach flees from danger, does that mean that it also feels fear?
Trend underlined by the Pope and by the President of the Republic, Giorgio Napolitano at its meeting with Benedict XVI on Quirinal, asked what the state and the church work together to defeat racism. "
Has the question: What is there in five years? Schmidt said he would like Google can respond to questions such as, "What can I do tomorrow?" Or "What is the work that I would be the better? '. However, software cannot respond to this kind of issue, simple at first sight, the day when they know enough about users.
Deflation has resulted in the sectors of the transformation of oil (1.4 percent), the manufacture of machines and electrical equipment (0.9 percent), and a minimum increase in the processing sector of wood (0.1 percent).
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition.
For the attention of the institutions, the social forces and means of information on this dramatic, the famous Anmil today, in all the Italian provinces, the 58ème National Day of the victims of accidents on the work, institutionalised the second Sunday in October.
In addition, they are forced to admit that the SIM card in their phones is not registered in their name, so they cannot own them fully, in the manner of ordinary customers of mobile operators.
Kovalev gave the victory with the sole purpose of the shooting.
CSU: Thanks for a period of transition
Some expected that the US and Britain were going to obtain a certain type of autonomy for the Sudeten.
The German banking system is relatively stable, insisted the Federal Finance Minister it was only a few weeks ago.
When nobody is watching, it can work
The tactics, in these unequal fights, is often to ruin the defendants so as to impose an amicable solution which gags the opposition in addition to scaring anyone who dares to look again at the issue.
Marek: A psychological help
Of New Yorkers any have become very familiar to the world of finance in recent weeks.
But not to take advantage of the taxpayers'.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is now complete with the Palais Chigi.
Quickly, everything becomes calm in the bus passengers sleep.
But be careful.
In the framework of the rescue plan, the resources must be mobilised to the purchase of spoiled mortgage documents.
Domestic sale prices have risen to a lesser extent, 0.1 percent, compared with the previous month.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day in history.
We have already led the negotiations about that possibility several times with all the Czech mobile operators.
The second time began after the jets and the Arizona Cardinals have salement played under obscure clouds.
The strategy of sugar and the whip against drivers
Some believe that extra Place bears the name since 1802, when the legacy of the great firm of the many children of Philip Minthorne was divided, leaving aside the small, which remained since abandoned.
Otherwise, we risk that other countries will suffer the effects.
Mexico 's peep-toes without
The suspect was not willing to settle its debt and it is for this reason that he drew a creditor, last Wednesday, in a site of Ózd where he was killed, and the girl of this man, aged 9 years.
With a removed was barely 2.5 square centimetres, researchers have managed to maintain put up a corps of 100 kilograms on a vertical wall.
Investors feared that the rescue plan of $700 billion of the United States Government may not be sufficient to restart the financial markets.
The anthem has again been recorded by the orchestra of the theatre national under the direction of Jirˇí Beˇlohlávek.
I had rice with aromatic herbs, small sausages, a salad of cucumber and algae, fruit and a kind of meat covered by tofu.
Moreover, the bill also mentions meals, and our restaurant is closed for a long time. "
The rest, "with climate change, we need to rethink our vision of the North," he said, referring to the passage of the north-west, which will be open through the year because of the melting of the ice.
The movement of water in the tides, runs the pales turbines, creating a rotational movement that sustains a generator.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
Those who listen to music in such conditions for prolonged periods, risk a permanent hearing loss after five years.
They have too much charm.
During a campaign rally in Detroit, on Sunday, Obama has expressed his hope that Congress will vote soon on the 700 billion rescue package.
During a 'scouting operation', one of Lados' choices was a bistro.
Against several legends film, which lâchèrent early enough the job, Newman will be remained a long time in the saddle, while denouncing Hollywood, its TARP has good, and its concessions.
Kamathis is is third in 2: 07: 48.
It in recruitment two hundred.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
I read it in my mangas.
The sexes have imposed a ban on Glitter six months after he had spoken to the authorities who have under control, its intention to go to Spain from France.
Of Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Hard landing for international player Marko Marin.
It should discourage the drivers of driving fast and drink-driving.
In the first half of 2008, the reserve of liquidity of the bank had been reduced to 95 percent of 2.37 million euros, the rate of capital also had declined slightly to 1,45 from 1.6 percent.
Vargas Llosa, who won the prize for popular support at the Hay Festival, spoke to a packed auditorium in Juan Bravo.
Here in New York, all speak fluent finance.
"The doors tournantes- tells Brunetta- are an instrument for work better, with more productivity, attendance more and more services" says the minister.
In Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important to a symbolic point of view.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
And even more surprising is that if it had committed this gesture, its history would certainly never finished in court.
What matters is whether the coach is under its technical sheet equipped places standing or not.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy a phone.
The "North Plan" is the fourth part of a "vision" that Prime Minister claims to have for Quebec, that of a "new" economic area, which includes an agreement on the workforce with France, an agreement between Canada and Europe and agreements with Ontario.
The sum, however, must not be paid at once, but in installments.
She was a freestyle dancer and specialist of oriental dances.
New investigations into the case of US prosecutors.
Indeed, to publish the final version of the law and submit it to the vote, the Congressmans must conclude a number of details of the agreement.
With regard to the candidate, I don't worry.
From here, the road station near the station Puorta Nueva, four bus take this evening the start at 11.45 p.m., destinazione Monaco, Festa della birra, arrived in 6h30.
Work antistress is entitled '1001 ways to relax and will be among the booksellers directly from the publisher Pearson Alhambra and DA.
The New York Stock Exchange has accused a record drop on Monday after the rejection by the House of Representatives of the Paulson plan to bail out banks: The Dow Jones has lost 6,98%, a loss ever seen approaching the 800 points, and the Nasdaq 9,14%.
This will be crucial to decide on the sharing of losses in the financial sector and the government, "said Marek, this week, the server iHNed.cz.
But in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of standard output for headphones.
Would show the security agents that we behave well!
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
We believed ourselves out of this impasse since Democrats accepted that some "toxic" assets of companies in difficulty were only to be insured by the government, rather than bought.
"Most people, who are in this area, will think, 'Oh, this city has nothing compared to other" Alondra Kenon said after the mass Sunday.
It he: "Some people have not enjoyed".
Night would involve unnecessary costs, explains Marco.
I believe that rats and other mammals, perhaps even cockroaches (who knows?) have sensations.
A formulated answer like this is not suprising, coming from the representative of the operators.
Of these European roots will grow one of the glorious faces of the American dream.
The Hamburg SV will celebrate its 121 years on Monday.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
Moreover, it is also for the sins of forms, as the types of bills inadequate and false pills, that the bills issued the order of Együtt has Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, 21st. Századi Kulturális Egyesület and Biztos Bridge have proved false.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
Another application could be its incorporation into the GPS satellite navigation system, so that he can guide the driver to its destination by avoiding the obstacles are on the way.
And because their sensations probably differ from all of us (as human consciousness is based on special circuits, and on the language), I prefer to explore the emotional attitude that the sensations emotional rats.
Which will appear in the spots?
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
There is no beer, not yet.
Compared to its neighbour more colourful, Bowery, extra Place has left a slight historic footprint.
Locally, the group executive is to 65%.
The interpretation of the dominant market position is one of the many points of contention.
The symptoms of hepatitis A appear two to three weeks after the consumption of food contaminated, in general, accompanied by a bad state general, of weakness, upset stomach and nausea.
In a City in Part, pride and the plight of the Black Life
Curiously, this approach also highlights the weight of the prefrontal cortex in the achievement of view.
But what does that mean for the emotions?
Experts fear that the general theory of relativity is not entirely correct.
Two Kenyan elite runners, James Kwambai and Charles Kamathi, continued to defy Gebrselassie after the head of the queue have disappeared.
People are less and less attention to the operational system but increasingly the Internet browser.
The girl was at the moment, unfortunately, sitting next to the driver, on the seat the most dangerous of the vehicle, although it has at its disposal other two seats.
This sentence was spoken by the actress Sally Field, who has worked with him in 'Absence of Malice ", and illustrates the despair of American cinema, and America in general, faced with the striking idea that Newman is no longer in the world.
After the entry of CBGB, a monument punk rock closed in 2006, has re open to extra Place; the street is certainly more famous thanks to the photo in coverage of the album of Ramones come to Russia '"
The project of the motorway happened just when the girl the most famous of Eatonville had recovered its appeal.
Net falling oil following the concerns of the world of the New Economy
Newman, rather than sitting on his myth, was committed to the end.
, the liberal government, in coming to power in 2003, has refused to implement it.
But it is said, keep your eyes wide open: and it is not without reason.
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciated.
With a few exceptions, the street has always the same look.
I have done all the things that I wanted to since I was little and it has given me a lot of happiness.
Trerise wrote in a letter to confession: "I feel responsible for his death".
The player from Gladbach entered late in the game and his rising shot hit the framework of the goal.
The intervention of the governments of Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg had been made necessary after the French bank BNP Paribas said that it had renounced acquisition of its competitor in trouble since it has lost 2 billion euros (2.9 billion US) in the mortgage crisis in the United States.
In addition, the deletions made in the newsroom, in the room where the authors are working to the assembly of newspapers, are a major problem.
There has even been given a name to the baby unaffordable
Hepatitis C may also have serious consequences: if it is not dealt with, it can lead to cirrhosis of the liver or cancer.
And Spain it is estimated that it could save the lives of 115 people each year.
It would reduce the costs," he says.
The Austrian Socialists the SPÖ want to discuss with the Conservatives of the ÖVP.
He accused Interior Vice Minister at the time, Marco Minniti, of having engineered everything to raise a political issue, but given the request of incarceration signed this morning, the judges explain that the Piromalli clan had even managed to ask for the variation of the A3 project.
Austria think seriously about regain his courage, following his oscillation to the right in the parliamentary elections yesterday.
I live on the outskirts of Tokyo in the direction of Kawasaki and I take the train which takes me 40 minutes to get to Tachibana Highschool.
An automaton will monitor the coupon instead of the driver
Sheikh Hasina should return to the Bangladesh in a few weeks, but her party, the Awani League, has demanded that the temporary military government give her full freedom first.
The novel takes place in places that nobody knows and addresses unknown issues, but once again, Mario Vargas Llosa is determined to forward the project he is working on, a novel that has Roger Casemant as main character, an Irish nationalist who lived 20 years in Congo and who passed by the Amazon.
She was detained last year after the military interim government had assumed power, but was released in June for receiving medical care abroad.
This is what we think will bring in more customers.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to the ground by fishermen.
A famous American politician who wants to be independent, wrote: "Barack Obama will be the second anti-American president.
"We have taken a major step forward," said Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic chairman of the US House of Representatives, according to whom all that remains is to put the agreements on paper.
With this film Garci does not expect to win any prizes.
What good to facilitate the advent of such a competitor?
The Hypo Real Estate, since the takeover of the Depfa, has been a highly important investor of state and infrastructure.
The 31 girls of the class all whispered, stiffled laughs and made signs, and I clearly heard the word 'Kawaii'.
Is it because of the crisis that they have decided to buy small shirts with less fabric and cheaper at the same time?
Moreover, this beautiful side of Naomi fascinates me.
Jancˇura denies that the two seats reserved for the rest of the stewards have been sold.
It is bound to inform the authorities if it wants to go abroad for more than three days.
"Sangre de Mayo," the dared say of Garci
In 2003 we thought for a moment that the Deta-Bank could merge with the bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate and Halbab.
"It was a dirty victory", summed up Marin Jol.
Soccer - The Impact in the semi-finals
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
This amount would be twice that produce nuclear power plants.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
The Federal Reserve and the Federal Institution for the Surveillance of the Services decided (Bafin) assume that the ability of the Hypo Real on the market is now guaranteed.
Other believed that they would simply remain in Czechoslovakia.
The song was put in trade in the UK, as single in 1979, according to the 15th place.
However, given the expansion of the festival Hurston, a certain level of local pride has emerged.
The chairman of the party, Erwin Hube and the head of the regional government, Günther Beckstein, can still retain their place. The question is how long will the pardon?
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
The phrase 'You do not consider "is enshrined in majuscules on the registration plate.
The first news of the failure of the rescue plan has seen Dow Jones temporarily loose 700 points.
Because WestLB, injured, is under heavy pressure.
Never in the history of the Palais Chigi, not had been rotating doors for the entry and exit of employees.
The Bush administration and the leaders of Congress, both Republicans and Democrats, have finally reached an agreement yesterday on the greatest economic recovery plan since the Great Depression of the 1930s.
It may be that he speaks with a small, quiet voice, with words alone, murmurs or with cries of tears, long speeches...
The neurophysicien Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals also have sensations.
It is apparently it a force of attraction whose effect is visible on other bodies.
However, the leaders of the banks are in bad stance and the meantime the help of the state can expect their redundancy payments, called simply golden parachute Atlantic, will be capped by the government.
They make a short stop for the photographers before moving into the room where all the officials await them.
The bad boy arrived in Australia, Russell Crowe, dared appoint Newman as his greatest inspiration.
After all, such a relationship could be the decisive impetus to other concentrations in the Länder banks.
We don't need to remember a capacity of gigabits, or even of mega-extend.
On the opposite side, Antonio Damasio for example believes that the sensations resultant from primitive activities are born in the areas of the corporeal feeling of the cortex and the core of the brain, like Jaak Pankseep who focuses more on the just the core of the brain.
As we have said before, they can also be associated with very high fever, to situations of stress or agitation and excitement.
"Say what you want, we will be the ones to put the cross on Obama or McCain.
On the screen of the machine they will find all the information about the validity of their document.
Financial the action of the Bavarian house has lost by time three-quarters of its value in spite of the rescue operation of the federal government and private banks, Commerzbank has reduced by more than 20 percent.
He huge resemblance to her sister has not prevented her from developing her own personality.
According to article, the kidnappers wanted to release the women hostages after the ransom had been paid.
In Naples, a bed costs 300-400 euros, a simple room, 400 to 600 euros, with prices higher in the Policlinico, Vomero, and Colli Aminei areas.
The question, if it is really a matter of chance, pops up naturally.
On the contrary, they are trying to do everything possible to a potential competitor to appear.
A mono-themed library (of course named Hurston) opened in 2006 on a magnificently repaved Kennedy Boulevard.
The Prime Minister does not exclude to trigger the elections before the end of the year
A relationship of any kind between the Deka bank, which knows its customers on the basis of their investment funds, and WestLB, has been questioned for some time now, even by Frankfurt.
Haile Gebrselassie, Ethiopian, has once again proved to be worthy of his title of best long distance runner of the century, having beaten his own world record in the marathon in Berlin on Sunday, becoming the first to run 26,2 miles in less than 2 hours and 4 minutes.
As a client is important, it offers special prices (and other benefits).
The Latin are always between residential buildings carrying fifty luxury shirts hung on their shoulds by way of a yoke, like mules.
Among the things planned, there are measures of tax facilities in favour of managers and benefits to the public in terms of mobility: viewers will be able to enter the area but only move about in a limited confine, and have special tariffs for the parking spaces.
He added: "I stress in particular, as described by her father and mother, the effects of your crime on Stephanie over a period of many years."
Passers-by said they did not think often of Extra Place, and suggested its development.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a telephone.
At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
"In cases where the coach would have braked suddenly, the laws of physics would obviously be valid.
Some Member can still be a lifeline to their financial institutions titubants, and thanks to their own taxpayers' money, they can save them from bankruptcy.
However, it is generally believed that this way to buy music (either by GSM, Internet, or by wireless Internet) will dominate the music industry in the future.
For compensation of the girl's family, the agency will not wait the judgment of the Court, but as far as the financial compensation, it is also on the culprit.
Then, in a puddle of blood, the phrase 'You will pay'
In Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important to a symbolic point of view.
This 'territory twice as big as France', ' is here, is in Quebec.'
It will not be released at the beginning of 2009 but by late 2009 or even in 2010.
His message was precisely formulated, it came out of his lips in a persuasive manner.
The UN has done last week, a vaccination campaign in the six provinces.
In his party, the choice of the opposition or entry into the coalition is temporarily an open question. These points should be debated in the ÖVP.
The largest is in London.
"Anyone who wants to maintain Israeli sovereignty on the whole city will be forced to integrate 270 000 Arabs.
Beˇlohlávek considers the Czech national anthem as one of the finest anthems.
This is a loss for the academic world, as for the public debate in Canada, and it is time that governments put arrangements restricting this kind of abusive prosecution in place .
Has the conference on the emerging technologies TIM Microsoft has been presented a new system of recognition of image and human interaction, a kind of artificial Intelligence with little intelligence but able to do some basic tasks, such as call a taxi (or in the case of Microsoft, a shuttle for travel in the campus of the company) in response to what it was asked during a conversation.
After the market prices of hotels have risen for years, bed and breakfasts have already cut their prices in many places.
Not at all.
This time, the decline is due to the fall of shares on the Wall Street.
McCain, he wanted to build a fleet of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same configuration.
Democratic Senator Barack Obama awarded himself certain addition powers at the understanding, including the proposal to allow homeowners to keep their homes and the one connected with monitoring salaries of employees of companies rescued by the State.
Today, one in 12 million runs the risk of blood being infected with HIV.
But of course this is the future.
In August 2008, domestic non-sale prices rose by 0.1 percent compared with the previous month, and 12.9% in August 2007 - communicates the Central Office of Statistique of Hungary.
Dramatic reductions of Hypo Real Estate and Commerzbank led the German index (Dax) to a profound deficit.
The investigation is based on the theory of lawyers who argue that their dismissal of political causes.
In the timing of the construction or the destruction of stadiums, the streets, hotels and airports, the two guests run after the deadline.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
I already knew the word thanks to my mangas.
When the Police patrol came it found the actress sitting inside her vehicle, which was partially blocking the road.
"There is a real danger that the PZPN will not be able to act within the rules," said Drzewiecki of the Polish news agency PAP.
The trio number one of the Canadian is prepared to take the season.
The authorities responsible: In line with operators
But he said they do not feel good, and refused to go to London.
This person, at that time, called the emergency services because "it was concerned about the life of Locklear".
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred to the gates of the community.
The total immersion in the English language focusses on the almost constant use of English in teaching.
Listen to the four new version of the national anthem.
Indeed, the Web 2.0 is nothing else but collaboration, derving from the fact that we intentionally leave traces behind us, and that we use communication channels available to us, and while their size changes one by one, the essential remains the same: we expose ourselves.
One must ask for permission for most of the interviews, and some things - like the walls of the old church of Eatonville, painted by the white man, depicting black men in the fields - must not be photographed.
But look at everything in detail and from the start.
This is a disproportionate source with more than 70% of the surface area of the planet and now the major global energy companies are beginning to discover.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
His lawyers have announced that it will now appeal to the Supreme Court against the order of the Supreme Court.
Anyone in health, aged 18 years and responding to the eligibility criteria can still give blood all 56 days, or six times a year.
As we know, the national reserves of blood transfusion Service managed by the Red Cross Canadian have been infected with the acquired immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus during the 1980s.
"Next week could be a turning point," said yesterday, the influential Democratic Senator Charles Schumer.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
In the world of the Vice-President, it seems that this word is only meant to designate highly paid lawyers and not all Canadians; this is a rather narrow view of the concept.
The photo present in this article, was taken earlier this month in one of the rooms of rest reserved for employees to Microsoft's Redmond.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
"Matilde Tórtola transformed into a mature figure.
Even tougher action was decided in Poland.
A few days you started on the bridge with Naomi Campbell, is it not?
For a price of three four thousand kronor, we can have a very decent walkman.
In this respect, the economic crisis seems to produce two phenomena convergent.
I had not felt the crisis despite the completely pessimistic stories until this afternoon when I decided to open a new savings bank.
Voices have continued to rise yesterday against this project, both on the Republican side and the Democratic.
They agreed with a ransom, "said the official.
You turned 30 a little while ago: has this been hard for you?
German Günther Bauer mixture in "intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people 'the théâtralité of a few stage with singers, dancers and guitaristes with this side least-known artists.
Its aim is the reintegration of the driver through road re-education.
As in the case of society Ravenna Bt. or the course of Kunfehértó sport, which both deny be the authors of invoices in their name.
Beyond his career as a legend, he was also a major campaigner for civil rights, ecology, independent cinema, and against the excesses of Hollywood.
The Bentos are not only school lunches Japanese.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng index-has gone awry 2.1 percent to 18.286,90 points.
"And we did not know whether the disease could be transmitted by blood.
The Basque police have finally arrested one of the two occupants and seized the 2.178 kilograms of hashish that they were carrying which they found after inspecting the van, says an Iveco Daily.
But also the pool in groups of conversation
Nights of insomnia for shareholders of Hypo Real Estate
The higher prices of plastic and chemical raw materials has led to a considerable monthly rise in the price of manufactured products and chemical materials (1.6 percent).
The proposal was made while Eatonville was just coming out of a difficult time in its history.
The most prestigious prize in fashion
However, some experts the right propose a different view of things: For the creation of a virtual operator is possible, we must obtain, each time, the consent of the operator of network.
Has Eatonville, no great commemoration, or mark for the general public.
Today, one in 12 million runs the risk of blood being infected with HIV.
Other applications could affect aerospace engineering.
Following the Bundestag elections, which will take place in September 2009, Merkel will again be Chancellor that if they call up in one way or another, with a joint force, the CSU, having played an important role in the success of 2005.
It could be the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
"According to us - stressed Mercandelli - more tests and inspections are needed, as well as greater intervention on the training of workers from as early as school."
It is the second increase in price which follows an increase of two pence in February, and comes following a research carried out consultation society.
A clear but complex pessimism invades the American journalism.
Drivers should be reminded of the risks," said Martin Korˇán, the Transport psychologist at the Na Homolce hospital.
A virtual operator will win the Czech Republic this year.
Spiegel Online present in a series of articles answers to the question "What do you think be true without power in evidence?"
It lasted, he added, until teachers and students came only more of the same place.
A lady of Miami wrote on a website: "This person is full of ambition".
Several people have rightly pointed out that an Internet browser is not an operational system.
Being more aggressive anti-cancer treatments, patients are often need to recharge in red blood or plaquettes.
In Germany, according to a current study, flights would be even cut up 50 percent.
In a US magazine article of the American Chemical Society, the Californian researchers have presented an adhesive formed of microfibres like hair, which automatically clean themselves of dust in the movement on the area to ensure a constant and perfect grip.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
"We need more charm and more dribbles", demanded Jol.
Pankseep argues that what is as fear among the Hommes and rats is probably also felt as such in both cases: How could anyone yet check whether rats and Hommes feel the same thing when they behave in a similar?
Firstly, by his name flamboyant - although he is known as Marcel, – which has to do with the sport as it takes after the name, according to legend, of the boxer Marcel Cerdan, a lover of the singer Edith Piaf.
Beˇlohlávek consider the Czech national anthem as one of the finest anthems.
"Worrying data provided by the Anmil, and the tragic events of recent days, confirm the importance of the issue of prevention in the workplace," says the President of the Republic, Giorgio Napolitano, in a message to the president of the National Association of Anmil, mutilated and disabled of work, Pietro Mercandelli.
We must work at maximum speed, " said Grigorij Surkis President of the Ukrainian League.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon is because of confusion among researchers - the anomaly of the support gravitationnel.
Suburban buses are equipped with card readers included in the till the driver.
"We know take back," said Marcell Jansen.
Today we are starting, in March we end, in June we will make the sums.
These photographed people "in the street" are artists able to pass on stage the passion, the sadness, the joy... by exciting the public.
And already buses drive into the night in the 'Autostrada Brennero direction.
Who can most can say the least.
A few children speak during the night.
Filtering a dam has been put in place on the peninsula of Quiberon.
Two minors have helped to remove the footsteps of the double homicide of Ózd
The US as in Europe, the crisis appears to speed up the phenomena couvés for some time, so much so that, in the new climate, they solidifient and are.
To Elena, this is the first time, Luca already the third or fourth time.
She presented her hometown to the world through books sincere, full of dialect, such as "Mules and Men" (1935) and "their Eyes were watching God "(1937).
The more functions you use it, the more the interval between two rechargements will be reduced.
The opposition does not provide for actions of protests in view of the results. It is trying rather to get its message on the need for economic reforms to the voters.
Step towards
As soon as you leave your seats, they are parties! '
The pressure spins a turbine which in turn, feeds a generator.
It is clear that the rest him has been brilliant, but not rouillé.
Share price fell from 75 percent to EUR 3.30 goes.
Its huge resemblance to his sister has not prevented to develop its own personality.
Without pomp, he was brief and precise.
"Protecting the people of Kent is the most important intention of the Police of Kent, and we are closely monitoring the behaviour of those who are accused of sexual abuse in the region, in order to minimise the risks to the public."
Then he found a kyste in the vocal cords.
The employee who cannot be named, is accused of violating the section 8.1 of the act, i.e. of the clause which deals with the preservation of information.
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague regained its losses.
The fate of the tandem, having suffered a catastrophic loss of voice ny 17 percent, will be on the agenda of the party congress , held the last weekend of October.
"The guidelines that I have read [are] that this is something that we will all have to digest and with which we can move forward.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
Man of the Ministry of Defence was in travel documents when he oublia two highly classified, on a train in the direction of Waterloo.
The eye of the bee plays an important role, since it is able to see in all directions, in an angle of 300 degrees.
This amount would be twice that produced by nuclear power plants.
The courts have banned the rock star glamour, Gary Glitter, accused of sexual abuse of children, expatriation in France and Spain.
The main strategy of Vodafone in this area is to find a partner to put in place a common network for a fast mobile Internet. "
"The office has not met with signs of anti-competetive behaviour on this subject, and hence has no reason to intervene in one way or another.
In Europe, the crisis has suddenly accelerated, pushing to emergency measures in favour of banks in the United Kingdom, the Benelux, Iceland and Germany, sign that the markets are facing "not only a US crisis, but a global crisis," added the analyst at FTN Financial.
Waves, tidal currents: here are the new renewable sources on which the behemoths like Chevron have set their eyes, and now trying to get their hands onto.
There was more since 2007.
The project has turned into an anthologie of flamenco, which will soon be published in a collector's book of the portraits exposed at the gallery.
"We must examine all aspects of the case for the coming weeks, to assess the options to adopt so as to avoid the building societies and their members paying a hefty bill" said Mr Cole.
"All the work is done.
It is enough to introduce the smart card Opencard and the coupon bought earlier will make himself on the map.
Number of voters believe that they will find salvation in a which extols the Virtue, the Law and the: They do not see that this government has given up on what was the reputation and the dignity of our country.
"Paul Gadd was not present when".
I do not refer to those who woke up very awake by about something that happened the day before, but the children who speak during their sleep.
At a conference in the upper School of Public Administration
Will it be a birthday without a genuine party.
We think she committed suicide by suffocation with a plastic bag.
We have resolved our differences of opinion on the form that the scheme of action to stabilise the market must take," the democrat Nancy Pelosi confided to the Agency Bloomberg.
He complained of scandal when the Prefecture ordered the dissolution of the City Council.
The alarm makes one sad when it sounds almost every morning at 7 a.m., but it is even worse when one thinks of the agitated rythm that life presents us with.
The head of the Quebec Party, Pauline Marois, has brought up the issue of the development of the North-of-Quebec that the Landry government launched in 2001.
Has disappear, it is often the historic places and charged with memory, "it is as if a friend of mine was broken, someone that we know, with which we have shared a way and both emotional" observed the director of the movie Nuovo Paradiso film, which offers Tornatore 20 years ago, the first Oscar and the Grand Prix jurée of the Cannes, and telling the poetry of a room of province, and nostalgia a way to live the cinema, lost can be forever.
Welt Online depicts the most important cases.
Similarly, the society Biogate Kft., which is now in liquidation and in 2003, made bills on order by the Foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért Alapítvány, the association Atlasz Egyesület and the association Vörösfenyo˝ Egyesület, for a total of about five million HUF, but behind which no provision has actually been provided, has cooperated with the Zuschlags,
Real estate financial the Bavarian Hypo Real Estate (HRE), the DAX side, gets a consortium of German bank credit a billion to protect themselves from the turbulence.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
There are no precise figures: we are talking about 50 000 people who make their way through the Alps and drown themselves in tankards of beer.10 percent of visitors would have specially come from Italy this weekend.
Paul Newman was one of them. "
How is it possible that prices in the Czech Republic to maintain so high, compared with Europe?
According to the MEP, it is necessary to raise awareness of these reports in a circle the widest possible, also among the Roma and non-Roma.
"UEFA has constantly on the eye '.
The implementation has missed.
In a democracy, even critics have the right to speak.
However, I do not think so.
But if you stop and take the time to look at its history, it is a very beautiful city ".
The billions in aid for banks in Europe and the United States does not mask the concerns of investors.
It is the same government that condones torture: it considers it hardly important that a young adult is now psychologically destroyed, probably forever after so many years of violence.
Werner Faymann, the chairman of the SPÖ, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with the ÖVP.
Currently the sisters Cruz take very seriously their new activity in the way.
I believe that we can now feel comfortable to receive or to prescribe a blood transfusion to recover health, "says the head of the direction of Héma-Quebec.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely concurrenciez.
In recent days, Washington Mutual, a bank in the capital of $327 has made use of the syndic of bankruptcy, and while the New Yorkers covered in the home for the weekend at this Friday evening, another bank, Wachovia, the savings accounts of a value of $440 million, sought désespéramment a buyer for the save.
Only the neural imaging methods have helped to remove the contradiction between the two theories in leading now to a new third explanation." - said Andrew Schotter, Professor of the Faculty of economics at the University of New York.
What should be a symbol that we can pay for life for a moment of insufficient attention.
Even if he speaks, he is sleeping and is therefore at rest.
The course of action of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and the Dax into the abyss.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, to a German Jew father and mother of Hungarian origin.
one must be ready for the return.
"But what we want is that it is not just a spectacle," commented on the leader Sebastián Proulx, replacing Mario Dumont, which amounts of holiday today.
Student Agency is the only carrier coach services to propose the stewards.
And he adds that it is essential to make the public administration more efficient.
Staging was also made thanks to the music composition and guitars of Jesús Torres and Paco Arriaga, to the popular song of Michel Ortega, el Pulga and Moi de Morón; the percussions of El Pájaro, and the viola of Rafa El Viola and the collaboration of an actor, Juanfra Juárez, "who plays the role of the eternal companion of the kind of artists who were considered divas".
When the price of oil, declined to 1980, the idea of using the marine energy was set aside, but now the bodies environmentalists and the further increase oil give a strong growth in the sector
Journalists are not hard to see where will the web.
But the film maker regret not having secured funding for films as "leader Alatriste" or "The ghosts of Goya" - more than double that achieved for "Sangre de Mayo ’ –, because it has not been able to turn a few scenes written in a script signed by Horacio Valcárcel, with whom he has worked in almost all his career.
And to top it all, they are all listed in a book which will bring relaxation to bookshops on 30 September.
Of the dark influence on the flight of space probes
The savings and transfers of Hesse-Thuringia, which has 85 percent of the capital of the Helaba however, has drawn a lock at the beginning of the year on any union with WestLB.
The Socialists Christians have transformed Bavaria for decades and now, these are the same people who their modern are turning their backs.
, "dancing and the butterfly" reminded me of a Cuban popular dance and "dance of the snake" to some tangos.
On a purely theoretical perspective, I cannot contradict him, but I believe that it cannot be proven.
Issues that arise after the accident: Were the stewards in the car illegal?
The judgment of Google is therefore somewhat contradictory: it is severely criticised by those who fear the transmission of their personal data, because they believe that their inner world and their private lives suffer when they begin to use Google services. Therefore, they address them in the spirit of revolt against multinational companies who are proud maintaining their public images.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
But in this approach which Christof Koch and Francis Crick followed, one focuses more on the nervous correlations of consciousness than on causal mechanisms: the two may or may not be identical.
To capture moments of personality of these artists we should not photograph them on stage.
But as of today, this new measure against hypocrites is in force, against those who tip and then go to drink coffee in the bar during working hours.
"I do not propose to make peace with Syria solely on the basis of a retreat from the Golan Heights," he said.
"Yes, we have a serious problem.
Which is on because it will not be easier to manage the CSU injured, and the crisis of the social democrats lasts forever.
Its cost is higher than 1,000 euros and is the responsibility of the driver.
Charges brought against him are multiple murder, assault with intent and interest.
The other sectors of the processing industry have increased between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
But Dannemarie will not know benefit and will not cause major problems with an 11 illhousien who has just fallen slightly for "compacter" his defence, except in the last few seconds to play when, after a big way, the ball was very close to the transversal.
This is the second weekend of the beer festival, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
Some residents, including the bloggers who had already talked about the move towards the luxury of the East Village, have opposed the idea of selling extra Place, saying that this humble property should remain public.
And this is the New York Times yesterday that we can confirm that the current crisis divides the Republican Party, even more divided between its eve soul East Coast, moderate, in favour of the federal institutions and the business community, and its new soul, on the contrary, conservative, hostile to "those of Washington 'and the world of finance, powerful especially in the Member of the Centre and the South.
For now, no super heroes.
According to the survey, the equipment would have been bought by the company Cash Investment Kft. of Kiskunhalas, which was in liquidation since 14 September 2005.
Today, the European summit for the Equal Opportunities began in Paris, in which France was host, as representative of the current presidency of the European Union.
The World Energy Council (WEC) of London estimated in 2007, only 15% of the world's electricity needs could be covered by systems exploiting sea currents.
"God created the time of persons perfect
This financing plan which aims at thawing the crisis on Wall Street and the paralyzed credit market, has become the central issue in the presidential campaign.
The target for 2008: reach 5 million downloads, and given that today there are nearly 3 million and 600 thousand, it is likely that with the release of the new version, we can even exceed the figure planned
Memories of the charming cowboy from Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969), the young man rejecting his sensual wife (Elizabeth Taylor) in The Cat on a Burning Roof adapted from Tennessee Williams in 1958 return to rock us.
But the opposite will not be ruled out.
The basic models in principle do not support cards with memory exceeding 2 GB.
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
The electronic vouchers are valid from tomorrow not only in the capital, but also in the surrounding area of the city.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
In this new geopolitical context, the prime minister believes that to occupy the territory is a duty.
The evening of the prizes is presented by Coldplay, with this year, a selection restricted to four categories.
Rieger has been for nearly three decades of the physiothérapeute HSV, it has a great reputation as a former players.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently the other.
Since yesterday, there is also the possibility of buying the voucher over the Internet on the web pages of Dopravní podnik: www.dpp.cz.
The winner will be rewarded with a prize of 300,000 euros.
Steve Ballmer has found that if the computers were sold with only the essentials instead of many unnecessary applications, they would work five times faster.
I feel better than ever, my 30 years am delighted.
The talks, however, have only begun, according to sources in the financial centre.
The saga of Meat loaf will be honoured.
The night flights and hotel would again become profitable - it is the result of a study of the service provider of financial services and travel American Express.
A dark street in the City, Souvent forgotten, and Peut Be soon for sale.
It is entirely invisible, i.e. that it sends nor reflects any electromagnetic radiation, especially visible light.
Two months ago, Locklear has emerged from the clinic in Arizona, where she was interned for care of a nervous breakdown.
"A city without cinemas is a city blind, it is as a face and eyes"
The news has been watered down by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
Saturday night, President George W. Bush spoke to Pelosi, then, the White House also welcomed the news of the agreement.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon has been the cause of confusion among researchers - the anomaly of the gravitationnel effect.
Printed publication against broadcast.
Otakar Jeremiásˇ and Jaroslav Krcˇek arrangements are the authors of the anthem.
Of April to June, the economy class ticket prices have fallen by an average of 12.5 percent compared with the previous quarter, business-class and first class however, the evolution of prices have been far less pronounced.
While the primary debts have barely budged, the secondary loans are flagging.
The strategy of sugar and the whip against drivers
Be careful of grapefruit, orange and apple juice.
And the mobile operator has quite logically the monopoly on its network.
The BBC correspondent Frank Gardner said that this episode had many people from Whitehall.
Therefore, an early prevention is very important, as well as regular screening tests.
The head of state expresses his "sincere appreciation for the ongoing effort in favour of prevention in the workplace, the protection of accident to workers, assistance to the victims' families and awareness of public opinion"
She is has the right instincts," warned Bill Clinton this weekend.
Historic Paris Analysis of the sitting Morning Meeting Historic Morning Meeting
Or heels of trial of clothes.
The spots were prepared by the agency Euro RSCG.
The problem of American journalists is money.
"With these 3%, we manage to maintain an inventory that meets the needs of hospitals.
Verdant announced that it had a long list of clients in expectation of authorisations necessary to draw of energy.
Observed, and emotions are closely linked to the regions of the cortex that characterise the primates and especially Man.
Without making a great match, the yellow and black have created the largest number of occasions and have managed to turn a profit of the match.
The largest owner of the stock exchange of Prague is the investment bank Patria Finance, with about 25% of holdings, followed by the 14.7 percent of the bank Ceská Sporitelna and the Tiger Holding Four S. a.r.l. with 13.5 percent.
"Godbout, which has created Hydro-Quebec, Lesage who made the quiet Revolution and the nationalisation of hydro-electricity, Bourassa who made the Bay James, our party was able to forge the future," said Jean Charest.
It is not unthinkable that we do not have to resort to the financing in full.
If the pressure which requires new mergers should increase, the potential partners are gradually him.
The assistant entraineur Cornelius Jol has acquiesé and lifted the inch to approve.
Because, for Barrick Gold, the best way to conduct a public debate would be to ruin anyone who dares to support a position contrary to his?
Last "the road on the left," writing it, "you will find the modern public school brown and white, with its gardens and these areas of game well maintained that Howard Miller has always taken care, although he knows just read and write.
The process of marginalization of cinemas, with the birth on the outskirts of big multiplexes, and the death of single hall theatres in central areas of cities, is a major event which is inevitable; it has all the hallmarks of a genuine cultural crime.
Interest rates have to Hong Kong the same level as the US.
But for the moment, its creation is accompanied by a total silence.
"I have not abused her sexually.
In the case of mobile cheap, do they will play music for a few hours.
Tells us what you do in Paris.
Saturday the rain prevented the celebration of the second scheduled bulls race.
Already for 2007, they had been spoiled the two thirds.
In return, the state should recover options on the actions of the financial company that can be exchanged reason to changes in the way to reduce the burden on the Treasury Public.
Terms of the support of the financial system will be examined on Monday in the House of Representatives.
According to the renouned political scientist, the erosion of the CSU began well before the sad duo Beckstein-Huber took up office.
Sellers in detail must decide whether they will in turn increase the cost to consumers.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of Record of the Equipe.
The wrong time has hit the fair, because ultimately two parties on three could not take place.
The Prime Minister does not preclude a large meeting, "not necessarily a summit", but a time when "there will be a common vision".
Three buses are reserved for the Italian, in one of the bus travel of brésilens exclusively.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
Their method, made public by the authorities in charge of the investigation, was to receive the money subsidies obtained by issuing fresh bills, behind which no real provision was given and thus, the associations never had no respect their commitments.
For them, they are books - bills the market to Józsefváros, while fabriquaient stamps to Kiskunhalas.
It was Mr Vic Toews, former Minister of Justice (ironically) in the cabinet Harper, who allowed the summer to say of Louise Arbour that it was a "disgrace" for Canada.
A government which takes no account of the fact that Omar Khadr was a young teenager at the time of the charges against him are.
Stress is the evil of the twenty-first century.
The Nobel Prize for economy goes to Paul Krugman.
He stressed that the proposal contains the passages of consumer protection that he also supports.
Thus, the probes can save on a lot of fuel.
According to her the final vote could be made by Sunday.
"We need only find a picture to which they react very positively, such as a mother or father," said the psychologist.
The total amount of aid to the system should be divided into two parts.
'"While the Ministry of Public Administration remains today data on the reduction of absenteeism in the workplace to cause of maladie- writing the association of the people" consommateurs- loafers assets "continues to rise.
In this school students are largely Hispanic, and of families with low incomes.
The Impact will mee the Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
The "economic pressure" that journalists feel has increased by up to 79%.
Similarly, almost 93% of students have passed the examination of English-language-arts
On the one hand, Japan is the country of technology and the latest trends, on the other hand, it is tough, disciplined and traditional.
But that does not mean that there are plenty of reasons to buy an MP3 player independently.
She added: "Some people have not appreciated it".
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to settle the interests of the first year.
The office of the minister Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek thinks it will discourage drivers from dangerous driving.
To ensure that no one would know, five fictitious bills received from the society Works Team Kft. were presented to the TMA.
We need to wait to see what you think...
The legislators thus refused to support President George Bush's call to the project.
We have not managed to pass the new law on telecommunications, recently adopted, which extends the powers of the CˇTÚ in the field of economic competition in telecommunications, although many specialists promised an improvement in the situation.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
It is our duty, maintain attention to this phenomenon, not in assessing the alarm on the gravity social, and improve the legislation.
The process must happen in the blink of an eye.
With a goal and simple methods, SV Hamburg reaches top of the league table.
Until now, its admissions are not very detailed, and although he promised on several occasions to tell the last detail, it has not yet done so.
By 228 against and 205 for the representatives have refused to the Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson the means that he asked.
German domestic flights have even been halved according to the study.
It may be that it will not have to wait for long.
"The first day of courses in Japan.
That is how we need information campaigns in the press and above all negative advertisements, believes the psychologist.
According to Rule, the kidnappers wanted to release the hostages women after paying the price.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family which is doing very well".
Thanks to a technique of palpation of the human brain, it could also find that Catholics have been able to activate the part of the brain responsible for the regulation of pain.
The stars of the flamenco like Diego El Cigala, Chano Lobato, Cristina Hoyos, Enrique Morente, El Lebrijano, Antonio Canales, Vicente Amigo, among others, are part of the selection made from around seventy artists photographed.
"They could propose to restore and the deal, which also Avalon could do, but we want to maintain public."
The forgers did not pay attention to the fact that the company HIB Kft., based in Nyíregyháza, was in liquidation when (2001) the group of Fiatal Városért Egyesület was supposed to take a meal at home. According to our information, it is for this reason that the liquidator of the company denies having made this bill.
The victory against the project of the motorway enabled it to change its own image.
The interest in the image of Eatonville born with Zora, that everyone here is Hurston.
If Mr Obama really wants to eliminate the differences, it should then consider carefully, the models of education that work, rather than the dismiss or view them as insignificant.
The dancers like a lot of dress for the courts and the tests, to look in the mirror and feel good.
"The strike will continue," because "the fishermen do not keep" and "do not want to travel to Paris', for example, has announced Liliane Cariou, the chairman of the Committee on Fisheries of Lorient.
"We understand the situation and want to be really sure that the words proclaiming that American troops come on German territory not oppressors and enemies, but as liberators," is written in the letter, signed "Persons, who hold the fate of the Sˇumava close to my heart."
No, sir I am Spanish but I have lived here two years.
As soon as somniloquy appears try to stay calm.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of the Team Record.
So many other Paul Newman have gone to history.
The song, written by Jim Steinman, required a great voice like Meat Loaf's.
BSkyB retorted that being forced to reduce its share of ITV would not be sensible and instead was excessive – especially given that BSkyB had just given up its voting rights.
The name hepatitis is a generic name given to infections in the liver and caused by various virus.
I am pleased because she has agreed to play a role in my work and I am honoured ".
"I am so happy," he said to reporters.
"The needs are increasing because the population is ageing.
A line of attack stressed since yesterday in television commercials Republican.
You had not long ago 30 years: Has this been hard for you?
"We have worked very hard on the issue and have made significant progress towards an agreement that will work and will be effective in the market and for all Americans," said Paulson.
They obtained a grant worth twice 500 000 HUF, but these have not been used for the objectives indicated in the demand.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy a phone.
A presidential visit comes at the same time as a General Assembly of the "committe for crisis" created by fishermen of Breton to obtain measures in the face of soaring oil prices, which reached a record of 1.14 euro per litre on average.
The talks come, however, only to begin, said in the financial centre.
The situation was discouraging.
Or will ensure that no one would hope at the moment - that the financial crisis can be overcome in 15 months.
I find that the woman is more mature, has more experience and relishes life with fewer problems.
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciates.
However, it adopted its usual position faced with this problem.
"I am not out of my area" Favre said about all its fishways to Coles.
The assistant entraineur Cornelius Jol has acquiesé and lifted the inch to approve.
In April 2007, its true father, Terrance Randle, was found dead in his apartment in Plymouth.
In the Borussia, Luhukay has not yet managed to find a functional 11.
It was sufficient for the mining company to open its books, its files and establish a real debate, through the newspapers, media publications and funding of independent research teams that could shed light on the issue.
It will never be but we must see the "death" the operational system not as an absolute truth but as a truth.
It should discourage the drivers of driving fast and drink-driving.
Paul Newman (1925-2008) - Death of an icon committed
The five Germans, the five Italians and the Romanian and their eight Egyptian companions are doing well and are safe, announced the Egyptian national television.
Well, except perhaps the candied salted plums, brrrr!
Seth Donlin, a spokesman for the Preservation of Real Estate Agents, confirmed that the city wanted to sell the street, stressing that the agency's mission was to develop the property rather than to manage it.
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of an American artist if lucid and if generous.
It will be put to the vote early next week.
Oh, this is life.
You trouves in front of people, of characters that sometimes you do not know or are you just a few minutes to make them a photograph.
I am a woman from the theatre, I am very anxious and concerned, I would like to have everything now but of course it is not possible.
As we have already mentioned several times, the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market has made a significant drop in the price of services.
Finally arrived at Terminal 3 of Heathrow Airport on 22 August and has remained while his lawyer, David Corker, went to the court of jurisdiction limited to Uxbridge, West London, for the recorded in the list of people accused of sexual abuse, as required by Scotland Yard.
His modesty, his sensitivity and a talent who was sinking of source have also away from the register of power that actually giving rise to the real monsters sacrosanct.
The lists of price of these firms tend to get elected.
Sunday, Barack Obama and John McCain, the candidates for the presidency of the two major parties in America, showed their support for the government's $700 billion rescue plan, but there are politicians who are demanding the resignation of the US Treasury Secretary.
There was nothing left but to collect the hostages", when suddenly, "this surprise" occurred.
It he: "Beyond the form, the fact that the bill, a hundred people have housed there, not very truthful headline either, since the establishment only eleven Chambers, who do not have the same place.
The probes become so unexpected faster or slower.
In Germany, prices have been falling even more than in other European countries.
Paul Newman was part of that. "
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciates.
After the bankruptcy of Washington Mutual on Friday, the authorities have held the purchase of banking activities of Wachovia by its rival Citigroup.
The team with its new arrivals - the Brazilians Neves and Silva, the goalkeeper Petric as well as Jansen lately of FC Bayern - looks nice enough, but has not shone yet.
The trial subjects have spent half an hour in an MRI scan, meanwhile, have received 20 shock in four part to post, while watching the paint religious issue, is the one to issue more general.
In Asia, Japan's Nikkei the main index fell to 11.743,61 points after an increase from 1.26 percent.
The essence of the great masters of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, released all tensions to get the relaxed aspect of the man or woman.
Although it was once a star of literature, a contemporary Langston Hughes and the only black woman at Barnard College of the 1920s, it was buried in a fall in Fort Pearce from any, Fla, where she lived.
At boarding it is therefore necessary not only to show the smart card the driver, but we must also put the Opencard to the right place on the side of the box.
For example, there is Avalon Bay, the builder of recent luxury buildings on First Street.
This was his response to the taunt: "In any case, my life continues.
For those who accuse the Commission of being useless, given that their views will not be binding, Alemanno replies: "Everything depends on the work that the Commission will be able to do, and the quality of its proposals.
"People were always happy to see Zora" he said.
It is one of the most widespread formats and to hand him, the vast majority of aircraft comes to read the music of format WMA.
. "Many points were made in little time."
Fortis employs 85 000 people and is part of the 20 largest European banks and the 10 largest insurers.
At the time, I was very pleased to have begun to learn the language two years ago.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
But it is a shame to be wearing them just as underwear.
A court has been told that years of abuse inflicted by his father-led a woman to commit suicide.
In the same way that in a city bus or in a tram.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day in history.
Shareholders and creditors of the bank have nothing more but to hope.
The time limit that we had given was the opening of markets this morning.
With very nervous children and those who have difficulty relaxing, relaxation techniques can be used to help calm them internally.
On a purely theoretical, I cannot contradict him, but I believe that prove.
It would repaver extra Place, and create a smooth transition to the shops and shops, which should open in the new buildings.
It is not just about the attitude of CˇTÚ, which, unlike Britain and other developed countries, has unfortunately not, in the Czech Republic, the power to intervene in the economic competition.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
This vast region is much more developed in humans than in other primates and appears to be entirely absent among other species.
Students become victims of expensive rent; upto 900 euros for a room.
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of an American artist so lucid and generous.
And furthermore, something even more profound, in a sense, even worrying is a reputation, a suffering, an image of inadequacy, a sense of isolation which tends to involve the entire class of directors in a growing number in the West.
Is a long list of active principles inhibés by the fungus and other juice.
"And this is because we do not know what will the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
In demonstrating the assumption of neurologues, the members of the team players' against failure "were prepared to put higher than those made by the group and the control group" for victory. "
"Our challenge for the next decade is to maintain the safety of our products.
This is the second weekend of the party of beer, known as the 'weekend of Italy.
The Dre Décary however, in mind that "the trust is extremely fragile".
The elites in danger.
On demand, the installation CD can be shipped to home or work address.
And here, they give them a lot of importance.
AIG would consider giving more than 15% of its assets
The waves moves the buoys up and down, which is then converted into water pressure by the pistons and cylindres inside it.
Of particular interest, they say at the Institute for research of electricity, and which deserve special attention at the moment, are tides.
Two minors have helped to remove traces of the double homicide of Ózd
Impact de Montreal has qualified for the semi-finals of the eliminatory rounds of the first division of the USL, thanks to a 3-1 victory (4-3 in total of goals) at the expense of Seattle Sounders yesterday, at the second and decisive game of the series quarterfinals in total of goals, at the Saputo stadium.
The witness said that at 4.30 p.m., Locklear "based on substance on the accelerator, doing a lot of noise, trying to get out of the car garage, and going backwards several times, she roula on his sunglasses".
It is not necessary to the store and react with the logic intuitive based on data from previous games. In this way, it uses only a few dozen kilo extend of memory in continues.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the case Silva
"They believed that once home, being Czech would be beneficial to them," said Chalupa.
They also have the necessary resources and the legitimacy to use resources: Two invaluable, things which no market or international organisation can never have similar way.
It was full of scrap yard, haillons, barrels, posters, leaves and strings. "
The ADQ said support the adoption of a North Plan by the government.
Which is particularly appreciated by Italian, that is trying to the brewery Hofbräu.
Abuse of a father-" which led to suicide "
In any case it is a phenomenon little studied.
The bloodshed of the US stocks
No combination of roles, but only the desire for a corner where one can elaborate a great project for Rome.
Now, most half of the $700 billion can be spent. The first 250 billion will be issued immediately after the adoption of the law by Congress, probably on Monday. This first amount will the Treasury Secretary to buy bad debts of banks, while the use of additional $100 billion will be left to the discretion of the President.
In the context of the tragic accident at the coach of society Student Agency almost Padua, Italy, arises the question whether the stewards and passengers can during the journey move within the coach.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
The high-end mobile also allow, for example, the purchase online music.
In most cases, the offers rental are also a number of violations: Contracts free, not registered, without limit of rent, in-kind of letting.
"Yes, we have a serious problem.
Moreover, the state provides a right to buy shares in the banks taking part in the plan. In this way, the risk of taxpayers, since they can even be win in the case as soon as the economy and with it the banks saved will rebound on their legs.
Today, one in 12 million runs the risk of blood be infected with HIV.
The report by the inspector General was very critical of the role of Mr González in this case, saying that he considered him 'chiefly responsible' for the dismissals, and ultimately abdicated his role as leader, managing remarkably not to involve himself in the case.
This is a problem that must be resolved, according to reporters interviewed, if we want the traditional journalism as the general public, will be reduced substantially.
A spokesman of the Community Islamic local said to be "deeply shocked" to the announcement of this desecration, which comes just for religious month of Ramadan, which is coming to an end.
I believe yes, but in the end they are joined and these activities have a lot in common.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices has developed between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
BSkyB has lost its trial following the verdict of the Competition Commission, which will force it to reduce its participation in its rival provider ITV.
The opposition fears that the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe that followed the election process does not recognize the validity of the election.
After the waves, the tides.
Also interesting, are some functions specific modules, such as anyone can compress PowerPoint presentations, useful for example, to send them by email or to import PDF files into the module responsible for graphic elaboration, while retaining the original aspect of the page.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer 97 had delivered.
The shame, Mr Toews, is in this renouncing, and not elsewhere.
World in which we live?
Share prices being sucked into the eddy in Europe and the United States
This case is one of the many accusations that her.
It is better for this way, as they will still need their strength.
For 46 years, the CSU was the single "sovereign" party of Bavaria contributing 18% of the GDP.
That is why, according to the researchers, the rise in prices is with the brain to the violent reaction of the striatum.
No current device is as universal as the mobile phone.
During the war, it was, as a German of 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, engaged in the Navy in the Baltic countries.
The interests of 2009 cover seven months, from the end of September this year till the end of March.
That is that one aspect of the American mindset kept secret until the end.
Launches T. Izumi, a former member of the studies in California, and former director of the department of education in the Pacific Research Institute for Public Policy, is the co-author of the book "not as Well that you would think. Why the middle class must be able to choose their school."
The 'rescuers' must not immediately brandish 100 billion euros, though this would be good if they knew in which case it would be reasonable to ask for taxpayers' money, with the aim of preventing the biggest damages.
"In other words, it means distribute 12 million blood products before someone is infected with HIV.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed Marcel Jansen later.
The talks come, however, only to begin, said in the financial centre.
"We have ensured in a letter to the President of UEFA that the preparations for the 2012 European Championships do not suffer."
Part of the press Madrid is also the scapegoat in Washington.
To imitate the functions of the eye, engineers have put forth the idea of a laser rangefinder.
His lawyers, Michele Gentiloni and Gaetano Pecorella, asked if the estate agent could move from the provincial city to a home in the capital.
A very intense but, at the same time, exciting, day we expect.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
In addressing the draft hydro-electric dam Eastmain1a-Ruper, Mr Charest pointed out that its operation was scheduled for 2012.
"The practice of faith should change and in many cases, actually change our personality," said Wright.
For the Democratic candidate, the current debacle "is the final verdict of eight years of bad economic policy implementation by George Bush and supported by Senator McCain."
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
But the launch of Android being late and the iPhone is already on the market, it will cost them dear.
Mr Bush was happy with the progress in the negotiations
The head of the Department of Justice, the Prosecutor General Alberto Gonzales, is accused of being involved in this case of dismissal, and in the end, he resigned.
It is a benign lack of sleep called somniloquie.
UNIPOL: Court ROME, DANILO COPPOLA remains A GROTTAFERRATA.
In Monica, they are not that girls fine and famous who give their behalf.
Cornelius is the brother of the chief trainer of Hamburg Martin Jol.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament it is because they have been appointed, not elected.
Then I quickly crept in my place.
Although the President can be vetoed by this decision, Congress has the opportunity to put it in a minority.
The middle ground Antonio Ribeiro marked the winning goal in the 90th minute to play.
"This is the 'reformism also emphasises Brunetta.
It will not work, "he stressed.
And it is precisely on energy tides that states such as New York, Maine and Alaska, with others, are looking at the coast, have invested $7 million in 2008 and provides investment up to 35 million in 2009.
We cannot ignore the threat longer - highlights the Tages-Anzeiger in Geneva.
More than a third of students, many of which are newcomers, are studying English.
According to the results of a recent research, the religious belief would work as a kind of painkiller, which would have helped to make more bearable death martyrs Catholics.
A fight taken to extremes: MP3 players against the mobile.
What happens if someone uses my data against me, if we look at what is my work? Require users, who worry about seeing the monopoly of information to Google.
A former PM of Bangladesh has denied the bail
Of these European roots will generate a glorious faces of the American dream.
As a result of domestic price fluctuations and for export, the prices of industrial production rose by 0.7% compared with the previous month, and 3.2 percent compared with the previous year.
What I will do that is to give happiness to my son and raise him with a lot of love.
The second weekend of the party of beer is also known as the weekend of Italy.
They are red recall the machines to compost the tickets and passengers have perhaps already noted in the underground stations Roztyly, Budeˇjovická, I. P. Pavlova, Florenc and Vltavská.
This whole process must reflect what the bee does to avoid other bees.
The written version of the economic recovery plan of $700 billion to buy the questionable credit of banks, and to reuse this several times, is ready.
They are, indeed, free of the relatively high costs of construction, operation and maintenance the mobile network.
Note the case of Bologna, the first Italian city, which concerned about these closures, has decided to resolve the situation with the signing of a protocol between the Mutuelle and Anec, the first of its kind in Italy, to defend and promote single hall cinemas of historic centres and in the periphery.
To Elena, this is the first time, Luca already the third or fourth time.
The last change, the loss of the ball to Bowens, may well be the most charming
It did in addition to mention of the new husband of Widow Dash and wrote that Lee Glenn "sells drinks of any kind and everything that can serve the people of way.
"He has set the bar high," said George Clooney, who is perhaps the only person today who is trying to pierce the screen like Paul Newman: By being very honest and having a serious private life a long way from his objectives.
I believe that in the photograph the portrait is the kind of the most difficult.
He took a second look, when the jets transformed a 0-0 into an explosion.
In my view, similar behavious is not enough to prove similar experience.
Until now, physicists could not explain this.
The sailors have already shown their determination on Monday by burning, from early in the morning, tyres and pallets in front of deposits of fuel at the ports of Brest and Lorient, while the demonstrations were under way at Concarneau or St Brieuc.
The director of the company was a man from Romania, who Iván Kubatov would also have sent documents in connection with the society, between 2002 and 2005.
Criminals painted Jewish symbols, such as the Star of David, on several graves; the detectives believe, however, that it could have been done to disguise the feeling of hatred of extremists to the Muslim immigrants.
The Spanish bank Santander said yesterday that it would buy the branches and the customer accounts of the British bank.
Indeed, the Prime Minister, who said in April that there would be no election in 2008 and probably not in 2009, has not ruled out the possibility of a ballot this autumn, which the law allows him.
People pay less and less attention to the operating system but increasingly to their Internet browser.
She would know of the extent of deception only after the divorce.
"All the work is done.
Behind him, during his speech, was projected a kind of windmill of images.
And that is why its application has been received the strategic markets.
This is the site of the newspaper The Equipe who reported the news.
On the other hand, a wave of reputation for the existing leaderships, economic types who have proven to be inadequate and full of grey areas.
The Sudeten called for a referendum in the US
From January to March, prices rose by 6.9 percent in 41 of 48 examined European cities on average, compared with the same 41 of 48 examined European cities in 2007.
Mr Randle confronted his daughter's step-father, who had also written a letter of confession that ended with: "I tied and bound her up regularly".
Refer Rome, gave the order to leave the Commission for the future of the capital.
While virtually all mobile can read the MP3 files, no MP3 player knows telephone.
The same music for travel, namely music high-pressure, to put it in a simplified, MP3 music.
It is "irritating" to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior during the resumption of the housing market, must now pay for the institutions which were much less cautious.
Tourists kidnapped in Egypt are set free
Italian, "whose dynamic salariales- explains the ministre- these 8-10 years have doubled compared to the private sector, and well above the rate of inflation.
New York has hundreds of Avenue, boulevards, streets and other roads in parallel, some famous, other only functional.
But there was always new negotiations on the reunification of the Deka-Bank with the Länder banks.
When the agreement was announced, one would have thought a truly revolutionary step.
Its cargo, more than two tonnes of hashish, what stop them.
For the moment, we have four systems of this kind in phase of the project, pending a single federal approval and part of energy could be used to a military installation.
No final decision has been taken on these cessions, said FT.
Unlike any existing system currently, the avoidance maneuver is entirely a knee-jerk.
Included in the programming of the Month of the photograph Flanders, the exhibition "reflects the international importance of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, more every day," explains the creator, which clarifies that "intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people '" can be anyone but, having seen the pictures, the observer realise that they are not typical images of artists on stage.
Newman, rather than sitting on a myth, has committed to the end.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
How sounds the 'new' anthem
It is precisely the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market that has led to a considerable reduction in prices, which were subsequently react to the traditional operators.
Attacks on Obama are rising while the date of the elections are approaching.
The spokesman for T-Mobile Martina Kemrová says in a rare agreement with the declaration of O2: "We have not seen for the moment of project viable and bilaterally advantageous, which could serve as a basis."
"Because it fascinates me,"
For the Helaba, this is not particularly good news.
, the final vote could be done by Sunday.
The BBC correspondent Frank Gardner said that this episode had (surprised?) people of Whitehall.
Reading the investigation in detail, we see that in Milan, a bed in the Brianza area, is approximately EUR 450; a simple room, ranges between 650 EUR minimum (in Bande Nere), to an average of EUR 800 (in Udine, Lambiate, and Fiera) to a maximum of EUR 900 (in Vittoria)
A virtual operator win the Czech Republic this year.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not recognise the elections as fair.
His spokesman Tony Fratto said that Mr Bush was pleased with the progress made on Saturday and appreciated "the joint effort to stabilize our financial markets and protect our economy".
In this way, the organizing committee, in accordance with Fermín Bohórquez, Pablo Hermoso of Mendoza and Leonard Hernández, has decided to suspend the celebration of the race bulls.
A Sevillan dancer will pay tribute to a dancer who is also Sevillan.
In the online magazine 'Edge, "contributions are published for several years by famous scientists.
And in addition, there is the currents and the tides.
When we will not be the most expensive
The host of the Festival, Felix Romeo, was confronted by a fascinated public who hardly realized time pass during which the Peruvian, with a staggering memory and with a great deal of humour, described the birth of his literary vocation, which was due to "his thirst to read" and "to live new experiences"; how he wrote in a "very methodical" manner thanks to the hard work of documentation, correcting and redrafting part of the text to cope with a "lack of inspiration"; how Faulkner, Victor Hugo and Alexandre Dumas have influenced his vocation and how his memories inspire his novels.
That is how it plays necessarily a dominant role in a certain segment of the business.
The Czech national anthem will, next year, its 175è anniversary.
"I wanted to re-commemorate her because I think it is these women who have had an enormous influence in their time and now no one knows and highlights their work," says Bayón.
A replica of this combination is out of the question.
If someone believes that it is not possible to achieve peace in lieus as the work or through personal relations, this is crazy manual is such a belief.
What's more, this week, a change of strategy was discussed at Microsoft.
The only one who relies on a travesty of justice to assess the guilt of the accused.
Worse for El text, who entered the arenas of Los Llanos without effort or glory.
The Dow Jones index lost nearly seven percent, following a fall of such a scale for the last time in 1987.
"The entry of a virtual operator on the mobile market would be possible following the conclusion of an agreement between a mobile operator and the virtual operator in question about renting the necessary infrastructure.
No one was afraid to go to ridicule or to exaggerate.
For example, bees.
Run! Run to reserve the seats at the far end of the tent.
MP3 players put hearing at risk.
Not in front of the cashier's desk, neither to withdraw nor to deposit money, but before the counter for customer service, where the usual customers get their checkbooks, tourists ask for directions to Macy's, and the new customers opened their accounts.
But I do not know how the show.
Often mentioned in conversations with the Prime Minister recently, the opening of the north - the 49th parallel northern territory - had never been the subject of a presentation.
Unlike the politicians of the opposition, the Russian observers have accepted the democratic elections.
Sixth Street on analyses, in practice, a constant assessment of capacity and an exemplary attitude.
The Rock star Meat loaf, must be honoured at Q Awards for his epic singing Bat Out of hell.
Thanks to this, they have sought to calm angry members of the group and the basis that one day after the Bavarian "tsunami" demanded of personal consequences for the loss of an absolute majority.
Eatonville is classified as a historic city since 1998.
The money comes from private banks as well as from banks in the public sector.
I believe that in the photograph the portrait is the kind of the most difficult.
Ago for five years, it is true, even under the direction of Edmund Stoiber, at the top of his career - the socio-Christian union had 60.7%, while today, a year after the coup against Stoiber, there are only 43.4 percent of their strength.
"This remains between us, but I forsee it happening," he confided to his militants, eliciting a huge round of applause from them.
They say so much about he, I know, many things are not true.
The interior minister wants the driver who has had more than three administrative penalties for alcoholism, to install in his vehicle a system which prevents the vehicle from starting in a state of drunkenness, or if he refuses to have his breath checked.
No title could no longer make profits.
Sylvana already know that word thanks to Mangas - in her new exchanges Log, she speaks of Japan.
Transactions with the CˇEZ shares rose almost half the usual daily exchanges.
"She had a disoriented look about her," that is why the agents led her to the center for drugs and alcohol to conduct a test.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
's investigation reveals that the Public Prosecutor 'issuers' have also made mistakes by mentioning as provision the transport of goods by road, that the company emitter bills could not exercise, given that its profile was the council in investment.
Other sources say that the refinancing would be provided through the funds until the end of 2009.
Generosity, love of life were vibrants features of the actor.
Despite all their efforts, it is still not sure that their plan will the green light.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was trying to take care of my way to pay.
The pressure spin a turbine which in turn, leads a generator.
"We owe the overall financial disaster to the US president," the daily of Rome, La Repubblica accused. "The president was not even been able to block with his own party behind a bill, improvised in a hurry, aimed at helping a desperate situation..."
But it emerged then, that prosecutors dismissed were not more criticism that their colleagues, which incita some observers to give these redundancies a political undertones.
According to the results, the Catholic believers were able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
The more losers of the Dow Jones were on this date American Express who lost nearly 14 percent and Bank of America with a loss of about 12 percent.
His Rachel, Rachel, in 1968 (according to the saga of the Canadian Margaret Laurence), with his wife Joanne Woodward were leading role in the end, traçait a female portrait of melancholy.
It provides for: better control of its implementation by the elected representatives, new mechanisms to ensure the reimbursement of public money, new provisions to contain the number of houses seized for default in payment, and a right to scrutinise the salaries paid to executives of rescued companies.
The new plan provides for the payment of a first installment of 250 billion to which will be added another 100 billion if the President thinks it necessary.
It is better for this way, as they will still need their strength.
The song of nine minutes 50 seconds, was the title of the hit of the album of Meat loaf of 1977.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
It is quite common, especially among children and adolescents.
Shortages are very rare.
It represents both a historical model of a takeover of blacks and a community of nearly 2,400 people where the poverty rate is twice the national average.
Moreover, there is another question to the ÚOHS.
With a goal and simple methods, the SV Hamburg becomes first of the league.
The world over, stock markets fell to their knees.
The lists of price of these firms tend to come to a select few.
"But above all, a greater sense of responsibility of employers with a phenomenon which represents a social emergency."
One aspect is that the circuits associated with almost always to human consciousness include the cortex latéral préfrontal (of its participation in the short-term memory and in senior management and implementation).
Try not to excite the child before it goes to sleep.
The number of stages for the European Championship could possibly be reduced from eight to six.
Josef Pokorny´, the director of the Department of road traffic, believes that the law deals sufficiently with the problem.
The talks, however, have only begun, according to sources in the financial centre.
For them, sugar is represented by, for example, to save time when they grillent a red light.
If it is impossible to study and to discuss issues that do not like the rich companies in the world in a country such as Canada, repeated charges, which can do so?
What could be really interesting is that the accused, János Zuschlag himself, decides to lift the veil from the whole story.
A forecast that unleashed a lot of controversy, and which brought the economist a lot of critisism for years, but now has proved correct.
Brunetta: "From today, breakfast before the work".
Moreover, the programme differs from the original proposal made by the Bush administration, which she stated that the $700 billion should be spent only once, to buy securities on the appropriations dubious.
But the Mexican press knows who are the Princes of Asturias and knows the importance of the journey.
Elena attack by Luca, then the embraces.
As the network has not changed much over the human evolution, it could quite part of horizontal sensations of all kinds.
According to the dancer, "we are not trying to tell his life but to translate its way of thinking.
Who will take the place of George W will be a huge stain to do.
This can be explained by the fact that Google, unlike Microsoft, does not ask its users of identification code, is not asking for money for its applications. The code documentary and the package of programmes, continually cooler, has a much more accessible, younger and more page, faced with the practice of official of the software giant.
Stars in the starry sky of Paris.
Even veteran taxi drivers and and long time local residents aren't able to give proper directions to Extra Place, because they have never heard of it.
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
The development of the North would be in line with the principles of sustainable development.
The two right-wing parties that have won almost 30 percent of the votes, the Freedom Party and the Alliance for the Future of Austria, led a campaign against immigration. Some of their slogans were even considered, according to critics, as xenophobic.
Monica Cruz is small but full of vitality.
Following the experience, we cannot shake off the impression that the confusion in the competences their is in these cases more than good.
If adrenalin does not course through your veins to restore the balance of your body and if the stress has become a problem, it is time to sit in the sofa, to disconnect from your spirit and focus on reading.
"We are discussing the expansion of this project to success, but in the Czech Republic the negotiations are not very promotrices.
But how can we ensure that it has the same feelings when it behaves in the same way as we do?
The other sectors of the processing industry have increased between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
Oil prices fell sharply on Monday, because people fear that the rescue plan for the financial markets, will not be able to revive the economy.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was trying to take care of my way to pay.
What is it that I was excitée.
As regards readers, you do need, without exception (iPod), no software.
To capture the moment of personality of these artists we should not make photos on stage.
The intelligent car imitates the flight of a bumblebee
Petr Koblic, the director of the stock market in Prague, said last week that among those involved, the stock exchange of Warsaw would be the least desirable new owner, and has not ruled out the fact that this could lead to the disappearance of the stock market in Prague in the future.
They are often linked to other changes of sleep as the nightmares, the night terrors which were, the énurésies pipi to bed at night (be) or sleepwalking, but it is not always the case.
The profession has not always been kind to the handsome Paul Newman to whom roles fell badly for a long time.
There is no single cause which determines its occurrence
This wave of admiration swept Hollywood without care for either nationalities or passports.
The development of Orlando has already pushed Interstate 4 up to the west of the city.
The Nasdaq stock market index of technology was at 1548 points with a fall of more than seven points.
According to Bush, the project should solve the main causes of the financial crisis and to help stabilize the economy as a whole.
Microsoft is right, its operational system is important but also its software.
"Everything has been done to put out the real economy and the ordinary Americans of the ongoing crisis on Wall Street," said the democrat.
Has 35 years, Gebrselassie won the 26ème world record of its successful career in which he won the World Cup or the world record for any distance, the 1600mètres of the marathon.
Which explains why the residents are both proud and protectors.
They go at night, remain the whole day at the festival and return at 10.30 p.m.
The big words were not lacking in the letter from the steering committee of WestLB to employees of the house.
Through the Personalized Search program launched two years ago, users can, for example, store their own search history and can see what they have sought, what they have clicked on. Thanks to this, in the long term, recommendations, based on the same logic, will be able to give much more personalized answers, and will submit products and services on the basis of previous statements and registered preferences.
It would have taken note of the extent of deception only after the divorce.
Since its creation, on 28 September 1998, Héma-Quebec has applied the precautionary principle.
There is even people who swear: If Obama wins, we leave the United States.
Sarkozy at the meeting of fishermen angry
In exchange, we are recovering influence and a right to vote in the bank.
"A woman is dead."
It is enough to fill, through the USB connector, the apparatus of music from the computer.
The collar workers continue to queue to buy their sandwich matinier merchants to happen, and it is impossible to find a taxi between 16h and 19h in the week.
However, it is quite unlikely that an echo of such activity was not able to the leaders of the mobile operators.
And increases even more convinced of the various classes, before the actions are the same ideas of social elites until now at their peak, their way to listen and to be, their culture in the complex acceptance of the term, to have the same time, and to be more foreign to the views of majorities.
The mistakes are starting with the withdrawal of dossards, which you have to go ahead.
The police of Munich is reinforced by seven policemen of South Tyrol, by the Italian rescue volunteers who bear the Bavarian Red Cross making a statistic on the countries where the Italians occupy the first place before the British (60 interventions) and the Austrians (approximately 80) with nearly 200 medical interventions in all.
Cooperation between several people is something that has resulted in improvements in the various applications: in the worksheets, various users can intervene, avoiding conflicts on the changes in the drafting of texts, because every employee is attributed a colour for comments, so that there is greater recognition in the process of revision.
Nothing is yet come out of this display ternaire.
Is to be ready for the return.
The most expensive action in Czech history targetting road safety.
What method would be best to develop technologies which are able to avoid an obstacle, than to look at systems in nature that do exactly the same thing?
Immigrants: The New York Times asks itself whether Italy is racist?
It begins with a section instrumental that has lasted almost two minutes.
According to Merkel, concealing his disappointment caused by the fiasco with difficulty, the loss of ground of the CSU will not negatively influence the grand coalition of Berlin.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was trying to take care of my way to pay.
The pace was not very supported during this meeting where the attackers were difficult to speak.
We can, of course, make music directly on the map memory, but little card readers know go without reduction, given the dimensions tiny memory cards used in mobile.
According to the information of MTI, the young man had premeditated the crime. The weapon with which he was going to commit the crime was hidden on the scene of the crime.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one in ten patients receiving medical treatment.
We advise you on how to make a choice.
The future, says that the mayor of Rome, "will not be limited to the usual local border, but will go further" not only in the context of the future metropolitan city and its legal status as Capital, but also in relation to the role that Rome can and should be, as Capital of Europe and the Mediterranean '.
In a recent past, 15 of these banks have failed.
The septuagenarian McCain has repeatedly put forward his indisputable experience in foreign policy, while emphasising the "naiveness" of his opponent in these matters that were at the heart of this first contest.
The Congress agreed that the government of the United States could inject $700 billion into banks
When a rat is a danger, it is the same as many other animals: It is the death, fled or attack.
Unfortunately, the Czech regulators deal with this issue in the way of a hot potato disposed of by passing to the nearest target.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the map winner for democrats is George Bush.
Martina Kemrová said about this: "Competition on the mobile market was, moreover, recently increased by the entry of a fourth mobile operator to the market.
Said Sunday to Reuters Barney Frank, the chairman of the committee of the banking and financial regulation of the House.
Much more irregularities occur in the speed.
The operational system will always be necessary because it is essential for the hardware and software to understand each other.
Following a work of almost a year ago, carried out by developers volunteers, monitored by Sun Microsystem, the new package Open Office is the public with various innovations: Of the screen to welcome, and the interface reviewed and become less dry, to other more important, as the compatibility born to the system opératif Apple Mac os X, and support for the new format ODF (Open document format) 1.2, the latest version ISO standard.
Eric Smith made another happening and was intercepted.
Whose orders seem to have been similar: and hurry up with the second goal!
According to the vision of the newspaper El Mundo, it is the failings of the political direction there that has led the global economy to the brink of collapse.
Thirdly: 'This evening, be back here has ten and a half hours battery is understood?!
You will achieve nothing, because in sleeping, he is not sufficiently aware to organize his thoughts.
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory on the ground after a long period of famine.
Associated with late in the negotiations, the two candidates in the US presidential election were rather in favour of understanding, without fail, however, to express their dissatisfaction that you need to get this far.
The report was critical of officers of the White House, legislators and former Prosecutor General, Alberto Gonzales.
The sun was about to set but its rays forced one to shielf ones eyes to see the royal couple get off the plane.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
For me, it was clear that I had to travel there some day.
Because I have also a weak to the traditions, customs and habits.
It is certain that more than one speaks during the night.
And this isn't noisy for the Italians, explains Marco Guarda.
Has Bologna, where students are concentrated in areas close to the University, 250 / 280 euros for a bed in a double, and 370 to 500 for a simple.
Saturday that is the rain that prevented the celebration of the second race bulls planned.
More than four hundred people profitèrent of service during the morning.
Would viewing a better quality painting of the Virgin Mary induce better results?
According to the Russian observers, this is due to a country ruled by Alexander Lukashenko, who ensures prosperity and stability, while according to the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE), this is because illegalities are made in the counting of votes.
His fellow Democrat in Ohio, Mary Kaptur believe that these are the same people who are taking action, as those responsible for the collapse of Wall Street.
But the committee would prefer that the street rest in the hands of the city, and asked to submit a new proposal next month, said Susan Stetzer, the local manager of the Committee No 3.
And do not forget the deposit.
In the whole of the processing industry, prices have risen by 10.2 percent during the past year.
I conclude that an emotional system such as the fear is activated in a brain aware of its own business.
The boxeur Rocky Graziano, delinquant, tormented, violent, unforgettable in Somebody Up there Likes Me (marked by hatred), or Robert Wise, a role intended for James Dean, resumed after his death, which really launched Newman in 1956.
Graffiti on the walls, an empty bottle of beer of 22 onces, lies beside the newspapers that have just been thrown.
Mixed blood often makes beautiful children.
High-end mobiles also allow, for example, the purchase of music online.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´, the spokesman for Vodafone, in doubt: "The Czech market is relatively small to an approach segmentaire, which is based most of the virtual operators.
The song is ensured by Katerˇina Kneˇzˇínková and Adam Plachetka.
They desperately need this, indeed, and I shows you an example.
New cases of positivité the last Tour de France: It is the Austrian team Gerolsteiner, Bernhard Kohl, qualified third, and winner of the jersey the best climber.
So many other Paul Newman have gone to history.
Passengers can receive their coffee and their newspaper upon boarding.
No operator, however, is against such a procedure.
Today we are starting in March we end, in June we learn the sums.
Prices are not the lowest.
The reason may be that geeks see exactly the problematic relationship between the rights of the individual and the Internet, and what the Web 2.0, the keyword of recent years, really entails.
Since the disease can be detected by a routine examination in the laboratory, it is advisable to consult a doctor treating from the observation of symptoms of unknown origin.
The SPÖ wants to show that the cooperation of both parties is indeed possible - that is what already exists in certain regions and in the Socialist partnership.
For many, the main advantage of mobile phones that play music is their prices.
Paul Newman the magnificent
Sudanese soldiers had done this Sunday six of the kidnappers in the border area between Sudan, Chad and Egypt, and had arrested two of them.
Krugman is one of the largest criticism solutions in economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
The company has analysed reservation data for the first half of 2008 and has established that after a price increase in the first quarter, a sharp fall in profits was witnessed in the second quarter.
Shortly after, the witness, who initially had not recognised the actress saw Locklear stop in the middle of the motorway and get out of her car.
In fact, it is not interested too the bus, but rather the points system, the maximum speed on the motorway and the use of mobile at the wheel, "said the expert Horˇín.
But that would require also some efforts from Damascus.
But that is precisely that would seem strange the CˇTÚ.
Moreover, it is these bills that were found in the raid on the office of Árpád Kemecsei, at the Ministry of Education.
There are even people who swear: if Obama wins, we leave the United States.
But the court was told that Ms Randle, assiduous volunteer of National Trust, was haunted by the abuses that had been inflicted on her twice a week.
But we must not give up so easily.
Almost two Republicans out of three rejected his plan.
This 1: 0 (1: 0 at half-time), the team of Hamburg the needs to a successful in the head by Mladen Petric (at the eleventh hour); and the fact that the very low Gladbach players could not do any harm to the weak players of Hamburg.
No, not Mr, I am Spanish but I have lived here thinking two years.
Young and opponents were demonstrating Sunday evening in the main square in the capital of Belarus to reject in advance of the elections.
'Four hundred prominent professors of economy, including three Nobel Prize winners, have written to tell us: we request Congress not to hurry but carefully examine the route to be taken," he said yesterday.
In New York, Wall Street opened with losses sensitive.
Young people have recognised the facts that they are accused. For the moment, they are accused of complicity.
On trade terms, the stock exchange of Prague fell
On the road, someone nails yellow hats to the trees, the signs and even an election poster of a large Bavarian People's Party, so as to easily find the return path.
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the falling stock markets.
At that time we witnessed the outbreak many cases of the human form of mad cow disease in Europe, a new variant of Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, recounts the one that stood strong since its founding in 1998.
Only a few days ago, the big investor Warren Buffett was involved in society.
The cinema of the 1950s and 1960s we dazzles and we let much for our collections.
But I think it has appreciated the end of the match.
In this way, the ODSZ has abandoned its originally planned boycott.
'I want to become a young mother; the candidate does not worry me "
In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng index has gone awry by 2.1 percent to 18.286,90 points.
And do not forget the deposit.
Despite these circumstances, as a photographer, I always attempt to convert my ideas into reality".
The political analyst David Gergen believe that the performance of John McCain, although honourable, was not sufficiently "brilliant" to allow him to halt the decline in the polls for the presidential elections that he had been seeing for five weeks.
Negotiations to ransom are already underway.
"Sometimes what one feels goes beyond any expression, and now I have lost a great friend," wept Robert Redford, "my life and my country were better thanks to its existence.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
Andik, the owner of Mango galant, a man, and the Baron of Rotchil have finished the evening without jacket because they had lent to two women.
It has not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain of outdated.
The first time this happens may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
To produce energy on a large scale, however, we must use of technology with a higher environmental impact.
As bold in life as in her literature, Hurston led readers to a shop owned by the first mayor of Eatonville, Mr Joe Clarke, which was then divided into several private parts.
We do not have to look too far to find examples.
The same man who milita for civil rights was also the car pilot who classa second to the Mans 24 hours in 1979, doubled of a sex symbol, albeit a member of a couple model formed since 1958 with the actress Joanne Woodward were.
The market for students try does not know of crisis
The proposal of this potential acquisition was made public in the meeting of this month.
Staying the night would involve unnecessary costs, explains Marco.
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the markets of actions that are falling.
The documents that he has lost contained assessments on Al-Qaeda and the resources of the security forces in Iraq.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is complete with the Palais Chigi.
No one with operator, however, is against such a procedure.
It should discourage drivers from driving fast and of drunk-driving.
But the Illhousiens goal scorer was not able to enjoy his happiness long and was be forced to return to the changing rooms a dozen minutes later and leaving his team mates with one man less.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
And if we start to list all his appearances, we could also mention the strapping moustachu who lifted weights in a travelling circus.
It is better for this way, as they will still need their strength.
The state financier had, according to a newspaper article, refinanced itself in a very short term for projects in the long term for which it had borrowed money - which is no longer possible given the distrust towards the markets.
It belongs exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
At the end of last April, the City Council of Gioia Tauro had been dissolved; already in 1991, and always because of alleged pacts between organised crime and the local government, local politicians had been released from their function to administer the City.
- It has ajouté- "we must make a further effort on the communication and awareness of public opinion.
It was a blow for everyone.
Last week a delay has happened in the new version of Windows Mobile 7.
McCain, on his part wanted to build a fleet of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
A cockroach flees before danger, but does it feel fear?
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to settle the interests of the first year.
According to the results, the Catholic believers were able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
BSkyB had bought its share in 2006 following an agreement to prevent NTL, – now called Virgin Media - buying ITV.
You are what you divulge about yourself.
The film maker of "Volver a empezar" has impressed with his usual way of working on the stage direction of actors, with who he practices before shooting and to whom he gives no casting, since it seems "humiliating" and considers that "the role of the filmmaker is to go to the cinema, or the theatre to remain informed".
The figures provided by Anec, the main association of traders, says: in the last five years, 316 traditional cinemas to have closed, and it is the halls of the main cities that have especially paid the price: 10 fewer in Florence, 9 in Milan, Naples, Bologna and Rome, 6 in Turin, 5 in Palermo.
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only inside the party that voters have become more aware, more critical and more stubborn.
In the Swedish town, prices hotels are with an increase of EUR 26.3 percent, the highest in Europe.
In the Czech Republic, no chance, say the mobile operators
Across the world, every year, a million people die of the most serious form of the disease, such as cancer or the cirrhosis of the liver damage from hepatitis B.
This information stems from, among other things, a letter preserved in a private archive, which is now a part of the the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna.
"It is a traditional position that all governments have reiterated.
In the online magazine "Edge", contributions by famous scientists are being published for several years.
The return of the good of the 10-year Treasury fell to 3,632%, against 3,827% on Friday evening, and to 30 years to 4,161%, against 4,357% the previous day.
Hence only the event on Friday took place
Why your new collection created to Mango for the fourth season?
They go at night, remain the day of the festival at 10.30 p.m., and fall.
Microsoft is seeking a virtual (see)
Even if it is a shame to be just as underwear.
The architects of the plan would like to see put to the vote in the House of Representatives from today, and the Senate on Wednesday.
The other research - The University of California, Berkeley, claims also to be researching in a new adhesive.
But it is said, keep our eyes wide open, it is not without reason.
Researchers hoped that the sight of the Virgin Mary would create a kind of state of faith among the believers, while the painting of Da Vinci, not very different from the first, would have a calming effect.
US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
Then they found a cyst in his vocal cords.
Other applications could affect the aerospace engineering.
The reasons for this fall in prices would be a slowing economic growth, explains the firm.
The Thai authorities stopped him at passport control, and in the end, he went to Hong Kong.
And will the inhabitants of the territory be the First United and the Inuits?
One has the impression that the traditional elites, their parties, their programmes, but also their observance, their newspapers, their accredited intellectuals, their format, someone would have more difficulty, which is not new, to understand and therefore to represent the layers deep Western societies, and that the economic crisis strengthens, increases and wave potentially too much.
It is now become a city of pilgrimage
Monica Cruz is petite but full of vitality.
Krugman is one of the biggest critics of the economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
The Hang Seng index in Hong Kong stock exchange lost four percent during the exchange, but later, it made up for part of losses and reduced the drop to approximately 2.5 percent.
If the plan will be adopted now, or early next week, is, according to Marek, not as important as that.
So, in just 100 words, Hurston to a combined Eatonville self government but also analphabétisation, on remariage, and sex.
It is astonishing that in recent weeks, this is precisely the classic groups of citizens who are rather far away from CSU, such as the self-employed artisans, holders of degrees and graduates of studies higher.
I am curious to know if I could see this here as well.
But I do not know how to prove it.
After spending during the last eight seasons, more time than anyone in uniform of the Jets, Shaun Ellis, the defender thought himslef to have seen everything.
The leader of the Hungarian diplomacy is in negotiations today onwards in Washington.
The other sectors of the processing industry have increased between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
Járóka said: We need to break the vicious cycle of poverty and segregation
Even the telecommunications regulators lack the tools necessary for the opening of the mobile market to virtual operators," said Chaloupa in his statement.
The experts say a technology still in its infancy, from the fact that the marine energy dispelling fears about the environmental impact.
For example, Avalon Bay, the manufacturer of recent buildings of luxury on First Street.
The historical cinemas are closing in favour of Multiplex.
The wait lasted more than 35 minute;, it is incomprehensible given that 11 000 people are expected to these races.
Another English, whom Sam Mendes, said that work with Newman was the top of his career.
The shares of Goldman Sachs Bank showed a drop of almost 10%.
But the coach can have an accident or brake suddenly at a time when the steward serves coffee or distributes newspapers.
Of April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than the previous year.
If not, you can use the integrated bodies that virtually all mobiles have, but very few MP3 players.
It will not work, "he stressed.
"It works, observed," it worked for us "
The perception of the obstacle is taking place in a split second, and then the mini self robot, imitating the movement of bees, immediate changes the direction of its wheels in the turning point of a light enough to avoid a collision.
According to Senator Harry Reid, Democrat évadiez legislators are so that Congress will lead to a final agreement by Sunday.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family which is doing very well".
During the break, they then took out their Bentos.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin said, while many made fun of her.
The pace was not very sustained during an encounter where the attackers found it difficult to do anything.
Concerns for the Afghan campaign antipolio.
It is a shame that, from an ethical and moral point of view, the government does not respect the existing laws.
In Germany, prices have been falling even more important than in other European countries.
Yes, there are solutions.
In terms of points, the biggest drop in its history (684,81 points) had previously been recorded on 17 September 2001, the day of the resumption of trade after the terrorist attacks of 11 September.
They have a personality and a unique character.
He shouted the scandal when the Prefecture ordered the dissolution of the City Council.
The Tan have allowed to shorten the period silent, which stretches between the time when the person has been infected and when the first virus can be found in blood by our technical, explains the specialist.
Five paragraphs in the guide to the Florida transformed this city, located just outside of Route 17, a road that runs through the centre of Florida, often forgotten, which ends in a chapter in black history of the human drama.
The party of racing banderilles which concluded the bulls of the rat of Pozoblanco has been suspended yesterday morning, after the horse toréadors to have established that the ring was unworkable.
And accentuating still further the sense of urgency, "every day that goes by ushers the fall of a financial institution" in the US, said Mrs Piegza.
Behind him, during his speech was thrown a kind of mills in pictures.
The general coordinator and Member of the United Left, Gaspar Llamazares, said today that it is up to the regional federation to take a decision on the case of the former advisor of Youth and Sport of the City of Seville, Francisco Manuel Silva, who resigned last week after being accused of nepotism.
Among the rain of tributes which déferlait yesterday on Newman, a great friend and former colleague of weapons Robert Redford (they had played together in The Sting and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid) said, very saddened: "His presence has made my life and this country better."
Every day, in Italy, there are 2500 accidents at work, 3 killed and 27 people who are disabled permanently.
The life of this woman who was the history of the dance in Europe in the interwar, has fascinated Isabelle Bayón.
In the first half of 2008, the night flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
Sheikh Hasina should return after 17 October, said a former leader of the Awami Party.
This month, at a meeting of the committee of owners of the neighbourhood, representatives of the city agency of Avalon Bay have outlined a proposal to allow a real estate agent to buy the street.
The payment of another 350 billion will have to be ratified by another vote in Congress.
The spring, Mikitenko aged 36 years, has surprised everyone winning the London an in 2: 24: 14.
We need to continue with the recovery plan for the markets, but we're there," said Paulson
The public is waiting for the time, without really hiding it, when Google will reveal its true nature.
The programme will be overseen by an independent body, in which the chairman of the Federal Reserve will take part.
The price of crude oil fell by 7 percent to $99.80 a barrel. The New York Mercantile Exchange during sales this morning.
A rat or cafard fled before the danger, is it that it means that it is also fear?
If it had done that, "we would be more advanced today" commented Mrs Marois alongside her candidate Jean-Achilles (elections held today), Françoise mercury.
Property which cannot be sold is a great liability to financial firms and threates the entire system. These should be bought by it from financial companies.
"Today, the city has five, but by the end of the year, there should be eighty," added Opatrny´.
The crisis of 2008 for these journalists is a crisis of economic model destroyed.
A bitter and retaliatory billiards player in the magnificent The Hustler of Robert Rossen (1961), he played the character again in The Color of Money of Martin Scorsese, which won him in 1987 his only Oscar out of nine nominations.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
We think she has suicidée by suffoquant with a plastic bag.
While Hong Kong is part of China, it establishes its monetary policy itself, that is, independantly of the Chinese central bank.
The wrong time to spoil the rat of Pozoblanco
Price reductions have taken place in the sectors of production of textiles and textile products (2.5 percent), as well as in the manufacture of machinery and electrical appliances (0.3 percent).
More than 90 graves were severely damaged in the graveyard of Traun, near Linz, between Friday night and this morning; it was according to the police, an organized act.
At the time, the department said that the prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
You do not think - you pay for it.
Of the subtle degrees of feeling, associated with our volubile nature, emerges, because we have the ability, with the help of words and grammar, differentiations and categorisations of the state to put the blame on others.
In the MDAX, the shares of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
The unforgettable interpreter of "Butch Cassidy and the Kid" died as a result of cancer at the age of 83 years, in his house in Connecticut.
"An affront to the legal and moral normatives, and especially in the right direction" write prosecutors, that the two local authorities had expressed a willingness to pay consultations to Maître Piromalli.
Other European stock markets also have known that a direction: In London, the FTSE 100 index has seen a decline for the moment of 3.2 percent, the CAC 40 in Paris has lost 2.9 percent.
"We no longer have any time to lose.
All come to read the MP3 and the vast majority of music that will arrive until you will precisely this format.
It was a victory for a country that has taken the trouble to impose against a suicidal food culture.
However, the law will still many changes.
We don't need a capacity of gigabytes, or even of megabytes.
The House of Representatives should be able to proceed on Sunday to the vote of the law, and the Senate on Monday, made it "Republican Senator Judd Gregg.
. People signs indicate the street.
Simply, Naomi Campbell has called, I have known for some time, to invite me to participate in London a parade of charity for his involvement in favour of support for women and clothing that we exhibions - I have exhibited two clothes of our collection created for Mango - were sold at auction to collect money for the NGOs of Naomi.
The famous Austrian journalist Gustav Chalupa, born in 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, confirms this.
To imitate the functions of the eye to facets, engineers have raised the idea of télémètre to laser.
The Crown Prosecution Service has suggested that the ministerial officer is placed under the tutelage of the Metropolitan Police, given the sensitive nature of his work related to the Committee associated with the secret services
It is also the issue of contention in the letter of the current directorial committee: in all eventualities, a 'global solution' for the establishment will be aimed for.
Not in front, because that way we create a block, and not all the yellow caps on the same benches, we must distribute them in the hall! '
"The first day of course in Japan.
The times jostle through his path.
Heinz-Christian Strache, who has abandoned the right of the Austrian Freedom Party, and Filip Dewinter of the Belgian right Vlaams Belang, take part in a demonstration to present the organisation 'cities against Islamisation' in Antwerp, on Thursday 17 January 2008.
Of course, Fodor was not like that.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
"It is a bad signal to the market, which Congress unable to adopt a plan," said Lindsey Piegza, FTN Financial.
"I am surprised and even a little shocked at the speed with which the memory of scandals such as the collapse of Enron and WorldCom, have disappeared from public attention" said Krugman at the end of 2002.
Expansive this wave of admiration balayait Hollywood without either the nationalities or passports.
On television, President Lukashenko and the members of the central electoral commission welcome their success.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to the ground by fishermen.
A group of other issuers of bills is composed of those who were well aware that they were asked to forge bills.
Has side of the primary functions, the telephone calls and sending SMS, it is able to read music and films, to register them, it has a camera of varied quality and can, for example, to serve to shipping.
But this time, Elena accompanied him as his sweetheart, and therefore there is nothing like it, he says.
But it is difficult to convince people to give their blood, but above all to retain and encourage them to become regular donor.
1001, the antistress number
The first time this has happened that may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
Among the groups of internal trade and in the allocation of sectors, in August, the initiators of profit on investment which showed a rise of monthly price the most significant (0.7 percent).
The supercolle to walk on the walls.
Since I was very little I loved clothes; I love to go to my grandmother's house to look in my aunt's closet, and to see her clothes.
At the trial against him, last week he had secured his release but with a compulsory house arrest in Grottaferrata.
"We are pleased with the progress achieved tonight, and we greatly appreciate the efforts of both parties to stabilize our financial markets and to protect our economy," said Tony Fratto, the spokesman for the White House.
The first new of the failure of the rescue plan have driven the Dow Jones temporarily 700 points.
A great tragedy arrived
The change of strategy is welcome.
The genial thug in the brilliant The Sting, winner of an Oscar for best film in 1973.
It would be absurd to buy expensive gramophone for the house a high-end to put the new album of Maxim Turbulenc.
The first new of the failure of the rescue plan have driven the Dow Jones temporarily 700 points.
So far, Embraer 41 appliances delivered to the Chinese customers in eight years.
About 30 feet wide for 120 long, it looks more like a dusty alley than an active road.
Rats also have the sensations
Saturday night in Minnesota, the Thunder filled a deficit of 3-1 in the match and returned to win 4-3, but the Whitecaps reached the semi-final round 5-4 on total goals.
Breaks will be made at Bressanone, and Holzkirchen, while many other busses with Italian registrations plates will again make a short stop shortly before Munich, on the motorway 8.
The beginning of classes does not seem to be as strict as back home in Lower Saxony.
Elena, Luca and other come together, Marco takes a last speech, explains the plan of attack.
In Rome, Alemanno gave the order to make the Commission for the future of the capital leave.
In the world, the stock markets fell to his knees.
But 1001, or a more or less.
A Committee chaired by Benedict Pelletier and Julie millstone (Transport and natural resources) has an important place getting the work started.
Because I have also a weakness for traditions, customs and habits.
To support the sector, one would need between 16 and 18 million per year.
But before the course begins, it was for me to appear.
A pension, based in Badacsonytomaj, did in fact that three houses, and maximum 10 people could spend the night, but the bill was one hundred and thirty customers.
This creates an immediate political problem for whoever is in power: that is to say to respond to the difficulties and the protests of individuals and families who are also an electorate.
"We have made great progress towards an agreement that will be effective in the markets," said the representative of the Bush administration, Henry Paulson.
According to him, none of the Germans prisoners who lived in Czechoslovakia before the war believed that, following the Benesˇ decrees, they would be expelled from the Republic.
Some prosecutors have been accused of being close to the Republicans of Congress, while others have refused to investigate the allegations of fraudulent vote against the Democrats.
A UN spokesman said this has happened despite the promises of the Taliban not to attack nor inhibit the thousands of nurses during the vaccinations.
In short - But victorious of Kovalev
Next year, will we still need a visa to go to the United States?
"I heard a woman to my local supermarket Chinese, talk on the phone of Lehman Brothers, the bank that has failed, and his thin CEO Dick Fuld, with the same familiarity she may have to criticise a colleague.
In the press conference, he cited another reference, conservative this time: the program 'Roads to the North' by John Diefenbaker, Prime Minister between 1957 and 1963.
If a rat or a cockroach flees from danger, does that mean that it also feels fear?
Soccer - The Impact in the semi-finals
Blood tests carried out on Kohl are part of those made in recent weeks by the laboratories in Lausanne and Chatenay-Malabry.
According to the calculations of scientists, black matters accounts for a fifth of the mass of the universe.
"The Supreme Court has rejected the request of Sheikh Hasina saying that it does not require bail because it had been allowed to go abroad for medical reasons," said his lawyer Rafique-ul Huq.
In Kent Police imposed the travel ban last Thursday after having proved that Glitter was guilty of sexual abuse of children.
On the other hand, there is a growing pressure of competition in the Treaty "open skies" liberalising air traffic between the United States and Europe.
In the sectors of the supply of electricity, gas, steam and water, representing a significant weight in the industrial exploitation, prices have suffered an increase of 0.3 percent in August, mainly because of the effect of rising gas prices set up by the authorities since 1 July.
In 1999 a much more sensitive means of testing HIV appeared on the market: the nucleic acid test (TAN) that can detect directly the presence of the virus itself and not that of antibodies against the virus in the blood donors, on which tests had based themselves so far.
I began again last week, and today I had doubts, but in the end it all went for the better. '"
I believe that the portrait is the most difficult kind of photography.
In this new geopolitical context, the prime minister believes that occupy the territory is a duty.
The US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
In cooperation with the University of Tokyo, Nissan has built a mini car robot, a bio-inspired self-robotized system, type BR23C, which it has equipped with properties of bees, the ultimate goal being to encourage the development of a system able to avoid obstacles.
This mechanism must deal with that some signals entrants per second, and respond to them.
If we take the example of the race yesterday: We are not!
Now that the election in Parliament of the Land of Bavaria fell, a union of BayernLB with the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg could be taken first.
This psychological importance of the agreement, providing for the adoption of the plan, the most important thing at the moment, "stressed Marek.
Michael Trerise, 57ans, Stithians, in Cornwall, has been jailed for six years after he admitted eight counts of indecent for facts.
When it comes to their interests, operators can be as thick as thieves. The chicane accompanying the creation of U: Fon stands witness to the fact.
This is what we think will bring in more customers.
Indeed, the activities of these firms brings them considerable profits, and, at the same time, as opposed to a traditional virtual operators, they do not threaten them with their own official marketing scheme.
As one of the first signs of an internal review of the party, the Vice-President and the Federal Minister of Agriculture, Horst Seehofer, presented as a possible successor to Huber, has also received a place in this small group of recognition, which initiating discussions to tâtons with liberal FDP, and with the Universities Electeurs, trained along the values of the right, about a possible coalition of the government in Munich.
The company wants to bring charge against the lorry driver.
Even if he speaks, he is sleeping and is therefore.
The show begins at 8.30 p.m. at the scene Lope of Vega
In the first round, half of this amount will be spent.
In six months, the president Antonio Marzano and 49 other members of the Commission will put up the directives for Rome.
As he had already confided to the Cˇesky´ rozhlas (the Czech public radio), he has chosen singers with young and representative voices, which are marked and appreciated, for the interpretation of the solo versions.
Renièrent legislators and supports the call to the project of President George Bush.
But some fishermen in Brittany do not want to be represented by leaders of the National Committee of Fisheries, which has not supported their movement.
With a camera and a system of recognition of forms and faces, this "see" can know how many people in the place, which they are - including remember what they occupy positions - and listen and hear the keywords of their conversations.
It is virtually impossible to find in a standard atlas.
The Impact should face the Whitecaps Friday and Sunday, but the details of the series will be confirmed today.
They say so much about he, I know, many things are not true.
In the past, Glitter was already served a sentence of four months in the UK, for detention of images of child abuse.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
But I wonder if we are ready.
The recreational port of Quiberon was also blocked, but the connections to Belle-ile weren't.
Hillary and Bill Clinton, Nicolas Sarkozy, George Clooney, Julia Roberts, Robert Redford and Sam Mendes welcomed the legend of cinema and the actor, Paul Newman, died at the age of 83 years.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer and delivered 97 aircrafts.
"We need to reach an agreement with the Palestinians, which means that it will be necessary to return almost all the territories (occupied), if not all," said Olmert on a daily basis.
The public is prepared to hear Barrick and to judge, but on the basis of civilised trade arguments, and not in the context of what many see as a prosecution-gag (pursuing the "public debate," Barrick Gold has also submit a formal notice to the place of the authors of Black Canada and told them to stop using the term...).
The reaction of Dennis Quaid on their qualification of unfaithful husband region fell clear: It would be "monstrous", said it the "New York Daily News', 54 years, that" Meg remâche again the history of our relationship and manipulated ".
That is the objective of various American research centres, and today, a team of four institutions have almost succeeded.
This is the second weekend of the beer festival, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
The interpretation of the dominant market position is one of the many points of contention.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family who will at best ".
"Because of the debt of the country and the rise of the trade deficit, the collapse of social security, 'referring to the silence of a graveyard', is no longer just a matter of time "- believes Milinkevich.
Specialized mobile telephone services are offered for example by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and others.
We must work to the maximum speed, "said President of the Ukrainian League Grigorij Surkis.
I very much like to make a trip into town and observe women to see how they are dressed, how they combine their clothes; I often do it.
The concern of security is the reason that gives the absence of stewards in its vehicles the director of the Asiana Litvine Alexei, which ensures, compared with SA, a very small number of lines.
The phone, after all, is increasingly a computer.
In these groups, support the CSU has fallen below 40 percent.
It is quite often, especially among children and adolescents.
The 15 million euros provided by the Madrid Commune are for Garci a "unique opportunity" to replicate with the appropriate settings and clothing the atmosphere of "a Spain which was mistaken of its leader in the fight, since the fight for independence led people to rebellion under the rule of Ferdinand VII," he said.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
Serious accusations are launched by the judges of the Directorate of the anti-Mafia Calabria, with the mayor and Vice Mayor of Gioia Tauro, Giorgio Dal Torrione and Rosario Schiavione, and the mayor of Rosarno Carlo Martelli's Liberal Socialists, arrested this morning for external assistance for a mafia association.
The universal nature of the mobile is not without problems.
The favourite to win the Nobel Prize for Literature has said yesterday at the Hay festival Segovia that the novel, which currently holds "is a real courage" and that "all shows that it should not write".
This service alone should be a compelling reason to buy a musical mobile.
So, following the latest step of the European Commission in the field of the regulation of roaming charges, a paradoxical situation may happen - text-messaging from abroad will be cheaper than in their own country for some customers subscribed to Czech mobile operators.
Since its creation, on 28 September 1998, Héma-Quebec has applied the precautionary principle.
It has been informed of the decision, on Monday morning and was then transported to home to a secret location.
After the failure of the vote
"And we did not know whether the disease could be transmitted by the blood.
Sign of the tense situation is the removal by the airlines of non-profitable routes, and the high number of airlines filing for bankruptcy during the first half of 2008 - there were 24 companies in Europe alone.
Nevertheless, she drew attention to the fact that in the new system, there will be no entry visa, but tourists must be registered before their departure.
He also stressed that the political party has "very strict ethical codes for all the officials'.
In this, Pavel Dvorˇák, the President of the Council of the Czech Office of telecommunications (CˇTÚ), who has repeatedly said that in the Czech Republic there was no room for another operator, is of the same opinion as the operators.
Forced integration, among other things, put an end to the isolation relatively idyllic of the community.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
Do not say that.
A crucial moment came in the 1980s.
Finally, cities such as Perugia, in which the kind of locations are often taken up by students from outside the European Union, there is a further anomaly: the rent asked foreign students is more by 25-30% compared to that applied to Italians.
However, given the complexity of the mechanism by which the aid to the markets can be put into effect, a "disappointment" will follow .
A modernisation goes hand in hand with the increase opportunities, and the consequences of such a policy are also visible.
The number of stadiums for the European Championship could possibly be reduced from eight to six.
Gary Glitter forbidden to travel abroad.
The part, precisely, which made itself felt despotically at the vote which I mentioned earlier.
The directorate of the Polish football league PZPN has been suspended by the National Olympic Committee after many scandals and replaced by Robert Zawlocki, an independent administrator.
"He has tried to do too much in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
"The name of our society and our tax number were placed on the wrong place on our stamp."
It would reduce the costs, "he says.
The important it is to make life better for women in the developing world.
Similarly, the VAT rate of four bills established on behalf of the Hotel Révfülöp the order of Jobb Jövo˝ért was incorrect, since the benefits of society do not pay VAT of 25% as mentioned, but a VAT to 15%. In addition, the employees of the hotel bills are printed, while the false were drafted in hand.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin told, while many are moquaient of it.
On Monday, Huber launched a scathing remarks at the CDU. According to him, they should have received much more support from the sister party.
Vodafone heads rather its attention on the performance of the requests for its own 3G licences.
Paul Newman the magnificent
It wanted to make the promotion for a new film, spoke of his privacy in an interview, and has now into trouble with his former: The Hollywood star Meg Ryan uncovered his former adultérin Dennis Quaid.
The launch of Mobilking will instead take place in other countries in the region, " said Jana Studnicˇková, spokesman for the financial group Penta in a telephone interview for Mobil.cz
According to the calculations of scientists, black matters accounts for a fifth of the mass of the universe.
On his part, the Speaker Gianfranco Fini pointed out that "this phenomenon of the dead whites is an absolute social emergency, which insults the conscience within each of us, and requires all the institutions, to make a real effort to stop it quickly".
We have already raised repeatedly on Mobil.cz the fact that the Czech operators are part of the most expensive in Europe.
However, according to what the manager, it would have been impossible that so many people in this place, at the same time.
They say so much about he, I know, many things are not true.
Would this make the beautiful country into a nation of racist? This is what the New York Times asked and dedicated a long article, discussing the issue of racism in Italy, working on the case of young Abdul William Guibre, a native of Burkina Faso, killed last month in Milan, for stealing a box of biscuits.
Student Agency is the only carrier coach services to offer stewards onboard.
The Czech national anthem will celebrate, next year, its 175th anniversary.
The Hamburg SV of will on Monday its 121 years.
For the moment, nobody with a complex and serious project plan in this area has contacted us," mentioned Vlastimil Srsˇenˇ of the press Department of Telefonika O2, in its statement for Mobil.cz.
"But this is not an amnesty for our country.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned the number of customers can be in thousands.
Members of this highly criticised pair have, in any case, felt that they were not particularly in their seats.
His lawyers have said that the court refused to give its backing because of his indictment to be extracted a businessman, 50 million ($Taka 729.000,00) when she was PM.
Indeed, this operator targets men in particular.
Almost two Republicans on three rejected his plan.
"This unpleasant saga ended with the suicide of the victim.
But the interests that are at the same time growing, will subsequently be debited, each year, to the 700 financial companies that collect on the deposits.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
He knew that he was right.
I am an emotional pragmatic.
At the same time, in Europe, we had a further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
Bastian Reinhard would also be more relaxed "wanted".
So far, Embraer has delivered 41 aircrafts to its Chinese customers in eight years.
Perhaps Mr Garver please explain how it can ask a debate "public" while disregard for the views of the public?
But there is no one or two methods to combat fatigue daily and the problems linked to the world of work.
A minimum of functions; and the resemblance to the command post with a cassette, commonly used in the past, or gramophone, is obvious.
However, it is clear that, to block the super power of the multiplex cinemas, the traditional must also improve the quality of its and the image, because the public today is more demand.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
Do not wake up.
Even tougher means of action were decided in Poland.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is now complete with the Palais Chigi.
Monday, the House of Representatives will be the first to vote on the bill responding on behalf of Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008, and then its fate will be in the hands of the Senate.
The past two weeks, the markets of raw materials have been buffeted by the financial turmoil on Wall Street, as well as by two powerful hurricanes in the Gulf of Mexico.
And there will be a maximum of five Members of the opposition in parliament, those who are best suited to power. "
"The fiasco of the motorway to five ways, very fast, a genuine civic pride" said Ms. Nathiri.
The arrests of this morning follow those of July, following which the police announced have décapitée the clan Piromalli.
The news of Kohl testing positive on the EPO of third generation, was confirmed by the head of the French anti-doping agency, Pierre Bordry, which communicated to the Associated Press that it had notified the Austrian authorities about this.
"It works," she observed, "it worked for us"
This is the first step towards the concept of a technology for the instant avoidance. According to estimates by Nissan, this system will make its entry in cars manufactured in series in the next ten years.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned it can act of thousands of customers.
At Eatonville, no great commemoration, or mark for the general public.
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
Coaches are divided into three categories: urban, where there are standing places and a maximum speed limited, inter-urban with standing places and a higher speed limit and long distances coaches without standing place with the maximum speed limit and seats equipped with seat belts.
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
In the recent past, 15 of these banks have failed.
"I feel responsible for his death."
I am pleased to have a wonderful family who will at best ".
This is very interesting, especially if we consider that in Alaska, the US continues to extract oil, and recently President Bush has set up a project for new excavations
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
It is unnecessary since it is unconscious and you réveilleriez.
Milk is growing up to five penny per litre
Long distance coaches of the Student Agency don't have standing place, a fact which has been confirmed in Aktuálneˇ.cz by the director of the company Radim Jancˇura.
When we will no longer be the most expensive country
He stressed that the proposal includes consumer protection, which he also supports.
But what has just been mentioned is just one example of the changes, the big changes that the earthquake ongoing economic pre-announcement or leaves already run: Not only in the US, but throughout the West, and can be not only here.
At the same time, the Belgian, Dutch and Luxembourg governments have party nationalised the European financial conglomerate, Fortis.
Hepatitis: When do we need to consult a doctor?
Fishermen in The Turballe and Croisic, in the Loire-Atlantic, have stopped the blockade of the important refinery Total of Donges in the evening .
Researchers have asked the participants from the experience of watching a sustained two paintings, one being the Virgin Mary painted by Sassoferrato the 17ème century and the other, the Lady to the hermine painted by Leonardo da Vinci the highly publicized 15th century.
The psychology of one-upmanship: Why are we spending more money?
The rule allows companies concerned, to take part in an insurance program, where the secretariat to the Treasury ensures the tools at the root of the concerns, for which the companies have paid a premium equivalent to the predictable damage.
That is why it is also difficult to determine what may be the awareness among other animals.
Slovenian a lorry was probably quité the hard shoulder without using clignotant and it has blocked the road to coach.
But the Conservatives have always figured strongly in this southern region which is of key importance for the Hungarian economy. In the future, they will be forced to the coalition.
He nevertheless used these companies, because at the request of Maître Zsolt Szente, co-accused and mastermind of the acts of founding the companies, he faked bills in their names, upon order of associations connected with Zuschlag, like the company Atlasz and Y-Generáció.
But, if Congress will have the impression that the programme does not fulfil its function, it has the opportunity to block the granting of the remaining amount, following two stages: Firstly additional $100 billion, then, finally, 350 billion dollars.
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and must be, too, effective on the market.
The excellent results achieved by the school speak for themselves, but the policies on education within his party (the Associations for National Education have supported bilingual education for a long time) and his huge support for bilingual education, obscures the prediction of results by Mr Obama.
"Senator Obama does not seem to understand that..." he accused on several occasions.
For example Tesco Mobile in Britain offers SMS that are at least two times cheaper than its competitors.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for childhood in difficulty.
In Germany, according to a current study, flights are cheaper by almost 50 percent.
In this case, we could exclude animals.
The second weekend of the party of beer is also known as the weekend of Italy.
. Ironically, indeed, while we were convinced to be now entered the kingdom of the network, technology, not always more sophisticated equipment, convinced that the global finance is now intended to dominate the world, we went into account a shot of a single, that our future will have to settle scores more with things somewhat material such as water, harvests, oil.
For his personal consumption, he called for a bill, on the model of which imparting other bills that they would introduce, among other things, to the Ministry of Youth and Sport, the Ministry of Social Affairs and Labour, and the City of the Capital for access to subsidies.
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only at the heart of the party that voters have become more aware - as mentioned Der Spiegel, the low score of the Bavarian CSU in the country.
And above all, it has regained the confidence of the public who had been badly shaken by the contaminated blood scandal in the 1980s and 1990s.
Most people carry their mobiles with them at all times.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is now complete with the Palais Chigi.
This collection of portraits of flamenco entitled 'Flamenco - people', is exposed at the El Fotómata gallery, located at No. 20 Rue de la Mata (street parallel to Peupleraie d'Hercules), which will be open until 16 October.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague regained its losses.
You needn't even pay too much attention to the music formats that the mobile or the MP3 player is able to read.
"At the moment, we do not believe that there is room on the Czech market for a virtual operator as such.
Other politicians CSU have interpreted the defeat as a warning to the CDU and also for Angela Merkel.
The financial crisis from the point of view of the European press
They launched a watermelons of their car '.
In this respect, a study in the US in 2007 showed that the vehicles equipped with this device cut up to 65% of offences during the first year of installation.
If you belong to a group of more demanding listeners, go for a specialized mobile-walkman (Sony Ericsson, or some Nokia and Samsung).
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition.
They have promised to welcome him "in a constructive spirit" and hope that he "will come with concrete proposals".
We have already led the negotiations about that possibility several times with all the Czech mobile operators.
The many initiatives promoted in the education sector, have a particular importance for a more direct awareness on the part of young people who enter the world of work.
The actress Heather Locklear arrested for having conducted under the effect of a drug
Here, too, there are groups on the basis of price and quality.
Gebrselassie on Sunday, preceded by four Kenyans, recorded a time of 1: 02: 04. half way.
But in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of exit for ordinary headphones.
The disproportionate prosecution of Barrick Gold clearly shows that, contrary to what it claims, it has no desire for a transparent debate.
Eatonville and the world seemed to have forgotten her.
Some devices have a single structure resembling that of an indexed tree, following the way of Windows Explorer, while others are capable of two (iriver, Samsung, Sony, Cowon, and smartphones with operating system).
On behalf of the 'European Year of Equal Opportunities "guaranteed for all, the objective of the summit for equal opportunities in Europe held every year since the summit in Berlin last year, is to ensure a single platform to support the measures taken in favour of equal opportunities and the fight against discrimination, targeted at European level and at the level of the Member States.
The first company to focus on marine energy has been Enersis, which in 2005, signed an agreement to build a plant in the north of Portugal.
Apart from the fact that one must go very early to withdraw the chip, the queue is 15 minutes, and one must leave one's bag at the entrance.
Analysts at Barclays Capital said that the negotiations frenzied at the weekend, concluded with the agreement of rescue 'do not seem to have managed to revive the market. "
The value of the stock exchange of Prague is estimated between 5 to 10 billion Czech kronor by specialists in the market.
She said to me, following my visit to the bank. "I put my savings in the market for Monetary Fund.
Most patients do not know of the virus, because the gene pathogenic destroyed a sly the liver cells. In many cases, the first symptoms do not appear that after 20 to 30 years.
Among the undecided voters, who really count the most, Obama won for 39% of respondents, while 25% of them handed the victory to McCain, according to a CBS poll.
Issuers of zealous bills were not informed on travel agents of Budapest, part of their choice, but only organising trips abroad. Thus, naively, they have indicated stays in Hungary on bills to settle in cash, which also goes against the accounting practices of the agency.
He embodied for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
According to the indictment, the manager of society Collab Kft. was forced to make false invoices by one of the defendants, Ludovic Györfi.
Platini, the UEFA president: A grace period for Poland and Ukraine
No final decision has been taken on these stop, continuing the it said.
They do not believe that the regime, which has been good to foreign observers in the aim of resuming talks with the European Union, is prepared to carry out a democratic watershed.
The singer, who will receive an Oscar at the ceremony in London next week, said to be "honoured" to get this recognition.
The fourth world aircraft manufacturer, Embraer, maintains its forecast for 2008 with 215 aircraft deliveries left, reaffirmed Fredrico Fleury Curado, its chairman.
Three buses are reserved for the Italian, in one of the bus travel of brésilens exclusively.
It was a nice ovation. "
Ms Boyd summed up the very saying that "Zora saved Eatonville".
Molter reacted cautiously to the proposals of the red.
This is not the first time that the Deta-Bank, which, with its 3,000 employees, account for one of the largest employers on the financial centre of Frankfurt, comes into play when it comes to consolidation in the sector of the coffers of savings.
With some, we have managed to make progress in the negotiations, "said the spokesman of the Pavel Kaidl.
Already for 2007, they had been cut by two thirds.
Despite this pitiful electoral defeat, heads have not yet fallen, and the debate on the personal questions of top memebers of the Bavarian CSU was postponed.
These research has tried to draw up a neural pattern of this kind of 'game' with the aid of an experimental auction.
The greatest pressure on the CˇTÚ, at the time of U: Fon's creation, was exerted by T-Mobile.
When energy gives birth to waves, big ones moves.
So far, the EU has not really dealt with the crisis, which, like a tsunami, crosses the old continent from end to end.
After the fact that the bank is, according to the latest reports, even at the gates of the insolvency Sunday at the end of the evening, this rescue at least temporarily will not be able to reassure people either.
Police officers stopped two occupants of a van and the last two undertake the brain.
"We have not escort. We object from the beginning.
Jancˇura is prepared to remove these services
In this way, "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" comes to an end with a repeat of this work with Congress International held in New York, with the restoration of the Museum exhibition Prize and with the peripatetic "Juan Ramón Jiménez: This peuplier of light" which was inaugurated in May last year and who, having travelled in the various provinces Andalusian, will go to New York at the International Congress.
Monica is warm and timid.
Other believed that they would simply in Czechoslovakia.
On Wall Street, fear travels.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
The defence of the traditional film is a subject that for me, has always been important: The closure of Supercinema of Bagheria, the place of my childhood and adolescence, was the spark that has convinced me to do "New cinema Paradiso" which I thought already since 10ans.
I look forward to ensure the films "The última hora and In busca of the tumba of Cristo.
It stems from a letter filed in the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna (The scientific Library of south Bohemia).
If you understand what he says (which is not usual), don't be tempted to question him to obtain information.
For their operation to be effective, indeed they need far fewer customers that a classic operator.
I was already afraid on my way to school.
The beauty in his blue eyes was long considered his trump card, while some called it his weakness.
Sunday, on the occasion of the National Day, the Czech Prime Minister Mirek Topolánek formally presented the new recordings of the national anthem Kde domov mu˚j (Where is my homeland?).
The sum, however, must not be paid at once, but gradually.
The public prosecutor believed that 10% of the sum listed on the bills along with the VAT went into the pockets of Kubatov.
Sanctions, including a ban on visas for Belarusian 40 leaders and the freezing of some assets, could be lifted if these elections were considered own observers.
In video presentation, the see detects a third person, but it understands that it is not for the group who is speaking with her and she is not part of the company.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
With this film Garci does not expect a price.
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory on home territory after a long period of famine.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not recognise the elections.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
People say that Naomi is a person with a warm heart.
. Coppola is investigated for bankruptcy in the framework of the investigation on the escalation Unipol-Bnl.
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
That is condemning the least of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
And Windows 7 will contain less applications, much less than Vista.
But what a great long distance athlete.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a telephone.
The Quebec has many built in its relations with the North, he said: The gold rush in Abitibi, engineering québécoise, the Bay James.
"These results cannot be demonstrated by any existing economic theory.
Since there was a long queue, competitions began and we had not yet left our bags at the entry, although once there, the return was even worse.
"We will present an appeal against the order of the Supreme Court"
Pupils are one after the other from eight hours, until to nine hours least 20, a round table begins with Professor, the 'home' room.
Another facet raises the question of how the various business models of each of these banks can match.
"The real men choose Mobilking - an operator who they want, and that they can trust," said David Seibert, the CEO of Mobile Entertainment Company, exploiting this virtual operator.
Iwan Wasjunik Deputy Prime Minister said that the preparations would soon be placed under the direct responsibility of the President and the Prime Minister.
Indeed, in Italy, thousands of employees of the public administration correct and productive, met to declare war on illegitimate standards contained in the decree.
And in various ways, the city that she described has become a tourist attraction thanks to its inclusion in the tourist guide to Florida published by The Depression- era Federal Writers Project- and remains a separate place.
Staging was made thanks to two outstanding contributions: that of Miguel Poveda who will again sing Isabela in one of his performances, as he had done for "La Puerta Abierta"; and that of Professor Matilde Coral, who was exceptionally eager to work with one of his pupil.
But it does not reduce the greatness of Gebrselassie capacity as a runner.
What does it mean?
Fortunately that I had planned to work at the end of the afternoon, because I discovered that at my local branch of JP Morgan Chase, two dozen people were already queued.
It rests on the rigour of NordLB.
Pursuing an Orwellian logic, he says that the biggest gold mining company of the world has brought a defamation suit of six million against three authors and a small penniless publishing house in order to launch a "transparent public debate".
The accident in question, during which a stewrdess aged 22 years died, was apparently caused by a lorry driver who crossed the path of the coach.
A rat or cafard fled before the danger, is it that it means that it is also fear?
Links between politics and 'ndrangheta, arrested mayor of Gioia Tauro.
No confirmation came from AIG.
The documents are in the hands of the BBC before being handed over to the police.
Passers-by some said they did not think that rarely to extra Place, and suggested its development.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
What matters is whether the coach is under its technical sheet equipped places standing or not.
Behemoths in the attack.
Sarkozy at the meeting of angry fishermen
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
The question is whether it is in their interest, or, possibly, the Socialists have reached an agreement that in exchange for the return of a large part of the 50 million HUF, Zusi would only the hat.
The Germans are constantly in the sights of the kidnappers.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
The testing of various materials, such as the glass, the téflon, and paper of glass, have shown that the new removed is ten times more powerful than the legs of these reptiles, and at the same time, he "stands out easily of the walls" explains Liming Dai, researcher engineering faculty of the University of Dayton.
They were about to stop a van to inspect when the driver has broken the orders, suddenly accelerated and control has begun.
For the image is complete, it must add that the existing golden parachutes are not changed. The cap is that the new contracts, this to motivate and participation in the plan.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
The Prime Minister, however, restricted himself to only explain that the North was "a jewel with huge potential", but gaven no date, investment figures, or priorities in the future projects.
It was a privilege to be here. "
In 2007, the Inail data confirmed that the number of dead whites were approximately 1200.
It would reduce the costs, "he says.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million savers of Bradford & Bingleys.
Letters - A country dishonoured
The Director-General of Building Societies Association (BSA), Adrian Coles said he is "irritated" to know that companies and their members will have to pay the bill...
It was difficult to receive the Oscar
But it is still not enough, according to Eric Schmidt, who is one of the influential people in society.
"The police convened two minors to interrogate them in the case of the double homicide of Ózd. According to suspicions, they have helped to remove traces of the crime," said the spokesman for the Police Station of Borsod.
"On the contrary, he said," you must assure you that your child speaks Spanish ".
'I want to become a young mother; the candidate I am not worried "
On average, 14% of those who propose their blood are not accepted, because they are suffering from AIDS and malaria, for example, and if they have travelled in a country where there is malaria, they will be excluded for a period of one year.
Barack Obama and McCain support both the rescue plan of banks
More, officials have noted that the registration plate was "forgery" because it did not correspond to that in writing on the grey card of the van, this is also why they have blamed the detainee a crime of falsification of documents.
It is exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
"Obviously, Washington is not listening to you," said the Republican Scott Garrett, a member of the Finance Committee of the House, to his constituents.
Given that no shelve knows burn meat and that no television will take photographs, we are almost a miracle.
Rescue operation of Wall Street - Democrats and Republicans agree
American prosecutors investigate and continuing the courts for the government.
The stock market values of Warsaw has proposed two hundred million, about five billion kronor Czech, for the purchase of 100% of the package of actions of the stock market values of Prague.
"He is a mediocre player"
One of the resolutions adopted, proposes to rename the Central Beauharnois into Barrage Adélard-Godbout.
A change in the law, which is being drafted, for more than a year ago by a group of 30 experts on Transport Ministry, could provide clarification on the movement of stewards on board the bus.
HSV beat Gladbach 1: 0
"The best years of my life," he said, "took place in dark, humid and disgusting places".
A Minsk, "have you noticed that there was an election?"
This week, Ballmer has confirmed this idea.
Industrial prices have continued to increase
Trerise wrote in a letter to confession: "I feel responsible for his death".
It may sound paradoxical, given that we have still three networks and a mobile penetration that far exceeds the 100%.
According to the two bills from the Zuschlag in 2003, this place has assured the restoration of a group of 90 people, members of the association Biztos Pont Egyesület.
Its aim is to draw attention to the chronic cirrhosis of the liver, caused by the virus, on the causes of its development and on the importance of early diagnosis of the disease.
When Google chrome appeared on the network, I was one of those who believed that Google chrome was the first step on Google's part to compete with Windows.
The complicity of murder can entail up to five years imprisonment.
The hepatitis virus, according to the pathogenous genes, spreads mainly in two forms: the hepatitis A and E through the digestive tract (for example: contaminated food or water), the hepatitis B, C, D and other viruses by blood and organic liquids (sperm, vaginal secretion, salive).
The new law also seeks to limit the so-called golden parachutes for the managers of companies participating in the programme and it will establish a committee, which will ensure the supervision of the funds.
This causes a lot of anxiety.
This is one of the many accusations against her.
The crisis, indeed, is a crisis-bank financial institutions that have, of course, to close relations with abroad, but, above all, are involved in a large scale, the balance sheets of individuals and families who live in one country, in one state.
On the contrary, they are trying to do everything possible to avoid the appearance of a potential competitor.
Despite these circumstances, as photographer, I always try that my ideas reality ".
of Rome, the minister communicates that "in three months, the absence of sick public employees was reduced by 50%, or 60 thousand more workers in a year.
A number of cabinet officers Department of Justice have also given their resignation.
US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
Professional fishermen, who do not pay taxes on diesel, now pay about 50 cents per litre but they believe that the threshold of profitability of a boat is achieved with a diesel below 0.30 euro per litre.
So many other Paul Newmans have gone down in history.
He made that statement in an interview published Monday by the Yedioth Ahronoth newspaper.
UNIPOL: Court ROME, DANILO COPPOLA remains in GROTTAFERRATA.
But it is not clear when will be turbulence and hôtesse of the air can beat your head. "
The driver control the validity of the voucher registered.
The song Kde domov mu˚j assails our ears for the first time in 1834 on the planks of Stavovské divadlo (the theatre of the Member) in Fidlovacˇka (school speech-day of savetiers), Czech original piece of Josef Kajetán Tyl, accompanied by music of Frantisˇek Sˇkroup.
According Lorenzo Bini Smaghi, of the executive committee of the European Central Bank, Krugman is a "highly valued economist", but also a divulger with a style that is "very aggressive, and particularly critical of the excesses of liberalism during the Bush administration.
American the Dow Jones index collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
The actions of the stock exchange of Sydney lost more than five percent, but ultimately it manages to reduce losses to 4.3 percent.
In southern Egypt, five Germans have been abducted.
In 2006, a study concluded that 66% employees of Microsoft used Google to seek information on the Internet.
It remained as one of the seven national symbols even after the creation of the independent Czech Republic.
BSkyB loses the legal battle to ITV
The phone, after all, is increasingly becoming a computer.
The phrase "You do not think" is inscribed in capital letters on the registration plate.
Glitter, 64 years old, informed the authorities that he wanted to go abroad, leaving him to be recorded in the list of accused for sexual abuse.
The proposal was made while Eatonville was just coming out of a difficult time in its history.
In this case, it is still of someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
The appointment of a special accusing able to force of witnesses to table, was one of its most important recommendations.
The first of these phenomena is the updating, the extraordinary revival of the double category Etat- sovereign, compared to a kind of renationalisation of the economy.
More than a third of students, been many newcomers, is studying English.
His fans saw him again in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy of the Coen brothers.
Has Minsk, "you have noticed that there was an election, you?"
But it also produces Sweat-shirt, Boxer Rebellion old fashioned, cardigans in cashmere, trousers in cotton, the babies, the mini-shorts...
On what is based your new collection created for Mango for the fourth season?
In six months, the operator has managed to win more than 100 000 customers and become the fifth operator of the country.
Issuers of bills to the outrageous have also fallen in excess, when they mentioned the company Pigal Kft, belonging to the hotel and catering sector. In their accounts, or the name of Jobb Jövo˝ért, or that of the Hoppá indication, according to the information to the public prosecutor's office.
Therefore ordered interceptions against Dal Torrione, the entry write, is émergée 'willingness to marry the requirements of a businessman, representing a group known, close to the Piromalli, unifying the choice of the public administration to the interests of the clan.
Thus, the probes can save a lot of fuel.
With the table of the extraordinary family Chagals as neighbour, the presidential table prepared by Mango, seemed even more spectacular.
The film maker has tried to put in the many characters and illustrate the social analysis "he has always admired in the work of the famous novelist, he explained today during the presentation of the film, with Quim Gutiérrez and Paula Echevarría at the head of the long list of players.
"I am not yet ready, warned the Russian.
The new anti loafers was presented today by the Minister of the public administration, Renato Brunetta, and by the Secretary-General of the Council Presidency, Mauro Masi.
"Now is the time to act responsibly (...) a danger threatens your job, your savings, the entire industry and the stability of the whole economy," he said before a crowd of 35,000 people.
It apparently emanates a force of attraction whose effect is tangible on other celestial bodies.
I do not believe that they have understood the contribution or the legacy that it's in the world "said Valérie Boyd, author of" Wrapped in Rainbows ", a biography of Hurston published in 2003.
And already buses drive into the night on the 'Autostrada Brennero direction.
However, the question for Obama is whether his desire to achieve a bilingual education that defends the instruction in class of languages other than English, goes beyond its interest to eliminate the differences.
You will achieve nothing, because in sleeping, it is not aware to hold his thinking.
Add that behind the Mobilking, there is the financial group penta, which has, among other things, the U: Fon in Czech Association Council.
If this equipment for standing places is not approved, passengers must remain seated.
The jets the coach Eric Mangini, who was asked to describe this madness, said "the second time or the third? "
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
The arguments used by they were virtually the same - a market too small and too much saturated, problems with the quality of services, etc.
Khaleda Zia, the rival of Sheikh Hasina since a very long time, has been set free on bail earlier this month.
"In these cases, I am very federalist, and this will be the Andalusian organisation which will have to assume its responsibilities," said Llamazares as regards the behaviour of the political party that it will adopt in the City Council in Seville.
But there is still a possibility - a virtual operator.
Catholics have said that in view of the Virgin Mary, they felt like "safe", as someone who are "takes care 'and they are" be quiet, and peace has invaded ".
The Czech market is very specific in comparison with others.
The Cardinals have taken control of the possession for the last 10 seconds, and then the jets have recovered the ball, Jay Feely made a goal from 20 yards taking advantage of a 34-0.
Repeat offenders of drink-driving will install the system 's alcolock
But that does not reduce the greatness of Gebrselassie's capacity as a long distance runner.
This is one of the many accusations against her.
A strange mockery of fate has been that it was using the list of Electeurs Universities, entered Gabriele Pauli into legislation, to measure against Stroiber was the possibility of a coup by the duo Huber-Beckstein, and then treat bluntly the very ambitious local politician.
Graves Muslim desecrated when Austria fluctuates to the right.
. Before the increase in February, the wholesale price of milk of Jersey had been changed for the last time, in 2002.
Suburban buses are equipped with card readers integrated into the driver's till box.
"I am not ready, warned the Russian.
This is not always easy or possible in the jungle of media today.
Brussels has asked the Scientific independent, to examine the problem, given the intensive use of mobile music devices and the increase in the number of young people exposed to noise that they generate.
Police control of a van in the province of taken: Two thousand kilos of hashish found
Zora has described the reality "said it Dinkins, 90 years ago a young girls of Johnson that Hurston was immortalised, citing the songs without colour, interpreted by men who have recognised their beauty."
As soon as the somniloquies are trying to stay calm.
Still him.
After a divorce with Joanne Woodward to whom he had been married 50 years, during which he always remained faithful even if the opportunities not to be were frequent.
Meanwhile, on the other side of the Channel, the British government seemed to nationalize another bank rocked by the financial crisis.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a telephone.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
Men were to be held until the kidnappers have found a sure way to flee.
Jancˇura denies that the two seats reserved for stewards had been sold.
The index of Hang Seng China Enterprises, following the movement of Chinese shares of the Hong Kong stock exchange, lost 3.8 percent, the markets being closed in Shanghai.
Graves Muslim desecrated while Austria fluctuates to the right.
The second weekend of the beer festival is also known as the weekend of Italy.
The chope, squealing Marco at 8.25 euros.
Microsoft is right, its operational system is losing importance but also its software.
The Prize for the economy to Paul Krugman.
Civil rights, moreover, have helped to create space for many other Zora Neale Hurston- black writers, actors and artists who went beyond prejudice, as she did, an army of cheerful confidence and guidelines such as: "How can they deprive themselves of the pleasure of my company!"
Energy is sent to the shore through the under-water cables.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
He knew that he was right.
No member of the opposition has seen the Belarusian parliament after the elections on Sunday.
"We will take the necessary steps to be prepared for the application of the law, as soon as it is signed," he said.
There is certainly no better place in the world to present a fashion prize than in Paris and there is certainly no living artist more extraordinary and bon-vivant than Valentino.
With a victory in 2: 03: 59 of a race accommodating on the plate, Gebrselassie has beaten of 27 seconds his record of 2: 04: 26, contested last year in Berlin.
After the negotiations marathons who have gone on for days on end, the representatives in Congress and the Administration have finally announced Sunday at the beginning, they have concluded agreements in principle on the rescue plan banks.
The British companies the building may have to pay a bill of more than £80 million to cover the rescue of the bank Bradford & Bingley.
Those who live a life online, consists of what it shows itself, and that is how we can define the principle behind the behaviour of young people today.
Even after the accident, the director does not consider their job as a risky job.
One of the resolutions adopted proposes to rename the Central Beauharnois in dam Adélard-Godbout.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
According to the schedule, there were José Luis Moreno, Curro Díaz to Juan Bautista, who were to face off in the arena of Castilblanco
Sylvana already know that word with Mangas - in his new Log exchanges, it speaks of Japan.
Still on this front, it is possible to create PDF documents "hybrid" between the graph typical of the format Adobe the elements of a calculation map or a producer of text.
As I had not yet the uniform of school, I have put an old skirt of my mother, as well as a host of rising socks shirt, blue and black leather shoes.
It denies, en bloc, the right to the quotation credible sources and the debate on the facts and interpretations, who represent the basis of the intellectual work.
The Ministry has inspired similar campaigns in the Anglo-Saxon countries, where we can see commonly images with drastic images of the victims of accidents.
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, said in commenting on the results of the compromise that the programme will work and will be effective, however other measures must be implemented. According to Pelosi, there is no question here of the rescue of Wall Street, but the wheels of the economy in the other direction.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million savers of Bradford & Bingleys.
On trade terms, the stock exchange of Prague fell
In a letter from 1955 to The Orlando Sentinel, Hurston questions the request of the Supreme Court to a forced integration, defining its decision in Brown v. Board of Education as "insulting rather than glorifying to my race '.
Not in the same way, because they had already withdrawn their saving from smaller banks, such as those of New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Staten Island.
In their experiment, three groups bid against a partner, in different circumstances.
So many other Paul Newman have gone to history.
The project of the motorway happened just when the girl the most famous of Eatonville had recovered its appeal.
I came to present the new collection that sister Penélope and I even have created to Mango for the new season autumn-winter, but also to attend the presentation of the second edition of Mango Awards' and 'Fashion to the dinner Opera in honour of Valentino.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed later Marcel Jansen.
If we cannot be part of The Germany or Austria, at least we want to live under the management of the United States of America.
Microsoft will surely to launch at the same time Windows 7 and Windows Mobile 7.
The man even used the company Szi-Beri Bt. to create fictitious bills that have been used in the context of the application for grants by Biztos Bridge.
Anti-cancer treatments being more aggressive, patients are often in need of recharge in red or white blood cells.
Already depressed at the beginning of the sitting, Wall Street has wedged itself after the rejection unexpected by the House of Representatives of the rescue plan of banks that was supposed to be a bit of stability in the markets.
The market for student accomodation does not know of crisis
In the first half of 2008, the night flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
According to the candidate for the opposition in the presidential elections of 2006, it is desirable that it remains so, despite the fact that "the power has been afraid to bring even one opponent into this Parliament which has no weight".
More than half a century of a seventh American art has ever-changing through him.
The new has been watered down by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient than the one that was put forward by Mr Obama.
The board of AIG met Sunday evening to examine possible cessions, according to FT.
Favre has found Coles for yet another two touchdowns, the first when a corner back fell and the second, to 10 seconds of half-time.
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when mortgages of Bradford & Bingleys are released.
Because if our economy, which is heavily indebted towards Russia, enters into crisis, and that we do not reform, we are in danger of becoming a protectorate of Russia.
The future is perhaps promising.
Building societies against the B&B bill.
"At these contact points, a trained member of staff will be at the service of passengers, and will help those who are interested with the online purchase, as well as registering their coupon with their card," said the spokesman of the project Martin Opatrny´.
Of course, Fodor was not the case.
"This black might be responsible for this anomaly, who is also in the vicinity of the Earth," he writes.
As director, Newman revealed little known aspects of his real and modest sensitivity .
The titles of his dances are reminiscent of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco.
In June, Merl said that the decisive question, namely through what business model the viability of the future of Länder banks was to be guaranteed, had not previously been determined by the German grouping of savings and transfers.
The House of Representatives of the United States intends to vote on the rescue plan, the vote in the Senate should follow on 1 October.
The impact will be measured in Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
More than half a century of a seventh American art in flux flowed through him.
Unlike the opposition politician, the Russian observers have described the democratic elections.
For me, it was clear that I had to travel there some day.
It is virtually impossible to find on a standard atlas.
The Austrian Socialists of SPÖ want to discuss with the Conservatives of the ÖVP.
Not to mention the realities which provide a service training, consultation and assistance, ideal for small and medium-sized enterprises, which could also be open to the prospects of business.
It would be moreover "regrettable", that "the trouble and the confusion following a divorce for every child were to be rekindled in public" for their son Jack who is now 16 years old. "
In this part of the programme of supervision of Education, Bruce Fuller and Lance T. Izumi discuss the position of the candidates on bilingual education.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
The unit of Alex Kovalev, Tomas Plekanec and Andrei Kostitsyn enlivened the attack in a gain of 3-2 of the Canadian over Florida Panthers in a barrage of shots, yesterday evening, at the Bell Centre.
Then, in a puddle of blood, the phrase 'You "paieras.
"From the beginning, I was trying to take care that the two singers, and the choir, have a good walking, so that it is well understood the words, they sing simultaneous way," he said.
Avenue at most of what could be developed further, including hydro-electricity, the forest, but above all the mining sector, has boosted by growth in emerging countries and the reconstruction of the public infrastructure.
And if advertising itself as free can be a way of broadcast in homes, it is precisely in business, that Open Office hopes to make an impression, which it can already count on for various projects in the public administration and schools.
Apart from the positions of yoga, the classic massage or spa treatments, Susannah Marriott gathers in the pages of a book a whole menu of methods suited to the taste and the time of each.
Yet, even before the entry of the parties such as Tesco Mobile or Virgin Mobile on the market, similar to those that we mean we wouldn't be heard in Britain.
Readers, however, have the advantage of having an order easy.
One can only save if one lives in the peripheral areas: 300 euro for a bed, and 450 for a simple room in Predestina, Centocelle or similar areas.
Net fall of oil following new concerns for the world of the economy
It stresses that the figures of participation seem too high, and the generalisation of the vote in advance (26% of voters in Minsk) opened the possibilty for all manipulations.
Firstly: wear the small yellow hat.
The winner will be rewarded by a price of 300,000 euros.
Has side of libraries, it will also be possible to register the electronic voucher on the Opencard in vending machines installed in the vestibule of several underground stations.
"In 1998, when Héma-Quebec began its activities, only 38% of people still had confidence in the system of blood in Quebec, recalls the Dre Décary.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
In short - victorious goal for Kovalev
One of the fathers of cinema and the homeland died during a particularly obscure, where terrorists and the stock markets are afraid, the feel of the American is low, desperately searching for reasons of dignity.
We based ourselves on a key recommendation of the reports by Krever and Gélineau, which stated that when we don't know it and a serious disease can follow, – Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease which is characterised by a brain degeneration leading inevitably to death, – we introduced measures of exclusion.
About the holiday, the logic is complicated: X days after the first year, x days after the third, up to 15 days in all, past a number of years.
And this time the old neighbours of Hurston see it as a sauveuse.
Analysis Paris history of the sitting Morning Meeting historic Morning Meeting
In October the decision will be taken on the fate of the toppled duo Huber-Beckstein
The elections were held; now everything revolves around the coalition; during the debates on public television, the party leaders have hidden their cards.
"This place was magnificent" said Danny makes, the manager of the Ramones, who took the photo in November 1976.
As long as the less affected issuing bodies, governments and commercial banks are still prepared to support the system, we can assume a reduction of arrears on time.
That is the timetable set by the Capitol for the work of the Commission for the future of Rome" which took place this morning at the new headquarters, behind the Thermes of Caracalla.
It is always to read the papers illustratifs medicines that we take, and, if something is not clear, not to be impressed, but speak clearly the doctor or pharmacist "stressed the expert at the agency Ansa.
The newspaper 'El Masri El Jom "said that, in the words of a German mediator, the release of the hostages was delayed because the kidnappers feared for their safety.
"We believe that the raw materials will not escape this infection.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices have ranged between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
The Italian version is downloadable at http: / / it.openoffice.org / download / 3.0.0 / download300.htmlet and is added to the English version that has already been available on the mirror since Friday.
When at the end of the war, he was captured by the British and placed in the court to capture of the region Holstein, dozens of Germans were the Czech consult to their learns Czech.
Witness also the slogan 'bloody" throughout the campaign.
The $700 billion plan to buy up with taxpayers' money the bad debts, puts to active risks the unsaleables of the US financial institutions.
They were simply informed the control of the real value of the product in question, and they have made their way.
"It must be in line with reality.
As in the plane, said an expert
According to Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd, the American legislators should quickly resume negotiations and adopt the proposed supports for the financial system.
Vargas Llosa confess that the novel that he says is "real courage"
This can also tell, in a way, the life of this woman who has exhibée in places so far, especially for the time, as in India, the United States, or Russia, but also throughout Europe, since it was usually in London.
David Nailey, a professor at the University of Western Ontario in London, recalls the risks of fruit juices that they are, or, if sounding costs associated with the ingestion of certain drugs; during the 236ème national meeting of the American Chemical Society underway in Philadelphia, it is launching a new warning: A glass of orange juice, fungus and apples, to reduce the absorbement of some vital medicines, cancelling their benefits and putting at risk the health of patients.
Shareholders and creditors of the bank did more than hoped.
It was the best that could mark the jets at a time.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition.
This whole process must reflect what the bee done to avoid the other bees.
Virtual operators have the advantage of being able to focus on a much more specific target group.
They have not been according to the opposition.
A number of cabinet officers of the Department of Justice have also handed in their resignations.
Researchers of space know about the only black for about ten years.
"To avoid the coalition of red and black, we are ready to take responsibility of the government," said Haider.
To operate in such a limited period of time, we should already have an agreement now. "
Special prosecutor, Nora Dannehy now will inquire to know whether the officers lied to their interrogators, hence obstructing justice, during their investigation.
During the hearing, one of the accused will relate the methods for manufacturing invoices, as he has already done before the public prosecutor earlier.
This service alone should be a compelling enough reason to buy a mobile with music playing capabilites.
It is beyond me. "
In February we had informed of the launch, Poland, the virtual operator Mobilking.
The actress Heather Locklear arrested for driving under the effect of a drug
The Bush plan was far from perfect, but according to the vote in Congress, a real danger is the possibility that Washington is not proposing a political tool to deal with the crisis.
Tourists kidnapped in Egypt are set free
As well, which is sovereign, has certainly more of cards that is not, i.e., whoever has the misfortune to live in a place without harvest, without oil and without water.
Such as Tesco Mobile proposes, in Britain, SMS at least two times cheaper than its competitors.
Asian stock exchanges lived on Tuesday a dramatic fall, even if the evidence did during the day, to erase some of the losses.
He was ill since 2007.
The high court of Truro has stated that he regularly bound his step-daughter, Stéphanie Randle, during her childhood, when she was between 5 and 7 years old.
"Among all the major roles he has interpreted, it has never been so proud that the husband dedicated, loving father, grandfather attentionné and philanthropist," he said.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a telephone.
"During the 90-minute debate, John McCain had a lot to say about me, but nothing on you, denounced Obama, yesterday, to 20 000 people gathered for an election rally in North Carolina in pouring rain.
Unlike any existing system, the avoidance maneuver works in an entirely instinctive manner.
It could be start the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
Suddenly, everything is linked.
"The phenomenon has now reached the very serious to exclude whole categories of young people, the right to the study because of the overall costs very high that the families of origin must soutenir- explains the responsible for the office of studies of Sunia, Laura Mariani- in these cities, the strong demand from the students has distorted the market that a process of widespread increase has amorcémême for residents.
Trerise and his wife have divorced in the 1980s, and it retourna live in Cornwall.
In August 2008, compared to the same month last year, we have seen the biggest increase in production sectors of energy and raw aimed at a subsequent transformation (16.8 percent).
It was the highest Jets score in one game.
Trerise and his wife divorced in the 1980s, and he returned to live in Cornwall.
How excited I was.
It soon became popular and people spontaneously adopted it.
Now the company has other things on which to focus, for example, the next version of its operating system, Windows.
There is no single, which determines its appearance
The BR23C uses lithium batteries polymère which are more light and whose focused of energy is bigger, which makes their long-life version that in the lithium-ion.
They thus want to calm investors before the start of trade on the Asian financial markets, which are located in the first time zone, where the decision of Congress could affect trade on Monday.
In 1945, some groups of Sudeten Germans were addressed allegedly the President of the United States with such a desire.
Has in suburban trains and buses 300-499, essentially use the inhabitants of Commons of Bohemia central to gain access to the capital.
The British newspaper Telegraph published an article that researchers at the University of Oxford have done an interesting experience in analysing where the belief in God could influence tolerance to the pain of human beings.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
A person in the confidence of the situation said to Reuters on Monday that the aid commitments are issued up to EUR 35 billion.
In the English press, the government would take on board the whole loans of the bank Bradford and Bringley, with more than 41 billion euros (75,5 billion USD) of mortgages.
The cinema, you expect the individual films that you have turned last year.
The insurer American International Group, that the US monetary authorities have fixed, plans to give more than 15% of its assets to repay the $85 billion that they have borrowed, according to the Financial Times on Sundays.
"I feel responsible for his death."
They wear road signs of mosques crossed out in red.
The dispute began by the radiation of nine American prosecutors made by the US Department of Justice in December 2006.
It was great, almost better than to go to the amusement park.
Some expected that the US and Britain were going to get to the Sudeten a certain type of autonomy.
Among students of CM1, 100% have passed the state examination for maths, expert level, in 2008.
America changes.
Promise of Brunetta, which suggests in smiling, "a good cappuccino to 7h in the morning is an excellent and healthy resolution".
The disease can be cured, if it is detected in time. The virus can be eradicated of the body, the way the risk of infection disappears and the development of cancer has warned.
What Barrick Gold does not understand - or does not want to understand - is that the public which supports the authors and publishers of Black Canada is primarily doing it because it rejects the brutal manner of the mining company.
Sylvana and the secrets of the Pandora to Bento
In April 1999, we refused to give people blood of persons who had been more than a month in the UK since 1980.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will in 2009, to £450millions.
Soon, on 8 October, will start the hearings relating to the ongoing criminal proceedings against János Zuschlag and his accomplices.
Tuesday morning, they have created blockades in Morbihan and Calvados, causing traffic jams of nearly 10 km.
The Euro-American research probe Casini-Huygens used this physical device, just as the solar probe Ulysses.
Is should be no problem for MP3 players, who are able, following a recharging, a continuing operation of at least 9 p.m., including the least productive.
MP3 players are easier to use, while mobiles need more expert knowledge.
It courut making use of a clever strategy, leaving the group of runners in Ethiopia and Kenya take a clear advantage, then going around 18miles 1⁄2 after.
The presentation of the first illustrated edition the "Journal of a poet recently married" in the church of Saint Stephen' at New York, where Juan Ramón Jiménez married Zenobia in March 1916, is part of the activities by the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia to celebrate the "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" (2006-2008), organised to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the conferring of the Nobel Prize for Literature and their deaths.
In the South, it will be from now on a junior partner, although it has so far resisted the crisis better than the banks of Munich and Stuttgart.
Speak in sleeping
It should be added that the ÚOHS has relatively enough powers to disclose such activity, and if it does not want to settle with the explanations of the operators, who say they had no idea that this would happen, their contractual conditions forbid it.
Yesterday Sandrina Fasoli, the Belgian winner of the first edition, watched her models in the window of Mango at 54 Boulevard Haussmann in Paris and she almost began crying with emotion.
The author, Brendan Gill, wrote: "Extra Place is a small cul-de-sac, dark day and night, and outlined by the doors of a warehouse in persion rusted iron, full of newspapers from last week that fly along the gutters."
Medicines: never with fruit juices.
It he: "Some people have not enjoyed".
Young people know him mainly through the cult film Slap Shot by George Roy Hill (1977), and in Reggie Dunlop, as the coach of an unorthodox Hockey team.
Building societies in the bill B & B.
But it says it has not been able to contact the children living in the dangerous areas of Helmand and Kandahar, located in the south.
In this case, it is still of someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
The option of doing nothing is simply not acceptable," he said.
In the online edition of the information journal of the German left, Franz Walter analyses the causes of the dramatic defeat of the CSU in his article entitled "The revolution in Bavaria devours its founding fathers".
The board of AIG met Sunday in the evening to examine possible, according to stop it said.
And that's it, it's go to the festival of beer.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
The leaders of the US Congress and the government of President George W. Bush agreed on a form of the agreement of financial assistance to the US financial system.
The circumstances around a shooting before the release of the hostages are still unclear: Well, the kidnappers were close to put an end to the kidnapping, in the words of an Egyptian security official, before the Sudanese army killed six of the kidnappers without shout station.
Others have proclaimed extra Place as a real rarety - a virtually identical fragment to the city that should be treated in peace.
Sometimes that a girl offers a boy a Bento she has prepared itself, and who is prepared very carefully, in the hope of being able to do a little better knowledge of the boy during the break.
Today, however, the U: Fon is ready to serve as an argument for not accept a virtual operator.
The authorities Thaï the bloquèrent the passport control, and in the end, it out Hong Kong.
However, they have not said anything openly about the veracity of the information so as to feel less worried about the credibility.
The dumping total in English focusing on the use almost constant of English in the investigation.
The sky, it is with pride at the meeting of his daughters with its fans on earth, something that is not as usual in America.
"The hesitation about action to rescue the US affect the financial markets around the world," observed Joseph Yam, the head of the Hong Kong Monetary Institute.
"The Syrians know very well what they will have to give up to get the Golan Heights.
This analysis is the first of a series of experience, which the academics, the scientists, philosophers and theologians part from various sectors of the university.
However, I do not think so.
But also remind them to wear seat-belts before starting a journey.
After the excellent results, there is the question of what would be the impact on the regulation of pain in the subjects if the believers were shown a Madona painted by Leonard or by a painter of equal calibre?
Moreover, the manual offers other methods such as contact with nature or 100% natural recipes which help to relax.
What matters most is consumer awareness and making this information open to the public domain.
Isabelle Bayón is in the skin of the dancer sévillane Tórtola Valencia
The Hypo Real Estate should now pay interest on the fraction to what it would have law.
"You do not embrasses tone white teacher because it is blanc- I want to say that there is now a line of demarcation cultural" said Ms Nathiri.
The hostage takers Germany had demanded a ransom of a total of six million; the money should be called by the German woman one of the hostages.
Sony Ericsson, whose mobile of the series walkman have the same menu that the user MP3 players sold separately, is the one who went as far in this area.
The events, and the desire to thank the designer Valentino, chairman of the jury of the competition, conspired to make it so that we were in a luxurious dinner at the opera Garnier of Paris.
Five years later, an acclaimed biography on Hurston published by Robert E. Hemenway, a true bestseller, re-introduced her to the American cannons.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
The question according to which he would envision a coalition with Wilhelm Molter, the current president of the ÖVP, as Vice-Chancellor, is open from Faymann.
Most affected are investment funds of the old dependant society Württemberg Hypo and those of course that have a life beyond 2009.
Currently, we figure to 200 million patients with chronic hepatitis C-type in the world.
The strategy of sugar and hard against drivers
I am a pragmatic émotionel.
The government should negotiate new advance in the case of mortgages that it will buy, while reducing payments of debtors and allowing them to keep their homes.
Dramatic reductions of Hypo Real Estate and Commerzbank led the German index (Dax) to a profound deficit.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently the other.
The talks, however, have only begun, according to sources in the financial centre.
Ms Boyd summed up everything by saying that "Zora saved Eatonville".
"Sometimes God creates perfect people.
If it is true that the judges are independent and impartial, this is not the truth they will deem, especially in the case of prosecution in libel, but the law.
Addition to Windows and Mac os, the result is as usual available in addition to the system opératif Linux.
In the case of mobile cheap, do they will play music for a few hours.
"You have noticed that there was an election, you? Question the Social Democrat leader Alexander Kazulin, one of the last two political prisoners released in August this year.
Residents proclaim now that the elimination of racial segregation in schools, although in some positive aspects, has weakened the cohesion of Eatonville and weakened the confidence of the young.
The US general counsel has appointed a special accuser to check the question of the dismissal of nine American prosecutors in 2006.
It could participate in the Beijing games because of a hypothetical poorly on the back, but he promised to win in Berlin, improving its third marathon, his personal record of nearly five minutes.
"I do not believe that Senator Obama has the experience and knowledge needed to be president," he also assured.
They desperately need this, and I show you an example.
Closer to our times (1990), to his sensitive depiction of Mr Bridge, troubled in his old age by a marriage that did not fulfil all its promises.
"Anyone who wants safety in Jerusalem, and especially does not want that tractors and bulldozers crush their feet, as happened to one of my best friends, must renounce parts of Jerusalem," noted Olmert referring to the two attacks in the city, in July, where several people were killed and dozens were injured.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
Least ten five hours of the morning.
Space physicists have known of the existence of dark matter only for ten years.
Olmert would return almost all the occupied territories in exchange for peace
This represents a discovery since Microsoft, after version version, has not been added to the functions and "perks," to Windows.
It must react instinctive instant and, since this technology is the most vulnerable and most of the envelope, a layer of protection for the moment when the collision is considered inevitable.
The interpretation of the dominant market position is one of the many points of contention.
According to economists, the announcement of the fact that the rescue plan will be adopted should be a first major psychological factor to revive the financial markets.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day in history.
A young, in general, can take a profile on several pages, of Facebook to Xanga, and it can connect them to other benefits, such as to Twinter, or last.fm, listant its musical habits, and then it can connect them to a system of further, as FriendFeed or Blip.fm. these young people can also take blogs, in which are automatically their most recent photo galleries that they store on Flickr or Picasa.
The street, however, has fans.
In the whole of the processing industry, prices have risen by 10.2 percent during the past year.
For five years, they have been going to the beer festival, and have already made three trips this year.
Carmen Tórtola Valencia, daughter of a Catalan father (Florenç Tórtola Ferrer) and Andalusian mother (Georgina Valencia Valenzuela), was born in the neighborhood of Triana and at the age of three years went to live in London with her family.
. No signs indicate the street.
And even if we could prove that for Man: How could anyone the show in rats?
Free speech - the Orwellian discourse of Barrick Gold
In his article entitled "Who? With whom? The party chairman is reserved with regards to the issues of the coalition," the Austrian conservative newspaper says about the situation of confused internal policy which has followed the Austrian elections.
As soon as we turn to other species and that we address the issues of feeling or in general of consciousness, we are moving into difficult terrain because the hardware is not correspondant.
Henry Paulson said that the law provides the necessary tools to spend $700 billion for the urgent needs of the financial system, the vast takeover of dubious claims, their insurance, or to avoid the risk of the system triggers the collapse of one or the other important financial institution.
After many years, the county has rejected the proposal of the motorway.
However the board of the Deka, which each half is borne and by the banks of the Länder and by groups of coffers of savings, instructed the steering committee to drive talks with WestLB for common commercial activities.
Darrelle Revis, corner back, has intercepted a fire lost 32 yards and the touchdown.
It ing understand that the return possible East Jerusalem.
Trerise wrote in a confession letter: "I feel responsible for her death".
Society, with its present value of 156 billion dollars, is more that IBM (140 billion dollars), Intel (124 billion dollars) or Coca-Cola (110 billion dollars). The AdWords / AdSense advertising areas threaten the turnover of advertising agencies, while the benefits introduced at a speed increasingly important cause severe headaches not only to Microsoft, but to many other creators of computer programs.
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
"Why Japan in particular?" my friends asked me when I told them that I wanted to spend a year at school in Tokyo.
In his speech before the full assembly, as one of the main spokesmen of the consultation of experts, Lívia Járóka, eurodeputy of Fidesz European People's Party, has drawn attention to the segregation in education, because it is a violation of the law affecting the children of Rome, and one of the main obstacles to their success in life.
The system is not yet available on the Spanish market, although some industrial vehicles and office have already installed a few on an experimental basis.
"Paul Gadd was not present when".
Currently the sisters Cruz are taking their new activity in the trend very seriously.
After much effort to improve the safety of blood products and work on the ground during the years that followed, we have returned public confidence, "he said proudly that at the beginning of 2008, nearly 94% of the population of Quebec had now confidence in Héma-Quebec.
Two extremes, between which there is enough room for everyone.
Meat Loaf - or Lee Marvin Aday, which is his real name - has suffered from health problems in recent years, even undergoing surgery to cure an irregular heartbeat problem, after having collapsed on stage, in 2003.
Trerise wrote in a confession letter: "I feel responsible for her death".
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
Open Office, this is the third edition of the package "anti-Microsoft"
The following category of issuers of bills is that of companies directly related to the accused.
The bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate was attached in its place to the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg in Stuttgart.
On the one hand the artist.
It is enough to visit, since the mobile phone, web pages of the operator (or those of another supplier corresponding) and buy the song or the album in question.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
It was a blow for everyone.
Financial markets such as Frankfurt or London would be even more affected by the decline in the price of hotels that industrial sites as Hanover, Cologne or Stavanger.
"This shows how much the market depended on the plan", she added, fearing that a draft adopted in several days may be "too late".
The ADQ has urged the support of the adoption of the North Plan by the government.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
Four times candidate for the Oscar (he has won a), Garci believe that the three films candidates representing Spain this year at the Academy of Hollywood, "Sangre de Mayo," "Sept French" ping pong tables and ultimately the winner, "The tournesols blind," are not representative of the young Spanish film, "which should be better known," he said.
In the surprising draft presented at the CEATEC, taking place in Japan, bumblebees have given the strategic idea to engineers from Nissan, for the inspiration on how they could devise the next generation of detectors of obstacles.
In January 2006, the Association Y-Generáció and Szövetség has Modern Magyarországért have applied for a grant from the body of public utility of the Socialist Party, Táncsics Mihály Alapítvány (MRI).
However, critical observers find, in addition to all this, contradictions that are cause for concern: for example, the top management of the society has refused, in its entirety, the protests of employees, after it doubled the price of the enterprise and after that the company has found it too expensive to feed its employees multiple times a day. It pales next to the fact that already in 2006, Google agreed to the Chinese government and according to the terms of the agreement, the company detects all the results that injure good taste, and the interests of the Chinese regime.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
A few hundred Belarussians met Sunday evening at the polling stations closed on the central place in Minsk to protest against the fraudulent nature of the legislation.
The choice depends entirely on the mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
The midfielder Antonio Ribeiro scored the winning goal in the 90th minute of play.
What we can do is take into account a number of very simple precautions such as:
Obama has said that he is the future.
The reason for this striptease of thought is the relations of the press towards Ryan's new film "The Women" - which tells the story of an adulterer.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
Despite this, there is still something - a virtual operator, which would force the traditional operators to lower prices.
Traffic control of the police in Euskadi (the Ertzaintza) on the border of the policy of Armiñón (taken).
Of course it is the second largest shop of the brand in Europe that has been opened with a surface area of 1.335 square metres.
10 years ago, in 1998, the CSU is ramassait with 47.7 percent, for the first time since the 1950s, with a score below the level of 50 percent.
According to the spokesman for lElysée David Martinon, the President "will discuss solutions that could possibly help their businesses to regain competitiveness and to secure jobs and pay for sailors with them'.
The spots will "haunt" the spectators until 2010.
In Iraq, 500 soldiers have been killed, and the Americans have not been forced to make the suitcases.
At the foot of the stairs, Ambassador Spanish and other authorities were present.
"When you ask the taxpayers to take extraordinary measures as a result of the irresponsibility of some, it is not enough to congratulate itself.
The new Czech anthem four new versions.
"It is a question that we have dealt with the Ministry and, at the beginning, it prohibits any movement of passengers.
"If there is what you suggest, it could be a violation of contractual conditions that we would examine and could reach a judgment of cooperation with the company in question," responded to our question on this issue Martina Kemrová.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
It is companies publishing their own list price of mobile telephone services, but these are only public in part.
It is clear that the interim result of the picture longer reflects the unpredictability of the first League that the domination of his HSV.
As he has already said, a collaboration will surely be unsuccessful if Faymann is trying to interfere in the internal affairs of the ÖVP.
The company account complaint against the driver of the lorry.
It is the fault of the climate.
In one month, our national currency has weakened by 1.7 per cent against the euro, and 7.1 percent against the dollar. Compared to August 2007, it has strengthened by 7.5 percent against the euro and 15,9 percent against the dollar.
Avalon Bay announced several months ago that she wanted to repave the little street and install seats, some which will be used by a café to which the constructor will rent out space.
Several members of the League of First Division were already in the previous season, convicted of manipulation of relegation compulsory; in the end, the beginning of the League has even be unrealistic at the last minute.
Today, the party is probably vexed, since its requests for him to be placed under house arrest, on the basis of a reduction of his detention conditions, continually fall on deaf ears.
Otherwise, we risk that other countries are suffering the effects.
Ecouter of music at full volume for a prolonged period using mobile music devices like MP3 players, can cause permanent damage to the hearing.
Foreigners who come to discover the history of Eatonville, its raison d'être, are still treated with caution.
For the CSU, the failure was not quite a surprise, but on Sunday, came to end a process that was likely it is that, just ten years: The undisputed hegemony of the national party ended.
Today, the largest agreement in American journalism lies between who run the newsrooms- i.e. the directors - and reporters who work for them.
But look at all in detail and from the start.
On the other, the person.
GTS Novera the group, which would like to take a step towards becoming a real competitor to Telefonika in the field of client enterprise, has not been hiding for a while now, its intention to launch a virtual mobile operator.
There is no beer, not anymore.
It is a group of elected Republicans that wrecked the first draft agreement last week.
Much to Eatonville, as Ms Jones, a teacher courageous and which has a low for the red lively, have always fear that their insular community is understood.
The first was Jimmy Carter, who, with his decisions, destroyed the US economy and had contacts (as he continues to have today, as a private citizen) with the Islamic enemy. "
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is now complete with the Palais Chigi.
"We have made great progress.
The documents passed into the hands of the BBC before being handed over to the police.
But, according to their revelations, the American journalists are often "sick" during the year.
The sale price manufacturers to export rose by 1.1 percent compared to those of July 2008, as compared to those of a year ago, they fell by 3.9 percent.
They have not been according to the opposition.
Later, the Dow Jones was a little overtaken.
Least for these aspects of our conscience who depend on the prefrontal cortex, including the conscience of who we are, and the ability to predict and decide, it is reasonable to assume that human beings differentiates even other primates.
According to a spokesman for the police, the actress has been cooperative and alcohol abuse has been removed from the beginning, "according to the observation police officers at first sight, we thought that Locklear was under the influence of a medicine".
"The scientists-concluded the executive UE- confirm that there are good reasons to worry, and that the European Commission will now decide, with the Member States and other interested parties, what steps could possibly be taken to better protect children and adolescents, against exposure to noise from mobiles and similar music devices.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently elsewhere.
At the time, the department said that prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
The whole matter was born from the account of the case by the inspector general of the Department of Justice, who criticized the actions of some cabinet officers.
Drugs: Never with of fruit juices.
The plan also includes aid for property owners, who have problems to pay.
In this way, instead of infinite combinations that bees have to avoid other bees, in our case, we could only use swerving movements, acceleration and slowdown as maneuvers for the mini auto-robot
In conditions almost parfaites- sunny time, 48, 55 degrees from the arrivée- Gebrselassie won Sunday, now an impressive average of a thousand in 4 minutes 43 seconds
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and be equally effective on the market.
Minister's office Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek think it will discourage drivers a dangerous driving.
Has television, President Lukashenko and the members of the central electoral commission welcome their success.
Renièrent legislators and supports the call to the project of President George Bush.
Clothes designed for the comfort of underwear.
Remind you that if it is very anxious several times, it is advisable to consult a doctor or check what causes both of anxiety in children.
Obama? The first president anti-American. This is why.
(Today there are 90 percent blacks)
This has been a recurring themes of the end of the week, who has started Friday by a large cocktail to highlight the 50th anniversary of the arrival of Jean Lesage at the head of the party.
Ehud Olmert, the chairman of the interim government of Israel, ruled in favour of the return of almost all the territories occupied in 1967, including the West Bank and East Jerusalem and the Golan Heights, in exchange for peace with the Palestinians and Syria.
The common transport agency of Prague (MHD) will introduce, on Wednesday, the chip in their ticketing system
Sheikh Hasina like Zhaleda Zia, denies the accusations against her.
It is certain that they can be dismissed at any time, but not for political reasons.
This mechanism must only deal with a few signals per second, and respond to them.
Dennis Quaid outraged counter-attack
It is beyond me. "
The fact that Belarus, economically dependent increasingly Russia, would improve relations with the EU, where because of the political order of Belarus described as undemocratic, Lukashenko and several senior politicians do not receive entry visa, was one of the expectations of the opposition, Belarus has taken credit for the reduction of Russian natural gas imports more expensive, and helped the passage of society Beltransgaz, owner of gas driven across the country, is spent in the hands of the Russian.
On behalf of the French Presidency, this high-level conference was opened by Xavier Bertrand, Labor and Social Affairs French Minister, and by Vladimir Spidla, European Commissioner for Work, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunities.
There is a line on the border on which there has been no agreement for a very long time and, when the opportunity arises, I reiterate our position on behalf of the government," he said.
The police in Kent has said that it would not discuss specific cases or travel in the potential Glitter contée.
In his edition of the 17 September, The duty published a letter from Mr Patrick J. Garver, vice-chairman of the Canadian mining Barrick Gold.
The hopes of Düsseldorfois are based on Frankfurt.
Thus, the future is perhaps promising.
This part of the brain, along with several other functions, plays a role in the mechanism of "self-promotion" of the nervous system.
A clear but complex pessimism invades American journalism.
Fall of shares in Asia
I feel better than ever, I'm delighted with my 30 years.
Windows 7 will be lighter and it will no longer have as many programmes involved.
Roger Levesque was the only off Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
Extreme means as at election time.
Eatonville has long been defined as a paradox of triumph and fighting.
However, I do not think so.
Despite all this, the opposition is still a palpable improvement in the political system: The political detainees have found freedom, and Minsk is prepared to small confrontation with Moscow, still refusing to recognise the South Ossetia and the Abazzia separated from Georgia and Russia with which Belarus form a confederation on paper, consider the two territories Independents for a month.
In this respect, the economic crisis seems to produce two convergent phenomena.
In short, over breakfast during working hours; more of coffee or increasing.
Sellers must decide whether they will in turn increase the cost to consumers.
It is indeed what took place this weekend.
Part of the Madrid press is also sees Washington as the scapegoat.
If you already have a mobile and want to buy a cheap MP3 player, go for a Cowon, a Creative, a Sony, a Samsung, a Emgeton, or an iriver.
And reading of music is one of the most important energy goinfres.
In Vietnam, the nation lost 50 thousand soldiers and were sent back with kicks to their rear.
Perhaps
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
These drinks, consumed especially the summer because désaltérantes and rich in vitamins, if associated with some vital medicines, to alter the popular absorbement or reducing in the case, their effectiveness, with the same serious consequences for health.
Cautious, the two candidates have ducked questions concerning the financial rescue package of $700 billion (470 billion) adopted yesterday evening by Congress and extremely unpopular.
"The main interest of Avalon Bay is relooker this been abandoned, and make public" she said, pointing out that this was the city to suggest the sale ".
Following the category of issuers of bills company is directly related to the accused.
The complicity of murder is causing a detention of up to five years.
"In the trains integrated into Prazˇská integrovaná doprava (transport integrated Prague), supervisors are equipped with card readers, in which they establish the validity of temporary and zoning vouchers," said the control of tickets Filip Drápal of the organisation Ropid, which sees the time of transport pragois.
Some upmarket music players are capable of much more than just playing music, but these consist mainly of functions different from most mobiles.
He was the enemy of Richard Nixon and the defender lost and overcome causes, like the foundation for fighting drugs created in honour of his mother who died following an overdose, and the creation of his own brand of organic food.
We switch on the computer only to turn Firefox, Explorer offer or chromium and every day people spend more time to surf the Internet that to go of the windows.
Whose orders seem to have been similar: And that it is with this second goal!
"On the contrary," he said, "you must ensure that your child speaks Spanish ".
The research borehole américo-European Casini-Huygens used this device physical, just as the solar borehole Ulysses.
At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
"We need this second goal," siffla Hermann Rieger in the corridor of changing rooms of the ring of Hamburg.
But before the classes began, it was up to me to introduce myself.
The police is examining the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
Take, for example, sixth Street Prep, an elementary school in east of the county of Los Angeles.
The possibility of obtaining energy from the movement of the sea is considered for now hundred years, and in the 1970s, in competition with the first oil crisis, the research intensified.
No one was afraid to be ridiculed or to exaggerate.
The spending of the second half of the $700 billion depends on a new decree of Congress.
As regards the names of companies that would be on the bills, it was decided, during the touring of the province north of Lake Balaton, and was carried out by István Lados, at the request of János Zuschlag.
We should start offering transplants early next year, "says Dre Décary who describes this programme of removal of umbilical cord blood as very popular.
This measure is that the administrative penalties for two reasons: Face these behaviors before they become criminal offences.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
When he was released, Glitter took the plane to Bangkok where it would have the board for a flight to London.
That is something that savers and householders will appreciate in these uncertain times. "
The rest of the time has been relatively quiet, but when the gong was music, I have been beset by the rules.
Open Office, this is the third edition of the "anti-Microsoft" package
"In the case of long-distance routes, it is not possible to treat these places, they are blocked."
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, prices rose by 0.3 percent, while those sectors which produce energy and materials aimed at a subsequent transformation did not change compared with the previous month.
A little more than three miles of the arrival, Gebrselassie has made his final push to diversify away from Kwambai, which ends second in 2: 05: 36, improving its best record staff of five minutes.
At the time of her death in 1960, Hurston was poor and her books were out of print.
People behave similarly, which is why some scientists deduce a similar subjective experience.
It is primarily targeted at the conscience of young drivers, motorcyclists, pedestrians, as well as professional drivers.
That announcement the European Commission, which, in a statement distributed in Brussels, quote the opinion of the Scientific Committee, on the health risks unexpected and recently identified (Csrseri) of the EU, published today.
What is it that it means?
In their comments Tuesday on the international financial crisis, culmination of the day, newspapers leaders of the European press evoke already a "second 11 September.
"If the passenger would need to check the validity of the voucher registered, there is nothing more simple as to call this information to the driver," compléta Drápal.
A war of late Rose for the former couple Meg Ryan and Dennis Quaid: Seven years after their divorce, the two Hollywood actors are engaged in a battle disgracieuse - in full view of the world.
Reuters announcement that during debates are extending until after midnight on Saturday, local time on the east coast, the leaders of Congress agreed on the controversy that exists for days on end, around the rescue plan for a total of $700 billion.
"I have never seen anything like this," said Ellis.
Democratic Representative Rahm Emanuel, a former member of the Clinton administration, has compared the "Obama's good economic instincts" to those of Bill Clinton during the 1998 financial crisis.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
It is precisely at the request of Iván Kubatov that the Romanian builders have created the companies Fa-Bani Jos Faipari Kft. and Jos-Investment Bt.
Other cabinet officers, including the former employee of Bush, Karl Rove, have been criticised for not having managed to cooperate in the investigation.
It demeura one of seven national symbols even after the creation of the Czech Republic independent.
Tuesday, at the beginning of trade, the stock exchange of Prague renoua with his downfall of the day before, when it lost almost six percent.
As in a plane, said an expert
A day very intense but, at the same time, exciting, we expected.
Mr field, for his part, said think that some under felt the attractiveness of the street in its current state.
Obama said to CBS that McCain has not had any role in the negotiations, while he was in daily contact with the Treasure Secretary.
Which device to choose
We have seen many its binette allowed to grace the vinaigrette pots, sauces, biscuits and other foods, judging the process of poor taste, albeit joke at the outset.
But that means and for the emotions?
This is the first time in the history of the United States that the legal ceilings will be in force on the allowances of the directors-general, has commented on the chairman of the committee responsible for financial services of the Chamber of Deputies, the democrat Barney Frank.
The talks come, however, only to begin, said in the financial centre.
Coppola is being investigated for bankruptcy in the framework of the investigation on the Unipol-Bnl escalation.
"Black children are used to being embraced - I remember well - we embraced our teachers in the morning and evening" said N.Y. Nathiri., daughter of Ella Dinkins and chief director of the protection of the Community of Eatonville, a non-profit group.
In this place so, I have presented to the rostrum, and tried to speak properly: 'Sayonara Wo She Sylvana...' - I called Sylvana, I come from Germany and my birthday is in a week.
The office and employees of shops which are in front of me, frightened of another potential debacle, have transferred money to a bank that their reliable, seems to be the most rescue on Wall Street.
This is what it is like when a directorial committee wants to demonstrate its ability to act in difficult times.
Eatonville is classified historic city since 1998.
According to the Member, a collaboration of the European Union geared towards a goal and an action is necessary for an acceleration of the process of desegregation schools. This respect for existing anti-discrimination directives and preparation is of paramount importance.
"We cannot believe, that you would give the territory to a foreign government, which oppresses and destroys the minorities and has done nothing to aid the victory of the Allies, without taking into account the opinion of its quarter of a million inhabitants," says the letter.
While no result had yet been announced, many young people came to demonstrate against the power of President Alexander Lukashenko: "The dictator, resign".
Passengers can buy a coupon valid for 30 days or 90 days (this will be available from 1 January 2009) as well as register their smart card at information points and the offices of Dopravní podnik (the transport agency), located in the underground stations at Muzeum, Mu˚stek, Nádrazˇí Holesˇovice, Andeˇl, Roztyly, Letnˇany, Kobylisy, Rajská zahrada, Kacˇerov and Luka.
Then they ammended it to allow passengers to go to the toilet during the journey on condition that they have their own seat, " he revealed his position.
Friday, the winner was Daniel Luque who cut three ears and was carried out in triumph, having made movements of arms with taste and aesthesis faced with the bull.
American actions lived, on Monday, a bloodbath and the main indices of actions got the biggest fall of the last 20 years.
"naturally outraged, everyone has resolved to put an end to such tragedies which, by their numbers, call for the clamour of media and the participation of the public, even if daily reality presents us with dramatic cases, even repetitive in their dynamics.
Not inform.
According to the chief economist of Patria Finance David Marek, the plan is a good idea, but its implementation will be very difficult.
The principle of capping means that if the secretariat the Treasury is buying up in an auction, they prélèveront a surplus of tax on the golden parachute, unless the President of discredited bank based in retirement.
In addition, and this is an example that Mr Obama could copy, reported Linda Mikels, chief of the sixth Street, the school has created the investigation of the English language full "waterboarding".
The most resounding these days is probably the coordinated action against paedophiles Brazil, during which Google has sent to the Brazilian Government the information that he had collected on page of the public called Orkut, allowing an identification.
And it is only thanks to the important benefits of the reimbursement of costs of accounting downstream from the restructuring of the former group Depfa, as well as the interest payments, according to the tax book procedures and commercial procurement for companies of Konzern that the deficit of the gains of about 16 percent has proven to be moderate.
The first time this has happened that may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
Unfortunately, that a limited part of aircraft has a universal USB connector, because not all can be directly connected to the computer, without a special software.
The bad boy from Australia, Russell Crowe, called Newman his greatest inspiration.
Beyond the speech by Mr Garver surréel, the pursuit of Barrick Gold is a direct attack on freedom of research university and the quest for truth, essential to a democratic society.
The question, if it is really a chance, is naturally.
The bloodshed US stocks
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
Indeed, earlier Roma children start school, it increases the chances of becoming a productive member of the labour market; by the taxes paid from his income and consumption, part of the state budget.
Police control of a van in the province of Alava: two thousand kilos of hashish found
Even taking into account the additional purchase of such a card, you will not exceed two thousand kronor.
No later than last year became on the island of Réunion the virus chikungunya who, like the West Nile virus, is transmitted by an insect in the blood.
The sale price domestic sectors of the processing industry has suffered only a small increase of 0.1 percent in July.
Austria thinks seriously about regaining its courage, following its oscillation to the right in the parliamentary elections yesterday.
Of the main ways as at election time.
Witness information available to the public learned from CˇTÚ websites.
The individual arrested was accused of drug trafficking and falsification of documents.
After the victory on Sunday, Gebrselassie said to reporters have suffered the Mollet-two weeks before, and have missed training for a week.
German domestic flights have even been divided by two according to the study.
In particular, the tar, we doubt the exclusion of additional benefits in the event of injury to cause of service hours; the extension of hours of continuous domiciliaire worker ill, during which are carried out inspections and other items from the new provisions sought by the minister.
The song is performed by Katerˇina Kneˇzˇínková and Adam Plachetka.
Madrid in the race for the 2016 Olympic Games
Paul Newman was part of that. "
The course of action of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and pulls Dax into the abyss.
For one, it can be unacceptable to spend eight thousand kroner for a reader, in the same way as a fan of Pink Floyd would be hard to sustain the headphones bought for twenty kronor in the market.
If they had taken into account all the mistakes that occurred during the race, it would be a note éliminatoire.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
The English-called 's tank but the awesome Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the other.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family which is doing very well".
It is indeed that took place this weekend.
Dennis Quaid outraged at counter-attack
But he adds moreover, sitting in his chair on the back patio that looks onto Lake Sabelia, where Hurston was certainly baptised, that "she never stayed too long".
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
And facilitate its implementation, as the legal reform can be made by ordinary routes but, however, the reform made by criminal means requires a reform of the organic law.
As he said, the orientation Schüssel-Molter was, in any case, rejected.
To cut corners for everyone in Congress, a provision has also been added that if the government were to take losses for five years with this program, it could put in place new taxes to help recover its losses.
In the first round, half of this amount will be spent.
The cause of this exclusion is that the stock exchange of Warsaw is owned by the state.
It lasted, he added, until teachers and students came from the same place.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
The gravitationnel effect is a means used by space probes to get an extra boost from the gravitational field a celestial body, the Earth for example.
Already the way to go to school I was afraid.
Inseparable except in the unknown intimacy, in these times of the public, where we discover to intimate and gestures of sight stolen of artists who do not care about up on stage.
With big on the heart and bear it, because of the recent death of his brother, Nati has put a clothing and a couple of Mango parures of ELAH, which cut off the breath, below, arms and hands with his son Luis - a good man of almost two metres high – it has accompanied Valentino to his dinner prepared in his honour.
A few months after the attacks of September 2001, during the days of the collapse of Enron, Krugman wrote in an article published on the New York Times, that the second event would have been more important than the first, in terms of impact on US history.
The disappearance of Paul Newman has been staggering to the cinema goers the end of this week, while collide its major roles on the screen black memories.
"There are few areas belonging to the city, and we hope that the city has extra Place" she said.
No financial movement has taken place, either, since the invoices were cancelled later, but that the bodies have avoided mentioned in their accounts.
With the festival "Popular Song of Mines" Bauer began in 1997 a long journey to photograph singers, dancers guitarists or dancers with a film camera.
If music is for you, essentially, a background noise and if during the day you will listen to it for a limited time, for example while taking the tram, you only need any mobile capable of reading MP3s.
According to her, "now, everything is waiting for the moment when the systems of entry and electronic control of the Atlantic will be put into service".
The question, if it is really a matter of chance, pops up naturally.
"UEFA constantly has an eye on us."
The Press (diepresse.com)
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
The assistant trainer Cornelius Jol has acquiesed and given the thumbs up.
Stress is evil of the twenty-first century.
We may not realize it yet, but at the moment we are witnessing an insidious erosion of our rights, freedom and 'democracy', that very word that Harper continues to brandish and which rings so hollow in his mouth.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
However, the law will still undergo many changes.
Etudiants victims of the rent ladies, up to EUR 900 for a chamber.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
In the context of this experiment 12 Catholic believers and as many atheists were subjected to shock, while each of them was presented with a painting of the Virgin Mary.
The head of the Deta-Bank Franz Waas said during the presentation of the figures of the six months ended August that he had no sense in the merger of the house of the Mainzer Landstrasse with a bank of Land, the Helaba or WestLB.
The ageing population also has implications for the network of blood donors which brings together on average only 3% of eligible Quebecian blood donors. "
Historical cinemas are closing in favour of Multiplexes.
Alice Walker, Tony Morrison and Ruby Dee came to the Zora Festival every year at Eatonville, to pay tribute to Hurston, the most famous writer of the Harlem Renaissance.
He was released from the mirror narcissique, the American player to smile charmer?
If the mobile operators a blind eye to such a procedure, why blocking the creation of a virtual operator?
A few days you debuted on the ramp with Naomi Campbell, is it not?
For a price of three or four thousand kronor, one can buy a very decent walkman.
Who uses even half of the applications provided with the system?
Blood mixed are often children beautiful.
I had to find the way by myself. Fortunately I didn't get lost.
99% of the shares are in the hands of the Polish state who wants to secede from more than 60% of its actions in a few months of activities.
The total amount to the aid of the system should be divided into two parts.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is now complete with the Palais Chigi.
The question, if it is really a chance, is naturally.
Askale Tafa Margasa of Ethiopia came second in 2: 21: 31, while Helena Kiprop, Kenyan finished third in 2: 25: 01.
Der Spiegel (spiegel.de)
But it is also important if you are always carrying headphones or a handsfree with connection.
It identifies obstacles within an angle of 180 degrees and a distance of 2 feet in front of the BR23C. It assesses the distances and sends a signal to the microchip on board, which turns to avoid the object immediately.
"This is the fundamental point: if we do not do this, the trauma, chaos and the disruption on the daily lives of Americans will be immense," said the Republican Judd Gregg.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, a German Jew father and mother of Hungarian origin.
Meanwhile, culture and its American geek "sauvageons" between the passionate, the activists and users enthusiastic of the computer that appear in many countries are in Google the next generation of big business, "trendy" corporation, as opposed to his rival, Microsoft, classified as invader of the world because of Windows, even if all the two are fighting for the same purpose.
Regardless of this, the feeling is spread that the combination of the various institutions of the public sector is especially urgent.
Then I quickly crept back into my place.
The directors who lose their jobs in the space of three years, are 47% at national level.
The only government that, despite the fact that Canada signed the Geneva Convention, denies its word and leaves languish in inhuman conditions a child soldier.
It still need to continue this recovery plan of markets, but I think we have, "Paulson said.
This epochal change is also the problem of any Christian Democracy, and therefore also that of Angela Merker.
It is better for example, they will still need forces.
According to a statement from the Hypo Real Estate, the need to finance the group is covered with the medium-term credit and the company protected influence of international financial markets largely outside running at present.
I read it in my mangas.
It is being proclaimed that every society must pay a sum proportional to the deposits that it holds, and that intermediate companies must pay about 18% of the cost.
"It is a player 'poor
When energy is born waves, now the big moves.
US, the economic turmoil is felt even among journalists: In the press, it is the deletions., and many blame the Internet, this' murders "the paper newspaper.
This episode has shown that the precautionary principle that has been applied made sense. "
Proof that confirms that the thing most responsible for their disappearance is the advent of the multiplex, because it is the three Italian regions that have made the most of new cinemas multisalles: 195 screens in Lombardy in the last five years, 81 in Tuscany as Emily-Romagne.
In 2007, a strong attack of laryngitis forced him to cancel his concerts.
Most of those in front of me were there for the same reason as myself, I learned later from Starr, my 'personal authorized banker'.
Cornelius is the brother of the chief trainer of Hamburg Martin Jol.
It begins with an instrumental section that lasts almost two minutes.
"Several mothers are disappointed not to be able to have access to it," because Héma-Quebec does not have the resources to propose this complex and expensive programme in all hospitals in Quebec.
Mr Obama should it not take example of the sixth Street Prep and the reply in other schools made up mostly of Hispanic students learning English.
Illhaeusern finally...
Both by measures formal and informal pressure, they ended up getting the creation of a virtual operator, followed by others.
In 2010, it will pay the interests of the whole year, which could also double.
The Sudanese kidnappers had demanded a ransom of several million euros.
We cannot ignore the threat longer - highlights the day-Anzeiger in Geneva.
WestLB bloc would be a "responsibility" doubled to a sustainable productivity in such a case.
If the quality is, as in France with the Commission Attali, as in Rome, I am on, its contribution will be crucial.
'"The Committee is absolutely independent; all the political, social and cultural ideas are represented - wishes to emphasise Alemanno - it will offer ideas of development for Rome which policymakers can use, which remain the Committee and the City Council.
Has the death of Hurston in 1960, it was poor and his books were out of production.
The ÖVP prohibits the SPÖ of meddling in its internal affairs.
My host mother had also made me this kind of Lunchbox - it's really something other than its miserable German counterpart.
Almost all mobile are now capable of this.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciated.
Similarly, in the summer of 2002, the bill on behalf of the foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért, which later will bear the name of Együtt has Harmadik Évezredért, grouillait of mistakes of form and substance.
Young people in particular, tend to be regarded as Hurston Eatonville its entire race: Beautiful, problematic and all, or better or worse, but also proud, creative, bosseuse, crazy and mixed that other racial and ethnic groups in America.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely concurrenciez.
The first debate on Friday between the two candidates for the White House was followed by another to know which of John McCain and Barack Obama prevailed.
They say so much about he, I know, many things are not true.
"During a regular traffic, there is no risk. The situation can be compared to that of service in aircraft.
Another problem occurs while recording music on a mobile.
Immediately after the General Council of the Liberal Party, Jean Charest went to Jean-Achilles, Quebec, where the new Minister of Health, Yves Bolduc (left), is trying to get elected in the election today.
In 2007, the data Inail confirm that the dead white were approximately 1 200.
Although the concepts are different in "Flamenco - people ', the photographer admits that he loves photographing the portrait of people, knowing them, and to enter their lives for a moment.
What matters most consumer awareness and make this information to public domain.
We, on the contrary, want to see progress, and more: to a broader prospective, working seriously for the development of Rome and its future. "
The directors almost always receive huge salaries, while the Editor can earn 10 thousand dollars a month, in addition to retirement pension and the payment of insurance.
In the latest episode of this financial catastrophe, "Citygroup buys banking operations of the Wachovia Corporation, said the government on Monday.
But the complaints from many interested parties (including the GTS Novera company mentioned earlier) show that they meet with similar constrains in their negotiations with all operators.
All lies with it, "he says.
He foams - and counter-attacks.
I am interested it was to create an intimate atmosphere to be able to capture with the camera of moments of personality of the stars of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco ".
Due to the increase in the price of kerosene, passengers in economy class have to pay an average of 7.1 percent more than in 2007, the long-haul flights, very consumers of fuel, have even increased until 29.2 percent.
It took the second time, when the jets transformèrent a 0-0 in an explosion.
This was repeated during the three years in the elections of the Bundestag of 2005, i.e. at the time of the much-discussed Stoiber.
The american of Dow Jones collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
(At the same time, the federal government has successfully obtained some 50,000 web addresses and 1,000 search terms that it had gained in relation to the strengthening of the law on the protection of children, voted several years ago, but in the end, it fails to get the lists of private users searches, or the whole list of Internet sites and the key words from the last two months.)
Later, the other two houses no longer does not rejoignèrent.
The intensity with which it happens is also very different.
As I do not explores language and consciousness among rats, or sensations, I do not know if they exist.
This is what has surprised researchers for years: flying bodies do not behave a 100 percent in the way one would expect them to according to the venerable laws of gravity.
At the same time, thousands of public employees, are united to contest the standards of the Brunetta decree making use of the Codacons.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely concurrenciez.
Tom Wright, Anglican bishop, welcomed the results of this research.
That is one aspect of the American mindset which is kept secret until the end.
On the side of the opposition, the broad outlines of Plan North have been welcomed with scepticism.
"He has tried to do enough in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
If that, internally and subjectively, cannot be measured and, because of the particular nature of the hardware, be analysed based on our own experience, then its observation raises some serious problems.
A source of the Ministry of Interior said that Jacqui Smith, the Home Affairs Minister has been reassured and happy to know that Glitter was banned from travelling in France and Spain.
The Spanish-American novelist acknowledged that "there is no way" to measure and whether the books are changing life. "But I refuse to believe that literature is a pure amusement, a short-lived experience," said Vargas Llosa, who said that it "has the effects" and "makes people less similar", because it has asked the writers' not give in to the frivolity "and to assume their vocation.
"Paul Gadd was not present when".
The court was told that Ms Randle, aged 34 years, has suicidée home to Mutley, Plymouth, on 1 April 2007.
Giorgio Dal Torrione, mayor of the UDC at the time of the collapse, was appointed head of a center-right coalition, after a run-off in May 2006.
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament it is because they have been appointed, not elected.
"And the choices are different: Ocean Power, for example, uses a system of buoys linked together.
It also hope that the Quebec called the members of the Council of radio and Canadian telecommunications and that they have a right of veto on the decisions taken in Quebec.
Hidden in the development of its huge park, a few miles from the sunshine, the brilliant and the giant Orlando, is a quiet town where are born the pride and complications of the African-American experience.
The chairman of the regional Calabrese committee Agazio Loiero, cannot deny that "there are more than one collusions between local councils and organised crime" in his region: "there are places where the mafia is stronger than in others, where the collusion is almost inevitable.
It is possible to limit these data making use of solutions such as the reduction of the level and duration of exposure to noise.
In Afghanistan, almost 200,000 children have missed the recent immunization campaign against polio, for reasons of violence linked to the Taliban, said the UN.
He dedicated his film Harry and Son – a work of modesty and sadness - to his son whom he lost to drug overdose.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
According to the BSA, no society has failed since 1945, the first date of its history.
The neurophysicien Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals have also of the sensations.
The two parties are trying to prevent the building of mosques and minarets, saying that they would be a political symbol of the Islamisation of Austria and Europe.
But also remind them to take the belt before start.
Superglue to walk on the walls.
The two minors, who, according to the information from MTI (Hungarian Telegraphic Agency) are girls, are defending themselves.
This is the second weekend of the party of beer, known as the 'weekend of Italy.
A spokesman for the Kent Police said "The police in Kent will do everything necessary to protect our children as those from abroad.
It should be managed by the Ministry of Finance.
The Sudeten Germans were in 1945 that Sˇumava National Park is included in the US.
In exchange for help, Washington will shares in companies rescued which will be worth of dividends in case of profit and that it will sell when the storm will be passed.
Publication printed against broadcast.
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
According to the head of Google questioned, after ten years of work of global chamboulement, they are still at the beginning of their aims to deal with all the information.
The academic world, to which we belong, has long been known to manage debates and disagreements and resolve conflicts.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
On both sides, there were, of course, those who have expressed their doubts about the plan.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
When Sylvana Hiltrop, 16 years old, must be present for the first day of Highschool at Tachibana, girls are giggle at her: The German is so "kawaii '!
For Elena, this is the first time, for Luca already the third or fourth time.
What is more, the irregularities occur at the level of speed.
This is the second weekend of the party of beer, known as the 'weekend of Italy.
Has another group, they promised that if they went to win the game, then they would receive additional $15, as a reward.
But pressure in the direction of an honest functioning market and lower prices is apparently not among the interests of ÚOHS.
The party populist BZÖ is open to negotiations. The Greens are not yet to agree on the coalition.
However, the OSCE's report on Monday was already challenging the campaign, in which most of the candidates for the opposition could not appear in the media, and particularly the fact that the opposition could not be present at the counting of votes.
"We know how to take a step back," said Marcell Jansen.
This is not merely a male body in a cotton shirt, milling and without sleeves.
Next year, there will need a visa to go to the United States?
But we want to be independent.
On the one hand, such products music does not go on record, and vinyl, from the point of view of quality, there is no objective reason for that to happen.
'"According to scientific data - she continues - it is a clear risk and we must react quickly.
In the world, around half a billion people suffer from chronic hepatitis B or C, while in Hungary, the chronic disease of the liver is mentioned among the main causes of death.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
In fact, these attacks that do not say much; they are obviously attacks of racial nature, and do not correspond to the views of all voters: will he be a good president? We have the polls, which say that Obama will win with a clear advantage.
They wear road signs of mosques removed in red.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
"If the project is moribund (...) then the relay will be quickly gone to the Fed (the US central bank, included) and other central banks to manage the crisis, which resserrerait more credit conditions, said Brian Bethune, chief economist at Global Insight.
It is probably true that a classic operator with its own network has apparently not much chance (incidentally, now, it would be difficult to of frequencies).
And the sooner the better.
The technology-dominated Nasdaq index, has yielded 199,61 points to 1.983,73 index and the broader Standard & Poor's 500 8,81% (106,85 points), 1.106,55 points, according to the final figures.
Napolitano does not hide "there is certainly a problem of resources: It is essential to invest in training and information"
According to the Czech business daily E15, the Polish proposal represents the most high that has been made to date for the purchase of the stock market in Prague.
After its privatisation in 1990, the former state financier had first of all badly speculated on industrial real estate loans, which then had been affiliated with the bank Aareal.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
It embodied for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
There is already a European standard of safety which limits the noise level of portable music devices to 100Db, but the concern is growing about the hearing damage that may result of excessive exposure to such sources of noise.
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when mortgages of Bradford & Bingleys are released.
We have already led the negotiations about that possibility several times with all the Czech mobile operators.
Adrian Coles, BSA
With a final role as godfather of the Irish Mafia in Sam Mendes' Road to Perdition in 2003, the circle was completed.
A court in Bangladesh has rejected a request from backing to the former PM Sheikh Hasina, which is likely to be arrested at his return.
In February we were informed of the launch of the virtual operator Mobilking in Poland.
The multinational trade and tourism has also indicated that the actions will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Sooner or later it will eventually a fatal accident, "he said, there is a years, Ty´den.cz.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
In this transition, Stoiber, who until now called the shots behind the scenes, will also receive an active role. The former head of the regional government and former president of the CSU, has appointed the 28 September as the most bitter day of his political career.
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciates.
In the view of all this talk of a "rebellion of the masses", seems quite frankly excessive.
The draft law states that in the next five years, the President must introduce to Congress, a proposal that will rule on how the losses will be returned to the taxpayers, from the financial sector.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
The obligations of the Hypo Real Estate bank appeared to be an alternative investment of speculation, now their value should be seen as dependent on the stability of the international banking system after the tightening of the banking crisis and the crisis in the same institution that has brought the crisis in the company by its takeover of the bank Depfa.
Kohl, too, is positive, this is the fourth cases of doping.
Given that the building societies are organisations without shareholder, their Member end up paying the bill or by higher costs, or lower interest rates on savings accounts.
The awesome Marcel
"Serious accusations of conduct potentially criminal, unfounded, have not been fully confirmed or resolved," said the inspector General, Glenn Fine, in his report.
The second half began after the Jets and the Arizona Cardinals played dirtily under the dark clouds.
The project of the motorway happened just when the most famous girl of Eatonville had recovered her appeal.
The cause can be attributed to the modernisation "devouring his parents', put in place in the region in a consistent with the CSU.
It could be the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
While viewing the religious painting, they felt 12% less pain than when they viewed the work of Leonard.
Verdant Power, on the contrary, is already producing energy for a commercial center and a car park using six under-water turbines in the East River in New York.
But that is precisely what should seem strange to the CˇTÚ.
In this project, the photographer takes up the special iconography of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco from different angles.
Open Office has been particularly attention to the interaction with the result Office 2007, and it is possible to open the documents with the new extension of Microsoft (.docx, .xlsx, .pptx.)
This should particularly bring nights of insomnia to long term creditors on the decision of whether they should secede from their commitments or not.
Demand will acquire ground for many market segments of travel by air.
"When a static panel which warns against a danger is installed, it will probably quickly merge with the environment and the drivers will not notice it any more," said Korˇán.
Has 5.40 p.m., official time, the plane of the Spanish air force in which the Princes of Asturias traveled landed in the warehouse president of the airport Benito Juárez of Mexico DF.
This accident could be somehow related to the elections.
No, not Mr, I am Spanish but I have lived here thinking two years.
According to the court, such movements (that the entry was not granted) would allow him to influence its society and to have access to evidence that the blame.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
The wrong time has hit the fair, because ultimately two parties on three could not take place.
It is more robust than other institutes refinancing dependent on the inter-bank market since it has no customers received.
It is also worthy, and private independent than it was in the 1930s, when Hurston said that the rural population in Florida was often reluctant to share its true thoughts with the white man, who "we with so little, do not know what he loses".
Currently, we estimate that there are 200 million patients with chronic hepatitis C-type in the world.
The cap wage is not mentioned in any specificity: the limitations depend on how the secretariat of the Treasury offers its aid to the company.
"Say what you want, we will see ourselves to the cross, on Obama or McCain.
Condemnation for loss of official data.
After a first half without goals on both sides, the midfielder David Testo and Rocco Plancentino hit the Montréal net.
The private bank Sal Oppenheim, has signed up for 23 million new shares.
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
While the economic situation is détériorasse, the demand for raw materials, including oil, should be slow.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
Has long term, we need the Member of the European Union are few cases of their national egoism, and they centralises control over financial markets divided.
In the same way as in a city bus or in a tram.
In most cases, it is a question of firms in charge of multi-level marketing.
Today, Eatonville is an anomaly in Florida: To six miles of Orlando, it can at any time see themselves as a back street after a summer rainy day, small as it was when it was founded by 27 black families in the 1880's.
On the side of the opposition, it has welcomed the broad outlines of Plan north with scepticism.
AIG must quickly achieve liquidity to repay the loan of 85 billion that the Federal Reserve loaned it at the risk of the American authorities taking 80% of its capital, diluting the share due to the current shareholders.
But pay attention, the Belgian brand does not make only tank tops.
Similarly, a price of petrol strictly identical to all the service stations is deciding by chance and hard struggle of competition.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
This phenomenon can be very sporadic (once in a lifetime, for example, associated with an episode of strong fever), or on a more regular basis (every day, once a week, once a month...); the day after the child does not remember anything.
If one of the operators accepted the creation of a virtual mobile operator, the ÚOHS will hardly remain impassive the rejection (discrimination) other interested.
Lawmakers hope that it will be adopted during the coming days.
Attacks on Obama are rising while the date of the elections approach.
"We are very keen to offer our clients not only fixed telecommunications services, but mobile as well.
But a few years ago, it has been proven beyond any doubt that the disease is transmitted by the blood.
The future is perhaps promising.
Not to mention the missed deliberation of credit for traders: the debt of the state is around 10 million euros.
The future is perhaps promising.
According to the press office of the Group of the Member Fidesz People's Party, Járóka warned that alongside distinctions found in the recruitment, Roma disappear from the labour market, in the first place, following their low qualifications.
Virtually anybody can master the controls of the most rudimentary MP3 players - which do not necessarily correspond to the cheapest (see our choice).
In March, it will have completed its tasks and disappeared, because this experiment must have a specific time period.
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient that put forward by Mr Obama.
The runners of runway as Gebrselassie and Paul Tergat, both runners, converted into Kenya, contributed to the loss of the marathon record of more than two minutes in the last ten years, since 1998, when the Brazilian Ronaldo da Costa became in Berlin in 2: 06: 05.
Does not mean that there are plenty of reasons to buy a reader independent.
Among those invited to take part in the consultation is the European social partners, as well as the most prominent representatives of the legal protection and civilian agencies of Europe, in the field of equal opportunities.
I believe that in the photograph the portrait is the kind of the most difficult.
Last week, Meg Ryan had expressed in an interview for the American newspaper InStyle on the causes of the failure of marriage, "Dennis has long been unfaithful, and it was very painful."
However, the leader of the United Left has called for investigations show "transparency" for the irregularities that Silva could make: "The United Left has always defended cases of this kind to have a maximum degree of transparency".
You do not consider - you pay for.
Of course, if even more banks collapse like dominoes, then neither financial resources, nor new improvisations will be enough.
Less cumbersome, less heavy, less complex.
Passion for the portraits of Bauer has led to repeat the idea two years ago with the "portraits of old athletes' ('SportARTproject").
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
Roger Levesque was the only one to outplay Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
According to its index, the Taiwan stock exchange lost 3.6 percent.
Since the rallying to Czechoslovakia promises nothing - by knowing the Czech national character - but brutality, attitude without consideration, incomprehension, oppression and servitude, the authors of the letter urge the American president to take in his hands the protection of the Sˇumava for now and forever.
Without egos ultimate amount of quality.
The development of Orlando has already prompted Interstate 4 up to the west of the city.
But even without admit this argument, it should at least be worrying for the ÚOHS that three mobile operators are clearly in a similar way.
Olmert also ruled in favour of retirement of Israel from the Golan Heights, which is, according to him, a prerequisite for the conclusion of a peace agreement with Syria.
We have four versions - one each with solo male or female voices, an interpretation with choir and an instrumental version.
Jaroslav Horˇín, an expert on BESIP (safety of road traffic) in safety in transport, does not see the displacement of the stewards on board as a major problem.
The polls and analyses made just after the elections, have defined the extreme right as the most important political bloc of the country, which is demonstrated by the majority of young voters who made the difference, because of their concern about their future in the European Union.
From April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than in the previous year.
In March when they have finished, the Committee and the City Council will evaluate the analyses and projects, in order to present in June, the strategic plan for Rome with the "official" stamp of the Capitol and its mayor Gianni Alemanno.
The beginning of course does not seem to be set as strict as home in Lower Saxony.
But we must renew the members of this network of donors as they get older and cannot give their blood.
Based on the accounts of Benito Pérez Galdós, José Luis Garci recreates the famous battle of Spaniards against the French in "Sangre de Mayo," which is the the most ambitious film in his filmographie with a budget of nearly 15 million.
The police is examining the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
By a union of the bodies of the financial institution of Düsseldorf with the Deka Bank in Frankfurt, "the central institution of the financial markets of the financial group of the Sparkasse" could be formed, according to the letter made public on Monday.
"We do not want this watered-down trend will result in minor attention, because it is precisely when attention is relaxed that tragedy strikes.
Michele de Milly, the spokesman of Avalon Bay, said that although the company wants to exploit the street, this does not necessarily mean that it wants to be the owner.
The administrative officer of the Director-General of the society Delta Trió Kft., who is in charge of trade of fuel and cars, and whose headquarters were in Budapest, was nowhere to be found; instead Iván Kubatov was found.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament is that they have been appointed, not elected.
If he does not have its movements to the authorities, he could face a sentence of up to five years in prison.
The written version of the plan was made public before the opening of the Asian markets, on Sunday evening at 20h, local time of Washington (i.e. Monday at 2 a.m., according to the local time of Central), but has not caused spectacular rise in the stock exchanges.
"They have thought that this would have remained between the walls of the Ministry of Defence and the Cabinet Office," he said.
Figures which show the gravity of the phenomenon which proves that it is one of the main causes of death, and causes almost twice as many deaths as homicides.
The reaction of the market following the vote in the US House of Representatives, who refused to adopt the plan for the stabilization of the US financial sector, is also noticeable back home.
The soul, precisely, who has made to feel a despotic with the vote which I mentioned earlier.
German domestic flights have even been divided by two according to the study.
According to the results, believers Catholics have been able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
For some, it is linked to a "safe job".
It is true, I look forward to leave.
In August 2008, the the most significant rise of price has been observed in the manufacturing sector for leather articles and shoes (2.8 percent); the manufacture of bags and belts with a monthly rise of 4.6 percent, followed by the production of shoes with 2.5 percent of monthly rise.
- Ah, well...
The Brazilian manufacturer very much hope of the Chinese market especially for its aircraft of the range from 30 to 120 seats.
The alleged reason for which the authors cannot sign the letter is the fear of the desire for revenge of "Czech oppressors".
Scientists were inspired by the legs of geckos, which are covered with microscopic hair which assure the animal with a perfect adhesive.
The larger editorial houses are working their way to the Internet, seen by many as the "murderer" of the paper newspaper.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was trying to take care of my way to pay.
As Héma-Quebec distributes each year between 400 and 500 000 blood products, it will take more than 24 years before strikes a case of transmission of HIV by a blood products.
But is it that the waistline brain is at the root of the sensations?
It could be start the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
They were present at the promotion that the brand Mango made at its new headquarters in Paris but also at the presentation of the most important fashion prize from the sponsoring Spanish house.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon has left researchers puzzled: dark matter affects the speed of space probes during gravitationnel support manoeuvers.
The competent people of the Ministry said that bailouts can take place in the context of an auction, but also directly.
Well, this is nothing compared to what happened the day of racing.
It is sure that there are more than one who speaks during the night.
The sale price for export of the industrial sector, HUF, rose by 1.1 percent in August compared with the previous month, while it suffered a fall of 3.9 percent over 12 months.
When asked, both - the jets made 21 unquestionable points in the third time - Mangini said: "I can tell you that I appreciated the second time more than the third.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
"I am concerned that such a huge number of young people who frequently use portable music devices and mobile phones at full volume, can unconsciously damage their hearing irreparably" says Meglena Kuneva.
"We celebrated, a few weeks ago, the banking of our thousandth sample of umbilical cord blood and are expected to take more than a thousand per year.
This time, the decline is due to the fall of the Wall Street.
Women in the race, Irina Mikitenko, born in Kazakhstan, now German citizen, has completed a remarkable year with the seventh time of 2: 19: 19.
If rumours are to be believed and we are indeed to soon witness the creation of a virtual operator, the Czech mobile market could be put in motion again.
The men continue to sneak on the pavements, with their trolleys and their shelves of muffins for morning meetings.
While virtually all mobile can read MP3 files, no MP3 player can make phone calls.
The Minister of State for road safety but also the Directorate General of the Road Safety Foundation and the technological Institute for Security of the car will participate in this initiative.
And it is, it is party to the party of beer.
Has the opposite of bees, the difference cannot move towards the top downwards or diagonal, it cannot be that of two dimensions, and only in the direction in which the way can turn.
The one who will take the place of George W will have a great work to do.
We need to review the existing control systems in the scientific opinion, so that they are fully effective and can follow the new technologies "
More, you will hear what he said, but you will not know what it is dreaming, suddenly made attention to the way in which you interpréterez information and the conclusions you draw from this.
Will it be a birthday party without genuine.
The price of the best telephones and better equipped, filled also an entry for headphones, no more than 15 000.
The global economy is in a vacuum, just when the history of capitalism, one of the biggest changes.
Moreover, the rain accompanied the expectations of more than 40 minutes during which took place rebellion and assault of the stands.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently elsewhere.
Everyone spoke at once, stiffled laugha and asked a lot of questions - in this case, it was quite difficult to understand Japanese English.
In this respect, the music players (especially the most rudimentary) are much more efficient.
A few hours before I had asked the taxi driver in the street, if he was aware that the Spanish Princes were visiting the city to conclude their official trip.
Not only that is, but it is with us, "he insisted, like to make it clear that he solicited a national myth.
It is in October that will be taken the decision on the fate of the duo Huber-Beckstein toppled
Virgin boss Richard Branson, a group of consumers and the regulator Ofcom were all contrary to the purchase.
On the basis of an agreement between shareholders, some 90% of the papers would be sold.
Then, are you thinking of becoming a mother?
More specifically, the experience is as follows: An instrument issuing sparks and broadcasting the shock is set on the left hand of the experimental subject.
After 10 days in the hands of their captors, tourists kidnapped in Egypt will be released as the Italian Foreign Minister has confirmed.
It has two hundred of them recruited.
The silence of the night falls on the place of October.
In addition, his album Bat Out of Hell stayed nine years on the English charts, and sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
And to better understand the mangas and their culture, at some point of time I also began to learn Japanese.
Although this is an intermittent phenomenon, the tide is more predictable of the wind, solar, or waves, and therefore more reliable as a source of energy.
Too often the policy is frustrated by the management of the newspaper and emergencies that occur from time to time.
Could this accident be somehow related to the elections?
Correspondents have pointed out that the terms of his release are contradictory because if we allow him to leave the country for medical reasons, they do not see why it could not remain free on his return in Bangladesh.
To operate in such a limited period of time, we should already have an agreement now. "
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ indicates the problems: "The law allows such speculation, however, the services of these companies are used as a percentage of customers negligible.
When the agreement was announced, a true not revolutionary.
In June - announced the mayor - we present the strategic plan based on the work done by the Commission for the future of Rome. "
The Attorney General, Ramsey Quaife said in court that friends had mentioned that Ms Randle, who was a good surfeuse and cyclist, seemed since 2006 "emotionally dead," and "had lost all hope to life."
Obama should be able to confirm its advance on Thursday with the proper provision expected of his colistier, Joseph Biden, in the first and only public debate with its rival, Sarah Palin.
To refer, indeed, "we need a sketch of strategic reference, or firm or stand still, to allow our city, to improve, which it has absolutely necessary, while thinking about its future now a spirit of unity,".
"The issue was resolved.
He didn't even use the words "middle class" or "workers". "The financial crisis clearly hands the advantage to Obama, who is regarded by the Americans as the most able to save the economy teetering on the brink.
Even the mobile the cheapest (by former. The Vodafone 527) have generally a memory card slot in tradable (the type M2, microSD, and so on).
For many, the main advantage of mobile phones that play music is their prices.
The community has begun to hold a festival in honour of Hurston to demonstrate the catastrophic consequences that the motorway would have created.
The 19 participants of the excursion in the desert should already be on the way to Cairo.
Most mobiles and MP3 players will themselves create a media library classified according to the name of the artist, the title of the album, genre, or according to the user's criteria.
The causes of this rest for American Express in the weakness of the dollar, which has led to a 'decline in the desire to travel of American tourists'.
The contamination is much higher on an average among the population of three groups: those who have suffered a blood transfusion before 1991, consumers of drugs and tattooed people.
"We will keep a certain percentage of the territory, but we must give the Palestinians a similar percentage (Israel), since otherwise, peace will not happen," he added.
Isabelle Bayón plays the part of the Sevillan dancer Tórtola Valencia
To support their theories, the economists in the group of researchers followed this with an analysis of financial surveys.
"This is a cosmetic change, highlights Alexander Milinkevich, a former opposition candidate for the presidency in 2006 and leader of the pro-European movement, because the important thing is that the voice, and here is the executive.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
Cornelius is the brother of the entraineur in-chief of Hamburg Martin Jol.
It is not just the European Commission, but also the Federal Services Authority Surveillance of which has decided that only recently, made it clear to the government of the Land of Rhenanie North-Westphalia that the time was running out in the search for a solution future.
In the MDAX, the shares of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
But he played less often young people first that the marginal: Névrosés, alcoholics, swines or desperate, including its features perfect reflétèrent the excesses and the revolt.
Only 13% of journalists are working under contract.
That is sincere civic affection that is meant in the voice of the nephew of Mr Franklin, Edwin Harvey, 18, who plans to return to Eatonville after the college to work for the local government or for the forces of Police, who need additional forces.
"We are very careful about how to tell the story" said Hortense Jones, 59, resident for always and the oldest paroissienne of the city.
Tomorrow, Congress of Deputies will vote an initiative of the Spanish Socialist Party, which proposes to install this system in school buses as has been done in France.
Model citizen, and above.
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
An honest man, in the widest sense of the term.
Of course, I want to become mother because my body demands it, and I want to become a young mother; I do not want to lose it.
The implementation of various means stylistic breaks with the classic side of the image, with a touch of modernity, this reflects the perception of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco in Bauer: "A very traditional music with roots that is changing and surprises us every day."
Augustus Franklin, 77, rappela that Hurston was usual in the city without warning, on board a large Chevrolet, a cigarette in the mouth and was wearing trousers here, where even today, we are proud of traditional clothes.
"We need to break the vicious circle of poverty, segregation and the unemployed to give the opportunities provided by democracy to the Roma children, so that they can participate as citizens of right to the future of Europe," demanded Járóka.
The individual arrested was accused of drug trafficking and carrying of false documents.
Linebacker, David Bowens left escape the ball because of Warner.
Having experienced in July, an increase of up to $145.29 the barrel, prices have dropped to nearly $90 a barrel this month, before picking up again at the prospect of the deep uncertainty of the financial markets.
Paul Newman, who died on Friday, aged 83, of lung cancer in his ranch in Connecticut, remains one of the last icons of the golden years of American cinema.
The favour of Hispanic voters is a complicated business.
The compromise, born from the plan, is supported by both candidates for the presidency, Barack Obama and John McCain.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
Only the most expensive ones support 8 GB cards.
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
Repeated drunk-driving offenders will have to install an alcolock system
Not surprisingly, this fundamental difference is completely obscured by Mr Garver.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
I think about 500 people will have pneumonia tomorrow, and some people like myself, do not even figure in the classification with the exact time, because the chip that they gave me didn't record the start correctly.
But with the renewed noise of a partial nationalisation, the likelihood that approached certainty has now become a mere hope.
But their entry in parliament can mean of space on television, meetings in the regions and the draft laws. "
But also pool them into groups of conversation
The price the most prestigious fashion
He has put forward his ability to make the right decisions, and to restore America's image in the world.
But these measures are necessary, "he commented on American television.
People are less and less attention to the operational system but increasingly the Internet browser.
We have thus substantially reuduced the risk that some donors are infected without their own knowledge and that we cannot detect it.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
There is no risk of collision in the form of a mobile Internet trendy by chance, followed by a bill of transmission of data immense.
Has every time you want to hear something, you just have to get out of your pocket the mobile, when you have forgotten your MP3 player in the home.
"An overwhelming majority of young Roma have no qualifications of secondary, and as a result of a poor quality elementary education, only a tiny fraction has the opportunity to obtain a diploma."
The fares of plane tickets and hotels is falling
Now is the time when morals no longer exists: one can now abuse, torture, arbitrarily detaining a Canadian citizen at the whim of a head of government who was a minority so far (what will happen after 14 October...).
A dancer sévillane will pay tribute to a dancer also sévillane.
This is not a mere of male body in cotton shirt, milling and without sleeves.
To 8.30 p.m., the most important stock index côtait 10.579 the world with a fall of five percent.
The price of milk has increased to five pence per litre
WestLB would bring a "competence block" doubled by a durable productivity in such a case.
That's how the driver tests the validity of the registered voucher.
If tourists in Manhattan was far from the newsstand and giant TV screens of Times Square, they do not make that they are in the eye of the storm.
With an annual budget of $297 million, Héma-Quebec not only provides blood products, but also tissues, including bone grafts, heart valves, eyeballs and skin that are almost exclusively used for the severely burned.
It is enough to fill the device directly from the computer, through the USB connector.
Kubatov gave people, 15 bills in total, issued by companies such as Cash Investment, Delta Trió, Fa-Bani Jos, Jos Investment and Linaxtrade, for a value of 14,2 million HUF.
"This is not wasted money, said yesterday, the Dutch Finance Minister Wouter Bos.
There was no one in the polling stations.
So many other Paul Newman have gone to history.
The campaign by Mr Obama stresses that 'students African-American and Latin have less chance of diplômer white students. "This is true.
Things have a bizarre appearance and a completely new taste.
In October, November and December 2005, the company issued several bills on the sale of computer equipment, for a total of about 18 million HUF.
I didn't walk the ramp to be a mannequin.
Has run a carving up WestLB which could take place, carving up here is obviously not liked.
The alcolock would prevent this because it is a trendy system on the vehicle which measure the rate of alcohol in the breath and prevents the car from starting if the driver does not blow into it before; or when the rate of alcohol in the driver's breath is higher than the allowed threshold.
Lukasenko - his rivals: 110 - 0
The same applies to music for travelling, which is normally compressed, in short – MP3 music.
"We have been excluded electoral commission and our observers have not been able to participate in the count," regretted Yuri Potemkin, the spokesman of the Union of the Democratic Forces, a heterogeneous reunification of twelve parties.
"As far as raw materials is concerned, our most pressing concerns is to understand how far the American virus will spread globally and in particular, in China."
However, I do not think so.
From January to March, prices had risen by 11.9 percent in the second quarter, they have fallen by 23.6 percent.
Pablo Picasso assumed his role on the Côte d'Azur, Leonardo Di Caprio wore one in Edward Zwick's 'Blood Diamond', as did Al Pacino in "The godfather' of Francis Ford Coppola and is part of the holding of the Association of well-built gays.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ said about this: "We are open to talks with potential virtual operators, especially in the field of shared infrastructure costs.
The start of the second half-time would be decisive with first two occasions signed Riahi and Temporale for Dannemarie, and immediately after the opening of the score for the Illhousiens by marshes, well positioned to use a ball rejected on a first attempt to Diebold (53rd is).
Now begins a new season of accountability and transparency.
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
Grapefruit juice has already been heavily criticised for increasing the effects of certain drugs, antibiotics, anti arythmiques tranquillizers, anti staminales and neurological, upto toxic levels.
The Financial Services compensation Scheme confirmed to the BBC, that the 59 building societies are included in the list.
But almost all countries where appeared of virtual operators, the traditional operators were an attempt, sometimes more or less, to prevent their creation.
Things that can certainly be transported to a place to another of the land, but which are linked to definitively to a limited area, a territory.
Because WestLB, injured, is still strong pressure.
This new emphasis of the nation-crisis is in perfect harmony with the importance always major economic developments most recent of the economy tend to give a factor quite linked to this: The territoriality.
What chance that the politician relatively is used the word 'and glissait that the German banker would not be saved by the movements of crisis.
"The aim therefore, is to restore the assurance in safety to the worker – he added - so that the fate of those who have an accident, must not depend on the whims or large-heartedness of the legislator"
In a corner of the car park, the Latin American sing already alongside their flag, they have already celebrated last night.
They did you go there only to take the dossard (first mistake, travel only for it) and (after a long queue) surprise!, there was that size would S for the jersey (second mistake, because I need a size XL)
On Saturday evening, representatives of legislators met the US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, in order to give a final form to the government fund.
Secondly: 'When the doors of the tent beer open, there is, squealing Marco in the morning.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will rise in 2009, to £450millions.
And in the role of actress, when you wear the clothes that's the point at which you really step into the skin of the character.
It would reduce the costs," he says.
'Push the limits of our last great northern border': This is the long-term ambition that Jean Charest presented with visual force while remaining in the guidelines, at the end of the General Council of the Liberal Party of Quebec, Lévis, yesterday.
They call the race perfect, but I think it was the worst race that I have ever participated in.
The Dax clearly slipped below the important psychological barrier of 6,000 points and quoted 5.839 points with a deficit of 3.7 percent.
The politician and his accomplices are accused of fraud, in the form of criminal organisation, permanently and regular, having led particularly important losses. Other charges have been used against them, for example, fraud and use of fraud.
During the shooting before the release, six hostage takers would have been killed.
The Hypo Real Estate needs about 50 billion euros annually of the global appropriations of Depfa as a means of short term refinancing.
Then develops on the skin and eye on the White from a visible jaunisse, the selles become clearer and the urine takes a colour more foncée. Cure can take two to three weeks.
Never they might think that in the offices in glass and nest of bee above their tète, bankers and hedge fund managers who monopolize New York, are the worst "working day at the office" since the fall of 1929.
Obama is really rich: He believes he wins the highest office of a nation that account in all, two governors and five senators blacks! "
Madrid in the race for the 2016 Olympic Games
The process must be held in a heartbeat.
"Scientifique- read this report we in the note- it appears that 5-10% of those who, during a period of at least 5 years, listen to music at full volume using mobile music devices, for over an hour a day and a week, risk a permanent hearing loss capacity."
The American physicist Stephen Adler of the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton still believes unshaken that Einstein do not was wrong and is trying to explain the anomaly of the support gravitationnel with the help of the so-called black matters that astronomers have identified in the universe.
The Sudeten Germans wanted that Sˇumava National Park be a part of the US in 1945.
The President of the second section of the criminal court in Rome, Carmelo Rinaudo, decided to reject the proceedings of the estate agent, Danilo Coppola, who had asked to leave his city, Grottaferrata, for a house in Rome.
In 1975, the writer Alice Walker went on the grave anonymous Hurston and began to fight to revive its reputation.
In conclusion, don't worry, it is nothing bad, it is an episode that lasts only a few minutes.
At 26 years of age, Kohl is the fourth cyclist to test positive for Cera, EPO of the third generation, after the Italians Riccardo Riccò and Leonardo Piepoli, and German Stefan Schumacher, also of Gerolsteiner.
A newspaper of Mississippi, in the southern regions of the US, wrote an article: once in the voting booth, we know that the American patriot will give his vote.
In my view, similar are not enough to prove the experienced the same.
They agreed upon a ransom, " said the official.
None of the operators has a dominant position, none has therefore a corresponding increased responsibility for its behaviour on the market.
People that Naomi is a person central aim.
Although German Czechs should have foreseen the possibility of their expulsion from the Republic, very few actually accepted it as a real possibility.
A young hôtesse in the region of Plzenˇ, who worked for the company for two years, has died in the accident on the line of Naples.
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to settle the interests of the first year.
The Prince is smiling and dressed in sea blue, while the Princess, her hair floating in the wind, is dressed quite soberly and is not in her usual peep-toes' '; perhaps they had warned her that a storm threatened.
30 September is the World Day of hepatitis, organised for the first time in 2004 by the bodies representing patients around the world.
A court spokesman said 'Thursday, 25 September in court of Ashford, Kent Police has asked for an application to prevent Paul Gadd to travel in France and Spain until 25 March.
Héma-Quebec celebrated yesterday the 10th anniversary of its founding, and its chairman, the Dre Francine Décary, had reason to rejoice, because Héma-Quebec has become one of the largest providers of blood safety and effectiveness of the world.
"The Italian exploitation has developed in an irrational way" observed Paolo Protti, chairman of the Anec, "it is useful to build new structures, but we need to ensure the survival of those that already exist, because when a hall closes in a city, its regular costumers are not necessarily all prepared to go to the multiplex.
Her lawyers have argued that she needed this bail to return to the country in order to prepare for elections in December
To place the blame on the CˇTÚ is a fairly common in communications, through which the ÚOHS is washing his hands of the matter.
But attention, because the Belgian brand does not only that the tank tops.
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
While we can hear many examples, such as the sweetheart which includes easily to view photos of the morning, taken by the circle of friends common, with which his friend infidel has spent the evening, or that of the company that has dismissed one of its employees, for the opinions sincere that he wrote on his blog about the top management, we can be on one thing: The end of privacy is totally to reconsider these days.
Anyone who is growing in God he feels less pain?
Listen to the four new version of the national anthem.
His dancing was sensuelle and they told me that my way of dance was identical to its own, "she says.
The French film-maker Bertrand Tavernier considered him, not without humour, "as a living challenge to the" underplaying "judging by his supported benefits."
It is not the dancing and singing itself, but the personality and the nature of the artist which captivates the public with his art.
Of fuel conductions soon be frozen, death cryogène the threat.
Walk on LES walls? – "this material may be used as a temporary removed" adds Liming Dai.
Virtual operators the advantage of being able to focus on a target group much more concrete.
The Ertzaintza continues its investigation to stop the other suspect, who has managed to escape and to determine the origin of drugs seizure.
Of this school students are largely Hispanic, and low incomes.
The press cuttings German language of the territory
The federal government will have the opportunity to delay the procedures of foreclosures on housing tied to mortgages affected by this plan, and to set limits on the starting pay and allowances paid to executives of affected companies.
All lies with it, "he says.
And this time the old neighbours of Hurston see it as a saviour.
We were able to reduce this period to less than a week.
Also die with him the grey areas of this secret star, who was at once quiet, committed, allergic to the flashes of show business, the enigma which we will never quite fathom.
Moreover, Járóka has insisted that education, as a fundamental right of human beings, plays a key role in implementing the other fundamental rights.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
What is certain is that everything is really good.
According to the public prosecutor, money from subsidies, was spent for personal use, while the benefits were justified by false invoices.
The mistakes began with the withdrawal of jerseys, which forced you to come forward.
For me, it was clear that I had to travel there some day.
Sergei Lebedev, leader of the Commonwealth of Independent States, told the Russian news agency Ria Novosti: "People do not believe in words, but in deeds." In this way, the absence of the opposition is proof of the maturity of the Belarussian voters.
The opposition has therefore entered the political game claiming that "we must begin a dialogue with the European Union.
Jean Charest has described this "vision" as being in keeping with the Liberal prime minister that preceded him.
To confirm the rising tension between Italy and immigrants, the NYT has also refers to episodes of intolerance of Milan, Parma, Rome, Ciampino and Castel Volturno.
What do these machines look like?
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, the chairman of the House of Representatives, Nancy Pelosi, and the Republican representative to the negotiating table, Senator Judd Gregg, have announced the good news for a few minutes after midnight, yesterday, after a marathon negotiations in two days.
Transactions with the actions CˇEZ rose almost half the usual daily exchanges.
"I wanted to work with Pepa Gamboa and she asked me to interpret the Sevillian dancer Tórtola Valencia and I thought it incredible".
The number of people who deliberately do not sign up on social networks so as not to be found is not insignificant. The services of Google online, including text search, image search, and reading of information, can be replaced by alternative versions, which are not linked to enormous servers which record our profile in not it's prettiest form.
And as everything is so well organised I never felt lost here, even if Tokyo is the largest city that I have ever seen. "
In its flights, each bee constitutes its own area with an oval shape, which in fact, is very similar to the hull - explained Kazuhhiro Doi, the director of the department for research and development and technological public relations of the brand, during the exposition.
According Andoh it is the intelligent instinct which is essential, not the treatment of data, and even less the capacity to store.
It has a right of reply.
According to the results, believers Catholics have been able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
These tissues are analysed, processed and frozen before being stored in Héma-Quebec which manages also the only public bank of umbilical cord blood in Quebec.
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
A signal to the Asian trade
And no
Of course, there is an analysis of relevant markets drawn up by the CˇTÚ that telecommunications are, from the point of view of economic competition, a single market.
Hundreds of fans came to the inauguration of the festival two years later, and many came back in January, to commemorate it.
Short-term investors can still use what they have drawn a line to be a postponement of losses for the next few years on the next income tax capital stock market gains automatically taken.
"We have made two steps forward and one step back, but the most important thing is that the dialogue has been initiated between Belarus and the EU," said Alexander Milinkevich to our newspaper.
The carrier must manage the safety of the stewards by internal regulations, "he says, and also think that from the point of view of the law, the problem is not resolved.
During his final league in Vienna, he spoke of "a European brotherhood" to avoid the rise of Islam.
Then the quarter back Brett Favre managed to make a pass to Laveranues Coles allowing him to make a 12 yards touchdown, precursor to an afternoon which saw their partnership taking a step forward.
How this will all be lumped together with the union of certain entities with the Deta-Bank remains to be seen.
Plan North will be "concerted, ordered and environmentally friendly, he promised.
In this respect, music players (even the most rudimentary ones) are much more efficient.
In an interview given to the ABC chain, McCain said: "We will all have difficulty in the stomach (...) but doing nothing is not an option."
A library single-issue (of course) ouvra Hurston in 2006, on a wonderful Kennedy Boulevard, repavé.
The same service, in the same category of price, but with a capacity of memory (up to 16 UK) and a life of the accumulateur (normally 3 p.m., up to 35 p.m.), is guaranteed by an MP3 player produced by one of the trademarks mentioned above.
The problem is that the commercial state of all Czech mobile operators prohibits such a resale.
In the first round, half of this amount will be spent.
We do not have to go look too far to find examples.
It will be necessary from time to time, just to be sure, to make a second charge for work - this being the case even for more expensive devices.
Although the textual content of the letter, given the current knowledge of post-war history, seems somewhat naive, according to some survivors, it illustrates the expectations of the Sudeten Germans of the time.
They do not feel isolated as in the past.
On the other hand, no legal prescription prohibits carriers from offering services.
German domestic flights have even been halved according to the study.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same situation.
While Ryan lives only for divorce, Quaid has remarié and will soon be the father of twins.
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
Despite this, Iraq has been, for the most part, the weakness of Bush.
Life today is whether race, there is rarely the time to spend an hour to give blood, "laments Francine Décary.
Men were to be held until the kidnappers have found a road sure to flee.
MEDICAMENTS A risque- It is the Italian Agency of the medicine itself, which gave the new in a letter dated two years, alerting doctors and patients not to assess the drift in danger of this mix and to pay attention to what we drink, taking medication for example, the Diazépam or the methadone.
Heinz-Christian Strache, the head of the Freedom Party who won more than 18 percent of the votes, conducted his campaign against wearing headscarves and burkas, and has even expressed his opposition to alaha food.
If the US president doubted the opinion of Germans of Sˇumava National Park, he had but to organise, according to the authors of the letter, a vote in the region to establish whether its people wanted to be part of the US, or live under the management of the US.
No such agreement has been reached at the moment, because the supply of potential interest has presented a priori not enough interest in the traditional operators, "said in response to our question Kristián Chalupa of the External Relations Department of ÚOHS.
In April 2007, her real father, Terrance Randle, found her dead in his apartment in Plymouth.
According to the most recent polls, highlighting the economic issues, Obama has once again managed to get a bit ahead. The advance of McCain, achieved with the appointment of Sarah Palin as running partner just after the Republican convention, has melted away.
The choice of operators is unfortunately miserable and is limited, in most cases, to radio tubes.
He received a nice ovation. "
To operate in a limited period of time, we should have now an agreement. "
Witness information is available to the public, gleaned from CˇTÚ websites.
According to sources, on Wednesday at the earliest, the plan should supposedly be put to the vote in the Senate.
(Today there are 90 percent of blacks)
"It is an initiative that I am very fond of" observed Giuseppe Tornatore, "and I hope that other cities will follow the example of Bologna by putting other measures in place.
The ministerial officer of the Cabinet Office, which had forgotten the top secret documents, in June on a train, will be condemned by the Official secret Act, has managed to the BBC.
Obama has said that it was the future.
Charest put North
The buses belong to Marco, who wears a long overcoat lined with fake fur and large silver rimmed spectacles.
The law ignores the steward
During the shooting before the release, six kidnappers would have been killed.
According to its index, the Taiwan lost 3.6 percent.
Abuse of a step-father-" which led to suicide "
Asked on another channel whether he would vote for the proposed plan, his Republican opponent, John McCain, said: "I would like to see the details, but I hope so."
When Marco's group finally arrives at the parking lot near the place Thérèse in the morning at 6h30 as scheduled, almost 50 other bus from all across Europe are already here.
No one was afraid to go to ridicule or to exaggerate.
The General Council of the end of the week has provided the Liberal leader a platform with the resolutions nationalists, including 'constitutional' aspirations which have gone as a letter to the post: The PLQ calls in particular the recognition "specificity of Quebec" in the Constitution.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one in ten patients receives medical treatment.
As Kristián Chalupa adds: 'Abroad, where the virtual operators are normally present, we can see that they enter the market has contributed to a fall in the prices of mobile telephone services. "
People behave similarly, which is why some scientists deduce a subjective comparable.
The Czech market is in comparison with other very specific.
Even if it is the year of the election of a black president, Senator Barack Obama, who has also cited an open dialogue on the issue of race, many here remain cautious of the gaze of the foreigner.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy a phone.
He left his five girls a letter containing these words: "Always and until the end, your father was incredibly grateful for his fate.
Success is not so sure.
The Senate Banking Committee Chairman Christopher Dodd, chief negotiator, said that lawmakers agreed on the responsibility of the financial programme, the protection of helping against losses, the agreement of relief, the conduct of the plan on the axis of time.
In Bari one must pay 250 / EUR 350 for a bed, and at least 350 for a simple room.
The judge Christopher Elwen said to Trerise: "You are truly bizarre as a fetishist, your victim must have been terrified of you, especially at the age of 7 years.
American prosecutors are investigating and following the judicial forums for the governement.
The 26 year old Austrian was placed 3rd on the podium behind the Spaniard Carlos Sastre and the American Cadel Evans, as well as winning the jersey for the best climber.
That could well make Zuschlag & amp; United in their factory in bills?
Whoever speaks of territory, state government policy, inevitably speaks of Politics, and therefore Leadership.
The psychology of one-upmanship: Why are spending more money?
The biological clock does not scare me.
Although the legislature composed of 110 people in this country of 10 million is happening very much opposition for many decades before the elections yesterday, the opposition between its forces under the name of Forces Démocratiques Nations (ODSZ) was seriously that Lukashenko, renewing his term as President for the fourth time in dubious elections, in the footsteps of the amendments to the constitution in 2006, "would" this time the presence of a few Members of the opposition in parliament.
The afternoon Alejandro Talavante concluded on two banderilles planted on the back of the bull and listen cut that the terraces discovered applauded more than his fight in itself with the bull.
Despite this, Iraq has been, for the most part, the weakness of Bush.
, the appeal of Michele Carruba, director of the Department of pharmaceuticals of the public University of Milan: "These findings are generally, immediately reported to the various national and international agencies of medicines to the need to change the notes informative of medicines.
- oh, well, we cannot go to the airport for customers to this time... Were you by or …?
While the third group has received these $15 before the auction, but the members of the group also lose money if they lose the auction.
If Barrick Gold really wanted a transparent and public debate it could do so in accordance with the scientific standards used by the authors of Black Canada.
German domestic flights have even been halved according to the study.
In the first half of 2008, flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
Nothing however came out of this ternary display.
Here is the least condemning view of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
The choice of mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
But the opposite must not be ruled out.
A rat short agilement at the bottom of the alleyway near a door that was once the CBGB, and which has now become the seat of a clothing store are.
Indeed, they will buy their coupon by Internet and will be on the cards Opencard in one of the thirteen Meˇstská knihovna (municipal libraries).
In cases where the somniloquie is very common, it would be good to see the child and consult a specialist, to see if there is a problem which causes a lot of anxiety and in order to obtain an explanation for this problem.
"There is no clear legal interpretation of the role of steward - no legal prescription deals with this role.
On the press, moreover, the Prime Minister has refused to rule out that it would unleash the elections this autumn, although he noted that it was very busy.
Many actors in "Sangre de Mayo" practise in front of the camera, as Miguel Rellán, Carlos Larrañaga or Fernando Guillén Cuervo.
We could see this as the short term, but I prefer to move forward rather than constantly beaten me against a wall.
Of course, if they were asking me to mention a perfect example of race, I would certainly not to the idea.
She asked if it is here to visit someone and it said that it will respond in a few moments.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
But the Department of Preservation and Development of the city that manages the street, has no interest in maintaining it.
The song, written by Jim Steinman, has required a great voice like Meat loaf.
We remember always Hurston as a person and eccentric, which was frequently after his family has moved to Jacksonville, Fla.
However, it became clear that there was room for such operators and that they could have a real success.
Jörg Haider, the President of BZÖ, is again open to all proposals.
Well, almost all journalists are pessimistic about their future.
Krugman, 55, is a neo-Keynesian who teaches at the University of Princeton and it is also a famous writer of the New York Times.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of Record of the Equipe.
A change in the law?
They have withdrawn their money from savings accounts in so-called thrifts (such a building society), associations of credit, and the type of savings banks and their local subsidiaries which function only in a state, and who claim to treat customers as their families.
Some companies are working to bring some functions of OpenOffice on the Web (the Cloud, on the cloud), and in the next few weeks, they should make the final outcome.
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, it was measured inflation of 6.8 percent, while the initiators of profit, a reduction of 1.4 percent.
"The Ministry of Transport do not consider the activity of the stewards as something that would fundamentally endanger the safety of passengers," concludes the spokesman Hanzelka, by saying that the control of security coaches is under the power of the police and the office for safety at work.
Listen to the four new version of the national anthem.
We are checking their state of health, "said Frattini.
She asked me to go up for a cause if noble, but if it had asked to make the poirier, I would have done anyway.
In the two games, participants could earn money, but during the auction of which an essential element is outbidding others by a third, all the activity was in the brainstem, called the striatum, and reacted in an intense way at the loss of the game.
The law on road transport is only concerned with terms of the recipient of a vehicle; it does not define his rights and duties, " adds the spokesman Hanzelka with more ambiguity.
On the drinks dispenser, a poster advertising their request to use their own research tool, "Your research. Our future".
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
In this way, the ODSZ has abandoned its is boycotting originally planned.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
Especially personal stories that will attack the emotions.
But it is also important if you have always on you of headphones or a handsfree with connection.
Portraits of which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, given the photograph classic.
This is the second weekend of the party of beer, known as the 'weekend of Italy.
Of course, the comparison nervous help: Rats and Hommes have similar, the brain troncs cafards by against do not have a brain.
The police have pursued and have arrested one of the other two occupants, a man of 28 years, identified as A. A. J., according to the information disclosed by the Department of the Interior of the Basque Government.
Only Monday, financial weakened institutions have received more than 100 billion - recalled the Viennese newspaper, Der Standard, which fears that European taxpayers also will have to delve into their pockets, very deep, in a similar way to the US in order to resolve the crisis.
You never know what pathogenic will emerge in the system.
Less monumental that Brando, in which it was like and he was long a kind of rival on the screen, more cautious in its stake, certainly more fragile, but apostle also freedom and the collapse of dramatic conventions.
The internationalization policy seems really out of the game or, had little to say: The evidence is provided by the European Union, which shared as usual, between the various interests and between the various national strategies, is to decide no common policy.
While those who have caused damage much more important, and the authors of economic crimes not repairable, roam freely or at least expect to their own home the end of the procedure. He has not that possibility.
The umbilical cord who was once considered a biomedical waste is full of a rich blood stem cells that can be used to treat serious diseases, such as leukaemia.
Elena attack by Luca, then the embraces.
The North, 70% of the territory of Quebec, includes a portion of Labrador that the Quebec has always claimed, said the prime minister at the press conference.
Eric Schmidt said, recently, to the Financial Times that the main ambition of Google was to gather more information about its users. This is necessary for the founders of Google to respect their original purpose which reads as follows: "Set out in a system all the information in the world!".
Has Rome, in areas close to the central universities (San Lorenzo, Piazza Bologna), around 600 euros for a simple, 450 for a bed in a double.
It is not entirely clear to all Internet users that the words used in searches on the Internet, the IP address of the computer which calls the search and the pages consulted are all listed.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
The Dow Jones at 10.809,25 points lost 334 points, or 3.3 percent within the first hour of opening.
But before the course begins, it was for me to appear.
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are visibly free.
Since 1946, the SPD has reached its worst results with 18.6 percent in Bavaria.
To support the sector, it should be between 16 and 18 million per year.
Useful advice
"The government considers UEFA's decision at Bordeaux as a sign of confidence in Ukraine and its ability to host, in collaboration with Poland, the European Championship," announced Wasjunik.
In front, they made a block in the centre of the ground leaving just Riahi at the forefront of the attack.
Here, too, there are factors to consider on the basis of price and quality.
"I didn't go out of my area" Favre said about all his passes to Coles.
We are facing a government that is the only, of all the Western countries involved, not to have brought back its national trapped in the concentration camp at Guantánamo.
After an emergency meeting, the three Benelux countries have announced the partial nationalisation of the banking group Fortis for 11.2 billion euros (16,3 billion USD).
If Barrick Gold really wanted a public debate, it is to the public that she should have presented her vision of the facts.
Addition to Chevron, Verdant Power Inc. In New York and Ocean Power of New Jersey, who travel the road of energy from the sea, and the sums invested until today, although their details are known, indicate that the observers, a growing interest.
On trade terms, the stock exchange of Prague fell
The cheapest normally cost less than three thousand.
At the moment, it is accessible for nearly a hundred thousand people, owners of the smart card Opencard.
Prices have fallen by more than $20 a barrel since last Monday.
In the whole of the processing industry, prices have risen by 10.2 percent during the past year.
After the creation of the Tchécoslaovaquie in 1918, the first breath became a natural part of the national anthem.
Action road safety the most expensive in history.
The incident took place when various officials of the Unit of the Traffic control of Alava were making vehicle checks on the N-1, on the border of the Community of Armiñón.
To combat these differences, the education programme of Mr Obama supports especially among many issues, "transitional bilingual education" for those who learn English.
A witness has a view to make strange games in trying to break his garage in Montecito, according to a spokesman for the police patrol of California unveiled to People magazine.
After a first attempt by the captain visitor Kauffmann which frôlait the lucarne on an unrelenting far, Illhaeusern slightly would take precedence and in turn Fonderflick far, then with Hirn above, Roman the end of the foot or Diebold tickle had the defence of Dannemarie.
Paul Rees, chief editor of Q magazine, said: "There are songs that transcend things like time and genre, and Bat Out of hell is one of them
"Of course, we have a lot of concern for this: We have to give our newspapers opponents in Russia, local authorities are putting a spanner in the works for the dissemination, but I can see that they are increasingly willing to support the elections, even in the circle of elderly people," said Milinkevich, referring to the fact that in the current regime of Lukashenko, which considers social security as its main result, the most sustained layer of pensioners officially really no longer regard it as appropriate.
He was reproché- especially in Kenya, the rival is Africa Ethiopie- to have too orchestrate its shopping, avoiding the global star of the marathon, relying on the hares as if they were in a competition of runway, and the more world records that the direction of the competition.
Elena attack by Luca, then the embraces.
If the against studies confirm the positivité the Cera, the Austrian will lose its third place in the Tower and will always expect two years of disposal.
Because he is projeta a whole country enamored of the self-made man, the Pacific War, wounded in battle, which in the early 1950s étudia dramatic art at Yale then fréquenta Actor' if the Studio of New York, before triumph of the theatre, cinema, television soon.
Sudanese the kidnappers had demanded a ransom of several million.
In the choice of a device, look especially for battery life, memory capacity, quality and output of sound, and of course, the user interface.
"As liberals who preceded us, we thought of different ways to transform the challenges into new opportunities for growth and development."
Despite this, Iraq has been, for the most part, the weakness of Bush.
Particularisés mobile telephone services are offered for example by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and others.
The assets which AIG plans to break understand its subsidiary of air leasing International lease Financial Corp., its participation of 59% in the reinsurer Transatlantic Holdings and its property portfolio and its investment in the private equity, it said.
But what great athlete of substance.
Adrian Coles, Director-General of the commercial committee of building societies, told the BBC that this decision was unfair.
The Bradford and Bringley would be the second bank, after the Northern Rock, the British Government should nationalize since the beginning of this financial crisis.
The Gallup Institute, which published an opinion poll on Saturday to give an advance of five points to Obama (49% to 44% to McCain), believes that it is the Democrat who held his own.
Thus, the future is perhaps promising.
In smaller cities, prices are lower, but they have a major importance in the economy.
An estimated 100 miles patients infected with hepatitis in Hungary, but only seven miles are following treatment. This is the fact that often patients do not know that they are infected.
Remind yourslef that they are harmless for the child and that the next day it will remember nothing of what happened.
Inés Sastre has not been for the visit of dependence of the palace, but it has shown us before on his mobile phone photos of her son.
56% of directors at national level, are convinced that reporters shares their values, while at the local level, this percentage drops to 23%.
They will have to give up their current relations with Iran; they will have to give up their relationship with Hezbollah (Shiite movement); they will have to abandon the constant supports they give to terrorism of Hamas (Shiite movement), Al-Kaïda (terrorist network), as well as to Jihad (holy war) in Iraq, " said the Prime Minister.
Not only.
The trend has been marked especially in Paris and Rome, where passengers were paid to 30 to 37 percent less than a year earlier.
The initiative was already announced last June and it now appears in the report by the Minister of State in which this initiative is seen as a pilot project that will last a year.
Retirement from the Golan Heights
"McCain has still not understood, while Obama, though," said, this weekend, a Republican to Democrat spot for not having grasped the impact of the crisis on the "American in the street.
The German Embassy in Cairo refused to make any comment on this story.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition.
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague réctifia its losses.
Locklear has been arrested is suspected of having led by the effect of a substance that has not been specified and has been imprisoned at 19.00 hours and released a few hours later.
The North contains "nickel, zinc, copper, platinum, gold, silver, iron, titanium, and even diamonds", according Mr Charest's list.
"But why should I eat a hamburger out of the home, if I am a beef in my fridge?", he used to joke.
Gyo˝zo˝ Farkas the manager of society, said the site hvg.hu that when the public prosecutor has convened and he has shown the bills, it has been able, immediately, it was false documents.
Energy is sent to the side through the cables under sailors.
Has few exceptions, the street has always the same pace.
Glitter, or his real name Paul Gadd, was not present at the hearing the court of jurisdiction limited of Ashford, but was represented by his lawyer Corker Binning.
For Elena, this is the first time, for Luca already the third or fourth time.
It has thus been indirectly confirmed that operators in the Czech Republic, in any case, did not support the idea.
It is 5-10% of users of these devices, and their numbers can be quantified around 2.5 and 10 million people in the EU
Sylvana already know that word thanks to Mangas - in her new exchanges Log, she speaks of Japan.
The whip is the threat of fines or an accident.
However, I do not think so.
"I photograph the master outside the scene to capture the elements of his character" Günther Bauer - photographer
And Lyn, the uniformed doorman of my building, has changed the subject of our usual conversation about Brad and Angelina or commercial shipments of my fruit and vegetables.
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
"If I was reasonable, I would not, but I will do so and I hope the end," – t he concluded in his speech at the festival of exchange of ideas and thoughts which saw for four days in the town of the aqueduct a hundred writers, historians and journalists and thousands of people.
But even if the conscience should not depend on the language, it surely the influence, so that the animal conscience, whatever the way it is produced, différencierait probably a lot of most of our Member of conscience.
In short, the need for leadership, feeds from below, a powerful and more ramified delegitimization movement of the ruling classes and traditional political orders, in the "electoral uprisings" improvised or, in the changes of collective mood of recent just days, from the conservative rise in Austrian Bavaria, in the fall of Labour in Britain, the US Congressmen's rebellion against Bush (and it may well be that the victory of the Right in Italy is not by chance).
In short, the global economic crisis appears but politically, it is almost that here.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
Regardless of the outcome of the trial, the authors and the editor of the Book black Canada will have to spend considerable sums to prepare their defence and weapons to fight, very unequal, against an army of lawyers supported by the pockets almost without substance of the mining.
According to unofficial information, it seems that perhaps we could have the first virtual operator already by the end of the year.
"At the beginning you think you work for posterity, then you realise you work for prosperity, and now you are happy to make a film in addition," explains Garci after more than 30 years of professional career.
While sceptics draw a parallel with Orwell's vision of horror, they do not see the essence of the Web 2.0.
Now, the leaders of the CSU are putting all their energy to stabilize Beckstein, one way or another.
The Austrian Socialists the SPÖ want to discuss with the Conservatives of the ÖVP.
The Germans are constantly in the sights of kidnappers.
In 2007, a strong laryngite has forced to cancel concerts.
As we know, Kubatov acknowledged during the investigation that it has issued bills to the order of business Atlasz, Hoppá and Együtt has Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, and he has pocketed their counter-value.
With the show of strength of fishermen who have severely disrupted Monday the access of several ports in Brittany and Normandy, the President of the Republic has decided to go on Tuesday morning at the port of Guilvinec, in the Finisterre, to meet their representatives.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently the other.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
If a rat or a cockroach flees from danger, does that mean that it also feels fear?
At the door of the hotel where they will stay, one of the four major hotels of the city, a funny journalist fro Mexican television awaits them.
Some experts fear that the theory of general relativity Albert Einstein, which describes the power of attraction of the area because of the curvature of the area, may not be entirely correct.
Promoter of a small group in Congress known as "the caucus of doubters," the Democratic representative Brad Sherman present things differently, but come to the same conclusion.
The 'safe' work at the level staff (our editors, ndr) in America is still on the agenda.
I believe that the animals have of the sensations and other states of conscience without me or anyone else has until now been able to prove just as we cannot prove that the other human beings have a conscience.
Vietnam, this nation has lost 50 miles soldiers and was sent back home to the fesses.
A voluntary groups was playing the lottery, while the other group took part in an auction playful, while with the help of a process of functional magnetic resonance (FMRI), the researchers studied the brain areas assets trial subjects.
In a nation huge as the US, with 300 million inhabitants and thousands of journalists, reviewed, radio, TV and the Internet, employers often provide what they want, and it is fast becoming a matter of take it or leave it.
The new version of the $700 billion plan to curb the financial crisis affecting Wall Street for months was yet to be approved by both chambers of Congress.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family who will at best ".
In New York, Wall Street opened with marked losses.
Rescue operation of Wall Street - Democrats and Republicans are
Because what the financing of classic state was not sufficiently profitable, the Depfa then committed more closely in the infrastructure projects and in the funding of projects in common among private investors and State (Privat-Public-Partnership, PPP) and diverse internationally.
The actress Heather Locklear, the famous Amanda of the series TV Melrose Place, was arrested this weekend in Santa Bárbara (California) for having conducted under the effect of a drug.
For nearly 18 years, the space shuttle "Ulysses" has been flying in space.
And the inhabitants of the territory, the First United and the Inuits?
Colossus to the attack.
Despite everything, nothing has changed.
In April 2007, the Office of Fair Trading has told that the purchase by BSkyB, shares in ITV sowed doubt on the effective independence of ITV, encouraging by a result, the Competition Commission to investigate
Paulson: The plan must be effective
It stresses that his schedule is fulfilled, including a mission of the board of the federation in China and a summit Quebec-New York.
However, I do not think so.
The money comes as many private banks that banks.
Things never revealed until now, so much so that the success of the black candidate seems almost certain.
But if there is in your shelves of records vinyles crowded, with the art rock, jazz and blues music, some hope at least likely to such a gramophone.
Six in ten senior executives of printing newspapers and journalists are convinced that journalism at national level is pursuing a bad way.
It would reduce the costs, "he says.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
It is true, I look forward to their release.
The times jostling through its path.
Last month, Gebrselassie missed the Beijing Olympic marathon, fearing - as can seem exaggerated to people today - that air pollution would increase his problems of asthma.
And yes, the dream of many of us is that Madrid to hold the Olympic Games, after the failure in 2012, this could be achieved by 2016.
Such thoughts geo-strategic does, however, that one of the sides.
Although it is in favour immigrants learn English, Mr Obama has recently seen this issue as insignificant, when he proclaimed that we all need to stop disagree about the wording of the laws in English.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the winning card for the democrats is George Bush.
We have already seen this kind of attitude in several similar cases.
The movement has spread to other ports of the Atlantic coastline and the Channel, as the sands of Olonne, in the Vendée, where fish were idle, or at Le Havre, where two dozen vessels have blocked ship movements of trade.
It is the day of the dissemination of OpenOffice.org.3.0, the open source of personal productivity which aims to reach always and even more users, the home office, professionals in the public administration, proposing a free alternative to the most famous Microsoft Office.
In the same way, the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia has bought eight hundred copies of "Journal of a poet recently married," published by Pedro Tabernero and illustrated by Jacobo Pérez-Enciso, to perpetuate the work of one of the most famous Andalusian poets.
Under the law, the secretariat the Treasury will put in place a combined strategy: It can, at the same time, buy bad debts, securities on mortgages and bad mortgages and other types of debt "toxic".
Germans of Cˇesky´ Krumlov pray in the letter, the US president not to allow "sˇumavská zˇupa" (region of forest in Southern Bohemia) - annexed by Hitler under the Munich Agreement - to be made in Czechoslovakia.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
"We know how to take a step back," said Marcell Jansen.
On Monday, investors are worried again despite the agreement on the rescue plan, the largest in history, reached over this weekend by the leaders of Congress.
Signs pointing out the danger to drivers are, according to him, already less effective.
The Brazilian aircraft manufacturer table on 215 had left this year despite the threat of recession that loom over the global economy.
No resistance on the part of employees has been recorded, ensures the Secretary-General: "It is a process shared by employees, and we had the cooperation of all".
The Prime Minister does not exclude the possibility of triggering the elections before the end of the year
According to the testimony of the latter, it was to identify pensions and restaurants.
The English call him tank but the awesome Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the other.
In fact, none of these companies worked, what the accused explained by the fact that they did not receive work.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
The hopes of the people of Düsseldorf rest on Frankfurt.
Other admirers including neighbours long ago, said be happy with this shortened simply because there is one of the last and oldest pâté streets of the houses.
The Chinese authorities refused him entry in their territory, and he was therefore forced to return to Bangkok, where the Thai police and immigration officers insisted that he go back to England.
The difference between these two groups was in fact that the emphasis was laid in one on victory, while in the other, on failure.
Try not to arouse the child before to go to sleep.
This' territory twice great as France ',' home is in Quebec.
Are ever to the child that you can ask for the night to know his secret.
According to the capacity (Max. 2 UK), you should not spend more than 1 100 kronor.
Those of Boulogne-sur-Mer have decided to wait for the meeting on Wednesday at the Ministry to decide on eventual actions.
The suspect in the double homicide of Ózd, a young man about 23-year-old, was remanded in custody, on Sunday.
The detainee, A. A. J. of 28 years, has been in custody for achieving the various steps and will be judged in the next few hours.
The Court of Appeal Competition ordered to BSkyB to reduce its share of ITV 17.9% less than 7.5%.
"Without these, she would probably now have been a young woman, happy, promising, and successful."
His message was made, it was out of his lips so persuasive.
American prosecutors investigate and continuing the courts for the government.
This malfrat appealing in the scam brillantissime The Sting (L), Oscar for best film in 1973.
Barely had the plans been made public that the government of the Hessen proclaimed itself against any participation with the Hellaba in these matters.
But Barrick Gold seems not to trust the public and rejected out of hand the petitions and letters of support for the authors of black Canada.
"Then, a gang of young whites were launch oranges or objects against people sitting on the side" said Mr Franklin.
A way to characterise the media campaign emotional the intention of launching, on Wednesday, the Ministry of Transport.
Sheikh Hasina as Zhaleda Zia, deny the accusations that they get.
However, as shown by the example of Mobilking in Poland, investing in an unusual target group can also be a good advertisment stunt.
"What works with drivers is the system of sugar and the whip.
Among the most affected by the closure, Emily Romaine is at the top with 82 cinemas single halls lost, followed by the Tuscany (44) and Lombardy (41).
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
Monday, the US House of Representatives rejected the draft for support of the financial system, for which it would have had to spend up to $700 billion (nearly 12 bilions of Kcˇ).
But he said he do not feel well, and refused to go to London.
Public officials of Orange County wanted to build a motorway to five ways to the town to replace the Boulevard Kennedy, main street in two ways of the community.
People of Jersey have to pay more for their milk
The attitude of mobile operators is easily understandable: the entry of another operator would mean an increase of competition, which would lead to lower prices and thus reduced benefits.
Elena, Luca and others come together, Marco makes a last speech and explains the plan of attack.
It occupies the same function that your wife or your husband when you have to say something to your mother-in-law.
But precisely that have spoken, in developed countries, regulators, who defended not the interests of the mobile operators, but those of their clients.
"If we wanted to respect the law strictly formal and the activity of a steward is against the law on the road," said the spokesman for the Ministry of Transport Karel Hanzelka.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was trying to take care of my way to pay.
It is annoying to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior … must now pay some of the bills of institutions that were much less cautious.
In the MDAX, the shares of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
From Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Hard landing for international player Marko Marin.
Yes and no.
On demand, the CD of installation can be shipped at home or at work.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
Defeat the laws of gravity thanks to a super glue and, in the future, walk on the walls as Spiderman.
New Yorkers in general have become very familiar to the world of finance in recent weeks.
I was already afraid on my way to school.
The search for the essential and the magic has been the constant of this work that is presented these days to the gallery El Fotómata.
During the investigation, it was revealed that the 23-year-old man was a lot of money to a man of 53 years.
"However, it has not led to any conclusion on this point.
The talks had turned into a sprint in the last few hours for fear of the effects that another failure would have on investors' sentiments.
What is most shocking is the almost concordant view of the three mobile operators, which stems from their reactions.
Monica Cruz, who presented herself at the event with a pair of trousers and a shirt — from her own collection, – and for the dinner metamorphosed by wearing a long sexy black dress, and was moved when during the night visit to the opera, accompanied by Goya Toledo, they showed us the practise room for ballet and remembering the good old days, she took a bar and did a full split.
"Eatonville, first black city to integrate fully, childhood home of Zora Neale Hurston, this description that she made in 1935, is not so easy to make these days." The city of five lakes, three croquet fields, 300 dark skins, 300 good swimmers, full of guavas, two schools and no prison.
The next morning, we have had the pleasure of seeing Olivier Martínez – another big man who drives a motorbike - and John Travolta, who arrived at the intercontinental Hotel in Paris, with his own sheets and towels and asked in advance, that there should be no smell in his bedroom.
For the moment, Microsoft is more interested in the launch of its own online services to become an alternative to Google.
Despite these changes, the main idea of the programme, which was to obtain finance to buy bad mortgage securities, whose value had fallen because hundreds of thousands of Americans were unable to pay their mortgages, was maintained.
On Wednesday 1 October 2008 will be included in the history of Prazˇsky´ Dopravní podnik (the Agency pragoise transport) as the date on which will rise in the metro, the trams and buses the first passenger, who, instead of having a ticket on paper, will have in their pocket a coupon electronic.
On the value of society-daughter, the Hypo Real Estate must proceed with amortization which should have on the calculation of the gains and losses of the a vital equipment which is still unclear.
It is a central point but also an example of rural southern black culture - a sometimes scorned, at others acclaimed - reminiscent of the birth of slavery.
This face through the ages, it was him.
However, I do not think so.
Two former ministers from two different parties, Pierre Corbeil and Michel Létourneau (former Member péquiste of Ungava), have already begun consultations with thirty communities.
According to an internal rules of society, the new services are not announced that when they can be used, which is about is that in the coming months and years, they are going to move the world on new points. While some believe that the draft scan and filing of books and magazines dimensions of Google is so important that the company will soon face the Supreme Court of the United States, other tremble before its system Health, because in it, we can build a comprehensive medical benefit from our results of previous studies, our doctors and our problems.
Indeed, each of them explained the phenomena found at auctions by the pleasure of winning and the parade before the risk.
Barack Obama's proposals on education is an interesting example.
Even after the accident, the director do not consider their job as a job at risk.
It is up to the vocabulary crucial to the survival of Japanese ados and means "beautiful, cabbage".
Bilingual Debate: Immersion into the English Language
We have said that this is a benign alteration, that is why there is no treatment, unless it is linked to a alteration of sleep that can be treated (for example, if it is linked to a sleep disorder or stress).
The choice of operators is unfortunately miserable and is limited, in most cases, to radio tubes.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
The multinational trade and tourism agency has also indicated that the shares will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Instead of a new Pearl Harbour, as the billionaire Warren Buffett, it is more appropriate to speak of a second 11 September.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred to the gates of the community.
According to the statistics, between 30% and 75% of drivers arrested for drunken driving more than once, go back to the wheel.
American legislators made a turning point in the talks on the adoption of a rescue plan in the form of financial aid of 700 billion dollars (about 12 billion kroner), given to the US financial system.
I live in Rome for 25 years, and when I turn to the Rialto, or Quirinal of Via Nazionale, now closed, where I have both lived emotions shared, I turn to the other side not to see the banners noircis by the dust.
Kinga Göncz thinks there is a good chance that on 12 January, the Hungarian-US visa waiver will be put into effect, which is what the foreign minister said in Chicago, in front of the leaders of the Hungarian community.
The choice is wide.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will rise in 2009, to £450millions.
The driver of the coach tried to avoid it by swerving hard, but still grazed the right side of the lorry.
In all cases, progress poignent on the plan nervous as they weigh the same thing in rats and Man.
Haider is prepared to govern Austria, to prevent the coalition of red and black.
The Republican senator said that in the proposal are mentioned the creation of a committee of control of the Treasury and the cap of redundancy payments to senior managers, and that he was personally very attached to these points.
"The principle of the glue can be imagined as a series of tubes prepared as a pile of spaghetti." Explains Zhong Lin Wang of the Georgia Institute of Technology in Atlanta.
The manettes also for Gioacchino Piromalli, the former mediator between the clan and public administrations, and his small sons lawyer, namesake of the boss, already condemned for a criminal association of mafia-style, and to pay 10 million.
This will allow children to have a more peaceful sleep.
This is not why the American people have voted for us, this does not protect the taxpayer dollars - said the Republican Deputy of California, Darrell Issa.
For some, it is linked to a "safe job".
A fight taken to extremes: MP3 players versus mobile phones.
The Czech market is very specific in comparison with others.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
It was a group of elected Republicans that wrecked the first draft agreement last week.
According to the prime minister, it will be necessary to find a solution to the Temple Mount, the sacred sites and historical 'located within the old city.
Given the nature of the mobile market in RT, it is clear that the entry of a new competitor would submit itself, and especially its services, to high demands. "
The publication of "Journal of a poet recently married" concludes the Triennat
Free speech opinion Orwellian of Barrick Gold
In a comparison of 12 months, taking into account the domestic sales of processing sectors, it is the price of oil processing sector which have been rising the most significant (32.4 percent).
This campaign costing 150 million will appear on television, radio, cinema, on the Internet, but also on leaflets.
This is what have communicated together the Egyptian state television, the Arab television channel Al Arabija and the Italian media.
The new Czech anthem four new versions.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
Even the new legislation sought by the Lega to curb immigration and facilitate the expulsion of illegal immigrants, is cited as evidence of climate change in Italy.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently the other.
It is, however, a fact confirmed that the terms sought are not only made, but in justified cases, they are sent to a third, and in this type of case law, nothing protects the personal rights of Internet users.
The majority of invoices was created by István Lados and his accomplice András O˝ri, who, according to our information, was involved in drafting the files needed to obtain subsidies.
The chairman of the committee Executive Board of HRE Mr Funke explained that the group Hypo Real Estate should not have to resort to financial markets in the medium term.
Two years thence and still no candidates among these enterprises, which have boasted replacing traditional energy with marine energy.
However, I do not think so.
"By their nationality of the European Union, the Roma must be assured of their right to quality education, and be protected from a low-quality and sectarian education," said Lívia Járóka.
Non-residents, such as Rachelle Munson, a lawyer who frequents our church since 1993, have begun to come in large numbers, and residents are beginning to reconsider the past.
"Chevron is currently studying the technology on oceanic energy - said the spokesman of a company associated with the colossus American petroleum company, in the business daily Wall Street Journal- and assess the potential to cooperate with us."
On the occasion of its tenth anniversary, Google says that we can find it in bottom of the pockets of people and in the sky above their heads. It knows where they spent their holiday, which specialists they consult and what are their interests.
A forced integration, among other things, put an end to the relatively idyllic isolation of the community.
America very fond least without Paul Newman
That wants to hide something, or at least, to try to circumvent the monopoly of Google, can do it (starting with, for example, Scroogle, using the system of research Google, but, at the same time, leaving intentionally no trace).
Vending machines which will operate from tomorrow, are easy to use.
Truth to speak, reading mangas is what I love best for some years now.
Elena attack by Luca, then the embraces.
Jersey Dairy has announced that it will increase the price in bulk of its milk, five penny per litre, from Monday.
When she was a child in Coventry, Trerise had bound her before forcing her into sexual acts, while her mother worked at a pub.
The phenomenon has already shown a few days ago, with the vote in the House of Representatives, contrary to the rescue plan of $700 billion approved by the White House: A good significant number of American was, and still is, more interested in punishing Wall Street to save the US economy.
"We believe that it is easier to monitor someone who remains in the United Kingdom because we have devices able to manage any potential risks, much more effectively.
Immediately after the takeover of bad debts, the government will intervene in aggressive way to ensure that the amount paid to the managers should not be exaggerated.
In Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important to a symbolic point of view.
On the other hand, no legal prescription does not prohibit not the carrier services.
Obama wins the points in the first televised duel
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
His step-daughter left for Plymouth.
There is a lot of similarities between their symptoms. The inflammation of the liver and jaundice are characteristic, but pathogens and diseases caused differ.
"The mayor of Gioia Tauro was prepared to standardise the choice of the Mutuelle the interests of the clan Piromalli."
It would reduce the costs, "he says.
Following the reports Gélineau and Krever, two suppliers have been created in Canada: Héma-Quebec to serve the Quebec and the Canadian company of blood to supply all other provinces and the two territories.
Internet users mindful of human rights have been able to breathe a sigh of relief in May, when Google, arms into confusion with the body of electronic legal protection EFF, has proved its right to court to the FBI. According to the ruling, in the future, Google will still not be bound by any of the points of the constitution to disclose information on the request of the FBI, secret of any kind.
Journalists can clearly see where the web is going.
But not thoe that take advantage of the taxpayers'.
It was an exciting life, a pioneer of the release of the woman, as Isadora Duncan, Virginia Woolf or Sarah Bernhardt.
Its beauty in the eyes of blue background was long their card asset, some would say its weakness.
Battery life is also crucial
Tourists kidnapped in Egypt are free
I am not at all of its kind to love speak to people, particularly in a class of 40 pupils.
But coming from an office, which must represent the interests of consumers and besides other things ensures that no one benefits from its position on the market, such a statement is confusing.
It was a nice ovation. "
This case highlights what the New York Times defines as the "paradox of the North": The northern regions are both those where one sees "more integration and more work," but also "the strongest anti-immigrant feeling in the country and the most important support for the Northern League"
In his fight with the second bull, after a fight much better, he was whistled at by most of the public.
Ms Mikels, contrary to bilingual education, has confirmed "we had a great success with a student who had just arrived from Mexico; 12 months later, if you would have walked into his class, you would have had no chance to identify him."
We have already had negotiations several times with all the Czech mobile operators about the possibility.
In any case it is a hardly studied phenomenon.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
He meets the Foreign Minister, Condoleezza Rice, to which it will decoration of the Red of Commendatore with the single of the merit of the Republic of Hungary, and will be an interview with the foreign policies of the presidential candidates, Democrat Barack Obama and Republican John McCain.
And thus, it is the government of each state from whom everyone expects interventions, plans of rescue and recovery, new rules, and especially the affection of appropriations: when one is going through a difficult period, there is nobody but the State with the economic resources, the mass of financial resources able to try to put things in place.
The bond market has risen sharply.
"We have not stewards. We objected to it from the beginning.
The Police accuses the right-wing extremists of having desecrated an Austrian Muslim cemetery, at the end of the victory of political parties of the extreme right wing in the general election of the country.
It is not only 1,000 but 1001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of daily life.
Finally, Günther Merl, chairman of the committee director of the Hellaba, however, was voted against any business strategy of merger with his bank.
Remember that in the first match of the series return journey, on Friday, the Impact had suffered a defeat of 2-1 at Starfire Complex, in Tukwila, in a suburb of Seattle.
"It would have been given to the clan - write the juges - to enter officially into the mairie, facilitating the possibilities, which are already considerable, to control the public administration"
"People were always happy to see Zora" he said.
The material, invented by the team of researchers, is a development of those that we are using a special structure of carbon, called nano tubes of carbon.
Czech according to the press, the stock exchange of Vienna, the transatlantic exchange, the Nasdaq Stock Exchange of New York, the stock exchange in London and Deutsche Börse have made an offer to date.
The CˇTÚ (The Czech Office telecommunications), which pointed out that the price of a home SMS was higher than in the rest of the Union, has confirmed.
The financial crisis from the point of view of the European press
Five hundred American journalists have been arrested by the PEW Research Center about the status of their profession and mental control for the future.
Those who will begin to use the shop online can forget definitively the counters in the underground stations, where they were so far trampling of impatience in long lines in order to obtain tickets in paper.
The cooperation in question needs a permit, discussed by the Committee for energy, to begin marine energy in Alaska.
The ETUDE- The US journal Science published the discoveries of some researchers from the University of Dayton, of Akron, the Georgia Institute of Technology and the Air Force Research Laboratory.
Bills made deliberately
Projected in circles, on three large screens, were images of hyrdoelectric generators, of mining projects, of Quebec seen by "Google Maps", maps, etc.
What we call as "fear" is therefore the mental state in which we find ourselves when the activity of the localised defence system in the brain (or its consequences, as the reactions of the body) absorbs live memory.
On the contrary, he promised to run in Berlin.
For travellers, it is advisable to be vaccinated against the virus A and B. There is no vaccine against C.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently the other.
Technology to perfect.
The fact is that dividends have been cut.
The first $350 billion, as was the wish of President George Bush, must be available as soon as possible.
Today, the systems such as those in Portugal, or some in Scotland, are small in size, and do not seem to create major problem in the ecosystem.
At Guilvinec, the 'crisis committee' should decide on Tuesday the follow-up to the movement and its participation in the stop-gap solution previewed at the Ministry of Agriculture and Fisheries in Paris.
For now, however, it is impossible to say with certainty when the two chambers of Congress comes out the vote, or if the negotiations are not likely to remain blocked, at the last moment, for this or that problem.
Goodbye old cinema Paradiso, cities are removing historic theatres.
Impressive.
The magic trick consists in the fact that the company pretends to be a customer classic company, which commands a large number of SIM cards, for the operator.
Open Office is made up of five main modules: the Writer for video writing equivalent of Word; Calc, is the worksheet which aims to replace Excel; Impress, for the rival of PowerPoint presentations; Dbase, to do the same for Access, is the program which allows you to work on databases; and finally Drwa which is the graphic module.
"Sangre de Mayo," the bet dared to Garci
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
The data of victims at work seem to point out a small positive trend, but this does not stop the fact that the number of dead whites is considerable "said the President of the Anmil, Pietro Mercandelli, later.
"Everything was perfect.
In the manufacture of metallurgical products, we have seen an increase in the price by 13.2 percent, while in the important area of food production, drinks and tobacco, prices rose by 11 percent.
The implementation was missing.
"Paul Gadd was not present at the time".
Nancy Pelosi, chairperson of the House of Representatives, said on Sunday that there are serious hopes that the House will vote on the bill as early as Monday.
According to the latest survey of Sunia, the union of tenants, to rent a simple room can cost a student up to 900 euro in Milan, 700 in Florence, 650 in Naples, and 600 in Rome.
"The global prospective equity, interest rates and exchange markets, have become uncertain" wrote analysts at Deutsche Bank in a letter to investors. "
Already on Saturday afternoon, the fans were cheering themselves, the blue sky above the stadium and the provisional league tables on the giant screen that showed their club as top of the league.
The police began their continued until the vehicle stops two miles up the low-hand, where the two occupants took to flee in a forested area.
Limitation of golden parachutes
The film's duration is more than two and a half hours. "Sangre de Mayo" will debut in cinemas on Friday, which will then become a TV series for Telemadrid of more than four hours.
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
In this case, it is someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
The street is in the East Village and travels the length of the north of First Street - not to be confused with Second Street - between Bowery and Second Avenue.
She was Buddhist and vegetarian and pleaded for the abolition of corsets that prevented the free movement of women.
Not surprisingly, the Republican and Democratic campaign headquarters have declared their own victory in the televised duel which would have been followed by a third of American families.
It comes after 14 months of a crisis triggered by the bursting of the housing bubble, which has led to the collapse of sub-prime mortgages (subprime) before spreading to other forms more widespread credit securities (PCAA) and lead to a freezing of liquidity and on the exodus of banks and financial institutions.
"A woman even died."
Some admit not having even voted: "What good would it do, because they will do what they want my voice," said a youth.
"It is much more important that the congressmans agree this week, that they support the plan and will devote themselves to it as soon as possible.
In most cases, this is the power potential represented by the company that can generate fear, and this is no compunction, fear of the punishment, the desire for freedom or possibly the revolt against the power that can generate in Internet users a counter-reaction.
The 500 reporters interviewed admitted to technology hoping that it "to do something good" for their journalism.
CSU: a grace period of transition
The mobile market in the Czech Republic is relatively advanced. Our operators propose virtually the same services as their partners in western Europe.
The Nobel Prize for economy has been awarded to the American Paul Krugman for his research on trade models and localisation of business.
These devices are filled test of independent order to MP3, and that is how the ease of the order is closer to that of an MP3 player independent.
The Prime Minister said that the Government of Quebec would be very sensitive to their concerns and that the project would benefit them, particularly young people.
In exchange, it is recovering a right to vote in the bank and influence.
Investment in early education of Roma children means a strengthening of the economy of the Member States of the European Union.
Researchers in neurology and economy of the University of New York have managed to update the neurological and economic basis of this known and apparently irrational behaviour pattern.
One the one hand is the conscience of the objective need for authoritarian leadership, the search for a person who will take control of the situation.
For 40 years, sociologists announce that they have been misled about the pace, but secularization, the results of education and the establishment of German of the North and in the region of Bavaria, could not remain without consequences on the loyalty of voters CSU.
The 19 participants of the excursion in the desert should already be on the way to the Cairo.
"Everything depends on the fact that the coach has in its approval permission to propose places standing.
And so I believe that we can keep dreaming of becoming the host city for the 2016 Olympic Games..
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
Embraer maintains its forecasts for delivery in 2008
The latest James Bond, the English Daniel Craig, noted that no James Bond died before him.
The actions of the Bank Goldman Sachs accusèrent a drop of almost 10%.
In Quebec, the committee Gélineau has fulfilled this mandate.
Negotiations for the ransom are already underway.
"Mercandelli then denounced" the gradual deterioration of the conditions of safety for compensating victims at work" and the "derived assistance to which the system has been moving in recent years ".
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy a phone.
"I feel responsible for her death."
I now come to the second new feature, which provides a fracture.
Portraits of which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, given the photograph classic.
The author of "The city and the dogs' was the man most expected the third edition of the festival and has fulfilled his contract.
Its fans have found in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy of the Coen brothers.
The biological clock am not afraid.
The journey is 75 euros, including the pot of welcome with a beer brewed Kaiser, according to the law of Bavarian purity, insurance and a responsible for the group speaking German - Marco has done a language courses in Frankfurt.
The PCA (format used by the company and its Apple iPods taken from them), meanwhile, is less course.
They are several to wait in the warehouse at the airport near the red carpet and a military row of 27 marine soldiers.
The interests of the loan will be paid by all companies that collect the dividends from the investors, including 59 building societies.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
Should I drink water during my workout?
How can I put something in book format without "publishing" it?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How do I make a height adjustable desk?
What is the best time and temperature for taste when cooking a salmon fillet in the oven?
How can I find out why my washing machine trips the outlet?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
Should I use IRA money to pay down my student loans?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How do you remove paint from hair?
Would a Colombian citizen with Canadian residency need a transit visa for the UK?
How can I locate and repair a leak?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
What does paying by invoice mean?
How important is the pronunciation of a toddler's first words?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How to strengthen my wrists?
How to address a professor in letter?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
What olive is a good taste substitute for Kalamata?
What does the scorpion represent in Drive?
How to select a workout plan?
What are the bus (coach) connections from Thessaloniki, Greece to Tbilisi, Georgia?
How can I get my colleagues to stop interrupting me?
OK we're all nerds here, so really, how on earth should I use a Japanese toilet?
How do you remove paint from hair?
How does arbitration work in baseball?
How can I use persimmons in a cooked dish?
If lost in the wilderness, what is the first thing I should do?
What is the PhD application process for Germany and Switzerland?
How can I replace a ceiling fan light pull chain?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What can I do to make my writing fit the 1950s?
How do I prepare a wall for backsplash tile?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How do I wire a bathroom exhaust fan/light to two switches?
What does "do." mean in old recipes?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
How to build plastic prototype?
Do I need a teacher to learn violin?
How to get funding for this idea?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
Is it possible to replace a switch with a receptacle?
How long can I safely keep a thawing pork shoulder in the fridge?
What is the correct way to secure a gas standalone range?
How can I manage applying for 2 more jobs when I already have a part time job?
How do I make my dog forget a command?
How much thinset is enough?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How can I prevent my ferrets from smelling bad?
How can I replace a ceiling fan light pull chain?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
What kind of socket is this?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What does this tablature notation mean?
How do I maintain a good relationship with my old boss after being promoted?
How can I tell if I'm planking correctly?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
Where could the air in the water system be coming from?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How to get rid of oversleeping?
How long should it take to read a paper?
How do I install switches in this box?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How do I clean the bottom of a gas grill?
How High Can I Raise My Lights?
What is the difference between a Rollover IRA and a Roth IRA?
How do I keep my dog's water clean?
Where can I find a good vocabulary list?
How can I wire my WIFI thermostat to control my millivolt fireplace?
What's the difference between stroganoff and goulash?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
Is it safe to travel to Turkey at this time (August 2013)?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
What instrument is this?
What was the meaning of "21 grams"?
How much water is too much?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
How should I ground a GFCI to a metal box?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
What is the actual difference between Graduate and Undergraduate texts?
How can I control a bath fan with two lights through a single wire?
How does one invent a cookie recipe?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is the difference between EFTA and the EU?
How do I keep an egg from cracking while being boiled?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
How can I prepare this old exterior wall for painting?
What does "do." mean in old recipes?
What is the difference between analog and digital effects pedals?
How can I control a bath fan with two lights through a single wire?
Why is there no water in the kitchen?
How can I get rid of springtails?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How do I stop my cat from peeing on rugs and linens?
How to address a professor in letter?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How do I fix a hole/gap between my shower tile and the dry wall next to it?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What do I do with the neutral and ground when wiring a transfer switch?
How do I retrieve a detached plunger from a bathtub drain?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
How can I reduce my need to do a water change on my turtle's habitat?
What is the difference between assertive and non-assertive words?
Is it ok to use "and/or" in my dissertation?
What are the pros and cons of setting up a 529 plan for myself?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
I'm an Indonesian citizen. Do I need a visa for South Korea?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the difference between mono and stereo?
How should I fill in pits in a concrete floor so I can install laminate?
Which job title to use?
How do I make my own chocolate chips?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
What kind of socket is this?
How do I track investment performance in Quicken across rollovers?
What are the pros and cons of buying a house using an FHA loan?
How can I stop my pre-schooler from whining?
What kind of socket is this?
Is it normal for cats to eat grass?
What is the origin of cheese dip?
Should I contact an editor at the journal that rejected my paper, to ask for feedback?
Can I ask a company what I should wear to an interview?
How do you remove mold from a tent?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
How can I make sifting easier?
Should I declare my job application at a meeting?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
Can I travel to Paris with a type A multiple entry visa valid for 3 years?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
U.S. income tax & charitable donations: How much is income tax reduced by donations?
How do I replace the front door on a stucco house?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How can I make an improvised vegetable steamer?
What is the function of "-ter" in words "laughter" and "daughter"?
Bar ware - What kind of glass is this?
Would a Colombian citizen with Canadian residency need a transit visa for the UK?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How much water is too much?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
How long can you keep chocolate in the freezer?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What to look for when choosing a new bathtub?
What are the pros and cons of Jefferson vs conventional deadlifts?
How does arbitration work in baseball?
Is it possible to replace a switch with a receptacle?
How High Can I Raise My Lights?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How can I remove wax from a wooden counter so I can resurface it with Danish oil?
Do I really need a redundant sump pump?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
How can I remove a key that has broken off in a lock?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
How long boiled egg can be stored in fridge?
How do I stop my daughter from hitting another child?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
How to deal with company that doesn't set expectations or tasks for me?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
How do I teach my toddler to chew his food?
Can I connect two load lines to a GFCI receptacle?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
How do you buy the right train ticket in the UK?
Do I need to ground my above ground pool / with saltwater system?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
How can I thaw a frozen exterior drain quickly?
How should I install a thermostat for a baseboard heater?
Can I connect my 50 amp generator to a 30 Amp plug?
I'm an Indonesian citizen. Do I need a visa for South Korea?
How do I replace a broken halogen bulb in the recessed light in my bathroom?
How do I remedy a ledger board that is pulling away from the house?
What is the likelihood of a PhD admission if a professor agrees to supervise?
How long does cooked TVP keep in the fridge?
Why are balls of fur behind my dog's ears, and how do I get rid of them?
Will getting a secured credit card to buy a single expensive item hurt my credit or help it?
How familiar should you be with a topic before assigning it as a thesis to an undergraduate?
How long does tortilla dough keep for?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How can I tell if I'm planking correctly?
How can I deaden the vibration noise of a box fan?
What is the difference between a 'trader' and a 'stockbroker'?
How do you reduce a cream sauce?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How long can I keep sauteed onions in the fridge?
Do I need to apply for ESTA?
How can I get my colleagues to stop interrupting me?
How should I patch a popcorn ceiling?
What are the principles of improvisation in newgrass music?
How does Elimination Communication work?
What do I do if a professor at a foreign university doesn't respond to my emails?
Can I do anything to make my gas oven better?
What are Automatic Garage Door Options for a Garage with a Low Ceiling Clearance?
What can I do to make my writing fit the 1950s?
Can I continue to travel within the US on an expired visa?
How should I make a budget?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
How can I keep my dog from barking when I don't know what he's barking at?
How hard is it to get an academic position in Australia/New Zealand with a PhD from the US?
How should I store eggs in the refrigerator?
I accepted an offer, then the company stopped responding. Do I keep chasing the offer?
What's wrong with my replacement GFCI outlet?
How does muscle confusion work?
How do I make a pot of coffee on a bbq grill?
What are some songs/music piece that I can use to practice Violin?
Travelling to Romania for 4 days by Schengen visa issued by Germany?
What is the likelihood of a PhD admission if a professor agrees to supervise?
Should I go for an interview if I feel I am not prepared?
How hard is it to get an academic position in Australia/New Zealand with a PhD from the US?
Is it ok to apply for more than one Phd student program?
How familiar should you be with a topic before assigning it as a thesis to an undergraduate?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
What is the professional way to follow up with a manager for project opportunity?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Do I need to update my resume when not looking for a job?
What was the average percentage of taxes in Europe during the Middle Ages?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
How is rental income taxed?
How do we teach our toddler that it's okay to go on the potty?
Do I need to update my resume when not looking for a job?
How do I find out whether my flight has WiFi?
How do I raise my garage ceiling after spray foaming?
What should I look for in a new car (automobile)?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What's the process to get an Indonesian tourist visa for a US citizen?
What does paying by invoice mean?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
Why doesn't my cat lick me?
How do you keep up with a toddler?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
Is there a term for the opposite of the Chuck Cunningham Syndrome?
What kind of socket is this?
Do we NEED to help a baby learn how to self-sooth? And how long can it take?
How do I fix this leaking dishwasher drain pipe?
What could be wrong with my furnace?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How exactly do the sounds of Arabic "ﻕ" and Georgian "ყ" differ?
Should I look for a new job?
How to get rid of oversleeping?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
Reapplying to same PhD program after one year, should I state I applied the previous year?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
What would I need to show to change fields and get into a physics PhD program?
What could be causing my GFCI to trip?
Is it right to expect my co-workers to have the same dedication to work as mine?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
How can I determine how much my car insurance will cost me?
In the Avengers movie, why did they close the portal?
Is it normal for a 12-year-old to have Vibrato?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How can I stop my fireplace from disabling my thermostat?
What happened at the end of Rocky?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
If lost in the wilderness, what is the first thing I should do?
Can I patent work after I have published a paper about it?
After a job interview, is it inappropriate if I want to talk to an employee in private?
How do you keep up with a toddler?
Why is compensation so much higher in the US than in Western Europe on average?
How do I reheat a casserole in the oven?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
What are the pros and cons of Jefferson vs conventional deadlifts?
What is a mezrag-holder?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
As a postdoc, how to make sure I get credit for helping undergrad and grad students?
What parameter is best to increase - time or temperature?
What kind of material do I need above the tile line in my shower?
Can I connect two load lines to a GFCI receptacle?
Replacing a hot water heater: tank or tankless?
What could be wrong with my air conditioner?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How much time can you ask before joining a new company?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
What is the significance of the cat?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is the motivation behind using the 2-3-2 (vs. 2-2-1-1-1) series format for the NBA Finals?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
Should I let potential employers know I have a job offer?
What would be a good substitute for Rice Wine?
How do I repair water-damaged hardwood floors?
How do I clean reclaimed wood from construction?
What could be wrong with my furnace?
How should I use heat tape?
Do we NEED to help a baby learn how to self-sooth? And how long can it take?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
Is it appropriate to call a professor for a recommendation on the weekend?
What could be causing water pressure to build up after changing my under sink filter?
Can I use romex in my unfinished, detached garage or should I use MC?
Why are Cinnabons so soft and moist?
U.S. income tax & charitable donations: How much is income tax reduced by donations?
Where can I find a good vocabulary list?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
What's the difference between a "false cognate" and a "false friend"?
Glue underlayment to concrete: how long does it take to cure?
How do I ask my boss to pay for an expense?
When is it a remix, and when is it a cover?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
How long will a balsamic reduction keep?
What does the term "Out of the Furnace" refer to?
What is the difference between mono and stereo?
Does this beginning hook the reader?
How do I stop my daughter from hitting another child?
How do I adjust for a door jamb that's thicker than the wall?
How can I remove a really stuck screw?
How do you remove mold from a tent?
Job transfer with a house I can't sell. How should I handle it?
Is it better to request a recommendation letter in person after class or by email?
What are some good strength exercises for marathon runners?
Should I go for an interview if I feel I am not prepared?
How to get from Rzeszów to Lviv?
Which is the cheapest ferry to Jeju in South Korea?
How should I patch a large hole in brick?
Can I repair a plaster ceiling with drywall?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
What should I look for in a new car (automobile)?
How do I retrofit a junction box in an insulated wall?
How can I remove old tea stain from carpet/rug?
How can I win my Supervisor's trust to do some big work?
What olive is a good taste substitute for Kalamata?
How should I make a budget?
How do I keep my dog's water clean?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
My name was misspelled in a citation, what should I do?
What can I eat the night before to help me get up in the morning?
I have a Schengen visa but my UAE Residence visa cancelled. Can I still travel then?
What could be causing my GFCI to trip?
How can I locate and repair a leak?
How do I convert a ceiling fan with 2 separate wall switches to a separate fan & light switch?
How long does cooked TVP keep in the fridge?
How can I get my colleagues to stop interrupting me?
What is the difference between assertive and non-assertive words?
Apply for new UK tourist visa from home while current one is still valid?
What is the difference between assertive and non-assertive words?
After a job interview, is it inappropriate if I want to talk to an employee in private?
What is the relation between the words "Cossack" and "Kazakh"?
Do I need to ground my above ground pool / with saltwater system?
How do you remove paint from hair?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
What is the difference between a 'trader' and a 'stockbroker'?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
Is "Why We Get Fat: And What to Do About It" thesis correct?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
Is it a good idea to go to the airport and ask for the next cheap flight to anywhere?
Why does the shower get cold when I flush, and how can I prevent it?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How much water is too much?
Can I run 3 feet of water pipe in the attic for a rain shower?
How can I keep my dog from barking when I don't know what he's barking at?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How should I deal with colleagues asking me to hide problems with their work?
What if I don't have enough work sample for an interview?
How do I prepare a wall for backsplash tile?
What size dry bag is best for keeping and washing clothes?
What happened at the end of Rocky?
How should I store eggs in the refrigerator?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
How do you remove paint from hair?
What is it that makes bacon so delicious?
How can I get rid of fleas?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
How much water is too much?
Is my U.S. driver's license valid in Europe?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How should I make a budget?
What kind of socket is this?
Should I have separate savings accounts for various savings goals?
When is it appropriate to close your office door when meeting with a student?
How should I build stud walls to make shelves in a room that has a sloping ceiling and floor?
How do you remove mold from a tent?
What's the best way to store potatoes and maximize their shelf-life?
How should I groom my dog?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
What are the pros and cons of buying a house using an FHA loan?
What is the easiest way to tear out a bathroom subfloor?
How do I replace a broken bathtub drain?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
What is a mezrag-holder?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
Do my kids need to file a tax return?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is "beta" for an investment or a portfolio, and how do I use it?
Can I run 3 feet of water pipe in the attic for a rain shower?
Should I tell prospective employer that I got a raise at my current job?
How long can you keep chocolate in the freezer?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
How can I make sifting easier?
How to stop feeling bad when you are leaving a company you like for a new job?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
What are the technical differences between skeleton and luge?
How long should meat be steamed for?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
How do I clean a Hammerite paint brush?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
Is it safe to leave butter at room temperature?
What is the cheapest way to go from Poland to Lyon (France)?
Is it possible to overmarinade a steak?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
Can I add a porcelain bathroom fixture to existing tile?
How do I install switches in this box?
What was the meaning of "21 grams"?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How can I improve hvac air flow to my attic?
What does "do." mean in old recipes?
How can I tell the difference between a rabbit and a cat?
What is a 13th chord?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
What are some great exercises for adult recorder players?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
What's the difference between stroganoff and goulash?
How to remember things you don't often use?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How can I create a disclaimer?
how to blackout a large bedroom window on a budget?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
What language does this look like?
Can I travel outside of the US during my OPT, but with an expired visa?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
What type of pants are good for weight lifting?
How do I determine if a pipe is frozen?
Do I need to update my resume when not looking for a job?
I'm an Indonesian citizen. Do I need a visa for South Korea?
Can I repair a plaster ceiling with drywall?
What are the pros and cons of buying a house using an FHA loan?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What are the pros and cons of Jefferson vs conventional deadlifts?
Job transfer with a house I can't sell. How should I handle it?
What is the easiest way to get rid of spilled glitter?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
Lowest score that has never scored by a batsman in an innings?
How to prepare cinder block wall for painting?
What is the difference between EFTA and the EU?
How to decide whether contract "had", "did", and "would"?
What is the relation between the words "Cossack" and "Kazakh"?
What signs indicate good water quality for tropical fish?
How to strengthen my wrists?
How do I know if my cat has worms?
What could be wrong with my air conditioner?
What is the best way to clean your clothes dryer exhaust?
What loan options are there for minors?
What does "do." mean in old recipes?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
Do I have to spend money with my credit card to increase my credit score?
How can I install a water inlet for a dishwasher?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I remove a really stuck screw?
How much activity is too much for my older dog?
What is the proper way to hold a subtenant's rental deposit?
What causes these chips in a cement brick wall, and how can I fix them?
What is the significance of the scene with the cop near the end of The Artist?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
What could be causing my toilet to back up?
Can you thaw a frozen turkey in a dryer?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
What is the difference between a Rollover IRA and a Roth IRA?
How can I wire my WIFI thermostat to control my millivolt fireplace?
How to deal with the child when both the parents are not on the same page?
How can I get a toddler I care for during the day to take a nap?
In a dialogue, how do you write that a character says a letter?
Why doesn't my cat lick me?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
Where could the air in the water system be coming from?
Is it possible to steam steak?
How can I determine how much my car insurance will cost me?
How to ask for more details about the job before applying?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How do I pump up water pressure in my shower?
Job transfer with a house I can't sell. How should I handle it?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
How can I get rid of springtails?
What are some common beginner mistakes when learning to play the piano?
Why isn't my mini fridge staying cold?
How to get rid of unwanted and annoying co-author?
What is the difference between balls in Test and ODI Cricket?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
Greek type D visa: Can I travel to other Schengen countries?
Is it possible to steam steak?
What could cause my ceiling fan light to go off after 2 seconds of being on?
What is the significance of the cat?
What could have caused my GFCI to trip, and what can I do about it?
How should I patch a popcorn ceiling?
What is the best way to introduce myself in a letter to a prospective graduate adviser?
What can I do to minimize my risk of being laid off?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How do I use a floor nailer near the wall?
How should I store eggs in the refrigerator?
What is the significance of the scene with the cop near the end of The Artist?
What can I do about out of square rough opening for new windows?
What's the best way to store potatoes and maximize their shelf-life?
What's the best way to store potatoes and maximize their shelf-life?
What is the meaning of the letters on the top of a common hex bolt?
How do I keep my dog's water clean?
What is the safest way to travel from Tehran to North-Pakistan?
How do I paint art onto a wall?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How to deal with meddling coworkers?
How do i get my 1 yr old to sleep in his crib?
Is there any difference between an article and a paper?
What are the principles of improvisation in newgrass music?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
What's the evidence for and against isochrony?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa for future date?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
should I continue with this research?
Lose more or gain weight?
How to ask for an update on a potential opening?
At what age should a child's self-involvement begin to decrease?
What are the pros and cons of Jefferson vs conventional deadlifts?
Can I travel outside of the US during my OPT, but with an expired visa?
What is the significance of the cat?
What can I eat the night before to help me get up in the morning?
What should I look for in strawberries at the market?
how to install pre-finished hardwood floors?
How do I replace a broken halogen bulb in the recessed light in my bathroom?
How to bake a chicken?
What is the best way to treat feline ringworm?
Why is there no water after replacing the filter in a Samsung refrigerator?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
When should I use italics in scientific writing?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How do I get play-doh out of the carpet?
What information/guarantees should I get from a company in financial difficulty?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
How to remove construction adhesive from concrete?
What are the pros and cons of setting up a 529 plan for myself?
Does the optimal hypertrophy rep range apply to tired muscles?
Is there any difference between an article and a paper?
How do I install switches in this box?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What's the difference between stroganoff and goulash?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
What is the difference between a 'trader' and a 'stockbroker'?
Is it safe to eat sprouted onions?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
How can I replace a ceiling fan light pull chain?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How do I teach my toddler to chew his food?
How to repair garage ceiling?
When should you use metal studs?
How do I repair my porcelain floor?
How do I clean a Hammerite paint brush?
Can anyone tell me what this is?
How can you buy train tickets at Oslo Airport?
Can I ask a company what I should wear to an interview?
Should I look for a new job?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What goes in a student success statement for a faculty application?
What is the difference between shawarma and gyros?
What type of hardware do I need for a heavy fence gate?
Why won't my new Craftsman garage door opener power on?
How do I replace a broken bathtub drain?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
What kind of socket is this?
Is it legal for a US citizen to travel to Cuba?
Is it safe to travel to Turkey at this time (August 2013)?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Can I claim child care expenses as a deduction on my federal return in Quebec?
How do you remove paint from hair?
How to clean up spilled paint on carpet?
What is the significance of the scene with the cop near the end of The Artist?
What is the safest way to travel from Tehran to North-Pakistan?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
Is there a keyed switch that can be used to power off a subpanel?
How can I reinforce a wall mounted ikea shelf?
How can I win my Supervisor's trust to do some big work?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
Where the did the concept of "smear campaigns" originate?
Must I enter Europe with Schengen visa from the country where I applied?
How can I install a new bathroom GFCI receptacle?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
What is the origin of the black/devil riders?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Why did Sherlock fake his death this way?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How do I remove a panel from the ceiling of my side porch?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How does mobile home insurance work?
What are the properties I should look for in running shoes?
What could be causing my toilet to back up?
How long can fish be left out?
Being a non-native English writer how can i improve my English Writing style?
What is the cheapest and most direct route from the UK to Malawi?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How can I replace the roller mechanism on this door?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What kind of socket is this?
How do you keep up with a toddler?
What is the relation between the words "Cossack" and "Kazakh"?
How to apply for a Schengen visa?
What is the cheapest way to go from Poland to Lyon (France)?
How can I remove grout and mortar from a drain?
What is the difference between mono and stereo?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
How can I get my dog to take liquid vitamins from a dropper?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
How can I get my colleagues to stop interrupting me?
Do Bangladeshi citizens need transit visa in Malaysia?
Can anyone tell me what this is?
How can I install a new bathroom GFCI receptacle?
What is the term for the "amuse-bouche" at the end of the meal?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
How do I teach my toddler to chew his food?
What are the pros and cons of buying a house using an FHA loan?
When not to reply to a recruiter as it would be clear that it is a waste of time?
Is it safe to leave butter at room temperature?
How to get a child to stop pretending to choke on foods he doesn't want to eat?
What does the term "Out of the Furnace" refer to?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How should I install a thermostat for a baseboard heater?
What's the best way to run a wire from inside my garage to the outside?
How can I remove a really stuck screw?
What are properties of good whole bean coffee?
How can I share my research ideas for others to develop, in exchange for authorship?
What should I look for in strawberries at the market?
What are the most effective cat exercises?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What to do with a cold corner?
How do I keep my dog's water clean?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How do I make soft chapattis?
How should you respond to your teacher who cannot help you with a recommendation?
Can I apply for a post-doc in theoretical physics without publications?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
Do I need to file income taxes for my business if it made no money?
How can I make a chocolate syrup that can be frozen?
How do I make soft chapattis?
How did Bellator survive?
How can I replace a ceiling fan light pull chain?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
How much should I reveal about my book idea to a publishing house representative?
Should I tell prospective employer that I got a raise at my current job?
How to deal with a bedwetting teenager?
What's the best way to run a wire from inside my garage to the outside?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I insulate the floor of a room above a porch?
How do I repair water-damaged hardwood floors?
What should I do with my credit card debt?
Is it legal for a US citizen to travel to Cuba?
Is it safe to wire a plug-in sconce directly to the junction box?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
Can I say "No" politely for a task I'm not interested in doing?
What is the difference between a filler word and a discourse marker?
Where should I travel to see this building?
How do I repair my porcelain floor?
How to respond to a low salary offer?
How do I adjust for a door jamb that's thicker than the wall?
What could be causing my toilet to back up?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the difference between a Rollover IRA and a Roth IRA?
British citizen, why does my South-African wife need a visa to visit me in the UK?
How do I ask my boss to pay for an expense?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
How can I practice Climbing without the actual wall and/or equipment?
What's the best way to run a wire from inside my garage to the outside?
What to look for when choosing a new bathtub?
What's the difference between a "false cognate" and a "false friend"?
What is the best way to remove pet odor from concrete?
What should I look for in a new car (automobile)?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is this stucco-like finish called?
Why is my two way dimmer switch not working?
How long does it take to get into London from Southend airport?
How do I reduce the lemon acidity in apple soup?
How can you make gelatin at home?
How are Vanguard directors chosen?
What can I realistically do to raise my credit score?
How should I ground a GFCI to a metal box?
Can I enter a different schengen country before I enter the country of my student residence permit?
How can I repair my two sloping concrete slabs?
How do I convert a ceiling fan with 2 separate wall switches to a separate fan & light switch?
How to apply for a Schengen visa?
Can I continue to travel within the US on an expired visa?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How can I remove a really stuck screw?
Why is my furnace blowing hot air outside through a PVC pipe?
As Philippine do I need a transit visa on a cruise through Schengen countries and the UK and Ireland?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
Do we NEED to help a baby learn how to self-sooth? And how long can it take?
Why does the shower get cold when I flush, and how can I prevent it?
What can I do to make my writing fit the 1950s?
How can I repair the carpet around a new shower?
How long should it take to read a paper?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
How much vertical distance is it possible to make in a day?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
What is the relation between the words "Cossack" and "Kazakh"?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
Can anyone tell me what this is?
How do I avoid paying higher taxes on freelance work in the UK?
Where can I find a good vocabulary list?
When to apply for a new credit card?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
How can I locate and repair a leak?
Why is my dryer taking longer to dry clothes?
How does mobile home insurance work?
should I continue with this research?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How can I repair peeling finish on a faucet handle?
Why isn't my mini fridge getting cold?
Is it possible for a foreigner to drive through (mainland) China in a foreign-registered car?
What could cause my ceiling fan light to go off after 2 seconds of being on?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
How can I get rid of fleas?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
What is this vocal technique called?
How can I improve my piano sight reading?
How long can you keep chocolate in the freezer?
How can I remove paint from a wood deck so I can stain it?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
What is the significance of the cat?
What is the difference between balls in Test and ODI Cricket?
Should I put my résumé on LinkedIn when applying for a PhD?
How long should it take to read a paper?
How should I store beansprouts?
What's the most effective studying method?
What are some good strength exercises for marathon runners?
What does casual mean in this context?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
What language to use in Georgia (the country)? Is English widely spoken?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
Do I have to spend money with my credit card to increase my credit score?
How to get rid of oversleeping?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
What kind of socket is this?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
How should I control my voice while rapping?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
How to get my cat to stop being annoying at night?
Is there any difference between an article and a paper?
What are the most effective cat exercises?
Why does turning on one light turn off a different light?
Why did my brown beef stock end up yellow?
What exactly is a CV?
In the Avengers movie, why did they close the portal?
How do I secure an old aluminum/glass sliding door?
I added insulation to my attic rafters, but should I have left room for airflow?
How to teach a toddler how to treat a book?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
How can I stop this Shower faucet leak?
How do I know if my cat has worms?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How can I tell the difference between a rabbit and a cat?
Is there any difference between an article and a paper?
How can I control a bath fan with two lights through a single wire?
How common were horses at the beginning of the 20th century?
As Philippine do I need a transit visa on a cruise through Schengen countries and the UK and Ireland?
How do I clean a very dirty refrigerator?
What instrument is this?
How do I repair water-damaged hardwood floors?
What do I do if a professor at a foreign university doesn't respond to my emails?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
Should I look for a new job?
What is the actual difference between Graduate and Undergraduate texts?
How much does a tailpiece affect the overall sound quality of an electric guitar?
Is it safe to eat sprouted onions?
I want to record but am nervous about it, why, how to get ready?
Should I tell prospective employer that I got a raise at my current job?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
What are the differences between hot and cold roof systems?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
What is the best way to remove pet odor from concrete?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
Is it possible to use one thesis for two degrees?
Do I need to update my resume when not looking for a job?
What are the chances of getting into a PhD program in math after other pursuits in life?
Should I look for a new job?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How do I prevent water from streaming into my driveway?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How should you respond to your teacher who cannot help you with a recommendation?
What happened at the end of Rocky?
Is "Why We Get Fat: And What to Do About It" thesis correct?
What's the difference between a "false cognate" and a "false friend"?
Do I need to replace my hot water tank's pressure release valve?
What is the best way to remove pet odor from concrete?
How do I get a recruiter to stop bothering me?
What are some good strength exercises for marathon runners?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
How to judge the quality of my own paper?
What does this tablature notation mean?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
Do I need a teacher to learn violin?
How should I make a budget?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How do I prepare my home for a power outage?
How can I remove paint from a wood deck so I can stain it?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
How do I level a small yard?
After a job interview, is it inappropriate if I want to talk to an employee in private?
Which way does the air flow through my furnace?
What is the difference between EFTA and the EU?
How do I get play-doh out of the carpet?
What is the proper way to install a exterior door in brick/drywall wall?
Do I need to file income taxes for my business if it made no money?
How to tell when a muzzleloader nipple needs to be replaced?
What does it mean to write a song in a certain key?
What is causing my butter toffee to separate?
Is it legal for a US citizen to travel to Cuba?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
How do I adjust for a door jamb that's thicker than the wall?
Is it a good idea to link your LinkedIn profile in the CV section of your dissertation?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
Why is my washing machine making this sound?
Why doesn't my cat lick me?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
How can I make the best use of chocolate peppers?
OK we're all nerds here, so really, how on earth should I use a Japanese toilet?
How can you tell if someone is dehydrated?
How do I prevent water from streaming into my driveway?
What does "do." mean in old recipes?
What defines a unique writing style?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How do I replace a broken halogen bulb in the recessed light in my bathroom?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
What is the origin of cheese dip?
How can I say "Facebook will not get you anywhere"?
What could be wrong with my A/C unit?
How to strengthen my wrists?
How can I stop my cat's playful yet aggressive behavior?
Why didn't my pan-fried potato wedges turn out crispy?
How do I convert a ceiling fan with 2 separate wall switches to a separate fan & light switch?
How to get rid of oversleeping?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa for future date?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Would a Colombian citizen with Canadian residency need a transit visa for the UK?
How do I install switches in this box?
How do you remove mold from a tent?
How to remove construction adhesive from concrete?
Would a Colombian citizen with Canadian residency need a transit visa for the UK?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
Can I use a nickname for work?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Can I ask a company what I should wear to an interview?
What can I do to stop my fiberglass bathtub from squeaking?
Can I ask a company what I should wear to an interview?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
What should I do with my credit card debt?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
What is the best position to keep monitor?
Is there a list of online public transportation planners?
How can I repair a towel bar with one end ripped out of the wall?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How to remove a ticks on my dog?
My colleagues earn twice more than I do. How can I approach my employer for a fair salary?
How can I remove a really stuck screw?
Which reward / benefits credit card is the best value for the money in Canada?
I am a 2nd year undergraduate student. What should I do now to prepare for my PhD?
How to deal with company that doesn't set expectations or tasks for me?
Is it a bad writing practice to start sentences with a verb?
What is this vocal technique called?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
How to deal with a child in an "I can't" phase?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
Is it a bad writing practice to start sentences with a verb?
What is the origin of Dragons?
What is the best way to travel around Israel and Palestine?
How should I groom my dog?
What are refereed and non-refereed journals?
What are the advantages and disadvantages of using a thinner yoga mat?
How does muscle confusion work?
How do you remove mold from a tent?
How do I pump up water pressure in my shower?
How long should it take to read a paper?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
What is the significance of the scene with the cop near the end of The Artist?
Schengen visa for UK citizen?
How did the Vulgar Latin 'parabola' evolve to mean 'word'?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
What kind of socket is this?
How long will a whole turkey keep in a refrigerator?
What does the term "Out of the Furnace" refer to?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
Why did my Tiramisu Cake become dry?
What's the process to get an Indonesian tourist visa for a US citizen?
What can I replace Microsoft Money with, now that MS has abandoned it?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
How should I ground a GFCI to a metal box?
Why did the overseer leave Solomon to hang?
What can I do to bond with my premature baby?
Where does the concept of traffic keeping to the "right" side of the street originate?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is the meaning of "playing off the beat" and "playing on the beat"?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
Is there a difference between a manual and an automatic grinder?
How do I make my cheese "crackers" less greasy?
What can I eat the night before to help me get up in the morning?
I have a Schengen visa but my UAE Residence visa cancelled. Can I still travel then?
What should I do if a check gets lost in the mail?
How do I replace a broken bathtub drain?
How do I remove floorboard nails from joists?
Do I even need credit cards?
What could be wrong with my furnace?
What is the best way to remove pet odor from concrete?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
What kind of socket is this?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
What is the best way to travel around Israel and Palestine?
What could be causing my toilet to back up?
How do I help a child who is afraid of the dark?
How can I extend my Schengen seafarer's visa?
How do I make my own chocolate chips?
How to deal with company that doesn't set expectations or tasks for me?
What does the term "Out of the Furnace" refer to?
How to learn to play guitar with a slide ?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How can I prepare this old exterior wall for painting?
Why does my dog ignore the treats I try to give him when playing?
Must I enter Europe with Schengen visa from the country where I applied?
What kind of socket is this?
What to do with a cold corner?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
With FlightHub, How many days in advance should I book a ticket?
At which temperature and how long should I cook tilapia on the grill?
Which part of the GRE is more important to admissions committees?
How can I repair my relationship with my manager?
How do I level a pipe with the ground?
How can I determine what size main water meter is required?
What was the significance of fort Wilderness in the Patriot?
In a dialogue, how do you write that a character says a letter?
How can I prevent my ferrets from smelling bad?
What can I do to make my writing fit the 1950s?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
Should I negotiate if I'm offered more than what I initially asked for?
Should a phd student try present a review paper in a conference?
How can I deal with an employee that always arrives late?
What is the difference between case marking particles and adpositions?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How do I make my own chocolate chips?
What are the pros and cons of setting up a 529 plan for myself?
Can you book hotels on a prepaid credit card worldwide?
Can I use brown sugar instead of white sugar in making fruitcake?
What can I do to bond with my premature baby?
How to show skills through Evidence?
Why won't my new Craftsman garage door opener power on?
Is it better to take protein supplements before or after a workout?
What can I eat the night before to help me get up in the morning?
Schengen visa for UK citizen?
How can I keep my dog from chewing on and destroying things?
How should I finish around this hole in my slab?
How can I get rid of fleas?
Is it possible to get into a good masters program in computer science with a 3-3.5 GPA?
What is the best way to remove pet odor from concrete?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
What are the pros and cons of setting up a 529 plan for myself?
What are the pros and cons of eating 1-3 grapefruits every day?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa for future date?
What was the meaning of "21 grams"?
Do I even need credit cards?
How do I determine what size Generator I need?
How can I gain a lot of weight in one month?
How to stop feeling bad when you are leaving a company you like for a new job?
How do I level a pipe with the ground?
What does "the anointed of the Lord" mean?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How do I know if my cat has worms?
What is the difference between shawarma and gyros?
How can I stop my boiler from making all this noise?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
How can I remove grout and mortar from a drain?
What does the term "Boardroom poker" mean?
What does the circle around a note mean in a guitar chord diagram?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
Should I use IRA money to pay down my student loans?
What is the significance of the cat?
How long is the life of a shot of espresso?
How should I wake up my 4 year old?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
Do I need to hang a bear cache?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How to prepare gnocchi dough for mixed ingredients?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
How to deal with a bedwetting teenager?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How much more does a recommendation letter from alumni help in PhD admissions?
What is the best way to learn finger-picking on an acoustic guitar?
Do we NEED to help a baby learn how to self-sooth? And how long can it take?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa for future date?
What's the difference between "Wood Filler" and "Floor patch & Smoothing Compound"?
How do I make my own chocolate chips?
My cat is gaining too much weight, how often should I be feeding her?
How can I improve hvac air flow to my attic?
How should I store eggs in the refrigerator?
After a job interview, is it inappropriate if I want to talk to an employee in private?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
What should I look for in a new car (automobile)?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What is a good substitute for ground veal?
How do I determine what size Generator I need?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
What could be causing my toilet to back up?
How to get rid of oversleeping?
How can I add a GFCI receptacle on a circuit with split receptacles?
I have a Schengen visa but my UAE Residence visa cancelled. Can I still travel then?
Cheapest way to travel from Osaka Kansai airport to Kyoto and back?
Why would anyone buy a government bond?
What can I do if I have a colleague who is picking on me?
How can I keep my dog from barking when I don't know what he's barking at?
How to fix a leaking bath tub overflow drain?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What's the best way to reheat frozen boiled potatoes?
How can I proof-read my own work more effectively?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
What is the longest six in cricket history?
Where can I find an LED replacement for this CFL bulb?
How can I stop my fireplace from disabling my thermostat?
What kind of socket is this?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How can I get rid of fleas?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can you tell if someone is dehydrated?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
How do I properly prepare a deck for repainting?
What should I look for in strawberries at the market?
How to get from Rzeszów to Lviv?
What can I do to minimize my risk of being laid off?
How do I paint art onto a wall?
After a job interview, is it inappropriate if I want to talk to an employee in private?
What can I do to make driving in the rain at night easier?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How can I remove paint from a wood deck so I can stain it?
What's the difference between masa for tortillas and for tamales?
What are the pros and cons of eating 1-3 grapefruits every day?
Schengen visa for UK citizen?
How do you reduce static in a coffee grinder?
Is it possible to do a Master's in Mathematics after a Bachelor's in Economics?
How do I wire a combo with two supplies?
How can a ventless (gas) fire box be put in a wall safely?
How do I repair this broken pipe?
What skis should I buy?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How can I keep my dog from barking when I don't know what he's barking at?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
Should I tell prospective employer that I got a raise at my current job?
Must I enter Europe with Schengen visa from the country where I applied?
What could be wrong with my air conditioner?
What is the best way to treat feline ringworm?
What does the term "Out of the Furnace" refer to?
How to ask for an update on a potential opening?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How can I manage my Credit Card Debt in Australia?
Does grenadine need to be refrigerated?
What do I need to look for in a Y splitter for guitar?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
Should I switch to third person or continue in first person?
What is the origin of cheese dip?
What should I do to promote my books?
What would be a good substitute for Rice Wine?
How to select a workout plan?
What's the process to get an Indonesian tourist visa for a US citizen?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
How should I install a digital timer?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
Is it possible to do a Master's in Mathematics after a Bachelor's in Economics?
How to address a professor in letter?
How can I test a rabbit's vision?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
How can I remove 6-8 inches of concrete from a wooden floor?
How do I repair my porcelain floor?
What happened at the end of Rocky?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
How can I finish the edge of a mirrored wall?
What is the origin of Dragons?
How can you make gelatin at home?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
KORG TRITON LE, can I make my own sounds?
How can I remove a key that has broken off in a lock?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
How can I stop this Shower faucet leak?
Do I need to apply for ESTA?
Is it ok to use "and/or" in my dissertation?
How can I avoid windswept muffins in a convection oven?
How can I manage applying for 2 more jobs when I already have a part time job?
How do I troubleshoot my electric oven?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How can I tell whether a mathematics journal seems reputable?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How can I get my dog to take liquid vitamins from a dropper?
Do I need to apply for ESTA?
Should I tell prospective employer that I got a raise at my current job?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
What's the difference between a "false cognate" and a "false friend"?
What is the CBFC's definition of a Film?
How long does cooked TVP keep in the fridge?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How should I patch a large hole in brick?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
How should I store beansprouts?
What to look for when choosing a new bathtub?
Where do I attach the grounding conductor to my bedroom light fixture?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
Is it possible to do a Master's in Mathematics after a Bachelor's in Economics?
How can I replace a 3 wire thermostat with a 4 wire on baseboard electric heater?
Is it possible to patent recipes?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
Is it appropriate to call a professor for a recommendation on the weekend?
What olive is a good taste substitute for Kalamata?
How can I replace a ceiling fan light pull chain?
How do I comfortably and safely bathe my Whippet?
How can I make the best use of chocolate peppers?
How do I pump up water pressure in my shower?
How can I get my colleagues to stop interrupting me?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
Why does my washing machine leak only during the tumble dry cycle?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
Schengen visa for UK citizen?
What is the best way to treat feline ringworm?
What is the significance of the cat?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What happened at the end of Rocky?
What's the best way to avoid slipping on ice?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
How to prepare dried tortellini?
What can I do to fix store-bought mayonnaise that split?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is the best way to travel around Israel and Palestine?
What does the term "Out of the Furnace" refer to?
How should I install a thermostat for a baseboard heater?
What kind of plug adapter should I pack for India?
How can I get rid of springtails?
How do I keep my dog's water clean?
I need a new bank! How do I determine the financial stability of a bank in the US?
How can I get rid of fleas?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
What are the pros and cons of setting up a 529 plan for myself?
What is the best way to treat feline ringworm?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
What does casual mean in this context?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
How can I keep my dog from barking when I don't know what he's barking at?
Is it possible to patent recipes?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
How do I know if my cat has worms?
Can I travel to Paris with a type A multiple entry visa valid for 3 years?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
Why do you need to peel peaches to can them?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
How do I increase the height of a sliding glass door lock?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
Is it possible to create a professional music with Fl Studio?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
How do I clean a very dirty refrigerator?
How to apply for a Schengen visa?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
What does "the anointed of the Lord" mean?
How can I control a bath fan with two lights through a single wire?
Is ham safe to eat if it was at room temperature but is recooked?
How can I remove 6-8 inches of concrete from a wooden floor?
How do I measure a standard sliding glass door?
How to test if a toilet is leaking?
What effect does the gender of the narrator have on a story?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
Is it advisable to apply to more than one PhD program?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How to ask for a higher salary increase the second time?
How much water is too much?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How do I replace a broken halogen bulb in the recessed light in my bathroom?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What's the best way to introduce a chinchilla to a household with cats?
Why is there no water in the kitchen?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
What is a good substitute for ground veal?
How do I monitor what my kids do on the computer?
How to make crumbly cookies?
Should I negotiate if I'm offered more than what I initially asked for?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
How do I ask my boss to pay for an expense?
What is intonation and how can I find out if my guitar has correct intonation?
How can I be sure my water softener is working?
How do I wire a bathroom exhaust fan/light to two switches?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How can I tell if I'm planking correctly?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
How do I ask my boss to pay for an expense?
How to frame a door in a passageway?
What to do when your manager doesn't accept your vendor's answer about a bug?
If lost in the wilderness, what is the first thing I should do?
What could be causing my GFCI to trip?
How to get rid of oversleeping?
How do I determine what size Generator I need?
Should I agree to have more insulation added to my attic?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I get power to this garage?
How can I get rid of springtails?
Is it acceptable as referee to contact an author on a paper you review?
How can I add a GFCI receptacle on a circuit with split receptacles?
How can I prevent my ferrets from smelling bad?
Is there an alternative to Wikipedia?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
I was published in a journal on Beall's list - how bad is my mistake?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
How can I get rid of springtails?
What could be wrong with my air conditioner?
What is the origin of Dragons?
What does casual mean in this context?
How do I repair this broken pipe?
How can I replace a 3 wire thermostat with a 4 wire on baseboard electric heater?
How can I ask for a raise at my internship-turned-full time job?
How should I cite a screenshot in APA style for my student paper?
How should I understand time signature?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
How High Can I Raise My Lights?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
What is a good solo to learn in the Dorian mode?
What milestones should we be aware of when planning for our child?
What is the longest timespan depicted in a movie?
How do I cap a T junction on a roof ridge?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
Is it right to ask for a PhD position at a conference?
How should I wake up my 4 year old?
How can I remove a non-load bearing wall in my basement?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
How long does it take to get into London from Southend airport?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How can I make the ceiling black, non-permanently?
How long should meat be steamed for?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How long can I keep sauteed onions in the fridge?
When should I use italics in scientific writing?
As Philippine do I need a transit visa on a cruise through Schengen countries and the UK and Ireland?
How to best store scallions?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
How can I repair my two sloping concrete slabs?
Why doesn't my cat lick me?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
Do I need to write a bibliography?
What is the decision on my paper?
What are modes and how are they useful?
How to address a professor in letter?
What is the most effective way to filter your twitter stream?
Can I put a convection toaster oven over the range?
What kind of socket is this?
How can I build a porch enclosure?
How do I stop my dog from jumping on me?
How do I determine if a pipe is frozen?
What is the difference between shawarma and gyros?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How to make a strong mug of filter coffee without any Coffee machine?
Can you really teach how to play notes on the flute?
How can I increase the number of push-ups I can do?
How do I prepare a wall for backsplash tile?
How do you keep up with a toddler?
How much water is too much?
How do I repair this broken pipe?
What is the difference between EFTA and the EU?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
How to record and optimize sleep patterns?
How to apply for a Schengen visa?
What is the difference between balls in Test and ODI Cricket?
In a dialogue, how do you write that a character says a letter?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
How do I season wood on my own?
What instrument is this?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How can I control a bath fan with two lights through a single wire?
What do I do if a professor at a foreign university doesn't respond to my emails?
What is the best way to clean your clothes dryer exhaust?
What type of lag bolts should I use for a deck?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
How do I repair this broken pipe?
Is the reciprocity fee for US citizens only charged if you arrive at Santiago International Airport?
How do I paint art onto a wall?
How can I get my colleagues to stop interrupting me?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
What's the best way to introduce a chinchilla to a household with cats?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa for future date?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How much water is too much?
What's the best way to store potatoes and maximize their shelf-life?
What is the best way to treat feline ringworm?
Can I repair a plaster ceiling with drywall?
How does mobile home insurance work?
To what extent should a professor give students freedom to do independent research?
What is the significance of the cat?
How should I build a skid foundation for my shed?
What do I do with the neutral and ground when wiring a transfer switch?
What is a mezrag-holder?
How do I professionally quit a job I've realized is not for me?
What are the types of Guitar available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How do I fix a hole/gap between my shower tile and the dry wall next to it?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What are the guidelines for declaring for the MLB Draft?
What does "respectively" mean in the Tenth Amendment?
Should I be worried about tears in my foundation wrap?
What is this vocal technique called?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
What exactly is a CV?
How do I season wood on my own?
How long can a pitcher of tap water be left out, and still be drinkable?
How do I monitor what my kids do on the computer?
How long can I keep sauteed onions in the fridge?
How do I wire a bathroom exhaust fan/light to two switches?
What is the origin of Dragons?
What can I use to build temporary walls in an unfinished basement?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How can I control a bath fan with two lights through a single wire?
Does Apple’s Magic Trackpad put more stress on the hand, wrist and arm than a traditional mouse?
What is the difference between shawarma and gyros?
What does this tablature notation mean?
How do I use whole fresh tamarind?
How can I get rid of fleas?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
Where can I find an LED replacement for this CFL bulb?
How do i get my 1 yr old to sleep in his crib?
Does drinking alcohol cause problems at altitude?
How can I determine why my toilets are not flushing right?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
What is the easiest way to get rid of spilled glitter?
What is the significance of the cat?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Is a Paraguay multiple-entry visa valid for more than 90 days in total?
How can I locate and repair a leak?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How do I secure a vinyl window to the wall?
How do I secure a vinyl window to the wall?
How does Elimination Communication work?
How to increase conversational skills?
What are the properties I should look for in running shoes?
I'm an Indonesian citizen. Do I need a visa for South Korea?
Is it possible to travel from London to India while on an ICT visa in the UK?
How long does cooked TVP keep in the fridge?
What is the significance of the cat?
What should I look for in a jump rope?
What is the origin of Indian weekday names?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
How can I add a GFCI receptacle on a circuit with split receptacles?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What kind of spider web is this - and how do I get rid of it?
What is the best way to apply Shellac-based primer?
What could be wrong with my furnace?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
When buying a backpack, what should I pay attention to?
Will I have to clear customs In Heathrow when traveling from US to Lisbon?
What is the significance of the cat?
I attended an Olympiad for student and failed. How should I write this down on my CV?
How to learn to play guitar with a slide ?
How long can I safely keep a thawing pork shoulder in the fridge?
Do Bangladeshi citizens need transit visa in Malaysia?
What exactly is a CV?
How can I move beyond learning songs?
What is the function of "-ter" in words "laughter" and "daughter"?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
How can I repair my relationship with my manager?
What does it mean to write a song in a certain key?
I'm an Indonesian citizen. Do I need a visa for South Korea?
How can I remove a key that has broken off in a lock?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
Would a Colombian citizen with Canadian residency need a transit visa for the UK?
What is the best way to calculate total yield on a stock portfolio?
How do I make my own chocolate chips?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What are some good next steps for the HENRY?
How can I help my dog adjust to a move?
How can I get myself writing again?
What could be wrong with my furnace?
What is the best way to learn finger-picking on an acoustic guitar?
What is the term for the "amuse-bouche" at the end of the meal?
What is a good solo to learn in the Dorian mode?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
How do I repair my porcelain floor?
How long does cooked TVP keep in the fridge?
Why isn't the switch working to turn off my ceiling lamp after I replaced a fan w/light?
How long should I wait between grout application and sealant?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
Where can I find good toys suggestions for each age group?
What kind of socket is this?
How to remove a stuck flexible installer bit?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
is it worth it to get a recruiter in a different country?
What could be wrong with my A/C unit?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I increase the number of push-ups I can do?
How do I add in-floor heating to a small area?
What are the pros and cons of Jefferson vs conventional deadlifts?
Should I look for a new job?
How do I determine if a paper has been plagiarized?
What are Automatic Garage Door Options for a Garage with a Low Ceiling Clearance?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
UK visa decision advice?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
What are the pros and cons of buying a house using an FHA loan?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How to fix a leaking bath tub overflow drain?
How long can you keep chocolate in the freezer?
Why does my asparagus turn out too chewy?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How does Paying credit card in full VS paying with interest will affect your credit score?
How can I get myself writing again?
What is the difference between mono and stereo?
What is the best way to shorten legs on a table and chairs?
What is the best way to store my sleeping bag for long periods of time?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How do I make soft chapattis?
What is the relation between the words "Cossack" and "Kazakh"?
What does a piano teacher do?
How long can you keep chocolate in the freezer?
How can I take apart this kind of tap to replace the washer?
What is the relation between the words "Cossack" and "Kazakh"?
Is it a good idea to tell my programmer colleagues that I actually code for fun?
What's the process to get an Indonesian tourist visa for a US citizen?
What's the difference between stroganoff and goulash?
How can I find out why my washing machine trips the outlet?
Did I do a shoddy wiring job on a ceiling fan?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How to peel peaches?
Should I contact a PhD student or his supervisor for potential collaboration?
How should I choose which graduate programs to apply to for the PhD?
What could cause the battery in a smoke detector to heat up?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How should I patch a large hole in brick?
How long does it take for sugar to get to the hard ball stage?
Is it possible to bring a bicycle on a plane?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
How can I improve my piano sight reading?
How does the USDA grading system work?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How do you go about calculating how much you need after retirement?
Can anyone tell me what this is?
How can I work out how valuable I am to my boss and company?
What is the best way to store my sleeping bag for long periods of time?
How to encourage a toddler to swallow his food?
How do I convert a ceiling fan with 2 separate wall switches to a separate fan & light switch?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How do I remove a panel from the ceiling of my side porch?
What is the difference between a stock and a bond?
How to make good coffee in a Moka pot?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
How do I improve heating in back room of house?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
What could be causing my GFCI to trip?
How do I help a child who is afraid of the dark?
How did the Vulgar Latin 'parabola' evolve to mean 'word'?
How long will a whole turkey keep in a refrigerator?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for a layover in the UK?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
What is the best way to repair a cracked bathtub?
What could be causing my GFCI to trip?
Is there any difference between an article and a paper?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
Why isn't my mini fridge getting cold?
What is a good substitute for ground veal?
Can I easily reach Salar de Uyuni in Bolivia, from Puno, Titicaca lake in Peru?
What do I need to look for in a Y splitter for guitar?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
What is the difference between mono and stereo?
How can I repair my relationship with my manager?
What kind of socket is this?
How do I teach my toddler to chew his food?
How do I stop my daughter from hitting another child?
What can I do to fix water coming up from floor drain?
What is the difference between mono and stereo?
What could be wrong with my furnace?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
What window part do I need for this window?
How to test if a toilet is leaking?
How do I test the functionality of a sump pump?
Is it inappropriate to spend personal resources for the company's benefit?
Digital era threatens tenuous future of drive-ins
Jessica Lal murder convict Manu Sharma gets 15-day parole
UN to hold emergency DR Congo talks
Iran and IAEA resume nuclear talks
Thai protesters storm army headquarters
40 Still Missing in Deadly Canada Oil Train...
Raghuram Rajan to step into eye of rupee storm
Iran Foreign Ministry to lead nuclear talks
De Blasio sworn in as New York mayor, succeeding Bloomberg
US presses Iraq on reports of arms deal with Iran
Narendra Modi appointed PM, swearing-in on May 26
Minn. man claims share of $448M Powerball jackpot
Driver backs into stroller with child, drives off
George Zimmerman arrested after disturbance call
Halliburton pleads guilty to destroying Gulf spill evidence
Spain Princess Testifies in Historic Fraud Probe
More MH17 bodies leave Ukraine
Lewis Hamilton holds off Nico Rosberg in thrilling Spanish Grand Prix
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria
TSA drops effort to allow small knives on planes
Snowden leaves Moscow airport
Morsi supporters rally in Egypt, army shows muscle
US stocks edge up after positive economic reports
Bachelet set for big win in two-woman poll showdown
North Korea proposes high-level talks with US
Senate confirms Obama nominee to key appeals court
Bangladesh sentences British, US citizen to hang
N Korea launches three short-range guided missiles
Obama Begins Africa Trip in Senegal
Beverly Hills demands Brunei sultan sell hotel
Britain aims to be first Western country to issue Islamic bond
Angelina Jolie's Aunt Dies Of Breast Cancer
Bangladesh factory collapse owners arrested
Apple files for 'iWatch' trademark
Quick crossword - Friday 31st May
Assad Says Syria Will Allow Access to Chemical Sites
Maple Leafs Top Canadiens for 4th Straight Win
Benetton, new retailers to sign Bangladesh safety pact
Rolf Harris charged with child sex offences
Abdullah Abdullah widens lead in Afghan presidential vote
7.2 Quake Hits Central Philippines, Killing 6
Israel 'resumes Gaza offensive'
Berlusconi expelled from Italian Senate
Israel shoots down rocket near Egypt's border
U.N. rights chief presses Egypt on Mursi detention
'Fast &amp; Furious' star Paul Walker dies in car crash
Obama Says He's Having a 'Great Time' on Vacation
Liquid ammonia leak kills 15 in Shanghai
Hong Kong rally organisers arrested
EU foreign ministers to discuss Egypt violence
Google agrees to sell Motorola to Lenovo
Scores dead, 1,000 injured in China earthquake
US Senate confirms Janet Yellen as US Federal Reserve chief
Heavy smog hits north China city, flights cancelled
Bombs and Gun Battle Kill at Least 16 in Somali Capital
UN rights council launches Sri Lanka war crimes probe
North West mining royalties misused, says inquiry report
Syrian Rebel Groups Battle Each Other in North
Pope Francis to make first visit to Holy Land
Chemicals weapons watchdog OPCW wins Nobel Peace Prize
Heineken H1 profits fall on lower sales volumes
UN to vote on MH17 resolution
Nelson Mandela dies aged 95 new
Mayawati demands president's rule in Kashmir
Quiz crossword - Friday 31st May
Egypt bans Muslim Brotherhood
Tokyo wins race to host 2020 Olympic Games
Uganda's president signs anti-gay bill
Manchester City Win Premier League Title
Angelina Jolie's Aunt Dies Of Breast Cancer
Rocks, Tear Gas Fly as Thai Protests Heat Up
Boston bombing suspect buried in Virginia
Boston bombing suspect buried in Virginia
Iran and UN sign agreement on Syria assistance
U.N. inspectors arrive in Damascus on chemical weapons hunt
Obama cancels Moscow meeting with Putin
Six dead in Philippine restaurant blast
Egypt 'freezes Muslim Brotherhood assets'
Man arrested outside John Kerry's house in US
Bryan Cranston WILL return as Walter White for Breaking Bad spin off, report claims
Six Cambodian opposition party members charged with insurrection
China army newspaper hits out at US's PRISM programme
Silvio Berlusconi expelled from Italy's parliament
Tokyo to host 2020 Olympic Games
Japan Upper House Vote to Set Ruling Bloc's Power
EDL leaders arrested during march to Woolwich
Mass grave outside Mexico City
Snowden's hopes of leaving airport dashed
AirAsia X hopes to raise up to $372 million from IPO
Obama signs bill aimed at blocking Iran's UN envoy
Death toll from Egypt political violence rises to 421
Thai Prime Minister To Dissolve Parliament
Michael Schumacher is in a STABLE condition - according to his manager Sabine Kehm
Turkish police storm Taksim Square
Conservative leader Abbott expected to win Australia election
Karzai Says Afghanistan will not be a Repeat of Iraq
Wing walker pilot die in crash at US air show
Child abuse videos will be wiped from web
Mandela laid to rest
Texas senator still filibustering abortion bill
RFK killer moved to new prison on anniversary of JFK assassination
Australia returns asylum seekers to Sri Lanka
US Capitol in Washington in lockdown after shots fired
Two killed in Bahrain car explosion
Chemical arms watchdog wins Nobel Peace Prize
Tropical Storm Andrea heading for North Florida
Syria hands over last of declared chemical weapons, monitor says
Egypt's Sisi sworn in as president
Soccer Ref Punched by Player Dies
Ukraine says insurgents attack border guards
Suicide car bomb kills 30 in Baghdad cafe-police, medics
Obama pressures Republicans to raise debt ceiling, end shutdown
North Korea to restart Yongbyon nuclear reactor
Top judge Mansour sworn in as Egypt interim president
British actor Bob Hoskins dies at 71
Venezuela's Maduro pledges continued alliance with Cuba
Obama sweats over sweaters during NY shopping stop
Stocks rise after Summers exits Fed race
Trayvon could have been me
Python kills security guard near Bali luxury hotel
Obama to Meet S'Korean Leader
Russia warns it will respond if interests attacked in Ukraine
Renowned Spanish flamenco guitarist Paco De Lucia dies
Belgian King Albert II to step down in favor of son
Suicide truck bomber kills 11 in northern Iraq
Suicide bomber kills 15 in central Somalia
Hundreds evacuated as Indonesia volcano erupts
Latest storm brings more snow to US East Coast
Aid gets to Philippines typhoon survivors
NTU drops to 82nd in world university rankings
Buddhist mob attacks mosque in Sri Lanka, 7 injured
Machete-wielding student aimed for carnage
Bangladesh building death toll tops 500
Man sets himself on fire on the National Mall
Hosni Mubarak retrial adjourned until 8 June
US drone strike kills eight in Waziristan
Australia leader ousted in snap leadership vote
Manila charges Chinese on reef crash
Israel carries out routine missile test in Mediterranean
Boston Marathon bombing suspect buried in Virginia
Bangladesh court sentences 152 border guards to death over 2009 mutiny
Protesters gather in Brazil despite concessions
Egypt protesters defy cabinet threat to end sit-ins
'Fast &amp; Furious' star Paul Walker dies in car crash at 40
Car bombs kill 20 in Turkish town near Syrian border
Oscar-winning actor Philip Seymour Hoffman found dead
Turkey could deploy army to quell protests
Dame Vivienne Westwood joins fracking protesters
Sen. Mark Kirk announces support for same-sex marriage
Couple marry in the UK's first Scientology wedding
China launches longest-ever manned space mission
UK has 'paid a very high price' in Afghanistan, says David Cameron
Russian opposition leader under house arrest
Two explosions at Boston marathon
Senate confirms Janet Yellen as chair of US Federal Reserve
Syria opposition agrees to talks
Clegg and Farage are both 'quite extreme' over Europe, says Cameron
Asiana Airlines Boeing 777 crashes on landing at San Francisco airport
Sweden court upholds arrest warrant for WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange
Uganda's president signs anti-gay bill
Qatar's emir hands power to his son
Carlo Ancelotti named Real Madrid boss
Easing of concerns over Syria boosts global stocks
Philippines typhoon death toll feared to hit 7,000
Egypt braces for 'Friday of anger' after carnage
Divers find human remains on site of Italy cruise ship wreck
Nelson Mandela Leaves Hospital After 10 Days
Mobile home fire kills man, 5 kids in Ohio
Japanese politician arrested in China on drug charges
New York train derailment kills four, injures 70
Red Sox Beat Tigers 5-2 to Advance to World Series
African nations press U.N. Security Council to suspend Kenya case
Microsoft announces 18,000 job cuts in reorganization
More than 1,000 inmates escape Libyan prison
Dutch couple kidnapped in Yemen appeals for release
China lands Jade Rabbit robot rover on Moon
Malaysia Airlines plane 'shot down' in Ukraine
Philippines welcomes its 100 millionth citizen
US embassy in Israel celebrates Fourth of July
Microsoft CEO Ballmer to retire in a year
Protesters celebrate in Istanbul square
37 missing, two dead after boat sinks off Malaysia
Obama lashes North Korea as pariah state
Manning says he is female, wants to live as a woman
Libya's former prosecutor general shot dead
More French soldiers to Central African Republic
Hagel Says U.S. Still Seeks 'International Coalition on Syria
Phil Mickelson wins British Open with superb final round
Bangladesh garment factory owners surrender to court over homicide charges
James Gandolfini dies aged 51
Bangladesh collapse death toll passes 620
Petkovic, Halep into French Open semis
Ukrainian parliament dismisses president
Venezuela lawmakers brawl amid election tensions
Cyclone leaves trail of destruction in India
Hezbollah leader vows to continue Syria fight
Israel PM says ground offensive in Gaza under way
IMF approves $17 billion loan for Ukraine
North Korea Warns Foreigners in South, Advising Evacuation
Abortion vote delayed amid debate Irish politicians will spend a second day debating divisive laws that will legislate for the first time for abortion in limited circumstances.
Israel hits back after rockets fired from Lebanon
Captain of sunken South Korean ferry arrested
Four dead in Navy Yard shooting
Everest avalanche kills six sherpas
Sectarian Clashes in Northern Lebanese City Kill 8
Taliban chief killed in Pakistan drone strike
Berlusconi expelled from Italian Senate
Obama to tap Charlotte mayor to run Transportation
Ferry sinks in collision in Philippines; 24 dead
Divided Syria opposition debates joining peace talks
Daughter says Mick Jagger to be great-grandfather
Interpol issues arrest notice for 'white widow'
U.S. woman pleads guilty to killing 2 Ontario tourists
Obamas to Attend Mandela Memorial in Johannesburg
Pakistan freeing 7 more Taliban prisoners
California wildfire spreads into Yosemite National Park
North Korea releases Australian missionary
Cars, drivers plunge into river after Wash. I-5 bridge collapse
NFL Seeks $1.5M From M.I.A. Over Super Bowl Finger
4 Saudis held over Tanzania bombing
Obama canceled meeting with Putin
Israel confirms strike on Syria targeted weapons
West Indies too good for Bangladesh
'Trayvon could have been me'
Minimum alcohol pricing would save 860 lives a year, study finds
Iran's president-elect calls Israel a 'wound' on Muslim world
Margaret Thatcher dies of stroke aged 87
Death toll in Syria now tops 100,000
Firefighters perish in Arizona blaza
France deports Tunisian accused of jihadist recruitment for Syria
Two members of Pussy Riot punk band arrested in Sochi
Adele named richest young musician
Tropical Storm Andrea approaches Fla.'s Gulf Coast
UN invites Iran to Syria peace talks
Afghan President Delays Signing Deal with US
Strong new quake hits shattered Pak region
Drone Strike Kills al-Shabab Militant in Somalia
Amazon's Bezos rescued by Ecuadorian Navy
Captain of sunken South Korean ferry arrested
Germany Crushes Brazil in World Cup Semifinal
Communist rebels ambush Philippine police, kill 7
Egypt's Morsi faces trial for prison break, murder, says prosecution
Iran Nuclear Talks Enter Third Day
At Least 22 Dead After China Earthquake
Jurors find Jodi Arias eligible for death penalty
US urges North Korea to release detainee
Turkish riot police move into Taksim Square - live updates
Bolshoi ballet chief confronts alleged attacker in court
Asiana jet crash lands at San Francisco airport
Legendary author Maya Angelou dies at age 86
Hollande 'threatens legal action' after affair allegations
Hong Kong set for huge democracy rally on handover anniversary
Egypt's Hosni Mubarak to be freed soon
British actor Bob Hoskins dies at 71
UN Syria inspectors head to alleged chemical attack site
Thai army declares martial law
Demolition work begins on Don Valley Stadium
Two dead after Boeing 777 crash lands at San Francisco airport
Stocks higher at midday as Black Friday unfolds
Blast in Pakistani city of Peshawar kills 14
Nibali seals Tour de France win
Woman dies while riding roller coaster in Texas
Scottish oil worker shot dead in Brazil
Jos. A. Bank buys Eddie Bauer
Brazil boss Luiz Felipe Scolari backs England to impress at 2014 World Cup
Nobel author Doris Lessing dies at 94
British woman dies on cross-channel charity swim
31 Dead, 90 Injured in China Marketplace Bombing
Over 100 dead as typhoon slams central Philippines
Siemens boss to asked to leave firm after poor results
Rafael Nadal beats Novak Djokovic to win ninth French Open title
First post office savings bank ATM opens in Chennai
Israel agrees to 12 hour ceasefire
Twitter reports blocking in Venezuela
GOP Sen. Mark Kirk backs same-sex marriage
Fast-moving New Mexico blaze causes evacuations
Quake of 6.2 magnitude strikes off Indonesia's Sumatra - USGS
Kerry says doubling U.S. non-lethal aid to Syrian opposition
Egypt's Mubarak to be freed from jail, lawyer says
G7 leaders to 'move swiftly' to impose new sanctions against Russia
Syrian opposition wants rebel backing for Geneva talks
US Supreme Court limits president's recess appointments power
Strongman Sisi sworn in as Egypts President
Three held over dissident republican activity
Obama Praises Mandela 'Inspiration'
China airs confession by detained blogger amid online rumor crackdown
Three women missing for a decade found alive in Cleveland home
British stuntman fell to his death in wing suit mishap
Nazi War Criminal Dies at 100
Rolf Harris Faces Three More Assault Charges
One dead, eight missing after ships collide off Japan
Deutsche Telekom profit up, sees rebound in US
Thailand Trains to south halted by suspected bomb
Yakuza loans scandal claims second lender
Euro crisis is over, says France's Francois Hollande
What makes India vote? Jaipur Lit Fest debates
Cyclone Phailin leaves trail of destruction, cyclone intensity weakens
Golden Dawn chief remanded in custody pending trial
'De-Americanised world needed after US shutdown'
Signals from missing Malaysia Airlines plane located in Vietnam
French troops pour into Central African Republic
Four Kenyans injured in South Sudan clashes
Pistorius neighbour 'heard screams'
Powerful blast causes injuries in Prague
Deal reached on Iran nuclear program
Microsoft to cut 18,000 jobs in overhaul
Iran needs more nuclear power plants
Canadian actor August Schellenberg dies in Dallas
French Soldier Stabbed In The Neck In Paris
White diamond breaks record in Hong Kong auction
Saudi Arabia declines United Nations Security Council seat
Iraqi Car Bomb Near Church Kills At Least 14
Italy's Letta names new government
Israel agrees to temporary Gaza humanitarian truce
Chinese satellite spots large object in search area
Three-year-old child among injured in Chicago shooting
Standard Chartered H1 net profit down 24%
Clashes in Istanbul extend into night in Taksim
Code red sirens heard in Hof Ashkelon Regional Council
Dutch Experts Headed to MH17 Crash Site
US-Born Rossi Left off Italy's World Cup Squad
Goa building collapse death toll touches 15
Landmark Rwanda genocide trial opens in France
Russell whirlwind century stuns Tigers and sets up HPC win
Death Toll Hits 238 in Bangladeshi Building Collapse
Pak religious body endorses underage marriage
Building collapse in Philadelphia injures at least 12
JPMorgan to pay $1.7 billion to settle Madoff case
Nineteen wounded in shootings at Mother's Day parade in New Orleans
4 French journalists freed after 10 months in Syria
Treasury proposal sees 1.5% increase in income tax
Russian Opposition Leader Navalny Detained Briefly In Moscow
Blast at Japan chemical plant kills 5, injures 17
A US hijacker returns from Cuba
Holland loses triple-A credit rating
Strong new quake hits shattered Pak region
Pawar sparks row with 'bogus voting' remark
Malaysia Airlines flight shot down in eastern Ukraine
Pakistan PM in Kabul to discuss peace talks
EU Ministers of Employment and Social policy will discuss how to boost employment, integrate social and economic policies
U.N. Security Council calls for humanitarian ceasefire in Gaza
Shenzhen market fire kills 15
Bodies of beheaded fishermen found on boat
U.S. Extends Some Embassy Closures over Qaida Threat
AstraZeneca rejects 'final' Pfizer offer
Putin soon to pardon tycoon Khodorkovsky
Riot police disperse protesters in Istanbul park
North Korea launches short-range missiles
Madagascar's Presidential Results Trickle In
Soldiers take part in fire drill in NE China
Anti-Hezbollah protester shot dead in Beirut
Ukraine doesn't respond to Russian 'provocation'
Hawaii Senate Passes Gay Marriage
South Sudan government, rebels set for New Year's Day talks
Hamas Urges Hizbullah to Pull Fighters Out of Syria
Hezbollah commander killed outside Beirut home
Starbucks pays first UK corporation tax since 2009
Controversial cop who pepper-sprayed seated students during OWS protest seeks workers compensation for psychiatric injury
Philip Seymour Hoffman Found Dead With Needle in Arm
Turkish court ruling would block disputed park project
5 key Lao officials killed in plane crash
Helicopter crashes into roof of Glasgow club
Russia's Channel One Journalist Killed in Ukraine's Donetsk
Afghans Tally Votes in Landmark Presidential Runoff Election
Flash floods kill 58 in eastern Afghanistan
Turnout low, Egypt extends presidential vote a day
U.S. and Russia reach a deal on Syria's chemical weapons
Egypt regime hails passage of new constituion
Four jailed for killing Roma in spree that shocked Hungary
Cambodian opposition retracts claim of election win
Twitter Prices IPO At $26 Per Share, Raising $1.82B
PSNI failed RUC officers, tribunal told
10 injured in San Francisco plane crash
Stocks edge lower following retail earnings
Belgian King Albert II to abdicate in favor of his son
Iranian Rial Climbs 10 Percent as Hopes Grow Over New President
Pistorius Pleads 'Not Guilty' at Start of Murder Trial
Police helicopter crashes into Scottish pub
Malaysian plane's pilots under scrutiny
Boston bombing suspect captured
German Chancellor Angela Merkel reduces appointments after skiing accident
U.S., Chinese warships nearly collide in South China Sea
Soldier stabbed in Paris
4 French journalists freed after 10 months in Syria
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria weapons
First book printed in America sells for record $14.2 million
White House statement on Crimean referendum
US ups pressure on Israel as UN demands Gaza truce
Australian government sticks to Huawei ban
UN chief boots Iran out of Syria peace talks
Anthony Weiner's campaign manager quits
Tornado hits Oklahoma City suburb
Daughter and son-in-law of elderly couple found buried in their back garden are charged with murder
Sisi sworn in as Egypt's president
Japanese planes flew into China's new defense zone
Russia Drops Charges Against 29 Greenpeace Crew
Taliban militants storm Pakistan prison, freeing hundreds of 'dangerous terrorists'
Brazil military rule torturer dead
Israel Accuses Syria of Using Chemical Weapons
Yale uni in lockdown after gunman sighted
'23% have lost track of pension'
Australian PM says 'Very confident' signals are from black box
Syrian opposition awaits invitation to Geneva peace talks
US Issues Travel Alert Over Al Qaeda Threat
Nobel author Doris Lessing dies at 94
Mt Gox reveals 200,000 'forgotten' bitcoin haul
Deadly clashes as Egypt marks anniversary
Mandela's condition has 'improved'
New York funeral planned for Conn. woman killed in Capitol car chase
Chinese lunar rover lands on moon
Florida US Rep. Bill Young dies at 82
Eurozone unemployment heading for 20 million
Cypriot Finance Minister Michalis Sarris resigns
Guests found dead in swimming pool at luxury hotel had drowned
4 injured in blast near Egypt's Sharqiya Military Intelligence HQ
Death toll rises in Pakistan church suicide bombing
Earthquake of 6.9 magnitude strikes off Indonesia island
Senate moves forward on immigration bill
Fox News anchor charged after airport arrest
Boy, 14, arrested for sex attacks around a university campus
Philippe becomes king of Belgium
Australian spirits high says Clarke
3 Chinese tourists killed in Pakistan
Duchess of Cambridge and royal baby 'doing well'
Two planes nearly collide at central Vietnam airport
Israelis, Palestinians kick off peace talks
Welsh councils 'largely unprepared' for scale of budget cuts
India anti-graft party takes charge in New Delhi
Spain approves new restrictive abortion law
Bangladesh to allow unions for garment workers
Cleveland Kidnapper Ariel Castro Dead in Jail Cell
Teen survives five-hour flight to Hawaii 'in airplane wheel well'
Carphone Warehouse and Dixons confirm all-share 'merger of equals'
Plane debris may have sunk
Spain opposition demands prime minister resign
Four arrested as Bangladesh building toll rises to 352
Government approves prisoners' release
Obama orders Syria 'gas attack' inquiry
Two U.S. astronauts set to make Christmas Eve spacewalk for repair job
Microsoft says to cut up to 18,000 jobs
RF urges its partners to denounce Kiev authorities' actions in Ukraine's southeast
'Dozens injured' after Texas fertiliser plant explosion
Angkor Wat gets Google's street view
Mandela responding to treatment, says South Africa's Zuma
Former-FM Lieberman acquitted of allegations
Dolce and Gabbana Fined in Italian Tax Case
Dozens still missing after Canada train blaze
Two confirmed dead after passenger jet crashes in San Francisco
NATO soldier killed in Afghan attack
Microsoft CEO Ballmer to retire within 12 months
Explosion hits fertilizer plant in Texas
17 Wounded in Shooting at New Orleans Parade
Democrat De Blasio takes Big Apple
Egypt's Interior Minister survives an assassination bid
World powers, Iran clinch 'historic' nuclear deal
German ambassador's Athens residence shot at
Unmanned Russian rocket crashes after launch in Kazakhstan
Diana Nyad completes record swim on fifth try
US government shutdown begins - live updates
Afghanistan praised for historic elections
Kenya minister says 59 killed in mall attack
Two Slovaks Killed in Kabul Suicide Car Bomb
Palestinians celebrate prisoner release
Ukraine's jailed opposition icon Tymoshenko walks free
Diplomats gather to plan Syria peace conference
Powerful earthquake hits off Chile, triggers tsunami
Oklahoma examines what went wrong in botched execution
Snowboarder buried alive after ice tunnel on Mount Hood collapses as he was passing through it
Napolitano elected for second term as Italy president
Two killed in Chile forest fire
US scientists awarded Nobel prize for chemistry for work on computer modelling
More than 100 injured in Texas plant blast
Bale scores on debut as Real Madrid draw at Villarreal
UN court convicts 6 Bosnian Croats of atrocities
U.S. accuses Russia of sending tanks into eastern Ukraine
Toronto rapper Drake gets 4 Grammy nominations
Israel to free Palestinian prisoners over Kerry talks
South Korea to tax cosmetic surgery jobs, religious figures
Putin challenges US on Syria claims
Mixed reactions to NZ same-sex marriage
Government approves prisoners' release
Israel to free Palestinian prisoners as deal to resume peace talks emerges
Fire destroys ancient Tibetan town in China
At least 95 dead as Egypt declares State of Emergency
HM King Hamad Receives Hindu BAPS Delegation
EU foreign ministers to discuss Syria arms embargo
Pro-Russian Mob Attacks Prosecutor Office in Ukraine's Donetsk
Egypt minister survives assassination attempt
Scores killed in Iraq attacks
Shingles vaccine for the elderly
UN gunships strike Ugandan Muslim rebels in DR Congo
Russia raises alarm over Israeli missile test in Mediterranean
U.S. warns North Korea against missile launch
Dave Lee Travis pleads not guilty to all charges
Scientists hope comet-chaser spacecraft wakes up
Saudi man with pressure cooker arrested at Detroit airport
Breaking: Comic actor Mel Smith dies of heart attack aged 60
Twitter unveils its IPO filing
Chidambaram questions IMF's growth projection
Co-op Bank Boss Quits Amid Moody's Downgrade
Putin calls for troops to be sent to Ukraine
U.S. stocks inch up after encouraging jobs reports
Myleene Klass makes DEC Philippines appeal
AstraZeneca pays $4.1bn to buy Bristol-Myers Squibb out of diabetes alliance
World mourns South Africa peace icon Mandela
Search for pilot of NY Angel Flight resumes
Bangladesh sentences 152 to death for 2009 mutiny
Rousseff says Brazil can do better
Mandela not 'vegetative' - govt
Sinaloa drug chief captured in Mexico
Britain Rules Out Military Action In Syria
Matt Smith quits BBC's Doctor Who
23:21 US Senate to vote on gun checks
Car bomb explodes in Beirut's Hezbollah stronghold
Russian protest leader denounces 'political' trial
Arab Idol winner given hero's welcome in Gaza
Gunfire rocks DR Congo capital
North Korea says to put US citizen on trial
At least 239 people feared dead as Malaysian airlines jet vanishes off Vietnam
Two hundred missing in Philippines ferry disaster
Anti-China protests spread across Vietnam
Three possible motives behind Israel's recent airstrike on Syria
Microsoft says to cut up to 18,000 jobs
Nidal Hasan Guilty in 2009 Fort Hood Shooting Rampage
FTC accuses T-Mobile of charging its customers for fraudulent cell phone spam
Jury deliberates as Dana brother accused of sex abuse
Obama 'heartbroken' at another Fort Hood shooting
Syria agrees to UN probe into chemical attack
Afghan Taliban attack near Kabul airport
Boeing jumbo jet plane lands at wrong airport
Death toll rises to 13 in Goa building collapse
Additional aid approved for Texas fertilizer plant blast
Thai protests escalate amid violence
Indian PM Singh to step down after 2014 elections
Three survive US-Canada bridge collapse
Gunmen in Nairobi launch attack on mall, kill 30
Death toll from typhoon Rammasun rises to 17 in China
3 Suspects Taken Into Custody in Boston Bombing Case
Egypt imposes state of emergency after 95 people killed
Giant Wildfire Threatens Yosemite Park
Tokyo stocks close 0.49pc lower
Kerry Looks to China to Defuse Korea Tensions
All set for National Economic Forum Tuesday
White South Africans' uneasy love affair with Mandela
Taiwan politicians scuffle over nuclear bill
Snowden, US intelligence whistleblower, nominated for Nobel Peace Prize
Obama to Press China on Cybersecurity
Cable warns on Help to Buy 'bubble'
Facebook pulls beheading video
Connecticut adopts strictest gun control laws in US
UN to hold emergency DR Congo talks
Deadly explosions hit Boston Marathon in US
Taliban video shows handover of US soldier
Egypt's new consitution explained
Obama to visit Robben Island in Mandela tribute
Israel launches ground operation in Gaza
78 killed in Pak church bombing
Malaysians vote in polls for stability or change
Kerry in Egypt on first visit since Morsi ouster
Prince George christened by archbishop in London
Philippines readies for mass burials
Rallies demand 'Justice for Trayvon'
1000 Estimated Dead After Typhoon Rips Through Philippines
Sir Jon Cunliffe to join Bank of Engalnd as deputy governor
Mighty Mickelson wins Open at last
Death penalty for heroin traffickers in Vietnam
Sexual assault a 'scourge' on US military, Hagel says
Saudi women's driving kicks off without arrests
Bomb in Damascus kills 13 day after attack on prime minister
UN warns of plight of women, children in Syria's Homs
Algeria's President Bouteflika in hospital
Nobel Prize-winning South African writer Nadine Gordimer dead at 90
Redford touts Alberta economy ahead of vote on leadership
Hagel, Dempsey face Congress over defense budget
Sony to sell PC unit and cut jobs
Two explosions rock Boston marathon at finishline
Cambodian opposition says poll irregularities worst ever
Mahathir resigns as adviser to Petronas
Crimea Votes to Leave Ukraine for Russia
Man kills 4 in Calif. before police shoot him dead
Iran Nuclear Talks Conclude Without A Deal
Spain train-crash driver accused of 'recklessness'
Still no sign of Malaysian airline lost in unprecedented mystery
Petra Kvitova schools Eugenie Bouchard in Wimbledon women's final
N. Korea Deports Elderly American
Nelson Mandela making "amazing progress" as world celebrates his 95th birthday
Retiring cricket legend Sachin Tendulkar recieves India's highest civilian award
Taliban attack presidential palace in Afghanistan
Court clears Dana's brother of all counts of historic sex abuse
Jury in George Zimmerman trial faces tough task
Eurozone unemployment hits record-high 12.2%
Turnout low, Egypt extends presidential vote a day
North Korea readying for fourth nuclear test
FAA approves Boeing Dreamliner battery system design
Search leader urges caution in findings related to missing Malaysian jetliner
Summers quits race for Fed job
South Sudan State Launches Army Recruitment Drive
No deal on Iran's nuclear program, despite 'concrete progress'
Egypt's Hosni Mubarak released from prison
Mandela's remains arrive in Mthatha before burial
South Korea expands its air defense zone in reaction to China
Mandela remembered by family, as stadium memorial service is planned
Conditions good for Costa Concordia righting attempt
Protests after George Zimmerman acquitted in Trayvon Martin case
China-Myanmar exchange ends in SW China
UN chief lauds awarding of Nobel Peace Prize to OPCW
Pope makes peace plea during Bethlehem visit
Poroshenko sworn in as Ukraine President
Dubai dazzles in global 2014 party, New Year welcomed with joy, fireworks
Amid Signs of Deal, Kerry Heads to Iran Nuke Talks
Obama holds talks over Syria action
Sharif stages comeback in landmark Pakistan election
Cheeki Rafiki found but no sign of crew
Peaches Geldof, daughter of Bob Geldof, dies
Why did British parliament vote against military action in Syria?
Obama, Cameron 'no doubt' Syria regime waged chem attacks
Seven dead in California college shooting
Iran makes proposal aimed at progress in nuclear talks
Syria Says U.N. Will Get Access to Site of Possible Chemical Attack
Bank of England holds rates as Mervyn King bows out
Crowds wait for verdict in Zimmerman trial
With bags of cash, CIA seeks influence in Afghanistan
Ukrainian presidency says deal reached at crisis talks
Federal Judge Rules That Same-Sex Marriage Is Legal in Utah
Obama prepares for possible action against Syria
Mattel profit slumps as Barbie's appeal continues to fades
Crimea's Pro-Russian Parliament Approves Declaration On Independence
Obama mulls limited military action in Syria
Immigration bill clears key vote and could be passed by Senate this week
Russian Parliament approves use of army in Ukraine
Syrian death toll has reached nearly 93,000, says UN
Army overthrows Egyptian President Morsy
Australia sends troops to protect its embassy in Baghdad
President Obama to Seek Approval from Congress Before Taking Action in Syria
Iranian agency drops Rafsanjani remarks critical of Syrian government
Toyota, Honda, Nissan and Mazda recall 3 million Japanese cars after airbag fault
Shashi Tharoor admitted to AIIMS
New Year Celebrations around the World
Thai anti-government protest leader shot dead in Bangkok violence-police
Five dead, 40 missing in Canada train disaster
Hot Air Balloon 'Catches Fire And Crashes'
French leader to await US Congress vote on Syria
4 French journalists freed after 10 months in Syria
Obama to give major climate change speech
France Welcomes US-Russia Deal on Syria
Stocks rise after Summers exits Fed race
Syria's PM escapes assassination try, regime says
Polls open in Afghanistan's presidential run-off election
29 Dead in 3 Days of Sudan Riots
George Zimmerman found not guily of Trayvon Martin murder
U.S. al-Qaeda raids in Somalia, Libya trigger backlash
US confirms use of chemical weapons by Syrian regime
Sri Lankan asylum seekers win temporary reprieve from Australia
Swedish Court Rules Wikileaks Founder to Remain in Detention
Nineteen hurt in Mother's Day shooting in New Orleans
Burma Promises To Free All Political Prisoners By Year's End
Obama holds out over Syria strikes
One killed in clashes at Muslim Brotherhood Cairo offices
Sailors dead in India submarine blast
T.S.A. Officer Is Killed at Los Angeles Airport
5 die in Christian-Muslim clashes in Egypt
Jordan elected to take Saudi seat on UN Security Council
Taliban claim deadly attack on Karachi airport
Maldives begins to vote in controversy-ridden presidential poll
South Africa remembers Nadine Gordimer
James Gandolfini of 'Sopranos' fame dead at 51
21 elderly patients die in South Korean fire
At least 18 killed in Iraq mosque bombing
Police surround protesters in Belfast ahead of G8
Egypts Muslim Brotherhood rejects Cabinet offer
Malaysia plane carrying 239 people missing
Malaysia Airlines flight missing
Tornadoes level homes in Oklahoma, 1 dead
Pope Francis arrives in Jordan
3 injured in gunmen attack in Kabul
7.2 quake hits central Philippines, killing 85
Turkish riot police fire tear gas at Istanbul protest
Turkey Protesters 'to Stay in Park' Despite PM Concession
Libyan army chief resigns after clashes in Benghazi kill 31
Thousands join Victory Day march in Donetsk
Facebook content to take over entire homescreen
Titanic memorabilia fetches thousands at auction
Chinese premier solicits expert opinions on economic growth
Turkish police fire tear gas, water cannons to clear park
Divers pull bodies from sunken ferry; toll tops 50
Afghan Taliban Releases Video Showing US Soldier Hand-Over
Afghan presidential election heads for a run-off in June
Obama arrives in Malaysia; third stop on Asia tour
Yahoo! promises Tumblr bloggers 'light' advertising
As Mandela's Condition Improves, South Africa's Anxiety Remains
Tearful Oscar Pistorius apologises
George Zimmerman found not guilty of Trayvon Martin murder
Osborne says not worried about house prices
Death Toll of China Quake Rises to 180 Dead
Wayne Rooney DID ask to leave Manchester United, Alex Ferguson reveals in new book
Ten rescued off Waterford, Dublin coasts
Cannes hotel raid nets 40 million gems
Putin declares Sochi Winter Paralympics open
Child prostitution raids rescue 105 young people
North Korea vows to restart nuclear facilities
France takes tough line at Iran nuclear talks
Gunmen kill 9 foreign tourists, 1 Pakistani
Sudan frees Christian woman sentenced to death for apostasy
Ukraine's parliament votes to dismiss president
Mandela spends third day in hospital
Google Now Has 1B Active Monthly Android Users
Flooding after heavy rain warning
Thai House dissolved, yet protests persist
One killed in clashes at Muslim Brotherhood Cairo offices
Security Tight at Miss World Final in Indonesia
Syrians detonate bomb against Israeli patrol on Golan border
Snowden said to seek asylum in Ecuador, Iceland
Beijing-bound flight from Malaysia missing
Plane search focuses on debris
Saudi Women To Protest Against Driving Ban
Obama, Hollande Hail Transformed US-French Relationship
Boston bombers bring echo of Chechnya's legacy of violence
Russian parliament allows Putin to use military in Ukraine
3 blasts in Patna ahead of Modi's rally; 1 dead, 5 injured
Germany welcomes Iran nuclear agreement
Qatar, Turkey and Iran condemn violence in Egypt
Bolivia vs. Europe over Snowden-linked plane delay
Woman dies after Newport shooting
Rival rallies disrupt start to Ramadan
Petra Kvitova wins Wimbledon women's title
Man arrested in car bomb plot at Kan. airport
Nelson Mandela hospital release reports 'incorrect'
Putin Defends Russian Action in Ukraine to Merkel
Funeral Service Held For Margaret Thatcher
Man killed in deadly terror attack in London street
Malaysian polls open in pivotal election
Egypt court bans all Muslim Brotherhood activities
World stocks rise on hopes Fed to keep stimulus
No winners in a war of sanctions
Brazil Protesters To March In 80 Cities
South Korean soldier reportedly flees after killing 5 comrades at border with North Korea
Merkel presses Putin to help calm Ukraine
BJP may win 5-7 seats in Delhi, opinion poll says
Rocky Road ahead for Egypt President-Elect Sisi
Murray first GB men's Wimbledon champion since 1936
China, EU reach settlement on solar panels
Cannes' second jewellery heist in months
Egypt court sentences 102 Islamists to 10 years in jail
Putin 'not decided whether to send troops to Ukraine yet'
Thai capital's emergency center says 4 wounded in blast at anti-government protest site
Oscar Pistorius' friend recounts gunshot incident at restaurant
Wife of India minister found dead after Twitter spat
US warms to Syria chemical amnesty plan
New York buildings collapse toll rises to seven
Iran nuke talks to be extended for 4 months
India inducts C-17Globemaster-III into IAF
World Cup hit by new stadium death
Egypt Calls for International Community to Act against Israel's Aggression on Gaza
Ukraine president's whereabouts unknown
Tata Nano and other Indian small cars fail crash tests
Hundreds besieged in Egypt's Fateh mosque
Three Israeli teens missing in West Bank
Ireland Exits Bailout With Last Tranche of IMF Aid
Israel agrees to 'humanitarian' pause in air strikes; 4 boys killed playing on Gaza beach
Greece reaches agreement with troika, bailout tranche expected within days
Indian village council orders gang-rape of woman as pun...
North Korea severs FINAL link with South in new escalation of nuclear crisis
Prince William and wife Kate present the baby prince
Shootings at Mother's Day parade in US
Briton among 50 dead in Russia plane crash
China quake leaves 181 dead, 24 missing
China urges early action on Syria weapons deal
Missing Nigerian schoolgirls start second month in captivity
Murray ends 77-year wait for British win
Malaysia Airlines plane crashes on Ukraine-Russia border - live
France threatens Google with privacy fines
Direct military action will require a further Commons vote
Syrian gov't, opposition to meet in 'same room'
Pakistan, India Trade Fire Along Kashmir Border
Heathrow runways closed after BA plane makes emergency landing
Tycoon claims win in Ukraine and promises to seek future in EU
US to Determine Extent of Chemical Weapons Use by Syria
Egypt on brink as crowds mass
Jodi Arias jury to choose death penalty or life
Why Mitch McConnell Isn't as Doomed as This Poll Would Have You Believe
Royal baby's birth leaves grandfather Prince Charles "overjoyed" for William and Kate
The covert war in Pakistan
Obama hails Mandela's inspiration effect
Qantas bill heads to a hostile Senate
Morsi supporters protest in Egypt
Rescue efforts continue in Korean ferry disaster
88yearold ND Tiwari marries mother of his biological son
Bangladesh to allow unions for garment workers
Syria agrees to surrender chemical weapons
Russia's Putin claims authority to invade Ukraine
Senior CPC official meets top DPRK leader's special envoy
US issues global travel alert, citing-al Qaida
French release terror suspect but charge him for inciting racial hatred
Turkey unrest goes on despite end to park protest
Boko Haram Says Video Shows Missing Nigerian Girls
Oil prices mixed in Asia
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Aug 5
Top Asian News at 12:30 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News 7:48 a.m. GMT
China treasury bond futures open slightly lower Wednesday
Indian stocks open lower
Nurse First To Contract Ebola Outside Africa
Pope calls for action on climate change in draft encyclical
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Aug 5
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Aug 5
Nigeria Confirms 2nd Ebola Case
IS jihadists kidnap 90 Christians in Syria: monitor
Inspired Nishikori ready for London ATP final
Top Asian News at 2:30 p.m. GMT
19 killed in Tunis museum attack
Oil prices down in Asian trade
Kerry Cautious Before New Iran Talks, Cites 'Important Gaps'
Gaza's summer training camps: 'No time left for playing' Aug. 11, 2015 
Singapore shares open 0.28% lower on Thursday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Monday
Who Is Jihadi John?
Target raises earnings forecast after profit rises
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared Friday
Iraqi Shi'ite militia kill dozens of Sunnis in mosque shooting
Twitter Sues Over Government Surveillance
China Hushen 300 index futures open higher Thursday
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Friday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Monday
Top Asian News at 1:30 a.m. GMT
Iran, IAEA Officials Meet Ahead of March Nuclear Deadline
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Friday
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Oct 4
Indian stocks close lower
10 Things to Know for Wednesday
Foreign exchange rates in India
Singapore shares open 0.35% higher on Wednesday
Pakistan: Daily Emergency &amp; Response Situational Information Report, 25 October 2014
Bombings kill 9 people in Iraqi capital
Your morning read for Sunday, September 6, 2015 in Toronto
Top Asian News 1:25 p.m. GMT
News of Terrorism and the Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (October 7 - 21, 2014)
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared on Thursday
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Monday
World News Update, what you need to know
US Attorney General Holder resigns
U.S., EU Widen Sanctions On Russia
10 Things to Know for Wednesday
Oil rises in Asian trade
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared on Thursday
Foreign exchange rates in India
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Monday
Top Asian News at 9:00 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 7:48 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 2:30 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 9:30 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 7:00 a.m. GMT
Avengers star Patrick Macnee dies
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Friday
Your morning read for Sunday, July 19, 2015 in Toronto
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Did Wednesday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Friday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Tuesday
Dead comet with skull face skims past Earth on Halloween
Hajj to go ahead despite crane collapse, officials vow
Oil prices rise further after gains in Asia
Latest from OSCE Special Monitoring Mission (SMM) to Ukraine, based on information received as of 19:30hrs, 16 October 2015
10 killed in Nigeria bombings
13 PKK rebels killed in Turkey's military operations
Egypt court postpones Morsi death sentence ruling
AT&amp;T helped U.S. NSA in spying on Internet traffic: N.Y. Times
Top Asian News 11:42 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 11:42 a.m. GMT
Oil rises in Asian trade
Pope welcomed to Central African Republic
Shanghai stock indices close higher on Friday
Powerful earthquake hits eastern Japan
Facebook activates safety feature after Nigeria bombing
Avengers star Patrick Macnee dies aged 93
Canada's Batty, Pendrel win gold, silver in women's mountain bike
Isis brings its war to Lebanon - and it could be a key part of Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi's masterplan
7.3-magnitude quake hits devastated Nepal
US House Republicans elect Paul Ryan as speaker
Cease-fire in Gaza ends
Suspected US drone strike kills 9 in Afghanistan Officials
Top Asian News at 9:00 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 1:25 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 1:00 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 1:00 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 4:00 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 4:00 p.m. GMT
Singapore shares open 0.35% higher on Wednesday
Singapore shares open 0.83% higher on Wednesday
China treasury bond futures open higher Tuesday
At least 59 dead, 600 missing after massive mudslide in Guatemala
Nigeria declares national emergency over Ebola
Foreign exchange rates in Thailand
How much do you know about ISIS?
Mali: Security Council Press Statement on Mali
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Friday
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Friday
22 killed in Iraq bombings
5 things to know for your New Day -- Friday, August 28
Ebola outbreak: Keep up to date
Chinese shares open higher Thursday
WHO: Ebola Death Toll Rises to 729
US Attorney General Holder resigns
Female suicide bomber kills two in Nigeria
US: Health Worker Tests Positive for Ebola
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Sept 27
AbbVie Sours on $55B Shire Deal After Tax Changes
Austria Now Says Over 70 Bodies Thought to Be of Migrants Were in Truck
Sierra Leone declares state of emergency over Ebola (Updated)
OSCE Special Monitoring Mission to Ukraine Deputy Chief Monitor Alexander Hug to visit Donetsk
State Department to Release More of Hillary Clinton's Emails
Chinese yuan strengthens to 6.3665 against USD Tuesday
China treasury bond futures open higher Tuesday
5 things you need to know Wednesday
6.1-magnitude quake hits Bay Area
U.S. to provide $ 351 million for Israel's Iron Dome
China on high alert for typhoon Kalmaegi
South Korea declares end to MERS outbreak
China treasury bond futures close higher Monday
S. Korea cuts key rate as MERS emerges as threat to recovery
Deadly tornadoes strike central U.S.
Yemen rebels refuse to board plane for Geneva peace talks
Chinese yuan strengthens to 6.1318 against USD Wednesday
A tale of two fathers
Saudi-led airstrikes hit Yemeni capital
7.0-magnitude quake hits 42km east of Tambo, Peru -- USGS
Nigerian President vows to hunt Mosque attackers
Islamic State militants raze Iraq's ancient Hatra city
Iran nuclear talks head into overtime
New UN peacekeeping chief named for Central African Republic
US launches airstrikes against ISIS
German intelligence recorded Clinton, Kerry calls
Hundreds dead as strong quake hits southwest China
Hundreds dead as strong quake hits southwest China
Iceland lowers aviation alert on volcano
Clinton apologises for use of private email account
S. Korea Reports 11th Death From MERS Outbreak
Militant attack from Afghanistan kills four in Upper Dir
17 killed as bus falls into gorge in Almora
Computer glitch grounds aeroplanes
occupied Palestinian territory: Saudi Arabia donates $12 million to aid Palestinian refugees
U.S. Ebola patient takes a turn for the worse
5.5-magnitude quake hits Indonesia -- USGS
At least 3 killed in Pakistan blast
Mali hunts jihadist nightclub killers
7.3 magnitude earthquake strikes Nepal
Greece defers €300m IMF payment
Top ISIS leader killed in airstrike
Tokyo shares open higher over buoyant U.S. market
Iran's parliament backs nuclear deal
17 Taliban killed in N. Afghanistan
Malaysia Airlines jet makes emergency landing in Australia after 'engine fire'
Turkish jets strike Kurds in Iraq, Islamic State in Syria
US-led air strike kills Al-Qaeda leader in Syria: Pentagon
Israeli Tanks Strike Gaza after Rocket Fired
Yemen separatists leave UN-sponsored talks
Sierra Leone to shut down for 3 days to slow Ebola
Israeli forces shoot, kill Palestinian attacker in West Bank
Greece defers €300m IMF payment
Hong Kong stocks close 1.27 pct higher
Brazil to hold general elections on Sunday
How VW scandal could be diesel's death knell
Netanyahu: Iran Nuclear Deal Threatens Israel's Existence
Burundi police fire tear gas, beat anti-president protesters
Britain launches airstrikes on ISIS in Syria
Google's self-driving cars have had 11 accidents
Hawaii preps for first hurricane in 22 years
Israeli forces detain 4 Palestinians at Aqsa compound sit-in
Ebola survivors' blood on black market
Iraq bombings kill at least 26
Taiwan stocks close 0.77 pct lower
Tokyo shares open higher following overnight U.S. gains
EU and US. announce new sanctions on Russia over Ukraine
Ukraine Inspects Russian 'Aid' Convoy
Sierra Leone in Ebola lockdown
5.5-magnitude quake hits western Iran
Tokyo shares open higher on buoyant U.S. market
Tianjin warehouse blast death toll rises to 104
Jim Carrey's girlfriend found dead, suicide suspected
Russia takes bit out of McDonald's
Oil falls in Asian trade
Israeli forces detain Palestinian MP in Hebron
Hong Kong's protesters aren't backing down
Police and protesters clash in Hong Kong
Nepal earthquake death toll surpasses 7,000
Hajj to go ahead after Mecca crane collapse kills 107
Students killed in Berkeley balcony collapse mourned in Ireland
12 Killed in Roadside Bombings in Afghanistan
Secretary Kerry Travel to Baghdad, Iraq
Live TV Now Drive it! 03:00 UTC DW News
Gaza ceasefire takes hold as focus turns to longer term
7.3-magnitude quake hits devastated Nepal
Nigeria dispels rumour of more Ebola cases
Driver hits pedestrians in Jerusalem
Avengers star Patrick Macnee dies
China stocks close higher on Monday
Soldier killed in Canada shooting
Two killed in suspected Boko Haram attacks on voters in NE Nigeria
Kenyan Kimetto breaks marathon world record
North Korean soldier walks across DMZ in bid to defect to South
US stocks mixed in midday trading
US STOCKS-Wall St up 1 pct as China fears ease
IED attack kills police chief in Iraq's Anbar
Chinese premier holds talks with German chancellor
Thousands of Syrian Kurds flee to Turkey as IS advances
China: At least 150 dead, 180 missing in SW China quake
Hundreds of rescued migrants and refugees arrive in Cagliari
4 killed, several injured in SW China car accident
Protest erupts during World Indigenous Games in Brazil
Syrian Arab Republic: Under-Secretary-General for Humanitarian Affairs and Emergency Relief Coordinator, Valerie Amos: Security Council Briefing on Syria - New York, 26 March 2015
Ebola death toll rises to 887: WHO
Six civilians killed in fresh fighting in eastern Ukraine
Israeli forces arrest 12 Palestinians in West Bank
Army air strikes kill 28 militants in NW Pakistan
More than 3,400 migrants rescued at sea in Mediterranean
Boston bombing jury to hear closing arguments, begin guilt deliberations
Germanwings flight 4U9525 Co-pilot was once treated for suicidal tendencies
Floyd Mayweather beats Manny Pacquiao in unanimous decision
Palestinian factions release demands for Gaza ceasefire
7.3 magnitude earthquake hits Nepal, close to Everest
New UN peacekeeping chief named for Central African Republic
Typhoon to bring rain to Philippines
Group: Israeli forces detain 11 Palestinians overnight, 152 last week
Lewis Hamilton Takes Pole for Russian GP
EU ready to impose tougher sanctions on Russia
UN Security Council hears Yemen envoy's final ...
North Korea says talks with South 'all but scrapped'
P132B tagged for climate change
Investigators probe deadly Russian airliner crash in Egypt
Air strikes kill 18 militants in S. Afghanistan
Israeli forces arrest 21 Palestinians overnight, clash with locals
13 killed in Afgan terror attack
4 dead, 3 injured in east China road accident
US launches strikes around Iraq's Haditha Dam
Rev's Early Reads: March 2
Markets Live: Waiting for China data
Afghan poll rivals sign unity government deal
Nepal quake death toll tops 3,700, almost 7,000 injured
Palestinians, Israeli police clash at Jerusalem's al-Aqsa
QPR beats Aston Villa 2-0 in Premier League
Paris attacks kill more than 100
Paris attacks: What you need to know
Ebola outbreak: Keep up to date
Tropical Storm Bill advances toward Texas coast
Suspected Boko Haram suicide bombers in Nigeria kill 24
Strong earthquake hits Northern Afghanistan
Two killed, four wounded in US school shooting
Saudi-led airstrikes hit Yemeni capital
Hong Kong democrats stick to their guns as reform vote looms
The end of the Hong Kong protests?
19 killed in Pakistan bus attack
Burkina coup leader given ultimatum
Typhoon Mujigae pounds south China, killing nine
Boston bombing jury to hear closing arguments, begin guilt deliberations
Kerry: Egypt key in fight against Islamic State
Tropical Storm Fung-Wong Inundates Philippines
Putin accuses Turkey of helping ISIS, calls for international anti-terror front
New Zealand beat South Africa to reach World Cup final
No police dashcams in Ferguson
6 Afghan police killed in blast
Australia Holds Memorial Service For MH17 Victims
Bali arrest over attempted schoolie rape
10,000 flee homes as typhoon hits Philippines
Greek PM summoned to Brussels for debt deal talks
Russian warplanes strike inside Syria
Police: Indiana suspect hints at more killings
Thousands of Hungarians protest against tax on Internet traffic
Indian police arrest 4 over rape of nun
4 Turkish soldiers wounded in PKK attack
German Authorities Release Al Jazeera's Ahmed Mansour - Al Jazeera
Judge orders Kentucky clerk to issue marriage licenses
Israel, Hamas accept Egyptian cease-fire proposal
China Hushen 300 index futures open higher Thursday
EU plans no new sanctions against Russia
Prosecutors: Germanwings co-pilot treated for suicidal tendencies
Obama to close historic Kenya visit with national address
Kentucky clerk jailed over refusing marriage licenses
Toxic liquor death toll reaches 27
Toyota to invest $1 billion in AI research
Iraq: Iraq Crisis Situation Report #24, 1 August 2015
Islamic State Claims Beheading of British Hostage
Chinese shares close lower Thursday
Prince William issues appeal to Fifa
Japan imposes sanctions on Russia over Ukraine
6.6-magnitude earthquake strikes off Indonesia
Myanmar ferry capsizes; 33 dead, at least a dozen missing
Ukraine: Ukraine: Situation Report No. 15 as of 10 October 2014
Egypt has paid back $500m to Qatar
CCTV of gunmen in Tunisia museum attack
5.2-magnitude quake hits Tibet
Two killed, four wounded in Washington state school shooting
Riyadh Conference: Day 1
Hong Kong stocks open higher
Live Blog: Ukraine In Crisis
6.8-magnitude earthquake strikes Chile
The views of British Labour favourite Jeremy Corbyn
Critical moment for Hong Kong protests
Israeli police clash with Palestinian protesters at sensitive Jerusalem holy site
Sierra Leone's vice president at home: spokesman
Nigeria Votes in Tight Presidential Election
Eurozone leaders thrash out Greece bailout deal
Egyptian court adjourns trial of Al Jazeera journalists to March 25
Prince William dons samurai gear on Japan tour
See the Stunning New Images of Pluto
Suicide bomber kills 21 in Nigeria
Israeli spy Jonathan Pollard released from U.S. prison after 30 years
Pentagon: U.S. general killed in Afghanistan
It's Djokovic again in China Open
Japan's Prime Minister Goes to US to Showcase Close Ties
Marco Rubio steals the show
Pope canonizes 2 Palestinians
China lodges protest with U.S. on warship patrol in South China Sea
Iraqi forces retake 2 military bases in Anbar
Saudi-led air strikes kill dozens in Yemen
3 killed, 4 injured in Los Angeles shootings
Manchester United 3-1 Barcelona 
India beefs up security post blast at Pakistan side of Wagah border
Micronesia vice president to visit China
Senate to hold one more vote on Iran nuclear deal
Islamic State militants raze Iraq's ancient Hatra city
Islamic State issues video of beheading of US hostage
Hillary Clinton Pledges to Campaign for Female Democratic Candidates
Islamic State claims responsibility for killing Japanese man in Bangladesh
45 killed in Pakistan bomb attack
Chinese shares close higher Monday
Hundreds of Iranian troops mass in Syria
Ukraine: Ukraine: Situation Report No.17 as of 24 October 2014
EU Tightens Sanctions Against Russia
Hillary Clinton to turn over her private email server
Israel troops kill 2 Palestinian suspects in teens' murder
US nurse sues over Ebola quarantine
Typhoon swipes eastern China
U.S. to screen air passengers from West Africa for Ebola
Burundi police fire tear gas, beat anti-president protesters
People found locked in a container at Harwich port
Iran ends cooperation agreement with Pakistan
Teenager tests negative for Ebola
7.3-magnitude quake hits devastated Nepal
Texas sues over Syrian refugees
New US Sanctions Target Overseas Cyber Attackers
occupied Palestinian territory: Israeli Forces Kill Palestinian Civilian and Wound another One South of Nablus
Britain set to approve airstrikes against Islamic State in Iraq
US Drone Strike Kills Senior IS Militant
Death toll form Nepal's deadly quake soars to 8,413
World, Dallas health worker tests positive for Ebola
China manufacturing shows signs of stabilizing in October
Typhoon to bring rain to Philippines
Burkina coup leader wants elections 'soon'
Mediators win Nobel Peace Prize
Ten charged over child abuse in Manchester
5 killed in Israeli air strikes in Gaza
Djokovic claims 6th China Open title
Fierce battle rages for Kobani
Deadly Blast Rocks Coal Mine in East Ukraine
Greece bailout uncertainty weighs on global markets
Sinai crash victims arrive in Russia
Asian shares follow Wall St higher but China fears linger
Islamic State militants kill 14 Iraqi soldiers
Rebel weaponry cut back in eastern Ukraine
Turkey's Erdogan Wondering about Russian Action in Syria
Chinese premier meets Armenian president
Four dead as super storm lashes Australian east coast
Rescuers rush to save survivors after Mount Everest avalanche
Australian surfer bitten after landing on shark
Palestinian unity key to Gaza reconstruction
Nepal earthquake death toll tops 3,350
Funeral of Ian Paisley to take place in Belfast
Coast Guard ends search for 33 missing crew members
Donald Trump doesn't bow on Megyn Kelly controversy
Roy Hodgson promises England will definitely qualify for Euro 2016
Rooney helps Man United beat Everton 3-0 in Premier League
Hard-line Jewish leader shot in Jerusalem
Waba emerges new NLC president
Backstage Moves Intensify as Fight Against Islamic State Widens
Hong Kong stocks open higher
Israel police clash with Palestinians at Jerusalem holy site
Egypt: IPI Urges Release of Al Jazeera Journalist Arrested in Berlin
Iran, six powers demand mutual concessions in tense nuclear talks
Japan economy contracted 1.2 percent in April-June quarter
Your letters: Your letters Hong Kong protects domestic helpers
occupied Palestinian territory: Israeli Forces Continue to Shed Palestinian Blood in oPt
Contributing Op-Ed Writer: Vladimir Putin's Guide to World History
Car bomb attacks kill 57 people in Iraq: police
5 US airstrikes target Islamic State fighters
Tunisia museum attackers 'trained' in Libya
Typhoon Koppu smashes into northern Philippines
Greek finance minister says some election vows can be put off
Africa: China in Support of Africa's Development
South Carolina removes Confederate flag from state capitol
French doctor sick with Ebola in Liberia
Erdogan wins Turkish presidential election in Turkey
Markets Live: Waiting for China data
US Stocks Climb Higher in Early Trading
Federal money starts to flow for Syrian refugees
occupied Palestinian territory: Hamas demands Israel free 54 Palestinians before new talks
Germany urges its partners, Iran to grab nuclear deal
Iran says new sanctions will make nuclear agreement difficult
Missing Ashya: Arrest Warrant Issued For Parents
Chad kills 200 Boko Haram militants in Nigeria: report
occupied Palestinian territory: Israeli troops kill Palestinian who stabbed civilian in West Bank: army
Second American aid worker with Ebola arrives in US
Libya: UN orders investigation into Libya rights abuses
Taiwan coast guard launches new ships as South China Sea tensions rise
Holder Asks For Federal Autopsy on Missouri Teen
Burundi police fire tear gas at protesters
US STOCKS-Wall St opens higher ahead of Fed statement
Hawaii preps for first hurricane in 22 years
Ebola patient not asked about travel
Israeli air strike targets Hamas in response to rocket attack
Hong Kong protesters on hunger strike after violent clashes
South Korea declares de facto end to MERS outbreak
Egypt: IPI Urges Release of Al Jazeera Journalist Arrested in Berlin
Liberia Discharges Last Ebola Patient
Terrorists Attack University in Kenya
Israel and Hamas agree new truce
China struggles to halt stock market slide
Pope Francis Faces New Challenge in Cuba
US, Iran see progress in nuclear talks, but ways to go
Nepal earthquake death toll surpasses 7,000
Ebola health workers go on strike in Sierra Leona
Israel, Hamas agree to 72-hour truce
Iran nuclear talks enter their final day
Hungarian FM to visit China
Bomb blasts at Hindu temple in Bangladesh, 10 injured
NFF Congress sues for peace
Obama: Ebola outbreak also a security threat
Baltimore police enforce curfew following riots
Kerry: Egypt key in fight against Islamic State
Iran appoints first woman ambassador since revolution
It's Jason Day and Everyone Else at BMW Championship
Jeremy Clarkson's future on Top Gear thrown into further doubt
At least 30 fighters killed in Syrian city of Kobani
European Commission proceedings against Malta ...
Malala seeks to come Pakistan, join politics
Ashya's Parents Arrive For Extradition Hearing
Hong Kong police arrest 9, seize explosive materials
Nigeria admits slow response in Ebola case
IDF jeep overturns, kills Palestinian in West Bank clashes
Voting begins in Fifa presidential elections
Turkey identifies suspect in suicide attack
Gunmen kill 8 laborers in southwest Pakistan
Thousands cross Austria-Hungary border
Russian Military Trucks on Ship Bound for Syria
Israel: We didn't spy on Iran nuclear talks
Why Hong Kong's protests are a big deal
Strong 6.0-magnitude quake hits northern California
Rouhani felicitates Ghana president
At least 17 killed, 400 injured in massive Tianjin blasts
Kranjcar leaves it late to rescue QPR against Moses-inspired Stoke
Liberia president describes heavy cost of Ebola
6.0-magnitude quake hits Indonesia -- USGS
Iran nuclear talks extended for another day
Australia beat Ireland at Stormont
John Kerry urges talks to ease China Sea tensions
Oscar Pistorius sentenced to 5 years in prison
Greece nears bailout deal
FM congratulates Erdogan on election victory
Hong Kong Protesters Pull Back From Some Areas
Pro-Palestinian Activists March to UN Headquarters
Hong Kong protests escalate
Islamic State militants kill 15 Iraqi police near Syrian border
5 killed in Kurdish militant attacks in southeast Turkey
Brazil presidential candidate dies in plane crash
China, Africa to strength health cooperation
Oil prices rise after Chinese trade data
Benzema faces possible charges in sex-tape case
US Senate votes to advance Iran nuclear review bill
Islamic State smashes Iraqi history with sledgehammers
China warns against 'immoral' art
All 224 dead in Russian airliner mystery crash
Merkel: Taking in migrants is right thing to do
Donald Trump Ebola tweet sparks outcry
Ashley Madison users facing extortion threats
Euro ministers set to launch Greek bailout, wooing IMF on debt
Islamic State fighters and force allied with Tripoli clash in central Libya
U.S. involved in seven air strikes on Islamic State targets
Pope Francis urges Congress to embrace migrants
Govt. to hold talks with FTII students
3 Indian officials suspended after lynching of rape suspect
Li Na to announce retirement
Gunners fire but fail to advance in Champions League
Five killed, 40 injured in suicide attack in Lahore
Islamic State destroys ancient shrines in Syria's Palmyra city
Highway Patrol take over policing Ferguson and HUG protesters
469 Israelis petition Spain to recognize a Palestine state
Scientists prove there is water on Mars
Cameron in Beirut over Refugee Crisis
Iranian President praises nuclear deal
Boko Haram disrupts Nigerian elections
China's March non-manufacturing PMI dips
Foreign Office names repatriated Tunisia victims
FIFA chief Sepp Blatter now 'in the crosshairs'
South Korea regrets North's refusal of talks
Iraq launches attack to retake Tikrit from IS
Chinese president holds talks with Angolan president
7 Chinese confirmed dead in Bangkok blast
Plane Crash Site Search Called off for the Night
Obama to Get Briefing on Military Plan against Islamic State
Four US marines killed in attack on military facilities
Vote to allow Palestine flag to fly at UN headquarters
Editors from around the world urge Turkey to protect media
Russian forces spotted in Donetsk and Luhansk, says Ukrainian colonel
Agency releases its report of train disaster in Quebec
Stocks rise as China fears ease; oil recovers
Cameron urges more action on migrants crisis after Calais chaos
Obama queries Turnbull over China port deal
China's generous 1MDB bid seen reaping it big returns in Malaysia
Khaleda Zia granted bail in graft cases
Historic nuclear deal reached; Iran no longer under sanction
UN chief appeals for calm in Jerusalem
Global markets brace for short-term hit after Paris attacks
British singer Cliff Richard interviewed by police
Greek banks reopen as government eyes return to normalcy
Asian markets up after Fed minutes
Hezbollah targets Qaeda gathering along border with Syria
South Korea reports seven new MERS cases
Hawks equal franchise wins record
Metro police to get fresh training in crowd handling at police academy
One North Korean defector wants to return home - and is forbidden
France pushes U.N. to support fight against Islamic State
Iran FM arrives in Najaf
US demands rescue of Asian migrants adrift at sea
Hong Kong protests weighing on global markets
Iran: Messages exchanged with US over battle against Islamic State
Saudi-led air strikes in Yemen, raids kill more than 90
Obama calls for international front against IS
Islamic State raises flag on eastern side of Kobani
1 American killed, 1 hurt in Saudi gas station shooting
US stocks open higher as investors wait on Fed
U.S. military says it conducts airstrikes against IS in Syria, Iraq
Who abandoned 3 Boeing planes at the airport?
UK: Jets doing reconnaissance, ready to strike in Iraq
North Korea to put US citizen on trial
Obama tries to sell plan to defeat Islamic State
Iraqi troops, militias repel IS attacks in Anbar province
Seven killed as New York train hits vehicle
Thousands protest government policy in Nazareth, call for Palestinian state
Parliament reappoints Libyan Prime Minister
Spain Ebola patient at 'serious risk' of dying
6 injured as blast hits train in South Pakistan
Poroshenko: Association Agreement will be ratified in September
Netanyahu bars ministers from visiting Jerusalem holy site
Hong Kong officials resume work as protests thin
US man convicted over web suicides
Estimated 6,500 injured in deck collapses since 2003
Britain beat Australia for first time in 17 years
Scotland decides to stop funding Queen via Scottish crown estate
Russia denounces arrival of U.S. military trainers in Ukraine
Ebola UK: NHS staff 'panicked' after suspected Ebola cases
U.S. senator calls for soccer corruption report to be made public
'Many dead' in Egypt plane crash
French FM: Still no guarantees on verifiable Iran nuclear deal
Pakistan rejects India's claim on Kashmir
Passenger Jet Crashes Near Tehran Airport
UK Leader Signals Support for Airstrikes on IS in Syria
Nepal earthquake death toll rises sharply amid aftershocks
Philippines, Canada pledge to further boost relations
Migrants storm Budapest train station
Israeli 'cult' leader faces prison for sexual offences
Contribute to nation building - Cyril
Nigeria releases detained Al-Jazeera journalists: TV
Safety fears over Chinese chemical blasts in Tianjin
Israel bars Palestinians from Jerusalem's Old City
Russia calls the shots
British woman dies in Australia crash
German envoy: Nations ready to move beyond Iran sanctions
President responds to girl's euthanasia plea
More Chinese relief aid sent to Myanmar flood victims
'Life on planet at stake', France warns as climate ministers meet
Will 'warrior king' take out election?
How much do you know about Secret Service?
Burundi says demos against president's candidacy are over
Alexander Lukashenko wins Belarus presidential race
Putin Takes on Syria
Turkey's election: Tyrant or steadying hand?
Man in serious condition after Ballyfermot shooting
Israel soldiers, Palestinians clash on 'Nakba' day.
NAACP leader lying about being black, mother says
Russia Sues Germany Over Mulino Training Ground Contract Disruption
Muhammadu Buhari takes over Nigeria in crisis
US stocks rise at midday ahead of Fed statement
Hillary Clinton delivers remarks in South Carolina
Soldiers killed in Taliban attack in Kabul
Ferguson unrest: Protest marks two weeks since police shooting
Hungary drops controversial border 'transit zone' plan for migrants
N. Korea agrees to talks with South
Bill Clinton appears in virtual-reality movie on Africa
Fears Australian extremism could escalate
Somalia car bomb kills 7 near presidential palace: police
US, allies say conduct 15 air strikes in Syria and Iraq
Drone footage of Manchester fire
Team seeks anyone who encountered Ebola patient
2 alleged NPA rebels killed in Bukidnon
Youngest Chinese hacker is a teenager
Mob throws stones at Pakistan convoy
China, Africa to strength health cooperation
Death toll rises to 19 on Malaysia's mount Kinabalu after quake: official
Top Iranian general, Hezbollah lead Iraq ground war
Bangladeshi Jamaat leader loses appeal against hanging
Hong Kong Police Arrest Dozens of Student Protesters
Michael Brown shooting: Family lawyer suggests 18-year-old was 'surrendering'
Palace up to sixth after victory at Watford
Iran, a large important partner for Russia: Novak
Global pressure on US to loosen oil exports ban
US and Iran positive after nuclear talks
Taiwan's president charters plane to pay respects to Lee
Two Palestinians die in attacks on Israelis ahead of Kerry visit
Minister urges Malayalis in Yemen to return
China home prices rise for second month in June
Egypt Court Declares Palestinian Movement Hamas 'Terrorist'
Thomas Cook accused of putting costs before customers
Female soldier strip-searches 2 Palestinian women in Beit Ummar
Australian Grand Prix: Lewis Hamilton takes the honours in style
Obama secures key vote to protect Iran nuclear deal in U.S. Congress
Narendra Modi 'photoshopped' image of Chennai floods visit goes viral
Myanmar education activists arrested
Ted Cruz: Donald Trump won't be GOP nominee
Glasgow votes 'yes' to Scottish independence
Mourners March to Commemorate French Bus Crash Victims
UN chief welcomes peaceful presidential elections in Guinea
Netanyahu says will use 'all means' to end Palestinian violence
Starbucks encourages baristas to talk race
Obama Struggles to Soothe Saudi Fears As Iran Talks Resume
7 foreigners, 1 Tunisian dead in museum shooting attack
Pakistan executions draw international ire
Philippines confirms nurse infected with Mers
Brazil to elect president today in run-off vote
Obama: 'No excuse' for violence
Obama begins meeting with Raul Castro in Panama
Liberty president calls for an armed Christian campus
Israeli defense minister in US after spat over Kerry remarks
Search resumes for missing in Brazil mine mudslide
Tony Blair Denies Saying Miliband Can't Win
North Korea starts huge military parade
South Korea declares end to MERS outbreak
US pledges more military support to Somalia
Pranab stresses need to strive for peace by nations
Nuns' mission in Pakistan
Philippines seeks US help in stopping China land reclamation
Eastern Europe turns down refugee plan
Fireman killed in south China
Asian stocks mostly down on weak data, commodity prices
Volkswagen skids into red in wake of pollution scandal
Two Australians killed in Kenya after bus crashed into river
6 killed in school stampede in China
France shuts mosque, arrests man in crackdown after attacks
Syrian refugees not welcome in 30 U.S. states
US Vice President's son dies
Train rams SUV, killing 13 in eastern India
Russian plane reportedly crashes in Egypt
Du Preez drives Springboks into World Cup semi-finals
U.S.-led coalition conducts 25 air strikes against Islamic State militants
British Parliament Backs Airstrikes Against ISIS in Iraq
Iraq launches operation to retake Tikrit from Islamic State
Amit Jain named president of Uber India
Three Somalis killed in attack on UN convoy in capital
Japan continues to insist on its rights for Senkaku Islands
Hundreds reportedly attend burial for Danish gunman
Severe Gales As Storm Clodagh Hits Britain
Netanyahu Looks for Alternative Approaches to Peace Talks
Strong quake kills 367 in southern China
Italy warns of Libya threat as pressure for action grows
Belarus tightens security along the border with Ukraine
Pistorius lashes out ahead of verdict
Nurse With Ebola Appears on Camera Before Leaving Dallas Hospital
Children among bombardment victims in Syria
Nato shunned as France calls on EU to destroy Islamic State
Dozens of Egyptians hostages taken by Libyan terrorists as revenge for airstrikes
President heading to Bahrain
Venezuela's President Concedes Defeat
U.S. stocks open lower after rally
US surveillance powers set to lapse after Senate vote
China, India vow to further bilateral ties
Tsarnaev jury to begin deliberations
Gunmen kill 20 laborers in SW Pakistan: officials
China to put 81-year-old writer on trial: lawyer
Boko Haram: Traders commend FG/Boko Haram ceasefire
Ukraine city readies for rebel advance
Funeral of Ian Paisley to take place in Belfast
Obama is right: Africa deserves better leadership
Man, 20, kills 13 in Oregon college shooting
German minister lands in Iran with trade team
Felline pips Aussie Matthews in Basque sprint finish
Attack on Canadian parliament: Soldier, shooter killed
Turkey slams Russian missile launcher 'provocation'
Obama addresses plight of Christians in Mideast
US is most popular destination for Chinese travelers
Does Biden have what it takes to compete in New Hampshire?
'Framework' for Final Deal Reached at Iran Nuclear Talks
Spain won't commit to taking in more migrants
Kranjcar leaves it late to rescue QPR against Moses-inspired Stoke
Kerry aims to calm South China Sea tensions
Ebola outbreak an 'international emergency' - World Health Organisation
Nigeria reaches deal with Boko Haram over abducted girls: source
Putin spokesman: Doping charges appear unfounded
Six dead, 33 injured in China firework plant explosion
Pakistan will not allow NGOs working against national interest: Nisar
New video shows US police officers beating mentally-ill man
'Hundreds arrested' in Burundi amid political unrest
All nine on board die in Alaska crash of excursion plane
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
It is "prior" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
This general three-step process can be used to solve a problem: 1.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
The typical example could be of a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
The methodology takes much less time rather than naive methods.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Memoization is used in order to save time the solutions are stored rather than be recomputed.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
It is "previous" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
The correct answer can be computed using Bayes' theorem.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
If this occurs then all of the non-private methods and variables can be used by the most specialised class.
There are two main approaches for dynamic programming.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Like divide and conquer, Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining solutions to sub-problems.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
They do not have to be written in a computer language.
For instance, a events schedule at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Programming means finding a plan of action.
Define value of optimal solution recursively.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Typically, terms are single words, keywords, or sometimes even longer phrases.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
Programming means finding a plan of action.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Dynamic programming is a problem-solving method which solves recursive problems.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Define value of optimal solution recursively.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Firstly, long documents are represented badly because they have poor similarity values.
With little or no modification, it is intended to help reuse existing code.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
The actual Google PageRank algorithm is much more complex than this, but follows the same underlying principles.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
For example, a schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a programme.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
Other ways of computing these values, or weights, have been developed.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The typical example could be of a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition.
A document is represented as a vector.
For instance, a events schedule at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
The other method is the top down approach which is a method that combines memorization and recursion.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
The PageRank is derived from a theoretical probability value on a logarithmic scale like the Richter Scale.
A page that is linked to by many pages with high PageRank receives a high rank itself.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Animals can be treated (cast) to living things.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
It is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
Typically terms are keywords, single words or longer phrases.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
Generlisation also some time known as inheritance.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The PageRank is computed iteratively, and it is found that the PageRank values converge fairly rapidly.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
Construct an optimal solution, using the computed optimal subproblems, for the original problem.
In general, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process: 1.
Compute the optimal solution values either top-down (with caching), or bottom-up using a table 4.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
A document is represented as a vector.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
To derive the theorem, we begin with the definition of conditional probability.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
For instance, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
A document can be represented as a vector.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Other possible uses for vector space models are indexing and also to rank the relevancy of differing documents.
For example; a person may be observed to have certain symptoms.
It is "previous" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Its first use was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
Its first application was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
It doesn't take into account any information about B, so it is "prior".
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A 0.5 probability is commonly expressed as a "50% chance" of something happening.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Also, looking up the solution when a sub-problem is encountered again helps reduce computation.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
This method is used in the Google Toolbar, which reports back actual site visits to Google.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Its first use was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
These subproblems are not, however, independent.
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
In computer science; dynamic programming is a way of solving problems consist of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
Lucky Joe likes to predict the colour of the ball he selects and he is 80% accurate.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
Solve these problems optimally using this three-step process recursively.
The methodology takes much less time rather than naive methods.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Without a proof of correctness, such an algorithm is likely to fail.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
The methodology takes much less time rather than naive methods.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Google owns exclusive license rights on the patent from Stanford University.
This meant that the sum of all pages was the total number of pages on the web.
Using the vector space model for Information Retrieval models all pages and queries as high-dimensional sparse vectors.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Its applications include information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
Google owns exclusive license rights on the patent from Stanford University.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
For example: a patient might be observed to show certain symptoms.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action, an algorithm.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
With each separate term corresponding to the differing dimensions.
They do not have to be written in a computer language.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Whilst Bayesians describe probabilities in terms of beliefs and degrees of uncertainty.
With little or no modification, it is intended to help reuse existing code.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
It is used in information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
The correct answer can be computed using Bayes' theorem.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Outbound, links from your page to others.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Without a proof of correctness, such an algorithm is likely to fail.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
In computer science; dynamic programming is a way of solving problems consist of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
When one class inherits from another class, all the public variables and methods are available to the subclass.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
A page that is linked to by many pages with high PageRank receives a high rank itself.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
Normally a term is a single word, keyword, or a longer phrase.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
Outbound, links from your page to others.
The method is more effiecent than naive methods.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
A hyperlink to a page counts as a vote of support.
This method is used in the Google Toolbar, which reports back actual site visits to Google.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
The idea of inheritance in OOP refers to the formation of new classes with the already existing classes.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
The word Programming in the name has nothing to do with writing computer programs.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
The idea of inheritance in OOP refers to the formation of new classes with the already existing classes.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
The method is more effiecent than naive methods.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
Other possible uses for vector space models are indexing and also to rank the relevancy of differing documents.
There are four steps in Dynamic Programming: 1.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
In computer science; dynamic programming is a way of solving problems consist of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
The correct answer can be computed using Bayes' theorem.
One example is the computing of the shortest path to a goal from a vertex in a graph.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Solve these problems optimally using this three-step process recursively.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
of the pages providing the links.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Nevertheless, the patent is assigned to the University of Stanford and not to Google.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
Inheritance is an important feature in object orientated programming.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
In a word, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
The definition of term depends on the application.
Break up the problem different smaller subproblems.
This meant that the sum of all pages was the total number of pages on the web.
Inheritance is a method of forming new classes using predefined classes.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The main problem is divided into sub problems which are solved and stored for future use.
What is the probability this student is female?”
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
So the same rule applies with keywords and indeed longer phrases.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Dynamic Programming is an algorithm design technique used for optimisation problems, such as minimising or maximising.
Animals can be treated (cast) to living things.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
This method is far more efficient than recalculating and therefore considerably reduces computation.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
This general three-step process can be used to solve a problem: 1.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
Inheritance is an important feature in object orientated programming.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
Typically, terms are single words, keywords, or sometimes even longer phrases.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
Using the vector space model for Information Retrieval models all pages and queries as high-dimensional sparse vectors.
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
of the pages providing the links.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The similarity measures largely identify the retrieval efficiency of a particular information retrieval system.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
They do not have to be written in a computer language.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
The algorithm may be applied to any numbr of entities with reciprocal quotations and references.
Other ways of computing these values, or weights, have been developed.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
Nevertheless, the patent is assigned to the University of Stanford and not to Google.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Memoization is used in order to save time the solutions are stored rather than be recomputed.
Typically, terms are single words, keywords, or sometimes even longer phrases.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
Using the vector space model for Information Retrieval models all pages and queries as high-dimensional sparse vectors.
When any sub-problem is met again, it can be found and re-used to solve another problem.
In computer science; dynamic programming is a way of solving problems consist of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
If there are no links to a web page there is no support for that page.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
The idea of inheritance in OOP refers to the formation of new classes with the already existing classes.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
This method is used in the Google Toolbar, which reports back actual site visits to Google.
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
A probability is expressed as a numeric value between 0 and 1.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
What is the probability this student is a girl?
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
For example, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
The typical example could be of a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
They also inherit the attributes and methods of its superclass.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The correct answer can be computed using Bayes' theorem.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
It is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
The articles on Bayesian probability and frequentist probability discuss these debates in greater detail.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Java allows object inheritance.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
It can be considered that fruit is an abstraction of apple, orange, etc.
The second method is the use of links.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
This method is used in the Google Toolbar, which reports back actual site visits to Google.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
In the original form of PageRank initial values were simply 1.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action.
With reference to this model, documents are represented as vectors.
When any sub-problem is met again, it can be found and re-used to solve another problem.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance is useful for situations where several classes share common features, such as needed functions or data variables.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Google’s payoff is that it gets to track the behaviour of actual users.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
The method takes much less time than naive methods.
The main reason behind this is a hierarchi structure of objects and classes.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
These original classes are either called base classes or sometimes referred to as ancestor classes.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
In 1953 he had refined this to the modern meaning.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
However, the patent is assigned to Stanford University and not to Google.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
A probability is expressed as a numeric value between 0 and 1.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
A document can be represented as a vector.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
Outbound, links from your page to others.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
With reference to this model, documents are represented as vectors.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
Like divide and conquer, Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining solutions to sub-problems.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
With little or no modification, it is intended to help reuse existing code.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
Like divide and conquer, Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining solutions to sub-problems.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
Its first application was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Subclasses are said to extend or specialise their superclasses.
Without a proof of correctness, such an algorithm is likely to fail.
Each item in the vector represents a different keyword.
The University received 1.8 million shares in Google in return for use of the patent.
If there are no links to a web page there is no support for that page.
If there are no links to a web page there is no support for that page.
They do not have to be written in a computer language.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
The typical example could be of a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition.
This general three-step process can be used to solve a problem: 1.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
It is also called the posterior probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Its first application was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
What is the probability this student is a girl?
Java allows object inheritance.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
It is intended to help reuse existing code with little or no modification.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
For instance, a events schedule at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
Virtual attributes and methods can be shadowed/overridden.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Typically terms are keywords, single words or longer phrases.
With each separate term corresponding to the differing dimensions.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
A document is represented as a vector.
They also inherit the attributes and methods of its superclass.
It is "prior" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
The vector is then constucted of the frequency of eacher word (dimension).
A document has representation as a vector.
So the same rule applies with keywords and indeed longer phrases.
It was intended to allow existing code to be used again with minimal or no alteration.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
It is intended to help reuse existing code with little or no modification.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Its first use was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Later versions of PageRank (see the below formulas) would assume a probability distribution between 0 and 1.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
When any sub-problem is met again, it can be found and re-used to solve another problem.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
This method is used as links are seen as an adoursment of a sight.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The PageRank algorithm is used to designate every aspect of a set of hyperlinked documents with a numerical weighting.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
The other method is the top down approach which is a method that combines memorization and recursion.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
It was intended to allow existing code to be used again with minimal or no alteration.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
For instance, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Programming means finding a plan of action.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
A document has representation as a vector.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
The inheritance concept was invented in 1967 for Simula.
They also inherit the attributes and methods of its superclass.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
With little or no modification, it is intended to help reuse existing code.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
Then, using this, the best overall path can be found, thereby demonstrating the dynamic programming principle.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
The vector is then constucted of the frequency of eacher word (dimension).
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
When one class inherits from another class, all the public variables and methods are available to the subclass.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Its first use was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Typically terms are keywords, single words or longer phrases.
Google owns exclusive license rights on the patent from Stanford University.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
It is also called the subsequent probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
The PageRank depends on the PageRank rating and number of all pages that have links to it.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
The similarity measures largely identify the retrieval efficiency of a particular information retrieval system.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Break up the problem different smaller subproblems.
This approach is called memoization (not memorization, although this term also fits).
The second method is the use of links.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
For example; a person may be observed to have certain symptoms.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Without a proof of correctness, such an algorithm is likely to fail.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
It is used in information filtering, indexing, relevancy rankings and information retrieval.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
This general three-step process can be used to solve a problem: 1.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
For each document, count the number of occurrences of each word.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
of a particular page is roughly based upon the quantity of inbound links as well as the PageRank?
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
With each separate term corresponding to the differing dimensions.
Recursively define the value of an optimal solution 3.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
A document is represented as a vector.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
Use these optimal solutions to construct an optimal solution for the original problem.
It is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
Then, using this, the best overall path can be found, thereby demonstrating the dynamic programming principle.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
In order to avoid this, we instead save the solutions to problems we have already solved.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The other method is the top down approach which is a method that combines memorization and recursion.
Normally a term is a single word, keyword, or a longer phrase.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
The second method is the use of links.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
The methodology takes much less time rather than naive methods.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Recursively define the value of an optimal solution 3.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Google has exclusive license rights on the patent from Stanford University.
A link to a page is seen as a vote of support.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
For example, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance was firstly derived in 1967.
This method is far more efficient than recalculating and therefore considerably reduces computation.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
With reference to this model, documents are represented as vectors.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
If a page has no incoming links, there is no support for that page.
The similarity measures largely identify the retrieval efficiency of a particular information retrieval system.
Typically terms are keywords, single words or longer phrases.
Inheritance provides the support for representation by categorization in computer languages.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
Furthermore, by combining solutions to subproblems, DP solves problems.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Dynamic programming can be divided into two main approaches: top-down and bottom-up.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
The similarity measures largely identify the retrieval efficiency of a particular information retrieval system.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
Overlapping subproblems means that the same subproblems are used to solve many different larger problems.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
A document is represented as a vector.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Using the vector space model for Information Retrieval models all pages and queries as high-dimensional sparse vectors.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
Inheritance is an important feature in object orientated programming.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
Dynamic Programming reduces computation time by solving subproblems in a ‘bottom-up’ way.
Inheritance is an important feature in object orientated programming.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
Bellman equation is a central result of dynamic programming which restates an optimization problem in recursive form.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
Without a proof of correctness, such an algorithm is likely to fail.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
It is "prior" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
So in essence it is a popularity contest between WebPages.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
The PageRank depends on the PageRank rating and number of all pages that have links to it.
The other method is the top down approach which is a method that combines memorization and recursion.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
Without a proof of correctness, such an algorithm is likely to fail.
They also inherit the attributes and methods of its superclass.
Deep, links to a specific page, usually bypassing the homepage.
Recursively define the value of an optimal solution 3.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
This method is used in the Google Toolbar, which reports back actual site visits to Google.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
The vector is then constucted of the frequency of eacher word (dimension).
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
The method takes much less time than naive methods.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Inheritance means derived a new class from the base class.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
The definition of term depends on the application.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
Solve these problems optimally using this three-step process recursively.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
The "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Then, using this, the best overall path can be found, thereby demonstrating the dynamic programming principle.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Java allows object inheritance.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
For instance, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
It is used in information filtering, indexing, relevancy rankings and information retrieval.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action, an algorithm.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
This formula gives more credit to words that appears more frequently, but often too much credit.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
Each object (except java.lang.Object) can be cast to an object of one of its superclasses.
Thus, the program is the best plan for action that is produced.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
A probability is expressed as a numeric value between 0 and 1.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Its applications include information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
The basic support provided by inheritance is that it represents by categorization in computer languages.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Dynamic programming can be divided into two main approaches: top-down and bottom-up.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
This method is used as links are seen as an adoursment of a sight.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
It doesn't take into account any information about B, so it is "prior".
With reference to this model, documents are represented as vectors.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
The method takes much less time than naive methods.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
Inheritance was firstly derived in 1967.
A document has representation as a vector.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
A problem with overlapping subproblems means that the same subproblems may be used to solve many different larger problems.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Dynamic Programming is an algorithm design technique used for optimisation problems, such as minimising or maximising.
The actual Google PageRank algorithm is much more complex than this, but follows the same underlying principles.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
This is highly used in dynamic programming.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
Since it searches all possibilities, it is also very accurate.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
Then, using this, the best overall path can be found, thereby demonstrating the dynamic programming principle.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
To derive the theorem, we begin with the definition of conditional probability.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
The PageRank depends on the PageRank rating and number of all pages that have links to it.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Each item in the vector represents a different keyword.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Pages that are linked to by many high ranking pages will themselves obtain a high rank.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
Use these optimal solutions to construct an optimal solution for the original problem.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
Since it searches all possibilities, it is also very accurate.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
This meant that the sum of all pages was the total number of pages on the web.
The idea of inheritance in OOP refers to the formation of new classes with the already existing classes.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
However, animals cannot be treated as fungi.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
Recursively define the value of an optimal solution 3.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
Typically terms are keywords, single words or longer phrases.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
To achieve this, the programmer has to note generalisations and similarities about various aspects of the program.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
One can consider fruit to be an abstraction of apple, orange, etc.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
Bayes' Theorem Let and be sets.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
The vector space model is one of these methods, and it is an algebraic model.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Virtual attributes and methods can be shadowed/overridden.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
Inheritance can be used to create a multiple level architecture of classes.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Recursively define the value of an optimal solution 3.
The second method is the use of links.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
This meant that the sum of all pages was the total number of pages on the web.
Dynamic Programming reduces computation time by solving subproblems in a ‘bottom-up’ way.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
It is used in information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The second method is the use of links.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
It is intended to help reuse existing code with little or no modification.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
A document has representation as a vector.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
A link to a page is seen as a vote of support.
With each separate term corresponding to the differing dimensions.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
In Java all attributes and methods are implicitly virtual.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
Furthermore, by combining solutions to subproblems, DP solves problems.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
It is used in information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
Other possible uses for vector space models are indexing and also to rank the relevancy of differing documents.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
This means that inheritance is used when types have common factors and these would be put into the superclass.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
Tasting it is the only reliable way.
I think it probably depends on your money.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
Obviously, the best book for you depends a lot on what you are looking for.
I've had this same problem.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
I remained under the banyan tree, exhausted by my daily ritual of dragooning the men every two hours. 
There are a ton of other examples online.
The way you have it is fine.
I think you should do both.
It's a good idea to tailor your CV and/or resume to each position you apply for.
So my proposed answer is "yes".
There are a few things you can do: 
In the US, it will depend on the school.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
There is no reason to worry.
You don't need to know everything.
You don't need to know everything.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
Does this page answer your question?
The two things you can do to really help here are:
You answered your own question.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
Cooking depends on the type of sauce you're cooking.
You answered your own question.
How should I proceed about this?
There's also what the string is made of.
Unofficially it is not.
If they want you to use a certain technique, then that's part of the training process.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Much of it has to do with marketing.
Be sure to use a good wood glue like Titebond II.
You also imply you may not be paid if they cannot place you with a client.
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
I think there isn't a general answer.
There are two things to consider:
It's also a matter of taste.
The more you weigh, the harder it is on your back.
I did this one time as well.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
You can use it, too.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I was in a similar situation.
I suggest you to take a look at rememberthemilk.com.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
You do not need to worry.
You should do it.
I think it is depends on the program.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
It is impossible to answer this question without a form check.
Yes, you can receive phone signals.
The short answer is: it should not.
I was in a similar situation.
I would even venture to say that it is THE question.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
This will, as the very first and foremost thing, allow you to place plenty of them.
If your long stay visa for Switzerland is valid, then you will not need a transit visa.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I think you should do both.
You should just ask your boss what he wants you to do.
This doesn't answer your question, but:
The key is you have to find something that works for you, and your goals.
Can you do this?
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I think the answer that we don't know.
You answered your own question.
It depends on what they are.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
It's not a good idea.
Depends a bit on your furnace.
I think this is a good question to ponder after a good workout.
Is this a scam?
How I should pay the due amount? 
This is not a good idea.
And I think its a good way to deal with situation like this.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
I think it probably depends on your money.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
Totally an opinion here but I have to agree with MGOwen's answer above.
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
The answer depends on where you are.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
The short answer is: it should not.
2. You may need to see a councilor to help you with the child situation.
You can do it, too.
I've had this same problem.
Or I have been.
This is not a good idea.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You should do it.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
Yes... on all the above.
You could try BerlinLinienBus.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
As far as I know there is no such law.
How do you do that?
You will need about 1 inch.
This information is not true.
I agree with the other comments.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
If you want to be a manager, that's another story.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
You have a problem.
I don't think it makes any tremendous difference.
I have few suggestions for you:
As far as I know there is no such law.
It really doesn't matter.
You want to start in the room that is the largest to make sure you have the straightest start.
It's pretty much up to you.
Depends on the loan.
There's no rule against it.
The answer depends on where you are.
It depends on what they are.
if you don't want to derail the meeting, but the key is to speak up.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
As far as I know, there are no ATMs that require a chip card.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Unfortunately the answer to your question is we simply do not know.
As soon as possible.
Personally I wouldn't!
The answer depends on where you are.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
Make sure that you collect references on your way out.
I think it's fine to ask this question.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You don't have to know.
What day do you want me to start? 
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
You could try BerlinLinienBus.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
And if you're holding in a Roth IRA, you get that tax free.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
It really doesn't matter.
Try something with the following format: mm/dd/yyyy 
To give this an answer:
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
Unfortunately the answer to your question is we simply do not know.
The rule - When in doubt throw it out!
I can think of a couple of options off the top of my head:
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
The answer depends on where you are.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
This depends on what exactly you're applying for.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
I think you should do both.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
All of the previous answers are good.
This is not a good idea.
You don't need to know everything.
This is not a good idea.
What kind of IRA?
The cymbals don't have to be expensive.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
Yes, it's probably a good idea to renew your passport.
There is no official government page.
You have a problem.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
You don't have to know.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
This problem is one that I commonly come across.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
Why don't you just lock it to something?
if you don't want to derail the meeting, but the key is to speak up.
See Wikipedia for average weather stats.
I think it probably depends on your money.
I think it probably depends on your money.
The answer depends on where you are.
There is some info about this on Wikipedia, but I'm not sure how acurate it is.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
It probably depends on the cut of meat.
This is not a good idea.
English is really widespread, so that would be your best bet.
Some things you might consider:
Yes, you have to file a tax return in Canada.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
You will think you want to fret a not a lot harder than you actually need to.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
It's not a good idea.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
Do you have a car?
You may need to step in and mentor him on how to do something.
I would suggest that you try ClearCheckbook.
It's pretty much up to you.
If you're going to say "No", do it as you're doing here.
Depends on what's causing the cramps.
I think you should do both.
Yes, there is a reason for it.
I don't think that there's any.
It's a good idea to tailor your CV and/or resume to each position you apply for.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
Don't worry too much about music theory yet.
I think it would.
There is a very good book called On Food and Cooking, by Harold McGee.
You don't have to worry.
I have few suggestions for you:
Have you tried asking your employees?
If you consistently maintain a caloric deficit, you will lose it.
In the end, there is nothing you can do if he's not willing to cooperate.
You don't need to know everything.
There are a few things you can do: 
Do you have a kid's sized table?
I would even venture to say that it is THE question.
You guys are making this all WAAAAAY too complicated.
It is possible, but I'm not aware of any evidence for it.
I have this habit as well.
You don't have to know.
You don't need any visa.
It's all about diet and exercise.
There are two things to consider:
I think it probably depends on your money.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
You shouldn't feel any obligation at all.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
You should do it.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
That is your problem, not your supervisor's.
I had the same issue and it turned out to be air in the system.
I would say that in a situation like this, communication is paramount.
There is no maximum.
Work into it slowly.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
I'm sure that this has been asked here but I can't find the answer.
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
You can buy it on amazon for $5.
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
Yes, there is a rule against this.
I'm not 100% sure, but it sounds like you're referring to Explorers.
The coffee simply picks up the aluminum from the pot, as the coffee is acidic.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
I think it is depends on the program.
There are two ways to start with: plunging and dripping.
The hard answer is a straight no.
There are a few things you can do: 
You might have to try a variety before you find one that clicks with him.
A few other reasons, which are less glamorous:
I don't think you can re-use the bones and expect to get a good product, no.
No it can't.
Yes, there is a rule against this.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
It's not a good idea.
The key is you have to find something that works for you, and your goals.
If you haven't, you should.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
There is no maximum.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
I had the same issue and it turned out to be air in the system.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
Yes, you should mention your experience.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
I think there isn't a general answer.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
If you want to install it yourself, great.
Interesting article, thanks for the link.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
At the end of the day you have to make him work for you.
As far as I know there is no such law.
You don't have to worry.
If you haven't, you should.
From what I understand this is what you can do :
Take a look at these:
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
If you intern with them it is likely you will want to work for them after you graduate.
What kind of insulation is it?
This should help, it's not precisely exact, but you can probably figure it out from here.
You could try BerlinLinienBus.
I had the same problem as you.
I believe you would be DQ'd if you were to use it.
The last thing I would look closer is that the one you are asking actually.
How quickly are you using the eggs?
I do not think there's any appreciable difference.
You could try BerlinLinienBus.
No, you do not NEED a bread machine.
I'd say it primarily depends on two things:
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I am not sure this is the right site for the question.
What are your goals?
It sounds like you just undercooked them.
Some of what you can do:
This is not a good idea.
If the code base that you have to deal with is no good, they know about that.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Obviously, the best book for you depends a lot on what you are looking for.
The answers so far are already good, but I'd like to add a map for Switzerland:
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
How much it will help depends on the temperature of the water and the environment the tank is in.
There are three options:
From what I understand this is what you can do :
There are a few things you can do: 
This depends on what exactly you're applying for.
I was in a similar situation.
This depends on the particular index, of course.
I won't try to describe it, but here's how I would go about it:
Get a lot of sleep.
I think you should do both.
To give this an answer:
I think it depends on the deadline the offering school gave you.
Healthy competition is the magic word you are looking for.
I've had this same problem.
There is no maximum.
I am not sure this is the right site for the question.
It depends on what they are.
My opinion is that I don't think you should force the issue.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It all depends on you!!
You can do it, too.
In the end you have to show people how things will work.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
If you don't want to work with them on graduation, then cooperate fully with their request.
There is no reason not to do them on the same day.
You are not disclosing key info.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
You do not need to worry.
As soon as possible.
It very much depends on the grant in question.
I think it is depends on the program.
Primer/paint will not work.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
You don't have to worry.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Unfortunately the answer to your question is we simply do not know.
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
I'd put it this way:
I have the same thing.
I believe the term you're looking for is Chibi
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
There's not a lot you can do about that.
Most likely this is an "it depends".
This answer actually has two parts:
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
I read a lot of non-fiction books and i read it only once.
Maybe everyone knew about this, and she was the only one who didn’t.
I think you really have to ask yourself if its worth it, the risk/reward.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
I don't think that there's any.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
At the end of the day you have to make him work for you.
It depends on a position, not person.
It is almost as if you are sleeping, but you are not.
This is a problem that the professor has to deal with.
If you do not have one that is fine, no one would expect you to have written much.
If you like the work, the people and how much your bringing home then stick with it.
This is a very unusual request.
This should not be an issue in big stations.
There are a few things you can do: 
What day do you want me to start? 
You have not indicate your country of residence or that of your friend.
I don't think there's any reason other than historical chance.
Don't worry too much about music theory yet.
If she doesn't like it, she can find something for you to do.
It very much depends on the grant in question.
I don't think that there's any.
The key is you have to find something that works for you, and your goals.
I have the same thing.
As for how to drain them, it depends on the type of vegetable.
No it does not affect your ratings.
I think it would.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
You don't need to know everything.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
You don't have to know.
Have you tried asking your employees?
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
Moisture-release is not a result of the cooking process but of the quality of the chicken.
It probably depends on the location and how much room you have to work with.
I think you're well on your way there.
I never worry about this.
If that is the case then you cannot bury it.
I don't think it makes any tremendous difference.
If you haven't, you should.
I think it's just a habit.
There are a few things you can do: 
It depends on what they are.
Did you overcook it?
There's not a lot you can do about that.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
I think you should do both.
If you will have 60 credits it is up to the employer.
Vinegar does a couple of things.
You answered your own question.
You should do it.
There are two things to consider:
Turn off the main breaker.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
Recently, I have had a very similar situation occur.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It depends on a position, not person.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
This is not a good idea.
This is not a good idea.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
Do you have a car?
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
There are two things to consider:
I'd say it primarily depends on two things:
Obviously, the best book for you depends a lot on what you are looking for.
All of the answers above are good.
I won't try to describe it, but here's how I would go about it:
Of course you can store them in the fridge.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
It depends on how it's used.
You could try BerlinLinienBus.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
If the property is good, go for it.
Most likely it is shiplap.
It depends on what they are.
It is very important to understand the culture of the place you work.
You don't have to know.
I have the same thing.
I think it is depends on the program.
This is a problem that the professor has to deal with.
It's not a good idea.
You are on the right path.
It's all in her head.
You don't have to know.
This doesn't answer your question, but:
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I have been to Dhaka many, many times.
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
I would say yes, but don't expect miracles.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
Some people do not like it if you begin your letter with "I".
I don't think that there's any.
You don't have to know.
How should I proceed about this?
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
Does this page answer your question?
It depends on what they are.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
You can use it, too.
Here's the issue as I see it.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
If you haven't, you should.
You can use it, too.
There is nothing new in what you describe.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
You don't have to know.
In the end, It's all about how you present it if questioned in an Interview.
I wouldn't give them detail about what you'll be doing, for who, or where.
I think you should do both.
That depends on who you ask.
I think it probably depends on your money.
I think it's just a habit.
I agree with Jolenealaska.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
There are a few things I think you should do.
You don't have to know.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
I've had this same problem.
Generally speaking, the slope of anything involving a house should be away from the house.
It depends entirely on your company and your contract.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
I've had this same problem.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
It depends on how it's used.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
I do this as well.
If you haven't, you should.
I think either version will be fine.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
What kind of insulation is it?
What does your contract say?
If you are a beginner and want to stain it, I would suggest you go with solid wood.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
There is no reason not to do them on the same day.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It's pretty much up to you.
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
It depends on what they are.
Yes, you have to file a tax return in Canada.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
It is possible, but I'm not aware of any evidence for it.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
I think there's a good solution to this.
It depends a bit on the programme, but the general answer is "stick to the 1000".
To my mind, it's a matter of how "big a break" you want.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
It depends on what they are.
There is no reason to worry.
There are a few things you can do: 
Yes, that is precisely correct.
I study in a university and live in its hostel.
I think it probably depends on your money.
The answer to your question is Gotye "Easy Way Out"
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Here is your procedure:
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I think you should do both.
I've been researching for years.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
Could it be The Cell from 2000?
There are a few things you can do: 
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It depends on the dish and how amenable it is at the stage you make the mistake.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
How much tax do I have to pay? 
Yes, there is a reason for it.
The more you weigh, the harder it is on your back.
It depends on how it's used.
I think you're looking for Mikey (1992).
It varies by the situation.
You don't have to know.
So how should I do this?
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I've used pandoc for this problem previously and it worked pretty well.
I think there isn't a general answer.
But in general, the longer the snippet you want to reuse, the worse the idea it is.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It's not a good idea.
You PROBABLY don't have any chance at the moment.
You don't need to know everything.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
I do this with lots of foods that are hard to separate after freezing.
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
As far as I know there is no such law.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
If that is the case then you cannot bury it.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
There is no test that can tell you if it is sealed or not.
It really doesn't matter.
You don't need to know everything.
Is it the easiest pan to use?
I think it is depends on the program.
The answer depends on where you are.
Short answer moisture and salts.
I'm a huge fan of the vintage glass bowl/reamer combination.
I don't think you can re-use the bones and expect to get a good product, no.
Interesting question but ultimately the answer is no.
the best thing to do with toddlers when it comes to food is to stop caring.
I'm not a fan of the test kits.
If this is the case, you really don't need to be as worried about steak.
I've been researching for years.
I think you can get away with thinset here.
You don't have to know.
It depends on how it's used.
The answer was a no.
How do you do that?
I am not entirely sure this is the right place to answer those questions.
I think you're looking for Mikey (1992).
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
My opinion is that I don't think you should force the issue.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
It makes absolutely NO difference.
If this is the case, you really don't need to be as worried about steak.
I think it is depends on the program.
You don't need to know everything.
Can you do this?
I don't think that there's any.
How do you do that?
I don't think that there's any.
I agree with Jolenealaska.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I think it's fine to ask this question.
I'm going to be very direct here.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
It could be that the roof is fine and the water is coming from elsewhere.
I don't think that word means what you think it means.
What kind of insulation is it?
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
I agree with everything Reven said.
I don't think that there's any.
Yes, you should mention your experience.
It depends on what they are.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
I don't think there are any web based tools that would allow you to do this.
Interesting series of questions, but I'm afraid I don't have an answer to all of them.
I had the same problem as you.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
That said, I'm guessing the answer is "no".
You should do it.
I told her that he did, if she wanted to believe in him.
It's not the size of the cup, it's the amount of coffee in it.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
There's not a lot you can do about that.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
This very much depends on your institution and your professor.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
What kind of insulation is it?
As far as I know there is no such law.
I don't know the credentials of this site, so take it with a grain of salt.
If she doesn't like it, she can find something for you to do.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
As Derrik mentioned, the Sagulator is probably your best bet.
It depends entirely on your company and your contract.
You answered your own question.
I agree with the other comments.
I've used it but, given a choice, I'll always opt for paper.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
Sounds like you need to make a 'Visa run'.
I've had this same problem.
The answer depends on where you are.
So how should I do this?
You don't have to know.
To directly answer your question: if you like the results with your ratio, it's reasonable.
), but it is not.
I don't think that there's any.
There are a few things you can do: 
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
There are many ways to structure an introduction.
There's not a lot you can do about that.
The goal is to get the bowl as empty as possible.
You don't have to worry.
In addition to the other answers, there's also a price discrimination component.
This is not a good idea.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
You don't have to worry.
This is the tip I find most useful:
There is no such index.
That's what I believe.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I would suggest Markdown.
I never worry about this.
There are a few things I think you should do.
I would look at this: U.S.
It's all in her head.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
The way you have it is fine.
I can think of a couple of options off the top of my head:
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
This very much depends on your institution and your professor.
I know this is difficult, but it's the only thing that will make things better.
All of the answers above are good.
You don't have to worry.
That makes no sense at all.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
Depends on your time scale, but generally, I don't think it would work.
Can you do this?
If they are not willing to give me a solid answer I ask them to call back later.
Sure, I've done this very trip.
You should do it.
You can use it, too.
If you haven't, you should.
I think it probably depends on your money.
I think you're looking for Mikey (1992).
I can think of a couple of options off the top of my head:
My opinion is that I don't think you should force the issue.
I am affraid there is not much you can do.
It's not too unusual.
A few things I learned:
How do you do that?
Now you don't have to be perfect on every answer.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
I've located an article that might be of some help: http://www.dsattorney.com/qa-pseudonyms-in-contracts/
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
I've had this same problem.
There are many ways to structure an introduction.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
Unfortunately the answer to your question is we simply do not know.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
I think it is depends on the program.
What day do you want me to start? 
I don't think that there's any.
You will have to make some adjustments, but don't let that stop you.
I think it probably depends on your money.
I think it is depends on the program.
There is no reason to worry.
It's also a matter of taste.
It's not a good idea.
Have you tried beef consommé ?
No it can't.
I think you're well on your way there.
You can buy it on amazon for $5.
Don't think of it as insurance for you in case you can't pay.
If they don't reply the thank you, it's neutral, no harm done.
You could try TripIt.
There is a very good book called On Food and Cooking, by Harold McGee.
This answer is based on my experience teaching undergraduate math in the US.
There are a few things I think you should do.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
I think it's fine to ask this question.
There is no reason not to do them on the same day.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
I think it is depends on the program.
The answer depends on where you are.
You will want to clean the area first.
Buy a new piece to fit.
In most cases the purpose of a credit check is to see if there is evidence of character problems.
While you claim this is a loan, it may not necessarily be seen as such by the IRS.
You could try something like a Philips SpotOn.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
There is no maximum.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
There are a couple of options that you could consider:
There's not a lot you can do about that.
You don't have to worry.
I think you should do both.
I think it is the nanny state thing.
You don't want to alienate your coworkers.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You can do it, too.
You're using the wrong type of screws.
Make sure it's not too big for you to be able to move.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
If you can get your hands on a file, you could modify a screw to be self-drilling.
I run the risk of appearing anti-social and unproductive. 
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
I'm not a fan of the test kits.
Vietnamese citizens need a visa to visit the USA.
It depends on how it's used.
You can always go to glycemicindex.com.
The two things you can do to really help here are:
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
In all probability, you should be able to board the flight.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
There's not a lot you can do about that.
Can you do this?
You got it right.
I don't think that there's any.
I won't try to describe it, but here's how I would go about it:
You don't have to know.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
How do you do that?
I don't think there are any web based tools that would allow you to do this.
I'm sure that this has been asked here but I can't find the answer.
It probably depends on the cut of meat.
You don't have to know.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
I think it is depends on the program.
I think there isn't a general answer.
You need to file a quarterly estimated tax payment to do this.
Depends on the loan.
Do you need to incorporate?
I was in a similar situation.
What matters to you is that the work is not getting done and the deadlines are in danger.
I had the same issue and it turned out to be air in the system.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
This is not a good idea.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
The cymbals don't have to be expensive.
What is your lid made of?
All of the previous answers are good.
You don't need any visa.
The answer depends on where you are.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
I had the same problem as you.
It's just worn out and not safe.
Maybe I'm missing something, but it sounds like you're communicating fairly well.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
That is your problem, not your supervisor's.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It is impossible to answer this question without a form check.
It probably depends on the location and how much room you have to work with.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
At the end of the day you have to make him work for you.
There are two things to consider:
what would be a good way to do this? 
I had the same problem, googled and found these solutions:
It depends entirely on your company and your contract.
I think it would.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
I agree with the other comments.
You don't have to know.
And it's not a qualification.
Depends on the loan.
I think it would.
I suspect it is to speed up boarding.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I agree with the other comments.
Vinegar does a couple of things.
What kind of IRA?
What day do you want me to start? 
I don't think that there's any.
There are a few things I think you should do.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
The answer to your question is Gotye "Easy Way Out"
I think it probably depends on your money.
The wood probably isn't rotten, it's just worn out.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
The answer depends on where you are.
I don't think that there's any.
I know you didn't ask for screws, but they do tend to be the most practical solution.
So think it in this way.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
Another thing to look at is your footware.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
I would suggest that you try ClearCheckbook.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
You don't have to worry.
I think there's a good solution to this.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
This is not a good idea.
There's not a lot you can do about that.
How do you do that?
It rather depends on which country you're in.
It's not a good idea.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
All of the previous answers are good.
Well, I wouldn't put it on my cv.
You will have to make some adjustments, but don't let that stop you.
This is a great one... 
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You can do it, too.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
If you haven't, you should.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
I think it would.
If she doesn't like it, she can find something for you to do.
I've done this in a similar situation.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
I'm not sure I get the situation:
Some things you might consider:
Is this the kind of person you want to do business with?
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
I believe the term you're looking for is Chibi
It depends on how it's used.
You don't have to know.
You can use it, too.
I've had this same problem.
I know this is difficult, but it's the only thing that will make things better.
Lateral support is probably very important.
It depends on how it's used.
There are a few things you can do: 
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
I've had good luck with SweetHome 3D.
As far as I know there is no such law.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
I agree with hobodave's answers, and let me add one more thing.
I think it is depends on the program.
Can you do this?
Thanks for the suggestions.
You do not need to worry.
This depends on what exactly you're applying for.
This is not a good idea.
The last thing I would look closer is that the one you are asking actually.
I think there isn't a general answer.
There are a few things you can do: 
I advice you to also take lessons for the basics.
The key is you have to find something that works for you, and your goals.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It's not a good idea.
It's not a good idea.
You don't have to know.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I think you've pretty much done your review.
I don't think it was a burger but rather a cupcake.
There are a few things I think you should do.
You don't have to know.
A little bit of baking soda will offset the pH of the tomatoes.
You burn more Calories digesting protein than you do carbohydrates and fat.
I'm confused on why you wouldn't want to have him as a coauthor ?
I have worked on a project that was like this.
If you do not have one that is fine, no one would expect you to have written much.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
You got it right.
You don't need to know everything.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
You answered your own question.
It depends on how it's used.
No you are not.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
Can you do this?
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I like crates better for a couple of reasons
If you feel you have too many commas, you do.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
I have the same thing.
I had the same problem as you.
They want to know what you have done to help them be more successful.
Some of what you can do:
You don't have to know.
Some of what you can do:
These numbers shouldn't impact you at all.
Yes, there is a chemical difference.
They can be out of level by a bit, but flat is important.
I would go for it.
You don't have to know.
I suggest you'd do like you would with a dog.
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
If your boss has a problem with that, then you have several options.
I would look at this: U.S.
There are a few things I think you should do.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
If you do not have one that is fine, no one would expect you to have written much.
You are on the right path.
In the end, there is nothing you can do if he's not willing to cooperate.
This is a big problem.
Does this page answer your question?
If you haven't, you should.
Have you considered making your own?
There are a few things I think you should do.
Yes it will help.
It's also a matter of taste.
), but the intervals between them are not the same.
This doesn't answer your question, but:
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
Take a look at these:
I think it probably depends on your money.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
I realized there is already an accepted answer but I figure I would add my 2 cents.
Yes it is common!
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
My opinion is that I don't think you should force the issue.
This is a big problem.
There are a few things I don't understand:
It depends on how it's used.
You should do it.
I don't think that there's any.
This is not a good idea.
It looks to me that this is set up for what you want:
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
This is not a good idea.
Problem is, the system doesn't account for people who could care less about money, or title.
Have you ever seen a strong vegan?
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
The key is you have to find something that works for you, and your goals.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
I think there's a good solution to this.
That is your problem, not your supervisor's.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I don't think that there's any.
Focus on one thing at a time so you don't waste time switching between task.
It is impossible to answer this question without a form check.
Your best bet is to refer to the owners manual of the furnace.
I think you should do both.
You don't have to know.
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
Work into it slowly.
You don't need to know everything.
If you haven't, you should.
There is no reason to worry.
You should do it.
The meat is definitely worth saving.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
No, you do not NEED a bread machine.
Yes, it is possible to publish a paper on model analysis.
In the end, there is nothing you can do if he's not willing to cooperate.
You PROBABLY don't have any chance at the moment.
If you mean what I think you mean, then Hebrew is noted for this.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I do not think there's any appreciable difference.
I agree with the other comments.
You should just ask your boss what he wants you to do.
No, being a graduate student in a PhD program is a full-time job.
I had the same issue and it turned out to be air in the system.
You don't have to worry.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
There are a few things I don't understand:
Yes, you should mention your experience.
It really doesn't matter.
These numbers shouldn't impact you at all.
If you haven't, you should.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
I think it is depends on the program.
This is a terrible idea.
The answer was a no.
I think it is great that you had a test conducted.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
Yes it is common!
You don't have to know.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
I think it would.
It depends entirely on your company and your contract.
I can think of two suggestions:
I've had one for several months.
I think there isn't a general answer.
I think it probably depends on your money.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
I think you're looking for Mikey (1992).
I don't think that there's any.
You don't have to know.
Yes, there is a rule against this.
What are your goals?
Depends on the loan.
I don't think that word means what you think it means.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It will become easier the more you do it.
So how should I do this?
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
You don't need any visa.
Depends on the loan.
I think you should do both.
There's no standard formula.
You will think you want to fret a not a lot harder than you actually need to.
You don't need any visa.
I was in a similar situation.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
Do you have any goals?
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
All of the answers above are good.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
Is this the kind of person you want to do business with?
Depends a bit on your furnace.
As far as I know there is no such law.
Do you have to wait?
But you can't know for sure the price that the fund will be worth at you payout date.
There are a few things I think you should do.
I think you've pretty much done your review.
All of the answers above are good.
Try some of the following:
I spend a lot of time in France and in the midwest US.
I think it is depends on the program.
I'm going to go out on a limb here...
3 is really the hardest to respond to; I'm not sure I have a good response.
But you can't know for sure the price that the fund will be worth at you payout date.
I would not do this for exactly the reasons you've asked about: 
The answer depends on where you are.
There are two possible causes for this:
If your long stay visa for Switzerland is valid, then you will not need a transit visa.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
I think the answer that we don't know.
Yes, although you probably want to chop it up.
You don't need a visa to invest in US equity.
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
Turn off the main breaker.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
I think it would.
Body shape has a lot to do with it.
A few more point to think about:
Now you don't have to be perfect on every answer.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
I'm afraid we are out of luck in this one.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
If she doesn't like it, she can find something for you to do.
I guess it really depends on your own beliefs and situation.
I would avoid freezing them as it will change the texture.
I think it probably depends on your money.
You don't need to know everything.
It varies by the situation.
It very much depends on the grant in question.
This is the same question you asked a couple of days ago.
I don't think that word means what you think it means.
2. You may need to see a councilor to help you with the child situation.
I have the same thing.
From what I understand this is what you can do :
Sure, I've done this very trip.
I have the same thing.
I think the answer that we don't know.
If you feel you have too many commas, you do.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I think it probably depends on your money.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
I think you should do both.
The more detailed answer to this questions largely depends on where you go.
You are on the right path.
You don't have to know.
There is no such index.
Stop, go to a veterinarian.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
The answer depends on where you are.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
There is no reason not to do them on the same day.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
Primer/paint will not work.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I agree with the other comments.
The way you have it is fine.
I would say a chef's knife, for sure.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
It's also a matter of taste.
I agree with the other comments.
This depends highly on the genre.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
I was in a similar situation.
I think it's fine to ask this question.
I have the same thing.
The hard answer is a straight no.
I suggest you to take a look at rememberthemilk.com.
No you are not.
If you do not have one that is fine, no one would expect you to have written much.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
This is not a good idea.
It's possible for two airlines to share the same code, under some circumstances.
2. You may need to see a councilor to help you with the child situation.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
There is no such index.
I would go for it.
This is not necessarily an issue.
You can use it, too.
If what you are looking for is much higher, they get the picture.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
The two tools I have used to make my own pasta are rollers and extruders.
Depends a bit on your furnace.
Here's the issue as I see it.
You could try BerlinLinienBus.
I had the same problem as you.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It's not a good idea.
Some things you might consider:
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
There are three options:
I think this is very subjective question and will depend on who the judge is.
I think you should do both.
If you want to be a manager, that's another story.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
I don't think twice about leaving a dutch oven in the stove overnight, at a low temperature.
There are three options:
The answer depends on where you are.
It is possible, but I'm not aware of any evidence for it.
That makes no sense at all.
It depends on what they are.
It depends on what they are.
As Adel points out, you're going to see this in a lot of companies.
I had the same problem as you.
I guess it really depends on your own beliefs and situation.
As you can see in this simple example there is a lot of information.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
The way you have it is fine.
You don't have to worry.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
You should just ask your boss what he wants you to do.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
You don't need to know everything.
I do not think there's any appreciable difference.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
You will have to make some adjustments, but don't let that stop you.
If you're going to say "No", do it as you're doing here.
It's pretty much up to you.
I've had this same problem.
Also it is useful to keep the consistency in your story.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
The answer depends on where you are.
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
Your problem is probably the temperature of the chocolate.
2. You may need to see a councilor to help you with the child situation.
I'd say something along the lines of "why?
I think it's just a habit.
It's not a good idea.
There are a few things you can do: 
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I can think of a couple of options off the top of my head:
It depends on what they are.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
If you don't do that you're a bad supervisor and you're not serving him well.
I think it really depends on how much you take out of your Nationwide account each month.
It probably depends on the cut of meat.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
While I can't give a definitive answer, I can just say it's somewhat to very common.
Volcanic water is not a problem.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
i think it depends what you want:
You will think you want to fret a not a lot harder than you actually need to.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
I'm thinking it's a bad idea. 
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
All of the answers above are good.
You have a problem.
I've had good luck with SweetHome 3D.
) Take notes on the papers you read.
The two things you can do to really help here are:
The answer was a no.
If I were you, I'd move on.
Unfortunately the answer to your question is we simply do not know.
It's not a good idea.
This depends on what exactly you're applying for.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
Unfortunately, this question cannot be answered in its full generality.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
There is no such index.
Depends on your time scale, but generally, I don't think it would work.
I can think of a couple of options off the top of my head:
If this is the case, you really don't need to be as worried about steak.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
I would personally beware of the Motley Fool.
If you are relatively new to the organization, performance reviews may not be done in the first year.
I think there isn't a general answer.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
It depends on what they are.
If you haven't, you should.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
It's not a good idea.
Can you do this?
You don't need any visa.
Well, you may be without a job.
I think it is depends on the program.
You have to decide what you want to get out of this.
You should have no problem using the bag.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
I wouldn't give them detail about what you'll be doing, for who, or where.
Other than that you don't have a tax issue.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
It's all about diet and exercise.
I agree with the other comments.
But don't worry, it can come back fast.
English is really widespread, so that would be your best bet.
Unofficially it is not.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
If you haven't, you should.
The answer was a no.
I think the answer that we don't know.
I think it is depends on the program.
I had the same problem as you.
Is this a scam?
I don't think that word means what you think it means.
Yes, it was very much.
Body shape has a lot to do with it.
I think it would.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
It's not a good idea.
I don't see why there should be any problem with this whatsoever.
If you want to install it yourself, great.
If you do not have one that is fine, no one would expect you to have written much.
I had the same problem as you.
There is no reason not to do them on the same day.
Do you have a car?
), but it is not.
I think there's a good solution to this.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
Not at all true.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You should do it.
I was in a similar situation.
I had the same problem as you.
This depends on what exactly you're applying for.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
There are 2 things you can do to make things less sticky:
If all of the money needs to be liquid, T-Bills from a broker are the way to go.
I think it's fine to ask this question.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
This is not a good idea.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
It's not a good idea.
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
If they want you to use a certain technique, then that's part of the training process.
I would even venture to say that it is THE question.
Couple of things to add:
This is not a good idea.
I don't think that there's any.
I don't think that there's any.
You don't want to alienate your coworkers.
You don't need to know everything.
What I mean by this is that you could be seeing the new normal.
Take a look at these:
Playdates do not have to be every day, although children may like it to be.
I think it probably depends on your money.
You don't have to worry.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
From personal experience, it depends on the child.
You can do it, too.
I am affraid there is not much you can do.
You certainly can and should ask for anything that is very important to you.
Depends a bit on your furnace.
The short answer is: it should not.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
Now, I have been in sports for 41 years.
You need to add this to your resume because it is the only position you have had.
My guess is that you don't have real cheese in your sandwich.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
This should not be an issue in big stations.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
There are two things to consider:
I think it probably depends on your money.
The short answer is: it should not.
You can buy it on amazon for $5.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
There really isn't any good ways that I'm aware of.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
Is this the kind of person you want to do business with?
Yes, there is a rule against this.
I agree with the other comments.
I'm assuming that the soil is frozen.
You don't need to know everything.
Do you have to wait?
I've done this in a similar situation.
I've visted this site many a times, very interesting.
There are two things to consider:
How do you do that?
It's pretty much up to you.
There are a few things you can do: 
So my proposed answer is "yes".
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
From what I understand this is what you can do :
At the end of the day you have to make him work for you.
The answer was a no.
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
The answer to this and all such similar questions is in two stages:
In fact, depending on the law of your country, they may even be required to do so.
If that is the case then you cannot bury it.
I think it is the nanny state thing.
I do this as well.
It probably depends on the cut of meat.
You don't have to know.
Because this question is unanswered.
From what I understand this is what you can do :
That's what I believe.
Depends on the loan.
I'd also tie a rope to the other end of the brush.
As far as I know there is no such law.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
You don't need to know everything.
I think the answer that we don't know.
If you want to install it yourself, great.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Go to your local music stores and ask them.
If this is new, I would do this:
It sounds like you just undercooked them.
It is impossible to answer this question without a form check.
This will heavily depend on the specific country you are talking about.
I have the same thing.
I don't think you'd want to use salt for a couple of reasons:
There are a few things you can do: 
I've done this in a similar situation.
If you're going to say "No", do it as you're doing here.
You don't have to worry.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
If this is the case, you really don't need to be as worried about steak.
If they want you to use a certain technique, then that's part of the training process.
So I'd take the time to decision stats with a grain of salt.
I don't think there's any reason other than historical chance.
Hope this is what you are looking for.
3) Just in case, there is always the possibility of post-traumatic memory loss.
I think something you might want to look at is a service called Dwolla.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I don't think that there's any.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
It sounds like you're feeding him before his nap.
It is a very low sound?
Yes, there is a chemical difference.
Seal all the edges like your life depends on it.
You don't have to know.
There are a few possible reasons.
I have the same thing.
You will think you want to fret a not a lot harder than you actually need to.
It always works for me.
There are a few things you can do: 
You can do it, too.
There are three options:
So think it in this way.
Take it to a professional.
Maybe this could work for you.
It looks to me that this is set up for what you want:
This is a very unusual request.
There is no maximum.
There is no reason to worry.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
This is not a good idea.
First of all I'd like to clarify a few things:
If you do not have one that is fine, no one would expect you to have written much.
I don't think that there's any.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Seems your best bet would be to use resistance bands.
Microwave would be your best bet.
You don't have to worry.
You should do it.
In the US, it will depend on the school.
I had the same problem as you.
This is not necessarily an issue.
The more you do it, the faster you will be.
Personally, I would bring it up directly.
I agree with everything Reven said.
I don't think telling your boss you're not reading the email is a good strategy.
I think it probably depends on your money.
You don't have to know.
It's not a good idea.
You can do it, too.
You don't need to know everything.
I had the same problem, googled and found these solutions:
The key thing to realize here is that it's not your job to make people do their work.
I think there's a good solution to this.
If you already own the generator I say go for it and try it out.
Treat it like you would ammunition.
i think it depends what you want:
You don't need to know everything.
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
I'm a fan of http://www.writersbeat.com myself.
I'm not a fan of the test kits.
I think there isn't a general answer.
I think there isn't a general answer.
Sometime if you really want it you might need to pay an agency to get the place for you.
While I can't give a definitive answer, I can just say it's somewhat to very common.
If you haven't, you should.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
No, you do not NEED a bread machine.
There are a few things I think you should do.
I agree with Jolenealaska.
You will not be able to collect your bags, as there is no airside baggage claim in Oman.
I've had this same problem.
I don't know of a residential use.
You CANNOT do this without rewiring.
It depends on what they are.
In the US, it will depend on the school.
This is not a good idea.
I think it is depends on the program.
I can think of two suggestions:
Depends on the loan.
I realized there is already an accepted answer but I figure I would add my 2 cents.
There are a few things I think you should do.
There are a few things you can do: 
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
Yes, there is at least one to my knowledge.
In the first case, I think it is quite common, as people come and go.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
There are a couple of options that you could consider:
I cannot say for sure, because I have not been in this particular place, but...
I don't know of a residential use.
I have few suggestions for you:
You certainly can and should ask for anything that is very important to you.
You have a problem.
There are a few things I think you should do.
You don't have to worry.
I've always had luck with VRBO.com.
There is no test that can tell you if it is sealed or not.
I don't think that there's any.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
The more detailed answer to this questions largely depends on where you go.
The key is you have to find something that works for you, and your goals.
What matters to you is that the work is not getting done and the deadlines are in danger.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
I think it would.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
The best way to save on clothes is up to you.
Yes, you should make a résumé.
I don't think that there's any.
Some things you might consider:
I have the same thing.
You shouldn't feel any obligation at all.
I've had this same problem.
I was in a similar situation.
I think you really have to ask yourself if its worth it, the risk/reward.
At the end of the day you have to make him work for you.
I think you aren't far off.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You don't have to know.
English is really widespread, so that would be your best bet.
You may have to experiment and find what you like.
I think it would.
Yes, you can do it with a passive Y-splitter.
I know you didn't ask for screws, but they do tend to be the most practical solution.
This depends on what exactly you're applying for.
This is a great one... 
I have to add a few things to Randomman's answer:
One tool that can help you to control the frequency of your strokes is a tempo trainer.
The two things you can do to really help here are:
In the end, It's all about how you present it if questioned in an Interview.
Computer Science This really depends on the institution and the group.
To my knowledge, there's no time requirement.
Take a look at these:
There's nothing that you can do or not do to change that other person's wages.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
No you are not.
Can you do this?
There is no reason to worry.
You will have absolutely no issues.
It depends on how it's used.
It really depends on how the employer documents it.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
The key thing to realize here is that it's not your job to make people do their work.
The best thing you can do is to know your stuff.
If you have the ability, you can rearrange songs yourself.
I am not sure this is the right site for the question.
At the end of the day you have to make him work for you.
I think the answer that we don't know.
I think it is depends on the program.
I think there's a good solution to this.
You can do it, too.
Here's the issue as I see it.
What kind of insulation is it?
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
You don't need any visa.
I agree with the other comments.
I don't think that there's any.
If you want to be a manager, that's another story.
This is not a good idea.
It depends entirely on your company and your contract.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
This is my recipe I translated from Italian website.
Not a direct answer to the question, but something to consider.
It always works for me.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Not a direct answer to the question, but something to consider.
When I was a kid, we used to run over them with the car.
You need to identify the source.
), but it is not.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
There are two possible causes for this:
It very much depends on the grant in question.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
I was in a similar situation.
The professional way is to let them know that you are not intending to take the position offered.
Sure, you have advisors, but they can only guess what is going to be.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
They probably won't block your entry, as long as you pay the fine.
I think you've pretty much done your review.
Couple of things to add:
I think it's fine to ask this question.
The answer depends on where you are.
You might want to check out the rasgueado technique.
I agree with the other comments.
Short Zen answer would be:
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
It rather depends on which country you're in.
It depends on how it's used.
I'm of the same mind as SF.
The key thing to realize here is that it's not your job to make people do their work.
That way if someone finds where you were, they know the direction to look for you in.
Yes it will help.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
This question is answered on wikipedia:
Voltron is the name of the show you're looking for
You are on the right path.
This is a terrible idea.
I have the same thing.
I don't think it makes any tremendous difference.
If you haven't, you should.
